he lavender shape beside him.

	Eagle Eye held both hooves over his mouth as tears rolled down his face.  He grinned—albeit in a crooked, quivering fashion.  Tiny, inward squeaks emanated from his flushed chest.

	"Nnnnngh..."  A familiar figure shuffled up from the distant engine room, rubbing his aching skull.  "My h-head..."  Ebon blinked blearily, then gasped as he stared—wide eyed—into the thoroughly wrecked observation room.  "Whoah.  What in the hay happened here?!"

	"Phweeeeee!"  Overwhelmed, Eagle practically pounced the stallion, hugging him close and repeatedly kissing his ear.  "I love you I love you I love you I love youuuuu!"

	"Gaaah!"  Ebon braced himself against the doorframe and nervously patted Eagle's back.  "H-hey, feeling's mutual.  But... um... Eagle!  Stop slobbering over my ear!"

	"Hmmmmmmm..."  Eagle nuzzled and nuzzled and nuzzled Ebon's neck.  "Just so glad that you're okay.  Everything's turning out okaaaaaaay..."

	"Yeah..."  Ebon smiled, running a hoof through the unicorn's silken mane.  "Who'd a thunk it..."

	Zaid glanced at Ebon, then at Eagle Eye.  He blinked, then looked down at Elma's dormant figure.  Without a second's hesitation, he hoisted the changeling up by her shoulders and rammed her body into the two hugging stallions.

	"Eeep!" Eagle's eyes bulged.

	"D'oh!"  Ebon winced.  "Zaid, what the buck—?!"

	Almost immediately, the changeling's eyes flashed open with a burst of green flame.  Elma sputtered and gasped for breath, as if coming up from a deep plunge.

	Bellesmith immediately looked over, muzzle agape.

	Elma stumbled back on four quivering hooves.  She rubbed her scalp before leaning against a rattling bulkhead.  "Unnnngh... wh-what a rush?  Where did that come from?"

	"You're welcome."  Zaid sat back with a smug grin.  "It's what I like to call shipping and receiving."  He turned towards Josho.  "Eh?  Eh?"

	"Meh."

	"Belle...?"  Kera gulped and looked nervously over the mare's shoulder, trembling.  "Who is that pony with the green eyes...?"

	"Somepony who helped you, darling..."  Belle kissed Kera's forehead and smiled lovingly at the shapeshifter.  "Somepony who helped us all..."

	Elma glanced nervously at Belle.  She bore a weak, confused smile, then plopped down on her haunches with a dizzied expression.

	"Hey, uh..."  Zaid scratched his scalp.  "Not for nothing, but..."  He glanced at all the others.  "Whatever happened to the east horse?"
		//------------------------------//
		// Not Quite a Maiden Voyage		//------------------------------//

	"Grnnnghhh!"  Rainbow Dash—sword gripped in her teeth—swung the burning weapon up high.

	Razzar ducked, twirled athletically to his side, and sprang forward on two rear talons.

	Rainbow dropped the blade lengthwise in her hooves, rolled backwards, and used Razzar's momentum to vault him across the control room.

	He flew, twirled, and landed in the center—skidding to a stop just an inch before coming into contact with the purple muck trickling down from above.

	Meanwhile, Rainbow flapped her wings, flew in a circle, and barreled towards him with the sword dragging in two hooves.  Grunting, she spun her body and slashed the burning blade in the process.

	Razzar ducked inexplicably backwards, his body bending grotesquely as it balanced on his tail.  He dodged the blade, then lifted one lower leg, its talons clasping around the tip of the sword.  With one twist, he sent Rainbow's body jerking aside from her grip to the hilt.

	"Ooomf!"  Rainbow rolled across the ground.

	"Hresshaaa!"  Razzar jumped her from behind.

	Pressing the sword against the floor like a pole, she thrusted her rear legs backwards, uppercutting him savagely across the chin.  A sharp tooth or two flew as she hopped up to her hooves, spun around, and swung the blade as hard as she could.

	Cl-Clank!  Razzar readied himself with a pair of forward talons, blocking her swing and pressing back.  The two struggled for dominance while sparks occasionally spat from the contact of his claws to the Sword of Solstice.

	All the while, Pilate scurried from platform to platform with the skystone shard in his grasp.  He panted, ears twitching to the sound of the frenzied combat behind him.

	"Which one is north... which one?!"  The stallion hissed under his teeth while his helm rattled.  "Blast it!  If only I had normal eyes, I might be able to determine..."

	He paused, his head jerking towards the shard.  Through the red-and-black field of his technologically facilitated senses, he detected a fluctuating concentration of lines across the skystone.  It only changed in frequency whenever he swiveled around, tilting the skystone in random directions.

	As the battle rattled on, Pilate muttered quietly to himself.  "This is amber skystone... which, according to Roarke, was harvested from the north field."  He gulped.  "Placing it on the north pedestal will bring us to where we need to go.  But we're so close to the north edge of the world as it is."  He tilted his helm up, then glanced back at the shard with pursing lips.  "It... It would have to resonate the strongest with the north platform... for the leylines would connect quickest.  That means..."

	To test his theory, he trotted in a circle—much slower and with greater concentration—all the while keeping his helm trained on the skystone as he endeavored to measure the intensity of its glow.

	In the meantime—

	"Hresshaaa!" Razzar shoved against Rainbow Dash and pounced on her.

	"Ohhhhh learn a new tune already!" Rainbow sputtered, slashing high.

	She grazed his shoulder with the burning blade.

	"Haaauckkktshh!" Razzar plummeted to the floor, gripping his bleeding shoulder.

	"Haaah!"  Rainbow Dash capitalized on the situation by slashing her blade straight down... and severing Razzar's long tail.  THWACK!

	"Aaaaaa-gaaaaught!" The naga tilted his skull to the ceiling and howled, his frill fanning spasmatically outward from his neck.

	"Ghnngh!"  Rainbow limped back, sweating heavily as she leaned her body against the Sword of Solstice.  "That's what you get!  Try to lay the smackdown on me and my friend?!  Not in Commander Hurricane's hood, ya overgrowned suitcase—"  Something writhed and jerked in her peripheral vision.  "Wait... what the—?"  She glanced down.

	Razzar's severed tail jerked, flailed, and suddenly launched itself at her like a python.

	"Oh ICK!!"  She chaotically flailed with the Sword of Solstice, trying desperately to slice the thing to ribbons.  "Die die die die!" Cl-cl-clank!

	The tail wormed around the blade, slithered up, and launched itself like a noose around her neck.

	"Hckkkkkt-t-t-t-t!" Rainbow wheezed.  She dropped the Sword, stumbled back, and clutched at the meaty appendage, fighting to dislodge it.

	Trailing blood, Razzar slowly got up, wobbled from a slight lack of balance, and lurched towards her.  "Let's see if your wings like to grow back..."  Chiiing!  He bore his claws at full length and prepared to swipe her face.

	Rainbow fell to her knees, hissing for breath as her fuzzy blue face turned bluer.  Her nostrils flared and flared.  At last, she clenched her eyes shut, shuddered, and reopened them with red-on-yellow fury.  A halo of ruby light pulsed around her neck, until—

	FLASH!  Her pendant fired a crimson beam, mealting straight through the ensnaring lizard's tail.  The appendage fell loose, only for her to catch it, spin with a snarl, and fling it like a leather flail straight up Razzar's snout.  WHAP!

	"Gaaaaugh!"  He stumbled backwards, spitting blood.

	"Hah!"  Rainbow hopped straight up and hovered on flapping wings.  "Not everyday I kick someone's ass with their ass!"

	"I will tear out your heart and f-feed it to you!" Razzar spat.

	"Yeah, good luck with that."  FWOOSH!  Rainbow glided straight into him, spearing the reptile down the center.

	Lifted by her flying figure, he tried slashing at her wings, but she swiftly jerked to the side until the two of them were gliding in a swift circle along the granite circumference of the room.  Tangled together in mid-air, Rainbow wrangled her hooves around Razzar's skull and slammed his face against the blurring wall, grinding his scales into the stone surfaces.  Razzar winced and hissed, smoke forming from the friction of his constant contact. At last, he found the strength knee her hard in the chest, and the two went sprawling across the platform behind Pilate.

	The zebra in question had finally stumbled upon a pedestal where the skystone shard glowed the brightest.

	"Finally!  This is it!"  Concentrating, he held the shard in two hooves, lowered it to the pedestal, and watched as bolts of archaic energy shot between the stone dais and the crystalline "key."  The entire control room shook, and the stallion stumbled backwards with a nervous breath.  He looked left and right, his helm detecting movement in the circular room's walls.

	Clak-Clak!  Something snapped.  Suddenly, whistling winds barreled into the room.  Pilate watched as the room lowered down on twelve descending columns.

	The control room, as it turned out, was situated in the very belly of Stratopolis, and activating the pedestal lowered it by its twelve support struts so that it gave those situated on the platform a three hundred and sixty degree view of the hazy gray world in every direction.

	Rainbow Dash tumbled backwards from the wind, rolling to a pained stop besides the Sword of Solstice.

	Razzar, caught of guard, stabbed his forward claws into the stone floor and held tight as air pressure tugged his body in random directions.

	In the meanwhile, Pilate anchored himself by the north pedestal, his helm being overwhelmed by the glowing energy of the shard.  He tilted his head away—facing west—and gasped as soon as he noticed the clouds along the horizon dissolving.

	"What in the frig is happening?!" Rainbow stammered above the noise of howling winds.

	"What else?!"  Pilate grinned wide.  "We're moving!"


		//------------------------------//
		// I Can See Clearly Now		//------------------------------//

	Elma gasped, her green eyes pulsing.  "Stratopolis," she murmured quietly.  Weakly, the frail changeling lifted her head.  "Everypony?  Something... s-something's happening—"

	"Uh huh.  That's nice."  Josho strolled past her and shimmied up the vertical crawlspace as quickly as his obese body would allow him.  "Hey!  Thunder Deer!"  He climbed into the cockpit behind Floydien, sweating and panting.  "The mutant pegasi just gave us a shave so close they're liable to set up a barber shop in my ass.  The front half of your Nancy Jane is an open gaping hole.  You understand how friggin' ugly a picture this is?  You gotta pull this puppy around and take us as far from the center of the store as you can before the zombies decide to come after all our collective sideburns!"

	"Easier the spitting than the glimmering," Floydien droned, pointing a cloven hoof out the cockpit window.  "What does the boomer's eyes see?"

	"Awwwwwwwwww crud biscuits," Josho wheezed, gawking at a solid line of winged abominations hurdling their way from the largest structure.  "It's like they come in waves!"

	Eagle Eye climbed up, followed by Ebon Mane.  "Looks like it's all clear below decks.  What's the situation?"  His eyes bulged.  "Oh fluff."

	"Princess, if I had some soap..." Josho muttered.

	"Whoah!"  Ebon gasped, glancing towards the right.  "There's another ship out there!"

	"It's the Tarkington," Josho said.  "That's where blondie and Prowse are."

	"Propsy is on th-that thing?!" Ebon panted and panted.  "Guys!  We... we g-gotta warn them!"

	"My kingdom for a sound stone..."  Josho leaned forward and spat over Floydien's shoulder.  "Better think of something smart, Secchy!  You're about to have guests!"

	"Nnngh!"  Floydien seethed, shoving Josho back.  "Don't get boomer juices all over Floydien juices!"  Snorting, he glared towards the windy horizon.  "Let us engage in the think think!"

	"The Tarkington looks like a freight ship," Eagle Eye said.  "I can't imagine they'd have any real weapons!"

	"That's because they don't have any real weapons!" Josho snarled.  "Just a bunch of crazy, tongue-tied badasses in tattoos and an old fart!"

	"But they've got Propsy!"  Ebon squeaked.  "We gotta save them!  I mean... r-right?"

	"Eagle?"  Josho glanced over his shoulder.  "Let's board the top deck.  We can make the monsters kiss manaflare, Franzington and Ledomare style."

	Eagle nervously nodded, but pointed at the elk.  "Things would be a lot smoother if we had his deathbolts on our side."

	"Floydien agrees."  Floydien put the ship into a neutral hover and climbed out of his seat.  "Give me glimmer room atop Nancy's flank."

	"Then who's gonna fly us?" Ebon asked.

	"Floydien has a constetant in mind."  The elk shouted down the crawlspace.  "Hey!  Clown boomer!"

	"Guys!" Eagle's voice cracked.  He braced himself against Ebon while pointing a wild hoof out the windshield.  "Look!  From up high!"

	Josho squinted.  "What in the popcorn fart..."

	"Not them again," Ebon murmured with folded ears.

	"No!  Something's different about them!" Eagle Eye exclaimed.  "Their flight pattern!"  He grinned from ear to lavender ear.  "I've seen it before!"

	"H-huh?"




	"H'lanna rekkhar drenna dre'nnden," Arcshod muttered.

	"Right..."  Seclorum nodded, patting the back of Prowse's chair while ponies murmured in fear behind them.  "We can't stay dormant here forever.  Somepony's gotta deal with those winged freaks."

	"And just how in the bloody hell do you intend to do that?"  Prowse cackled.  "Piss out the window at them?"

	"I wasn't asking you for ideas..."

	"Hey!"  Props pointed out the windshield of the Tarkington.  "Lookie!  The Lounge!"

	"Oh please, Propsicle."  Prowse rolled his eyes.  "That's the last thing we need—"  FWOOSH!  Something black and glossy soared straight over the ship's hull.  "The moon's arse!" he exclaimed.

	Everypony behind him craned their necks to see.



	The spherical vessel hovered into place between the other two airships and the approaching wave of undead.  Despite the constant sheets of rain, the forward hull of the vessel slid open.  Standing on the platform beneath the receding dome were three fully-armed naga.  Cocking their manarifles, they all turned and fired as one at the ravenous pegasi.  The air lit up with amber fury, splitting the clouds into errant streams of mist.

	In splotches and sprays of purple juices, the abominations fell.  Their pained shrieks were impossible to hear over the sound of constant manafire.  It was a gradual process, but their numbers eventually thinned, dissolving the charge into a flailing flock of confused, aimless drones.

	The Noble Jury flew a little closer to the Lounge's ship.  The door to the cockpit opened, and out trotted several gawking ponies.  Josho, Eagle Eye, Ebon Mane, and Floydien stood on the top deck first.  Finally Zaid poked his head out, squinting curiously at the violent light show happening off the ship's port side.  Belle climbed up into the cockpit.  She had Kera balanced on her flank.  Curious, the two jittery equines glanced out.

	"Zaid... what... who...?" Belle murmured.

	"Sorry."  Zaid shrugged.  "I got nothin'."

	"I don't get it..."  Ebon Mane leaned in towards the rest.  "Why aren't they shooting at us?"

	"Maybe they had a change of heart," Josho grumbled.

	"Not a change of heart," a voice crackled loudly over a speaker system built within the hollow of the Lounge's hull.  "A change of mind."  The three lizards held their fire, squirming slightly as a fourth figure emerged from the ship's interior behind them, training a hoof-mounted manacannon at their bodies.  "An energy discharge hotter than the surface of the sun being constantly trained on their scales will do that..."

	Zaid instantly smiled.

	"That... that voice..."  Belle murmured.

	"Is that...?" Kera squeaked.

	A patch of red light from the Noble Jury's skystone glinted off the metal mare's copper lenses.  "Forgive me for being late.  It took a great deal more convincing than I anticipated to make these lizards fly right."

	One of the Lounge grunted through his mask.  "We'll eat your heart out of your ribcage for this—" A manablast bloodily grazed his shoulder.  "Gaaaaught!"

	"Quiet, breeder."  Roarke's breath blew at the smoke trailing out of her gun.  "Before I decide to use your rectum for a silencer."

	"It is!  It is Roarke!"  Eagle Eye hopped up and down.

	"Oh!  That's wonderful..."  Ebon blinked.  "...I think?"

	"You're welcome," Roarke muttered.  She nodded her head towards the Tarkington.  "Pass word along to the ponies you've got in your gray mane'd coltfriend's ship, fat one," she said to Josho.  "We'll hold off the flying menace for them as well as you."

	"Uhhh..."  Josho sighed.  "We didn't exactly pack enough sound stones to make that sort of communication work in this rainstorm."

	Roarke's lenses pistoned in and out.  "Well," she said.  "Looks like you're still the same idiots you were when I first left."

	"It's her alright," Ebon muttered.

	"Hold on for a friggin' sec!"  Josho frowned.  "All this dayum time, you were one of th-them?  Hiding in their Ledo-forsaken robes n'crap?"

	"Yes, breeder.  Some of us can fit into them."

	"Just what in the Hell is your plan in all this?!"

	"Simple."  Roarke cocked her weapon and aimed it at the group of fidgeting reptiles.  "I keep my gun on them, and they keep their guns on the winged ponies.  We stay here, holding this position, eliminating all bogies for as long as it takes."

	"Uhhhh..."  Ebon blinked.  "For as long as what takes?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Eagle Eye gulped, trotting forward.  "Guys?"

	Belle craned her neck.  "What is it, EE?"

	"Something..."  Eagle squinted at the clouds swirling all around them.  "Something is happening..."

	"Gnnngh!"  Elma flailed, attempting to climb up the top rung of the crawlspace's ladder.

	"Elma!"  Belle rushed over and helped her into the cockpit.  "Careful!  What's—?"

	"I... I-I was trying to t-tell you!"  The changeling hobbled out onto the rainswept top deck with Belle's help.  "Something's wrong!  All of Stratopolis is changing!"

	"Not changing..."  Eagle gulped.  "Moving."

	"Huh?!" Josho did a double-take.

	"Floydien sees it too," the elk muttered.  He pointed with his antlers.  "Look.  Up in the shimmer shimmer.  It thins, yes yes yes?"

	Several ponies gasped and murmured.  On board the Tarkington, dozens of equine faces peered out the portholes, gazing in shock.

	It was subtle at first, but as the seconds ticked by, the winds grew less and less turbulent.  The clouds grew less and less thick.  Swirling mists gave way to patches of clear air.  Huge thunder clouds split down the middle.  Suddenly, in sparse beams of twinkling light, a nebulous aura pierced the malaise from random spots above.

	"Starlight..."  Eagle Eye murmured.  He trotted to the edge of the deck, gawking at the centermost structure.  "It's... it's heading away from us!"

	"Wh-what?"  Ebon spun to stare.

	Sure enough, the clouds weren't only dissipating, they were receding.  Following the large structure, the entire cyclonic phenomenon billowed away, streaking towards the distant horizon at a rapidly accelerating rate.  The Jurists on board the top deck glanced left and right, observing the shattered remains of temples and black obeslisks as they drifted by faster and faster.

	SWOOOSH!  One large temple in particular soared directly overhead, disrupting the air around the three vessels.

	The ponies on board both the Noble Jury and Tarkington gasped, floundering about for a solid hoof-hold.  Once they stabilized, they watched as several more temples whizzed past them, sailing off against the wind like a squadron of concrete edifices.

	"Look!" Eagle Eye pointed.  "The creatures!"

	It was difficult to follow Eagle Eye's gesture, for the undead flocks were almost nowhere to be seen.  In the distance, a thin line of leather bodies shrieked in the winds, but they too became an obscure shadow upon the horizon.

	"They're being carried away...?" Ebon murmured aloud.

	"It'd make some sense," Josho said, nodding.  The air grew chilly again, and the obese stallion shivered, his breath visible in the arctic air.  "They keep squirting out of the center building, and that's the thing carrying all of Stratopolis, ain't it?"

	"But I don't get it!" Ebon exclaimed.  "Why's this happening?  Why now?"

	On board the Lounge's ship, Roarke's muzzle hung agape.  She gulped and murmured, "It's happening..."  Her voice carried loosely over the still, frozen air.  "They've succeeded..."

	"Huh?"  Josho turned his head towards the Lounge's ship.  "What was that?"

	"Who's succeeded?" Ebon remarked.

	All the while, Belle blinked.  As she felt Kera's trembles atop her shoulders, she gasped.  Her eyes grew misty.  "Pilate..."
	


		//------------------------------//
		// Zebra Versus Naga: The Musical		//------------------------------//

	Pilate gnashed his teeth.  "Come on... come on..."  Raindrops ricocheted off his metal helm as he concentrated on the skystone shard in front of him.  The glow of the crystal intensified, and the zebra could feel the winds all around him whipping in one uniform direction: against him and away from the north pedestal.  "Blessed Spark, it's working.  It's working!"

	"Hrssshhh!"  Razzar knocked Rainbow Dash back with a savage punch.  Lightning flashed in his peripheral.  Instead of immediately leaping on the pony, the naga lurched in place, panting.  He tilted his head aside and blinked his slitted eyes.  "No..."  He saw the clouds vanishing, their last dissipating mists brimming with electrical energy.  All around the descended platform they stood on, the buildings of Stratopolis could be seen surging northward, their granite bodies and dark obelisks reflected in the waves of an increasingly visible ocean below.  Chunks of ice and splatches of frost shimmered in the moonlight.  "NO!" 

	"Hnnngh!"  Rainbow Dash pounced on his backside.  She swung the Sword of Solstice over and clamped it around Razzar's neck like a vice.  The naga struggled against her weight while sheets of rain evaporated upon contact with the blade.  "What's the matter, Razzar?!" she sputtered in his ear.  "All this time, you've wanted nothing but more skystone!"  Along the northern horizon, a thin line of red energy continually pulsed.  The city of Stratopolis hurled towards it.  "Well, now you're gonna get it!  Full force!"

	Razzar's jaws bled from how hard he gritted his serrated teeth.  "Rrrrrr—"  He slammed his skull back into the pegasus' chin.  "RAUGH!"  Rainbow sputtered, her grip of the sword slipping.  Without a second's hesitation, Razzar kicked against the floor with his talons.  The two of them went stumbling backwards, tripped over Razzar's rocket pack, and plunged into the dribbling column of purple muck from the structure above.

	Pilate gasped, throwing a shocked glance over his shoulder.

	Even with the helm, the bodies beyond the ooze were obscured.  After several heart-thudding seconds, an equine shape was the first to emerge.  Wheezing in pain, Rainbow Dash slumped to her knees, covered all over in lavender slime.  Her eyes pulsed red-on-yellow as she used all her strength to raise the Sword of Solstice in front of her.

	The stallion watched in mute suspense.

	Rainbow Dash clenched her teeth shut.  Her eyes lowered as she leaned towards the burning energy of the sword.  Inch by inch, the purple muck evaporated from her body.  Within seconds, she was fully cleansed of the taint, but the ordeal had sapped her of her strength.  She slumped forward, leaning on Commander Hurricane's weapon with labored breathing.  She looked up at Pilate—then flinched.  Spinning around, Rainbow Dash—

	"Hresssh!"  WHAM!–took a vicious right hook from an enraged reptile.

	Pilate winced.

	"Mmmf!"  Rainbow Dash crumpled hard to the rainswept floor.  Her legs lay limp while the Sword of Solstice clattered to a stop.  Clank!  A purple-stained talon clamped over the hilt.  Razzar leaned over, picked the blade up, and stood tall with the artifact in his grip.  The purple slime creeping down his body dissipated in puffs of steam as he seethed and glared through his pain.  At last his eyes fell upon Pilate's figure.

	"Bad zebra..." he hissed.

	The stallion gulped.

	"Hrnnnnnngh!"  Razzar charged at full force, dragging the Sword of Solstice along in preparation for the mother of all upswings.

	Pilate nervously glanced around.  He found the staff Roarke had given it and picked it up.

	"Hresssssh!"  Razzar sliced through the rain with Rainbow's blade.

	Pilate raised the staff in a feeble attempt to block.  CRACK!  The thing shattered instantly in half, forcing the stallion to stumble back.

	Razzar twirled from his swing and round-house kicked the zebra in his muzzle.

	"Ooof!"  Pilate fell back against the skystone pedestal, wincing.

	"Aaaaaugh!"  Razzar swung the blade down.

	Stifling a yelp, Pilate rolled to the side.  CLANK!  The golden blade ricocheted off the pedestal behind him, showering the floor with burning embers.  "Nnngh!"  He stabbed the sparkling end of his broken staff hard into Razzar's side.

	"Graa-aaa-aaaugh!" Razzar gargled on his own blood as his body jolted with electricity.  Dropping the sword, he fell down on all fours, writhing.

	With a grunt, Pilate leapt at the naga's shoulders—WHAM!—only to be savagely uppercutted by Razzar's wayward fist.  Whap!  The naga's claws clamped around Pilate's neck.  The zebra sputtered for breath, swung from Razzar's grip, and bucked both of his legs hard into the reptile's chest.  As Razzar leaned forward, Pilate slipped from his grasp, rolled around to his backside, and gripped his skull.  He then slammed Razzar's brow repeatedly into the edge of the pedestal.  "Rnngh!"  Wham!  "Gnngh!"  Thud!  "Haah!"  Whack!

	Groaning, Razzar swung both hands forward, gripped the edge of the pedestal, and stopped Pilate before he could impact his skull a fourth time.  He swung a talon out at the zebra, slicing across the stallion's right rear fetlock.  Sliiink!

	"Aaaaugh!" Pilate stumbled away from the glowing skystone.

	Standing up, Razzar clasped both hands together and slammed them down into Pilate's spine.

	Pilate sprawled out on the floor, wheezing for breath.

	Razzar grabbed the zebra by his tail and flung him mercilessly across the platform like a ragdoll.

	Pilate slipped across the rain-slick granite, rolled over Rainbow's body, and came to a jolting stop, lying face-up and wheezing.  Just as he struggled to get up, he heard the thud-thud-thuds of Razzar's charge.  Clank! The reptile's talon kicked the manasphere out from Pilate's choker.  Bzzzzt!  In an instant, the zebra's helm shorted out and he lost all sight.

	"Gaah!" Pilate gasped, his ears twitching.  He heard the rattling of the manasphere as it bounced off somewhere in the pitch-black darkness.  Desperate, he swung his aching limbs around and scrambled blindly for it.  He had barely moved a foot before Razzar found him again, lifted him off the ground, and tossed him clear across the windy platform.

	Pilated wheezed for breath.  All was confusion and thunder.  Around him, he sensed Stratopolis soaring faster and faster towards oblivion.



	"Where in Spark's name is it going?!" Eagle Eye shouted into the chilly air.

	"North," Roarke said from the Lounge's ship.  "At a constantly accelerating speed."

	"You know where it's headed?!" Ebon exclaimed.

	"It had to be done," Roarke droned, nevertheless staring towards the horizon in a pensive manner.  "Rainbow Dash and Pilate knew it as well..."

	"I don't get it..."  Ebon glanced nervously at the other ponies.  "What's the point?!  Why make Stratopolis take off like that?!"

	"The skystone deposits," Bellesmith murmured.  Kera looked worriedly at her as she said, "It can't be that far from here.  Approaching the glowing fields at full speed, not even a Sentinel like this would survive."  She gazed at the others.  "It would be the one and only way to eliminate the evil that Stratopolis had left locked away."

	"Eagle," Josho spoke.  "Do you see anymore pegasi swarms?"

	Eagle Eye shook his head.  "They were coming out of Stratopolis, but it's gone..."

	"Not quite gone," Zaid said, squinting north at the rapidly retreating structure.  "Still looks like a meteor's loogey from here..."

	"Rainbow's gonna fly out of that crazy place with Pilate, though, r-right?"  Ebon stammered. He turned and blinked at the others.  "Right?"

	Floydien hung his head.  Elma nervously clung to the cockpit's doorframe.

	Suddenly, the air roared with skystone engines.

	"Roarke...?!" Josho remarked.

	Roarke didn't reply.  She kept her rifle trained on the remaining three naga as she brought the vessel around, aiming it north.  "Get ready for cover fire!  Shoot any pegasus that isn't rainbow colored along the way!"  The thrusters flared bright and yellow.  "Cross me, and I'll turn each of you into naked hood ornaments!"  Thwoooosh!  The vessel soared towards the northern horizon.

	"Roarke!"  Josho gnashed his teeth.  "Dammit!"  He turned, glancing breathlessly at the others.  "Folks, if she's that scared..."

	Zaid stomped his hooves.  "The hell are we waiting for?!"  He galloped dowards the cockpit.  "Reindude?!"

	"The cockpit's mine, clown-clown!"  Floydien beat him to it, shoving his way past Bellesmith and Elma.  "Belt it up, boomers!  Nancy has a death city to catch!"

	"Go go go!" Eagle exclaimed, dragging Ebon along with him.

	As Josho galloped by, Belle lingered on the chilly deck, staring north with a pair of glossy eyes.

	"Belle...?"  Kera murmured, tugging on the mare's tail.  "Belle, we have to go now..."  She gulped.  "To help Daddy..."

	Belle bit her lip.  "Roarke... "  She whispered, tears forming.  "Roarke, please t-tell me this was all part of your plan..."

	"Belle!" Josho shouted from inside.  "Hop to it!"

	Gritting her teeth, Belle scooped Kera up and dashed into the cockpit before the door could close.  With throttling engines, the Noble Jury spun about and blasted its way north.  The Tarkinton had no choice but to cruise after the vessel, puttering along at a far tamer speed as it too followed the loose path of Stratopolis.

	
		//------------------------------//
		// Pilate is My Co Pilot		//------------------------------//

	The howling winds assaulted Pilate's ears, and yet still he could hear Razzar's sneering breaths.  With a claw-scraping stride, the naga approached the stallion's rear and kicked him hard in the flank, spilling blood.

	Pilate yelped in pain.  He rolled over, only to be picked up in two sets of scaled hands.

	"Grnnngh—The betrayer sent you?!  Hmm?!"  Growling, Razzar tossed Pilate across the platform.

	The zebra flew through darkness until he slammed into a pedestal.  He heard the clatter of skystone between pulses of pain.  The air calmed slightly, and he felt a shift in movement all around.  The crystal had been jostled slightly out of place on the north pedestal.  Stratopolis was slowing down.

	As Pilate struggled to get back up, he heard Razzar's voice approaching through the rain.  "How does it feel, pony?  To be weak?  To suffer the consequences of your failure?"

	"Nnnngh!" Snarling, Pilate galloped forward with a burst of strength and blindly bucked at the air.

	Suddenly, Razzar was behind him, slamming a talon down into the back of Pilate's neck.

	"Ooof!"

	The naga sneered in his ear.  "Once my brothers and I have control of this flying city, we'll do away with sniveling wretches like you."  A savage kick in the side.  Pilate rolled, his pained brain registering the angry speech.  "We will build a better world.  A stronger world.  One that won't breed accidents like you."

	Seething, Pilate got up—teetered left and right—and limped angrily towards the voice.  "Rrrrgh!"  He swung a hoof, hitting nothing but rainwater.

	Whap!  Another swat to the flank, this time slicing the skin with the edge of a claw.  "Yes.  That's it.  Struggle in the dark."  A prolonged hissing sound.  "I want your flesh devoid of hubris once I dig my teeth into it..."

	Pilate fell to his knees, shuddering in pain.  He took long, labored breaths, his ears constantly pelted by rain and moisture.  The world around him grew dull and numb.  For all he knew, he could have been the only living thing lost there in the darkness.

	So he took a deeper breath.  Pilate closed his blind eyes beneath the helm, tilting his head up and allowing the raindrops to splatter against his muzzle and trail down his cheeks.  He curled his forelimbs to his chest, feeling as his heartbeats grew further and further apart.

	He didn't think of the vengeful reptile stalking him through the darkness.  He didn't think of Rainbow's body lying dormant somewhere across the platform.  He didn't even think of Bellesmith's songful voice or Kera's tiny breaths.

	For the briefest of moments, Pilate was back in Blue Shelf, tending to the garden outside the cabin.  His mind ran circles around the various history texts he had just read with O.A.S.I.S back in his study.  Hypnotized by the cool spring breeze, Pilate planted flowers neatly in a row, compacting the rich soil around their roots.  His hooves brushed their petals, relishing in their delicate softness.  Each flower had a unique and enticing fragrance... all but one.

	Pilate's nostrils flared.  With twitching ears, he suddenly ducked.  The air whistled from a handful of claws above him.  Spinning around in an instant, he swung both front hooves blindly.  Wh-Wham!  They made contact with a soft, squishy lizard belly.  Razzar's rancid breath wheezed overhead, but Pilate wasn't finished.  He charged forward, ramming his skull into the reptile's sternum.  Once the naga had fallen hard to the ground, Pilate's rear fetlocks found their way to his ankles... and he savagely twisted.

	Razzar's legbone shattered down the center with a sickening snap.  The naga howled into the rain and thunder, clutching his sundered limb in agony as he writhed beneath the zebra.

	"Hressssshhhhctt!"  He seethed and hissed.  His jaws snapped at the air, and he fought through a sob to sputter, "How... h-how in Quezaat's name did you know—?!"

	"Thankfully..."  Pilate exhaled through a bitter grin.  "You smell as rank as the day you were hatched."  Then, with a triumphant grunt, he slammed both hooves down into the source of Razzar's voice.

	Thud!

	With a blood-gurgling wheeze, Razzar lay still, his unconscious breaths coming out in anguished bursts.

	Pilate shuddered from head to tail.  He stumbled backwards, almost slipping in the rain.  He heard a rattling sound, and he clenched his jaw shut, pausing his much needed breaths.  The rattling continued, rolling towards and past him.

	With a gasp, Pilate leapt for the sound.  He fell on his belly—but slid forward until the manasphere was in his grasp.  Fumbling, he clasped the thing back onto the choker hanging around his neck.  Snapping a wire or two into place with a splash of sparks, the zebra was painfully reintroduced to a strobing world of red-and-black lines.  Once again, he could make out the circular platform that had descended beneath the centermost structure of Stratopolis.

	He was lying right beside the platform's edge.  Far below, undulating waves of icebergs and frosted ocean water loomed.  Gradually, they dissipated, replaced by rising columns of steam.

	Pilate tilted his head north, but found it hard to "see."  A gigantic line danced with static energy before him.  A horizon of pure skystone loomed just within view, and it disrupted the flow of information through the zebra's Ocular Array.  Even from afar, he could hear an enormous roar—like a constant avalanche—devouring the sound of Stratopolis' maelstrom as the Sentinel approached the turbulent northern edge of the world.

	A petite body lay in the distance, its chest expanding and contracting with labored breaths.  Pilate galloped swiftly towards Rainbow Dash, leaping over the Sword of Solstice and Razzar's battered body.  He slid to a stop at the pegasus' side and shook her shoulder.

	"Rainbow Dash!"

	She didn't move.

	"Rainbow!"

	The mare's lips moved, her muzzle locked in a pained grimace.  She was still down for the count.

	Panting, Pilate gazed up at the north pedestal.  The skystone shard that Roarke had given him lay precariously on the teetering edge of the dais.  Beyond, the horizon continued to dance with static energy, threatening to short out his helm at any moment.

	The zebra gritted his teeth, shivering in the rain.  All around him, the roaring winds of Stratopolis formed a symphony of sound, serenaded by the distant banshee shrieks of winged undead.  Instinctually, his blind eyes blinked.



	Through the hull breech in the portside wall of the Ledo's Pride, Pilate could see the lush countryside of Ledomare looming in emerald brilliance.  Before him, five furnaces billowed, casting the glow of manafire across the zeppelin's engine room.

	He braced himself against a wall full of buckling, hissing instruments.  His muscles tightened as he prepared to spring for the levers closest to him.  The shrieks of innocent passengers lingered in his ears.  Acrid smoke wafted across his nostrils, but he was too busy holding his breath to suffer the pain of inhalation.

	Jaw clenched, the stallion leapt bravely forward, hurling his body at a wall of red-hot metal.



	Pilate didn't realize he was smiling until he had his hooves clamped around the skystone.  Grunting with pained breaths, he twisted and turned the shard until it attached firmly to the north pedestal once more.  Almost instantly, Stratopolis accelerated towards its destination.  The wind picked up, tripling in intensity.

	The Sword of Solstice slid towards the edge of the platform with a scraping sound.  Pilate slapped his hoof down over its hilt, anchoring it in place.  Undaunted, the stallion placed both hooves against the top of the skystone and pressed it down.  The more her forced the center of the shard towards the center of the pedestal, the more it billowed with sparkling energy.  His skin singed in several places from the rampant beams of mana.

	"Grnnn-nnngh!"  Weathering the pain, he forced the nebulous body of Stratopolis to increase its velocity.  The winds howled with a ghostly tempest.  The zebra's artificial field of vision turned to pure static as the skystone fields to the north came within a stone's throw.

	Something exploded to the far right.  Pilate swung his gaze aside in time to see something splitting down the middle.  An obelisk had sundered, shattering completely into thousands of pieces.  As a consequence, the half-dozen temples linked to it succumbed to gravity, descending into the arctic wastes below with dramatic sprays of ice and water.

	More explosions sounded off all around.  One obelisk at a time, Stratopolis crumbled.  The black shards flew along with the center structure, hurling towards the tempestuous crystalline fields ahead.  Above and beyond, the pained shrieks of pegasi echoed as their undead bodies burned alive, evaporating along with the unearthly slime that empowered them.

	By the time Pilate could see nothing but static, he spun around and made a mad dash across the platform.  He ran only two feet before falling hard to his chest.  The structure had tilted at an awkward angle, dangling the platform precariously along with it.  Rainwater slid sideways, shoving the three bodies towards the edge.  Pilate panted and floundered for hoofing, his fluctuating "vision" locked on Rainbow Dash.  One by one, the columns supporting the platform all around snapped, and Pilate's ears filled with the groaning implosion of the massive structure above him.


		//------------------------------//
		// All's Well That Ends Well		//------------------------------//

	Lighting bounced rapidly from obelisk to obelisk as Stratopolis broke up completely, dissolving into chunks of granite and prehistoric metals.  The city that once was the Sentinel of Urohringr turned to dust, crumbling and surging in every direction.  Bright flashes of otherworldly mana spelled its last cohesive gasp, and finally the entire place was consumed by skystone.

	Roarke's copper lenses retracted as she gazed off the bow of the speeding Lounge vessel.  She leaned against the rifle in her grasp, her muzzle hanging agape.  She watched as the central structure of Stratopolis bent sideways, then shattered in a million different places.  From a distance, hundreds of pegasi bodies lifted briefly against the spreading flame, then melted in a conflagration of friction and energy.  Fields of red and amber skystone flew sky high with resounding explosions, until at last the energy that filled the desposits mushroomed upwards in bright and brighter bursts.

	A vaporous shockwave flew towards the rushing vessel.  Roarke's grip slipped from the controls.  As the mancraft rocked to a stop, she and the three naga struggled to keep upright.  She immediately rushed back towards the controls.

	"Stop!" one reptile hissed, pointing a gloved hand.  "The skystone will not let us go any further!"

	She hissed above the noise of erupting energy.  "Challenge me one more time, and I'll throw you overboard in pieces!"

	"Take us any further north, and the energy fields will do the same favor to us all!  You included!"

	Roarke seethed and seethed, her hooves locked to the controls as she glared north.

	"It was Master Razzar's plan to use the city to mine from the fields," another reptile said.  "If it is now destroyed, then there's no hope for anyone venturing there."

	With a rapid exhale, Roarke plopped down to her haunches.  Her ears folded back on either side of her braided mane.  Her lenses twitched and rotated as she focused on the fiery aftermath of the city's ill-fated plunge.  Just then, a skystone engine roared from behind.  She glanced sideways in time to see the Noble Jury arriving on a crimson stream of skystone energy.  It hovered to a stop right beside the Lounge's ship, and its cockpit door slid open.

	Bellesmith was the first to gallop out, followed by Josho, Eagle Eye, and Zaid.

	"Roarke!"  Belle scampered to the edge of the top deck.  She peered over the edge, her chestnut eyes reflecting the grand plumes of fire settling from the massive city's impact.  "Why... wh-why have you stopped?!  Did you find them?!"  She stared at the Lounge's vessel, breathless.  "Are th-they here?!  I don't see them!"

	The air was cold, bone-chilling, gusting with an undulating chill.

	"Roarke, did they..."  Belle gulped.  "Did they make it out of there in time?"

	The metal mare gazed off towards the burning horizon.  "I had everything in order," she murmured.

	"Wh-what?!" Josho exclaimed, frowning.  "Speak up, rust muzzle!"

	"I thought I had prepared everything..."  She tilted her head up, her face flexed in pain.  "To restore what I had t-taken away."  Roarke gulped.  "But now..."

	Eagle Eye and Ebon Mane exchanged nervous glances.

	Belle, teary-eyed, ran to the edge of the Noble Jury's deck and slapped her hooves against the side.  "Roarke, talk to me!  What's going on?!  Is Rainbow Dash alright?  Is... is m-my beloved..."

	"I'm sorry," Roarke said in a shuddering tone.  She tilted her head up with a clenched jaw.  "The ponies you love have proven their courage and bravery."  She took a deep breath.  "I thought I had anticipated at what cost.  But now..."  She couldn't finish her words.

	Belle leaned back, lips quivering.  "Roarke?  What... wh-what are you saying...?"

	Roarke hung her head.  She took a deep breath and prepared to speak—

	"Hey..."  Eagle Eye slurred.  "Hey!"  He galloped towards the ship's edge alongside Belle.

	"What is it?" Ebon asked.

	"Over there!" the ex-mercenary pointed towards the skystone fields.  "See?!"

	Zaid held a hoof over his squinting eyes.

	"I don't see a damned thing, kiddo," Josho muttered.

	But Eagle Eye was smiling... and smiling more and more and more and—"Floydien!"  He spun towards the open cockpit.  "Mr. Floydien!"

	"That is Floydien's name!  Don't spit it loosely!"

	"Bring us closer to the glowing fields!"

	"Has boomerette lost their mind?!  Nancy will be ripped apart—"

	"Just four hundred meters!  Tops!  Trust me!"

	"I'd listen to him if I were you, space elk!" Zaid exclaimed.  "Unless you want me grabbing the controls from you and giving the heave-ho!"

	"Nnnng—Fine!"  The ship groaned and buckled as it turned around, cruising past the Lounge ship and towards the turbulent air between them and the skystone.  "But if too much glimmer breaks Nancy's bones, I'm tossing you first to the shark shark!"

	"Come on..."  Eagle Eye bounced up and down, slapping the edge of the deck.  "Come onnnnn..."

	Roarke watched from a distance as the Noble Jury soared towards the distant inferno.  She leaned forward, her copper-lenses adjusting to the sight.  With a blank expression, she re-gripped the reptiles' ship's controls and slowly drifted after the skystone vessel.

	The winds grew more and more chaotic as the Noble Jury approached the skystone fields.  Below, the waters roared and crashed against dull crystalline shoals.  The arctic air heated up, tossing a melted mist of sleet in every direction that coated the slick metal surfaces of the ship.

	Defying the elemental forces punishing the vessel from all angles, the Noble Jury nevertheless cruised towards its destination.  Eagle Eye galloped briskly from one side of the deck to the other and back, his vision constantly locked on one singular location.  At last, he gasped, pointing down low.  "There!  See?!"

	"See what, princess?!" Josho squinted.

	"Look for a streak of amber light!" Eagle sputtered, slicking his mane back in the frigid precipitation.  "Just above the waves!"

	"H-hey!"  Ebon gasped.  "I-I see it!"  He turned and shouted towards the cockpit.  "Down low!"

	"Beloved Nancy, Floydien hopes this invigorates you..."  Gritting his teeth, Floydien yanked at the controls, pushing the ship into a swift dive.

	Belle and the rest of the jurists clung to whatever they could to keep from flying off the top deck.  Spinning about, Belle's chestnut eyes caught sight of a lone source of flickering light, bobbing over the turblent waves, just moments from collapsing into the frigid brine.  As they came closer and closer, she gasped—for she saw three bodies aloft, with one grasping the other two in a courageous grip.

	"Beloved...?"

	"Ledo's spatula!"  Josho hissed, and rushed to the ship's edge.  "We gotta grab 'em!  Come on, girlie!"

	"Way ahead of you!"  Eagle Eye licked his lips and pointed a glowing horn forward.

	Josho's field merged once more with Eagle Eye's.  Before them, a web of translucent telekinesis materialized, floating alonside the edge of the ship.  Floydien brought the Noble Jury around in a sharp, banking curve, just in time to swing by the targets.

	Seconds before plunging into the tempestuous sea below, Pilate swung about, his helm rattling in the direction of the Noble Jury.  He had two things strapped to his back:  the Sword of Solstice, and a yellow-glowing jetpack made out of Lounge-tech.  Two bodies dangled under each hoof:  Rainbow Dash and a thoroughly battered reptile.  The zebra spun about, aimed himself for the unicorns' energy web, and cut his engines.  His body plunged—along with Rainbow's and Razzar's.  All three landed on the telekinetic field, sprung off it like a trampoline, and fell—sprawling—across the rain soaked deck of the Jury.

	Floydien immediately pulled the vessel up, coasting above the violently splashing waves of the arctic ocean below.  The Jury came about, soaring swiftly south before the rampaging energy of the bright skystone fields could cripple it from afar.  Not long after, it cruised to a hovering stop.  Roarke brought the Lounge's ship alongside it.  The metal mare left the controls and trotted to the edge of the platform, gawking at the scene.

	Josho, Eagle Eye, Zaid, and Bellesmith crowded around the three figures, chattering a million different things at once.  Their voices were shocked, exuberant, and breathless.  Hooves shook Rainbow's figure, and the pained pegasus stirred awake, her eyes blinking thinly—and confusedly—at all the jurists crowding around her.  She gasped as Eagle Eye slid in, hugging her tight and nuzzling her cheek raw.  With a sputtering breath, she looked across the way at Pilate.

	Groaning, the stallion stood up on wobbly legs.  He stripped himself of the Sword of Solstice and the nearly-spent jet pack.  Suddenly, he was being tackled, but he stood his ground, weathering the weight of Belle's intense hug.

	"Oh, thank the Spark!  You're alive!  You're alive!"  She kissed and kissed his neck and chin—anywhere that the stripes afforded her beneath his metal helm.  "Pilate!  Beloved!  I... I d-don't know what to say!"  She stared at him, eyes misty above a quivering grin.  "Did you just... did you just save Rainbow Dash and the rest of us single-hoofedly!"

	He leaned in to nuzzle her back.  "There there, love.  It is okay.  It is all okay now."  Pilate patted her shoulder as he stepped back.  "However, you must pardon me.  There is something I must still deal with..."

	"What...?"  Belle blinked, looking at him with melancholic confusion.  "Deal with what?"

	He gently brushed everypony aside, picked up Razzar's quivering body, and spun towards the edge of the deck.  "Rrrrrrrrghhh!"  Teeth gnashing, the zebra flung the naga onto the levitating deck of the Lounge's ship.  "Raaaaugh!"

	Th-Th-Thrump!  Razzar rolled to a stop, hissing in pain.  "Nnnnngh!"

	"Brother..."  The naga on board flinched and tilted their masks away, avoiding the sight of him.  "In Quezaat's name!  Your flesh is exposed—"

	"Quezaat's name?!"  Razzar pushed himself up with three good limbs.  "Gnnngh... Quezaat has been dealt an infuriating disservice today!"  He turned around, jaws dripping with drool and blood as he pointed an angry claw at the zebra on board the Noble Jury.  "All because of that insufferable horse!"  He sneered, "You robbed the Lounge of our one and only chance to protect these lands!  Do you know... do you have any idea what a calamitous fate you've brought upon the world?!"

	"I'm not a fan of breeder fights," Roarke droned.  "But it looks to me that the 'insufferable horse' has made you shed your skin early."

	"Choke on your own tongue, pony meat!"  Razzar briefly glared at her.  "You're the one who masqueraded as Vaughan, aren't you?!"  Growling, he hobbled up into a standing position, leaning his weight away from his shattered leg.  "Grnnngh!  I swear... with every ounce of honorable blood left in me..."  He glared at Pilate and Rainbow Dash in particular.  "I will hunt you to the ends of the earth and feed you your own entrails!  Every town and province—equine or reptilian—will know of your insidious treachery and foolishness!  And when I finally sink my teeth into that same flesh, I will enjoy the succulent taste of—"

	Taking a deep breath, Pilate suddenly pointed and hollered, "Weakness!"

	Razzar flinched.  The other naga glanced over, their silver masks glinting in the crimson light of the Jury.

	"B-beloved...?" Belle stammered.

	But Pilate marched towards the edge of the deck, continuing to shout:  "Your so-called leader is weak!"  His helm rattled as he spat, "He's nothing but a weak and foolish coward!  He's always been!"  His augmented gaze switched from one reptile to another.  "Why else would he have sent you on a fool's errand?  Attempting to dominate an uncontrollable ancient city that he couldn't even open up himself!  He needed Rainbow Dash—the Austraeoh—to do it!  And even when he had the heart of Stratopolis at his claws, he tainted it with his own impulsive measures, then forced everyone around him to suffer from the infection that he unleashed!"  Pilate scowled, his teeth showing as he grunted, "How many of your brethren did this weak 'leader' sacrifice—unnecessarily—for a futile goal, when instead he could have been bolstering your balance of power over the Wastes?  And just how many more brethren will fall if he carries you onward to another vain crusade?!"

	The naga glanced coldly at one another, their bodies stock still in the misty rain.

	"I've had about all I can take of ponies..."  Razzar hobbled towards the ship's edge.  "Brothers, ready your rifles."  He sneered.  "Send them to the abyss, along with Stratopolis—"

	A gloved hand grabbed his shoulder and threw him to the floor of the deck.

	"Ooof!"  He fell on his back, writhing.  "What—?!"  He spat up at his comrades.  "Traitorous fools!  I gave you a command!  Obey me!"

	"The horse speaks true, brother," one naga said, standing over him.

	"Your weakness is a sin," another murmured, crouching low.  "A frailty that the Lounge can no longer allow."

	"And you very well know..."  The third crowded in with the rest.  "...the cost of weakness."

	"Wh-what...?!"  Razzar's slitted eyes twitched.  He started to hyperventilate.  "Brothers!  You don't understand!  I was almost v-victorious!  We were almost victorious!  I had the pegasus and the zebra right where I wanted them!  I c-could have saved the city!"  He curled up and hugged himself under the converging shadows of the three.  "Stop!  I b-beg of you!  I... I..."  In a cowardly squeak, he held both hands straight out.  "D-do not look!  I am shamefully exposed b-before Quezaat!"

	"Do not worry, brother."  One by one, the naga removed their masks.  With puffs of steam, drool-slick jaws of razor sharp teeth emerged from their hoods.  "We shall hide your shame from Quezaat... in our bellies."

	"No... No, brothers!  I beg of you!  Don't!  Please!  Don't—NO!"

	"HRESSSSHAAAAA!"  The Lounge all lunged forward, their jaws digging into the squirming flesh of the once-Razzar.  His blood curdling screams got lost in their teeth and claws as they thoroughly dismantled him from the outside-in.

	A pool of blood spread outward from their crouching bodies, lapping up against Roarke's horseshoes.  Slowly, the metal-mare glanced up, staring past the scarfing and chomping reptiles.  Slowly, with a glint to her lenses, she smiled.

	On board the Jury, Eagle Eye vividly flinched, turning about to bury his face in Ebon's shoulder.  Ebon gawked at the violent scene with wide eyes, but nevertheless reached over to pat Eagle Eye's shoulder.

	Out of nowhere, Zaid drifted over, rubbing his chin as he squinted at the debacle.  "So, then..."  He murmured aside to the ship's cook.  "...getting ideas for a casserole?"

	"Eeeeunngh..."  Ebon ran—green-faced—to the opposite deck.  Gasping, Eagle Eye worriedly galloped after him.

	Zaid smirked in Josho's direction, and the obese stallion merely rolled his eyes.

	Pilate stood stock-still, breathing solidly through an unwavering muzzle.  With a slight limp, Rainbow Dash got up and trotted over to his side.  "Uhhh... y'know, Stripesy..."  She glanced at him with squinting eyes.  "You could totally have just crushed his skull or something when you beat him within an inch of his life up on the platform."

	Pilate sighed long and hard.  "Rainbow Dash..."  He turned and gave her an exhausted smile.  "After all you've been through, before and after you met us, I'm surprised that you haven't learned to savor the finer taste of irony."

	Rainbow Dash smirked devilishly.

	Pialte smirked devilishly back.

	Rainbow raised her hoof and gave his shoulder a fine swat.  "Welcome to Club Awesome, buddy.  How's it feel?"

	"Very..."  Pilate paused, fidgeted.  "...fuzzy."

	"Heh.  If you say so."

	He chuckled back.  Then slowly turned to gaze at Belle.

	Belle stared at him lovingly, her cheeks rosy beneath sparkling chesnut eyes.

	He pivoted towards her, smiling under his metal helm.  He moved his muzzle to speak—

	"Daddy...?"

	Pilate's jaw hung agape.  His features went slack as a pale sheen wafted across his stripes.  Slowly, he trotted around, gazing towards the open cockpit.

	Floydien stood beside Elma.  The elk and changeling exchanged glances, then slowly shuffled apart, revealing a shivering little foal staring out onto the top deck with wide green eyes.

	Silent words escaped Pilate's lips.  His brow furrowed under the helm, and he shuffled forward—one stiff fetlock after another.  Rainbow gazed after him, and she was no less shocked at the sight of the filly.  Her wings drooped at her side as she struggled to say something.  A warm hoof grazed her shoulder.  She glanced aside at Belle, shivering in confusion.  Belle merely smiled, then held both hooves over a sniffling muzzle as she gazed at the scene in anticipation.

	Pilate shuffled through the rainpuddles, then stood before the tiny child.  He knelt down with a splatter, then reached up to his helm.  Wincing slightly, he pulled the Ocular Array off his head.  A pair of clear eyes twitched blindly in the misty air.  Exhaling, he dropped his gear, then slumped against his haunches.  One limb after another, he reached forward—feeling around—until at last his hooves made contact with Kera's tiny horn.  He stroked down her face, grazing one tattoo after another, then felt her tiny, quivering chin.  Her muzzle moved against him as she quietly murmured.

	"Pilate..."  A whimpering smile.  "...you came back..."

	Pilate's face contorted, halfway between a sob and a laugh.  "So did you, precious..."  He almost instantly grimace, his blind eyes welling with tears.  "Kera... Kera, darling."  A gulp.  "I'm sorry... I'm so very sorry... for everything..."

	She sniffled, then slid forward, nuzzling her cheek along the length of his limb until she was embracing his chest.  "Don't.  Don't be sorry."  She hugged him, tears flowing.  "Be here."

	The zebra exhaled heavily.  He wrapped his limbs around her and held her close.  "I am... forever and ever.  I promise you."  He choked on a sob and nuzzled her mane.  "I promise."

	The two rocked together within the doorframe to the Noble Jury.

	Rainbow Dash sat back with a look of mixed confusion and joy.  She glanced down at the Sword of Solstice, its metal reflecting pure starlight from above.  Then she looked up at Belle.

	Belle stood in place, quietly crying as she watched the scene from afar.

	Suddenly, Pilate's ears twitched, pivoting towards Belle's figure.  Without saying a word, he reached a hoof out, beckoning.

	Belle squeaked through a melting smile and galloped forward.  She slid across the wet deck and collapsed into the other two.  The three chuckled briefly before enshrouding each other in a joint, familial embrace.  Belle and Pilate nuzzled each other while Kera sat nestled between them, no longer cold and shivering.  The couple's necks rested over an opposite shoulder while their hooves remained locked as one.

	Zaid leaned back against a skystone-supporting mast, folding his forelimbs as he smirked with pride.

	Josho trotted over to Ebon and Eagle Eye.  The old stallion tapped the ex-mercenary's shoulder.  Eagle then shook Ebon out of his nausea so that the two could turn about and properly ingest the warm scene.  Not longer after, the throttling of manaship engines shook them out of their tranquility.

	Pilate, Belle, and Kera looked up to see the Tarkington roaring to a loud hover besides the Noble Jury.  It pivoted about broadly, and not long after its port side door opened with a cold hiss.  Props and Seclorum were already there, bracing themselves against the frame.

	"Well, will you look at that," Seclorum managed through a breathless smirk.  "Guess not all was lost after all..."

	"Is... Is that Kera?!"  Props stammered, raising her goggles so she could stare with wide eyes.

	"Yes..."  Belle nodded from where she huddled with Pilate and the filly in question.  "Yes, it is..."

	"Are..."  Props leaned forward so far that Arcshod had to rush forward and grab her by her tail.  "Are you sure...?"

	Kera poked her head out, blinking.  "Props?"  Her muzzle scrunched.  "Why are you inside a big flying turd?"

	Props grinned from ear to ear.  "Eeeeeeee!"

	Pilate chuckled and ruffled the filly's mane.  "Does that answer your question?"

	"Yaaaaaaay!"  Props hopped up and down, much to Arcshod's exasperation.  "The Jury's back in session!  The Jury's back in sessionnnnn!  Wooooohoooo!"

	"What's with all the bloomin' noise?!"  Prowse trotted over and poked his head out.  He instantly smirked.  "Well, if that's not a beaut, I don't know what is."  Several ponies from within the Tarkington clapped their hooves and cheered.  Others murmured in relief.

	Rainbow Dash breathed nervously, her eyes darting back and forth from the airships to the burning plume in the distance.  "I... uh... I don't think we should stay here for too long..."

	Zaid glanced over.  "Why not?"

	"I mean..."  Rainbow winced, adjusting the pendant around her neck.  "Maybe n-not all of the pegasi died in the fall of Stratopolis?  They could be swarming us any second..."

	Zaid calmly smiled.  "Rainbow, we're fine."

	"But you'll never know if maybe some of the ooze survived in the ocean and could be bubbling beneath us this very moment and—"

	"We're fine."  Zaid reached over and touched her shoulder.  "Calm down and look around you."  He grinned.  "We saved the day..."

	"But... b-but..."

	"We saved the day..."  Zaid winked and leaned back against the mast.  "We saved the day."

	Rainbow panted and panted.  She gulped.  "We saved the day."

	He nodded.  "We saved the day."

	"Yeah..."  Her wings relaxed around her as she smiled weakly.  "Yeah, okay..."  She nodded and gazed about.  "Okay..."  Her eyes fell upon Roarke.

	Roarke stared back, her copper lenses cooly reflecting the mirth on board the Noble Jury.

	Rainbow Dash's smiled some more.

	Roarke's lips twitched, almost curving.

	Rainbow Dash trotted towards her—but suddenly jerked to a stop.  She sensed a shadow outside her peripheral vision.  Spinning, she turned towards the ship's stern.

	An equine shape was perched just above the hangar doors.

	Curious, Rainbow Dash trotted towards the end of the ship.  She then galloped and skid to a stop, breathless.

	A changeling was perched on the hull.  It gazed down at Rainbow Dash, its expression neutral at first.  Then, as Rainbow stood in its shadow, the shapeshifter's muzzle flickered green... then relaxed in a freckled orange smile.

	Rainbow gulped, then sat down calmly.  "You..."  She fidgeted.  "...you're fr-free?"

	Applejack slowly, slowly nodded.  "For the first time, darlin'..."

	Rainbow's eyes darted sideways for a moment.  "How... uh... does it feel?"

	"You tell me."

	Rainbow's gaze jerked back to her.  At last, she murmured, "Frightening.  Like a calm before a storm."

	"And what if the storm's behind y'all?"

	Rainbow winced, then said.  "I find that hard to wrap my head around."

	"You and me both, darlin'."  Applejack smiled.

	Rainbow smiled back.  Eventually, she asked, "Chrysalis.  Is she...?"

	"Gone."  Applejack's eyes glittered with starlight.  "Or... maybe... we're the ones who are gone.  And she's the one who's lost..."

	Rainbow took a deep breath, her jaw tight.  "In Val Roa..."

	Applejack slowly, slowly nodded.

	Rainbow glanced back at her friends.  Cheers echoed between the Noble Jury and the Tarkington.  After a deep breath, she looked back.  "Where will you go now?"

	"Nowhere..."  Applejack shrugged.  "Everywhere."  She then smiled again.  "The funny thang about home... I reckon it's anywhere you are, so long as you have love."

	Rainbow's ears folded across her head.  "I... I fear I've forgotten what that feels like."

	Applejack giggled.  "No ya haven't..."

	Rainbow's jaw dropped.  A tear ran down her face as she smiled.  "Thanks... uhm..."  She rubbed her face dry with a trembling forelimb.  "For—y'know—everything."

	"Thank yerself, darlin'.  And reward yerself."  Applejack's hoof reached forward.  "While ya still have time..."

	A shudder ran through Rainbow's body.  She closed her eyes and leaned forward... forward.  Seconds oozed by, and all she felt was a cascade of warmth.  Gasping, her eyes fluttered open.

	Applejack was gone.  A black figure flitted off into the distance on dragonfly wings.  It joined a hovering swarm of onyx dots that blanketed the stars.  Then, as one, the swarm of changelings flew off, disappearing into the frosted horizon.

	Rainbow Dash exhaled, clasping two hooves over her pendant as she bore a tender smile.

	"...I will."

	
	


		//------------------------------//
		// Denouement, Thy Name Is "Fluffy"		//------------------------------//

	For the first time in eons, the Strip of Flurries was no more.  The swirling clouds dissipated from the arctic skies, giving way to a frosty breeze that rolled and undulated over the northern wastes.  All that remained of Stratopolis was a smoldering plume of smoke and flame to the north, and even that was settling, falling, receding into the glowing skystone fields beyond reach.

	The waters below had become a placid sheet immaculately reflecting a field of stars above.  Against the cosmic canvas, three dark shapes floated tightly together, cruising their way southeast and away from the turbulent northern edge of the world.



	"He had lived eighteen long years in that damnable city," Seclorum muttered, leaning limply against a bulkhead inside the Tarkington.  On either side of him, thoroughly exhausted ponies laid down peacefully, getting some much needed sleep.  "When ill-fortune befell him, he... wasn't all that shocked or sad about it."  The old enforcer gulped, staring off at the stars beyond the open door in the side of the ship.  "He simply accepted what happened... as well as what he felt like he had to do."

	Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  Her body was freshly bandaged in several places, and she fluttered across from Seclorum, weathering the cold breeze from the arctic air outside.  "I wish I could have been in two places at once," she said.  "The Sword of Solstice could totally have cleaned the gunk off him."

	"Hey..."  Seclorum smiled weakly.  "You were off being a hero for the rest of us."

	"Heh... it was Pilate who saved the day, not me."

	"You know what I mean."  Seclorum cracked the kinks in his neck and spoke, "If it weren't for you, none of us would be here right now.  You risked your neck to make sure we got off that friggin' death trap.  I'm sure, if worse came to worst, you would have given your life to do the same thing."  He winced slightly.  "Like Aatxe did..."

	"He really held back those nasty creatures, huh?" Rainbow remarked.

	"Oh, totally."  Seclorum nodded.  "Gave us the window of opportunity we needed to book it to the Tarkington.  He may never have gotten the chance to set hoof on his ship again, but his spirit's here... running the thing from the inside out."

	"Yeah.  Just using a pale stallion with a red mane as his host."

	Seclorum chuckled dryly.  "That agreement was between Prowse and Aatxe.  But, so far, Prowse is keeping true to his word.  I've... uh... never been very good at running airships.  I've always been a ground soldier.  But I have no doubt Prowse will be able to get us to where we need to go."

	"And just where is that?"

	Seclorum sighed, rubbing his chin as he muttered, "To be honest, I've never thought it straight through.  I guess I never thought we'd actually get out of that place."  He looked at Rainbow fixedly.  "We obviously have to swing by Xona, so that Arcshod can properly escort his majesty home.  But... where would we go?  What province or border, I mean?"

	"Pretty much any one you'd reach first," Rainbow said with a smirk.  "What, with the war being over and all."

	"And that just blows my mind..."  Seclorum gazed thinly out the starry doorframe.  The Noble Jury and the Lounge's ship cruised within spitting distance.  "After all I've given... an entire life of hard work and fighting..."  He grimaced slightly.  "Peace could happen overnight?  True peace?"

	Rainbow gestured.  "You saw it happened here in the Wastes, didn't ya?"

	He glanced at her again.  "That's different.  You are different.  I mean..."

	Rainbow simply stared at him.

	His ears folded.  "You... really... truly brought a stop to the war on the eastern front, didn't you?"

	"Well, I had help..."  Rainbow smirked, her tail swishing back and forth.  "That nasty chaos dragon didn't exactly pile-drive itself into the ground, though..."

	Seclorum sat back on his haunches, shaking his head.  "It amazes me.  You're capable of kicking so much flank, and yet... in the end... you're all about changing the world, aren't you?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "For the better, I hope."

	"You find that hard to believe?"

	She hung her head.  "Every so often, the body count certainly makes me think twice."

	"And if you hadn't flown this way...?"  Seclorum blinked.  "Could you imagine the cost of a war that would waged on?  Or the toll that Stratopolis would have had on me and everyone I cared for...?"

	Rainbow said nothing.  Her face hung between a smile and a sigh.

	"There was a time when I thought that being a good soldier meant taking the moral risks that nopony else could afford to do," Seclorum said.  "Because you always knew that you were tasked with accomplishing something for the greater good."

	Rainbow tilted her head up.  "What do you believe now?"

	"Now, having met you, I'm starting to believe that the strongest ponies are those who do what they object to doing, so that others can more properly enjoy the peace that they themselves sacrifice."  He grimaced slightly.  "For the longest time, I neither loved nor hated what I did in war.  I just... pretended not to care."  His nostrils flared as he stared off into space.  "I'm suddenly not very proud of a lot of things."

	"You couldn't afford to feel.  I can understand."

	Seclorum glared at her.  "Can you?  Do you?"  His lips curved slightly.  "With the kingdom of harmony you've described having come from?"

	Rainbow fidgeted.

	"I now know I was wrong about what I did in Stratopolis," Seclorum said.

	Rainbow looked at him.

	He sighed and smiled wearily.  "Mercy and kindness would have saved our hides long ago."

	"I dunno if it would have saved you, but I'm pretty sure it would have made things better," Rainbow said.  "That's the least you ponies deserved while you wasted away up there."

	"We didn't deserve anything that we didn't earn," Seclorum said.  "We were prisoners long before we were ever dumped into that floating turdtropolis.  Between the war, fealty to a heartless empress, and hatred for a race of unicorns that... quite frankly... I find pretty alright..."  He leaned back against the bulkhead, sighing.  "I dunno about everypony else, but—speaking for myself—I've been a prisoner for a long... long time."

	"Do you feel free now?"

	"Almost."  His eyes darted up to Rainbow's.  "Could that be what you gave Josho?"

	"Well, he more or less gave it to himself."

	"It's a great feeling."  Seclorum nodded.  "And a sad one.  For the first time in decades, I feel scared for my own flank, and I think it's rather riveting."

	"Enjoy the rush."  Rainbow smiled weakly.  "And make the best of it."  Her eyes narrowed.  "By making sure other ponies do too."

	"I'm certain it's what Aatxe would have wanted."

	"That, and cleaning the crap out of his ship."

	"Heh..."



	"The energy reserves are fluctuating," Props stammered, trotting circles around the central dais of the Tarkington engine room where the manacrystal was situated.  "It's been somewhat erratic, but I do believe I've stabled the manaflow through several lateral conduits.  If you keep the buffers rotating on a regular basis, you'll have enough juice to get you to either continent and back."

	"That sounds brill, Propsicle," Prowse said, standing in the doorway to the engine room.  "You've done a mighty fine job."

	She kept pacing.  "Still, as soon as you get to the mainland, you'll wanna get the core replaced.  That and get a full rehaul of the steam thrusters.  Many of the interior pipes are blocked up with frozen grime and it's gonna take—like—a gazillion pony hours getting all the kerfluffle washed out so everything is squeaky cleany again!"

	"Lass..."

	"I-I guess I could try running a manaconduit towards the ship's bow so that we might construct a crude energy discharge device that the Tarkington could use to ward off pirates between here and Xona, though I really don't think that's gonna be a problem since the sexy tattooed guys are no longer wanting to tear airborn ponies' tails off and—"

	"Props..."  Prowse hobbled over and pulled her towards him with his good forelimb.  She shivered slightly staring up at him with bright blue eyes.  He smiled.  "Slow down for once..."

	"Did..."  She blinked.  "D-did you want to discuss tweaking the starboard stabilizers?  Cuz I'm still working on that!"

	"I just want to hold my niece," he said, leaning in to nuzzle the top of her head.  "And tell her how proud I am of her."

	Props smiled crookedly.  She sniffled and rubbed her cheek against his stubbled chin.  "I-I can make you even prouder!  Wait until we get back to Gray Smoke!"

	"Props..."

	"We can re-open the shop!"  She grinned from ear to ear.  "With all the gizmo-smarts you've gathered between here and there, you can set up a new bustling manaconduit trade!"  She winked.  "We'll show those bit-grabbing sooters who's who!"

	"Props, lass, I'm not going back to Gray Smoke," Prowse said.

	Props gazed up at him, her jaw dropping.  "You're... you're n-not?"

	He slowly shook his head.  "I made a promise to a very good friend of mine," he said.  "Aatxe gave me this ship for one express purpose—and that's to get the rest of these ponies to safety."

	"But... but we'll be going back to Gray Smoke afterwards, r-right?"

	"I lost bloody everything when the changelings replaced me, remember?"  He sighed through a weary smile.  "I'm a broke stallion.  All I've got is a few good deeds to do, and then I'm having to climb my way back up to the top."

	"Well, I-I can give you a boost!  Just leave it to me, Unky Prowsy!"  She smirked, bouncing in place.  "We'll get you a new shop in no time!  I've learned quite a few things in my poofing around the clouds, y'know!"

	"I've no doubt of that, Propsicle.  But you have to understand—"

	"You've always wanted to be on top of the metal trade!  You're not exactly ancient, Unky Prowsy!  We can get you back on track!"

	"What is it you want, lass?"

	"To... to h-help you..."  Props blinked, her lips quivering.  "Don't you believe me?"

	"I do," he said with a nod.  "And I also know that I've got plenty of fine mares and stallions on board this here Tarkington to help me all the same.  I've got a nice future waiting for me.  You know this too."

	"Well... s-sure... but I could be helping you to, y'know..."

	"Is that what you want?"

	"I... I want..."  Props bit her lip.

	Prowse stared quietly at her.

	She sniffled and leaned her cheek against his chest.  "Seeing Kera alive and squeaky again," she murmured.  "And Ebon and Eagle all kissy kissy... and Mr. Handsome in one piece again..."  She whimpered inwardly, her eyes watering.  "I want that too.  I want all of it."  She hiccuped, burying her face in his chest.  "Mmmmf... Pilate and Belle are nuzzling each other.  Elma's making miracles happen.  Rainbow's performing backflips.  Josho's not farting for once..."

	"Hmmmm..."  Prowse gently patted her shoulder.  "Do you remember, Propsicle, why I took you in so long ago in the first place?"

	"Mmmmmm..."  She sniffled and nodded against his chest.  "Mmmm-hmmmm..."

	"I made a promise to your folks that I would give you a family."  He caressed her mane.  "And a home."  His face grew long for a brief moment.  "If I drag you away now, I'd be breaking that promise with them."

	She tilted her teary face up towards him.  "I adora-love them, Unky Prowsy."  She gulped.  "The whole fluffy kitten bag full of them.  I wanna see them get someplace safe and happy.  And... and I don't think they can make it without me."

	"Pffft.  You kidding?"  He ruffled her mane.  "Toilet-headed pegasi be damned!  You're the backbone of that ship!  I don't care how many bloomin' sword-hilts Rainbow shoves into her muzzle."

	"Heeheeheee..."  Props giggled, rosy-cheeked.  She rubbed her eyes dry but nevertheless stared up at him with a pouting expression.  "But I looked around so super-long for you.  What kind of a niece would I be if I let you go now?"

	"Heh... are you bloody kidding?"  He kissed her forehead and smirked into her face.  "You think you can get away with me that easily?"

	"Huh...?"

	He chuckled.  "I ain't sitting down on this 'changeling business' just because I got my arse saved by a bunch of explosions!  There's more to all this than just the survivors on board the Tarkington.  Once I've returned Lasairfion and the rest to their hometowns, I'm gettin' to the bottom of this whole mess.  If that means heading east and snooping around Val Roa, then so be it.  Face it, lass, Gray Smoke is no longer the life for me.  Pffft... I was gettin' sick and tired of that rusted chimney factory anyways..."

	"Really?"  Props' eyes sparkled.  "Then why'd you stay there for so long, Unky Prowsy?"

	He winked at her.  "You think it was all about you taking care of me?"

	Props bit her lips, suppressing a happy squeal.

	He nuzzled her once again.  "I love the hell outta ya, lassie.  And I'll be damned if this is the last I see you.  But for now..."  He caressed her chin.  "Go where your heart takes you.  It's what I've always bloody done, and look at what life's given me!  It's dropped you in my lap from across a frozen sea.  And—odds are—your rump will come bouncing my way again."

	"Yeah..."  Props giggle-snorted with a nod.  "With extra rump-tastic-ness!"

	"Now that's more like it."  Prowse winked.  "I knew that the tiny filly that used to climb into potato launchers was still inside ya."

	She sighed and quietly wept into his chest.  "Mmmm—I never thought I'd find my inner potato launcher againnnnnnnnn..."

	"Go east, my girl..."  He patted her shoulder as the two rocked as one.  "Spread the joy of potato launchers everywhere you go..."

	"I will, Unky.  I willlllll-hi-hi-hi-hilllllllll..." She sobbed for joy.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Rarest Fire Still Burns		//------------------------------//

	"It behooves me to mention once again..." Roarke droned.  "...that I have claimed all your weapons as my own.  That being said, we all know that you have the resources and wits to get out of the wastes safely.  I suggest you return home to your brood."  Her copper lenses glistened menacingly in the starlight.  "Because if you don't, I will track you down and feed you more than your own skin."

	"We'll pretend not to be insulted by the fact that you still feel the need to threaten us," one of the three Lounge members stated.  They stood side by side on their ship across from the Jury.  In the cold arctic air, their outfits once again brimmed with steam and amber light.  "You have ridden us of the burden of a weak leader.  We can now continue to accomplish that which we originally set out to do years ago."

	"And just what is that?" Josho asked from the sidelines.

	Meanwhile, Rainbow Dash glided in from the Tarkington and touched down on the opposite end of the deck.  She quietly gazed at the exchange.

	"Keeping the skyways safe for trade and mercantilism," a naga said.  "With the Strip of Flurries no longer an issue, and the War in the West fully ended, we will be needed now more than ever."

	Roarke's teeth grinded.  "If you so much as think of transporting slaves and unjust prisoners anymore—"

	"To fall back on our own habits would be an unforgiveable act of frailty," one spoke.  "All Razzar's methods ever brought us was a cycle of anguish and failure.  It would not be beneficial to us—or any other creatures—to repeat that."

	Another Lounge member nodded.  "We owe it to your intervention for teaching us that, Roarke Most Rare."

	"Yeah."  Josho smirked.  "And all it took was the deaths of half your crew to accomplish it."

	"Breeder..." Roarke hissed out the side of her muzzle.

	"Vaughan's and the other's deaths were the consequences of their own failures," the Lounge said.  "If their passing means that the ones still alive can warn the world of the Changeling Queen, then so be it.  We will honor their memories under the shadow of Quezaat."

	"Make sure you do that," Roarke said.  "Just... far away from here."

	"Please believe us," they said.  "We have no long-standing affinity for this place.  The Wastes can—in the words of ponies—go buck themselves."

	That said, one naga signaled to the rest.  The others nodded, then turned around.  All three marched slowly into the bowels of the ship while the outer hull slid shut like a giant black clam shell.  With a flash of amber light, the Lounge's ship spun around, descended, banked, and cruised its way east over the frozen waters.

	Roarke took a deep breath, watching the ship disappear like a black dot along the starry horizon.

	Josho shuffled forward.  "From what I hear, you were on board that claustrophobic ship for a long-ass time."  He squinted at her.  "Feel a sense of attachment?"

	"I am elated to be rid of its smell," Roarke grunted.  She turned and glanced at several crates full of dismantled weaponry and energy conduits.  "Besides..."  She slid a hoof out from her cloak and felt along the metal braces clinging to her limb.  "...I got what I wanted out of the whole debacle.  An arsenal.  The makings of a new suit.  A transport..."

	Josho raised an eyebrow.  "A transport?"

	"Mmmm.  Yes.  Vaughan's personal craft, a rather small yet utilitarian thing.  Assuming it still exists beyond the former boundaries of Stratopolis, then I might be able to make a swift—"  She turned, her copper lenses reflecting several colors.  Roarke's words cut off.

	Josho glanced at Rainbow Dash, then back at Roarke.  "Ahem..."  He shuffled past the two mares.  "I'm going to go... be fat elsewhere..."  He marched his way down the stairwell.  "...preferrably below deck.  Well outside of knife range."

	Once he was gone, the wind occupied the upper deck with a deep chill.  Somehow, only Roarke was trembling.  When Rainbow Dash shuffled forward, the bounty hunter's strong gaze fell to her hooves.  She may have even squirmed slightly.

	"Hey..." Rainbow murmured.

	Roarke took a deep breath.  Avoiding Rainbow's gaze, she droned, "I hear you found a sword."

	Rainbow blinked, then nodded.  "Uhhh... yeah.  An ancient artifact belonging to Commander Hurricane.  From what I can tell, it's totally still filled with the same burning power that allowed her to drive the undead pegasi back to the heart of Stratopolis."

	"So... an efficient killing device?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth, blinked, and ultimately rolled her eyes.  "Or, y'know, a righteous tool."

	"We all call weapons what we like to, so long as they service us."

	"Nnnngh..." Rainbow face-hoofed.

	"I had not anticipated the presence of such a blade.  If I had, perhaps I would have unearthed it myself and presented it to you—"

	"Roarke..."  Rainbow glared up at her.  "Why did you come back?"

	Roarke stood dead still, saying nothing.

	"Roarke, look at me."

	The metal mare nervously obeyed.  A pale brown face hung from the fully retracted lenses.

	Rainbow leaned forward, eyes thin.  "I told you to scram.  I yelled at you.  I..."  She winced.  "I treated you like manure, and yet... here you are.  All of that infiltration of the Lounge.  The stuff you gave Pilate.  Commandeering the lizards' ship like you did..."  She bit her lip before blurting, "Why?"

	"Back in Searo's Hold, we gave our lives for the legacy of the Goddess," Roarke droned.  "We spilled blood in the name of strength and honor.  We lavished Lady Pestiferous with food, treasures, docile studs, and the spoils of conquest.  We never expected anything in return, save for the opportunity to kill and scream another day—"

	"Roarke, Searo's Hold imploded.  I was there."  Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "But we're not in Searo's Hold anymore, are we?  I'm here, and you are here.  And against all odds too."  She gulped and murmured, "Why?  Why is that, Roarke?  I need you to tell me..."

	Roarke opened her mouth, but lingered.  She stared past Rainbow Dash with nervous exhalations.  At last, a quiet voice came out.  "All of my life, all I ever expected to do was die.  I never thought... th-that I would feel guilty... and that I would have the tenacity and foolish courage to live with that guilt.  I did a disservice to your friends, Rainbow Dash.  In some way or another, I brought pain and misery to the lives of the ponies you care for... the only souls left that you love.  I thought I was doing something right by influencing Kera, but—in the end—all I did was ruin something... ruin the one thing that..."  She clenched her teeth as her words trailed off.

	Rainbow Dash stared at her.

	After a deep breath, Roarke managed to say, "I gave myself one last chance, a chance to fix things.  I knew that saving the day myself would not accomplish what needed to be done.  But if I enabled somepony like Belle... or in this case Pilate, then I might help him finish the task.  I could plant a spark of hope where Shell had dredged an impossibly black rift.  But... even that was an inept plan at best.  Once again, my foolishness almost cost the life of a pony you cared for.  If Pilate had died on board Stratopolis..."  She winced.  "If you had died..."

	Silence.

	Roarke's gaze fell.  "I... I only know how to do one thing.  I am the weapon, Rainbow Dash, not you.  You were right to banish me when you had the chance.  The fact that things ended up for the best does not excuse the vicious cycle of my inane philosophy.  I appreciate the fact that the Jurists have allowed me a chance to house my equipment here for the interim, but the first opportunity I get, I shall take my leave of this ship and—"

	Rainbow Dash marched forward.

	Roarke actually flinched—until she felt a warm pair of forelimbs around her, legs that pulled her in tight and tighter.

	Rainbow clenched her eyes shut as she buried her sniffling muzzle into Roarke's cloak.  "Thank you," she exhaled.

	"R-Rainbow, I cannot expect anything from you for—"

	"Thank you."  Rainbow squeezed her, murmuring.  "Thank you... Thank you, Roarke..."

	Roarke's lips pursed.  Her lenses clicked as she stared over Rainbow's shoulder.  After several seconds, she finally exhaled, her body going slack in the pegasus' grip.  She brought a hoof up and tentatively—awkwardly—patted the back of the mare's neck.

	The two huddled there in the cold breeze, though all the chill was gone.

	At last, Roarke breathed, "Perhaps I will delay summoning Vaughan's transport until everypony is well situated—"

	Rainbow's voice was like rust:  "If you even think about leaving us again, I'll replace your spine with Commander Hurricane's sword."

	Roarke gulped, and in a noticeably squeaky voice uttered, "Yes, ma'am."
		//------------------------------//
		// Two Beacons in the Dark		//------------------------------//

	"Belle, what were those things that attacked us?"

	"Hmmm?"  Bellesmith lay Kera onto the lower cot of their cabin.  "Oh, well..."  The mare's brow furrowed momentarily.  "From what Josho and Rainbow have explained to me, they were horrible creatures, Kera.  At one point in their life, they were either pegasi who served Commander Hurricane of ancient Equestria, or—perhaps—a race of flying ponies far older."

	Kera blinked tiredly, fidgeting under the blanket Belle was draping over her.  "Why were they so mean and slobbery?"

	"That's just the thing, darling," Belle said.  "Something terribly evil must have corrupted them a long, long time ago.  According to Rainbow, it almost looked like the winged ponies who controlled Stratopolis long before Hurricane had dabbled in... something that proved to be their undoing.  Maybe they were working on some horrible weapon, or perhaps they simply discovered an otherworldly substance that proved too dangerous for this world."  Belle shrugged, the proceeded to tuck Kera in.  "Whatever made them ponies was drained long ago, and all that was left was something cruel, barbaric, and animalistic."

	"They weren't like any animals that I'd ever seen," Kera murmured.

	"Heh... most certainly not."

	"How did we get away from them?"

	Belle blinked.  "Well, for the most part, because of you."

	"Because of m-me?"

	Belle smiled.  "Don't you remember?  You displayed one of the greatest feats of unicorn magic I've ever seen—much less by a young filly.  In one fell swoop, you single-hoofedly knocked dozens of them from the Noble Jury's hull."

	"I... I-I did?"

	"Of course, Kera!  It's why we're speaking to each other right now."

	"I..."  Kera winced, gazing towards the opposite wall of the cramped room.  Her eyelids fluttered tiredly.  "It's all fuzzy..."

	Belle leaned close.  "Well, what do you remember?"

	"Dreaming..."  Kera bit her lip and held the blankets close.  "With my eyes open..."  Her little nostrils flared.  "For a long... long... super long time..."

	Belle's lips pursed.  "Do... do you remember what you saw in your dreams?"

	Kera's ears drooped.  Her body tensed up, then gradually relaxed as she melancholically shook her head.

	Quietly, Belle leaned forward and kissed Kera's forehead.  She lingered there, nuzzling the filly's cheek.  "I know that a lot of this doesn't make much sense to you, and I'm still trying to figure it all out myself.  But I am so happy... so very blessed to have you back, darling..."

	"Did... did I go anywhere?"

	Belle bit her lip.  She sniffled slightly.  "Yes, Kera.  I-I'm afraid you did..."

	Kera tilted her chin up.  "Belle?"

	Belle leaned back to look at her.  "Yes?"

	"Who was that in the room with us when the things attacked?"

	"Hmmm?"

	Kera stifled a yawn and murmured, "The pony... the pony with the bl-black coat..."

	Belle squinted, then exhaled, "Oh.  You mean Elma?  Elma Boreal?"

	"What kind of a name is that?"

	Belle opened her mouth, lingered, then said, "Not a very real one, I suppose."  She squirmed where she stood by the bed.  "But Elma herself is very real... with a real heart... and a real desire for love."  Belle smiled.  "She helped bring you back, Kera."

	"She did?"

	"Mmmhmmm..."  Belle nodded.  "Elma's got a special talent.  And, from the looks of it, she woke you up."  The mare's eyes glistened momentarily.  "It takes a very special pony to bring back a very special filly..."

	Kera yawned and turned her head aside against her pillow.  "I should thank her..."

	Belle giggled lightly.  "I think she would be more than happy to speak to you."

	"She... br-brought me back to my Mommy and Daddy," Kera slurred, surrendering to the waves of slumber.

	Belle's smile faded.  She sat still, her breaths tense and uneven.  Sniffling, she blinked her eyes dry and managed a tiny grin.  Kissing Kera on the forehead one last time, she murmured, "Just rest easy, Kera."

	"Mmmmm..." Kera murmured, her body instantly still.

	"And don't you worry anymore.  Mommy an—"  Belle froze, inhaled, and uttered, "Pilate and I won't be far away."

	Kera slept soundly.

	Belle dimmed the lights, shuffled about, and quietly exited the cabin.  She shuffled across the thin hallway of the Noble Jury's second deck, making her way past compartment after compartment.  Heading towards the stern, she made a sharp left right before the mess hall.  The tiny infirmary was lit, and there Pilate sat on the edge of a cot, bandaging himself with the use of his other hoof and his teeth.

	"Oh, beloved—here."  Belle rushed over and knelt before him.  "Allow me."

	"Oh, you needn't fret, Belle," the stallion said.  His choker rested on the table alongside the manasphere and the Oracular Array.  "I do believe I have this under control."

	"Please..."  Belle nevertheless took control of the situation.  "I wish to do it."

	Pilate tilted his head down.  Eventually, he nodded with a faint smile.  "Very well."

	Belle breathed easily, reaching around Pilate's forelimb and shoulders as she gently tightened the gauze to his healing wounds.  "I don't think I've ever seen you so banged up."

	"Yes you have."

	Belle's lips curved.  She squinted aside.  "Since we left Blue Shelf, I mean."

	"Ah."  Pilate smirked.  "Well, worse things could result from tangling tails with a sentient crocodile."

	"I don't know what stunned Rainbow Dash more," Belle remarked.  "The punches Razzar gave her, or the undying fact that it was you who brought that reptile down to his knees."

	"I seriously doubt that she's jealous," Pilate said.  "The poor mare has been forced to extinguish all sorts of nefarious souls in the past.  I don't know what good it will do her countenance, but she can at least remove one burden of conscience from her list."

	"I know it sounds grim, but..."  Belle chuckled dryly.  "I'd be lying if I said I wasn't a slightest bit proud of the 'solution' you chose."

	"Razzar was always a victim of his own hubris," Pilate murmured, straight-faced.  "I believe his comrades had to see that, or else they might still be vindictive over Razzar's defeat today."

	"I'm certain Roarke wouldn't have given them the pleasure."

	"No.  Probably not."

	Belle finished tightening a bandage and glanced aside at the table beside the cot.  "Quite the fascinating device Roarke gave you."

	"It doesn't hold a candle to your genius."

	"Hmmm..."  Belle smirked.  "That's flattering of you to say.  But, let's face it, I've never considered crafting you something that would allow you to grasp your spatial surroundings."

	"Roarke's Searonese hybrid allowed me to catch my bearings, for sure."  Pilate nodded.  "But the textures of every surface around me were... well... a veritable blur.  I could never read with the Oracular Array."  Pilate's muzzle curved.  "I'd much rather possess O.A.S.I.S. anyday."

	"At the cost of knowing where you are?"

	"It's not a matter of where, beloved, but who."

	Belle opened her mouth, but she lingered in silence.

	"How is Kera?" Pilate asked.

	"Hmmm?"  Belle blinked, then turned to face him.  "Oh.  She is... erm..."

	"Still speaking?"

	"Very much so."  Belle nodded.  "And she's starting to remember some of the smaller details from just recently."  She gulped.  "Like Elma and the undead attack and—"

	"Witnessing the sound of her voice when I returned to the Jury was one of the most blissful things I could have heard," Pilate said.  Then, with a warm breath, he reached forward and brushed his hoof across Belle's cheek.  "Well... nearly the most blissful."

	Belle smiled.  She reached two hooves up and clasped his forelimb against hers.  She shook once... twice... then fell into a throe of quivering breaths.

	Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  His lips pursed.  "Belle...?"

	Tears coated his hoof as she nuzzled it, sobbing.  "Would you ever h-have it in your heart to forgive me, Pilate?"  She sniffled and clenched her eyes shut, grimacing.  "Kera wasn't the only one asleep for so long.  I-I felt so lost... and so afraid..."  Her voice squeaked as she stammered, "And I took it out on the one pony that m-meant the wh-whole world to me."  A whimpering tone.  "I was so horribly rotten to you... to everypony... but most especially to you."

	"Beloved..."

	"You d-don't deserve that... you n-never deserved that!"  She sniffled and wailed, "I should be t-taking care of you... protecting you... loving you..."

	Pilate leaned off the bed and knelt alongside her.  He flung his arms around the mare's shoulders.  "We should take care of each other."

	She inhaled sharply, her voice squeaking.  "Pilate..."

	"Misery blinds us more than darkness," he said.  "It's only natural to lose sight of love.  But I know the mare whom I fell in love with when I too awoke from the abyss."  He smiled and kissed her.  "She needs me as much as I need her."  His stroked through her mane.  "Even if it took a thousand years, I would wait for her to come around.  After all..."  He smiled.  "Would she be any less patient for this blind zebra?"

	Belle smiled as tears ran down her muzzle.  She buried her face in his striped chest.  "I adore you, beloved..."

	He cradled her head to him, stroking her neck and cheek.  "You never stopped, Belle."

	She winced.  "Pilate..."

	"Shhhh..."  He kissed the top of her head.  "We can make it through this.  We can make it through anything.  Not just us... but Kera as well..."

	"Yes..."  Belle nodded and surrendered to the depths of his embrace.  "Yes... we c-can..."

	Pilate laid his head atop her crown.  He stared blindly into the bulkheads of the infirmary, his muzzle locked in a soft smile.  Together, the pair of ponies cradled each other on the floor of the room while the Noble Jury drifted off into starlight.
		//------------------------------//
		// Let's Get These Whinnies Rolling		//------------------------------//

	Dawn brought with it a golden glow that glinted off the arctic seas below.  Flakes of frost drifted in the high winds, scattering across the open deck of the Noble Jury.  Elma's green eyes followed the streams of snow listlessly.  Then, with a sigh, she clutched the blanket around her figure and turned around.

	"I've lost all contact with her," she murmured.  "Although... I-I never really had much contact with the broodling queen in the first place."  The changeling fidgeted.  "I s-suppose that is how she meant it.  Who knows how many other turt—"  She winced, then continued, "How many shapeshifters out there are like me, stripped of all they can possibly remember so that they might serve as better tools for the hive..."

	Arcshod and Seclorum exchanged glances from where they stood on the Noble Jury's starboard side.  They glanced over their shoulders to where Prowse stood in the open doorway of the Tarkington floating closely nearby.

	"But you know for a fact that she's changed?" the pale stallion asked.

	Elma bit her lips with fanged teeth.  "Mrmmm... the hive has changed.  I'm almost entirely certain she's lost grip with the entirety of her broodlings.  That's most likely why I lost contact with her so swiftly... even as she was just starting to find me again."

	"I think we all know who we can think for that," Josho said, then glanced aside at where Rainbow Dash stood alongside Roarke, Eagle Eye, and Pilate.

	"Pffft.  It wasn't me," Rainbow Dash said.  "I'd tack that onto dumb luck."

	"Hmmm..."  Eagle Eye smiled rosily.  "I'd try another 'l' word."

	"Also dumb," Josho muttered.

	Eagle Eye glared at him.

	"And do you have any idea where Chrysalis is?" Seclorum asked.

	Elma slowly shook her head.

	"I do..."  Rainbow trotted over and rested a hoof on Elma's shoulder as she looked back at the others.  "Val Roa," she said.  "She made it pretty clear."  A slick grin.  "The mare has a thing for monologuing, it seems."

	"Val Roa..."  Prowse scratched his chin with his prosthetic and spoke above the high winds, "A monarchy.  Full of wealth and rich ponies.  But that's about all I bloody know..."

	"It's the last bastion of civilization before the Grand Choke," Elma said.

	Everypony looked at the changeling.

	She winced slightly.  "I mean... th-that's what my memories tell me..."  She rubbed her dark head.  "Supposedly, that's what every resident of Alafreo knows.  Val Roa is famous across the entire continent..."

	"It's a peaceful kingdom?" Seclorum asked.

	"Mmmm..." Elma nodded.  "From what I can tell."

	"Which makes it perfect for diabolical metamorphs to sow destruction and chaos," Roarke muttered.

	Elma flinched.

	Roarke exhaled while her copper lenses retracted.  "...nothing personal."

	"Of c-course..."

	"But Chrysalis is on her own now..."  Pilate tilted his head blindly towards Rainbow Dash.  "...right?"

	"It's our best guess."  Rainbow leaned back and flexed her wings with a sigh.  "Though, knowing her, she's probably trying to build an army back up again."

	"We have any way of knowing that?" Eagle Eye asked.

	Rainbow shook her head.  "Still, Val Roa is totally in the dark, and that isn't cool."

	"Well, I certainly wanna get to the bottom of this whole mess," Prowse said.  "But I'm afraid that just can't be done.  At least not from our end."  The stallion gestured at the hulking body of the Tarkington.  "Aatxe's baby here is barely hanging on by a thread!  I can get her back to Xona no problem, but then it's gonna need an arse load of repairs."

	"That's the least of your concerns," Pilate said.  "You've got many ponies who need to return home."

	"I'm on board with that," Seclorum said.  "I've spent the last few years fighting battles that weren't even mine to begin with.  And from what I hear, I had a double of myself wreaking havoc halfway across the continent.  To think of all those mares and stallions who... who could be living now if it weren't for... for..." His words trailed off a grimacing expression.

	"You get your ponies home, old friend," Josho said.  "And if it helps you to know, fruit basket and I totally cleaned that moron's clock."

	"Erm..."  Eagle winced and pointed at Josho.  "It was m-mostly him!  Honest!"

	"Hrmmm..."  Seclorum smiled crookedly.  "I don't know if it's a sign that I've lost my marbles, but that almost actually makes me feel better..."

	"Ge'nuulien th'rekkunu Lasairfion Xon-Nagu'n viulen saan'arloot ba'lassa thremm," Arcshod said.  "Diulen Xon.  Rekkun ral'anna messul thiulen braatu Val R'oa frem'uklannan."

	Rainbow squinted.  "What's the big guy sneezing about this time?"

	"Errrr..."  Seclorum turned to look at the others.  "He says he's spoken with his Queen already about the situation, and as much as Lasairfion would like to lend a hoof—"

	"It would be foolish to initiate a crusade towards a far-away kingdom when your own is still recovering from so much turmoil," Roarke said with a knowing nod.  "I understand.  It's how I've come to accept the fact that nopony from Searo has come to claim my head."

	"Well, there was that one pony," Pilate remarked.  "'Terra,' I believe?"

	"Mmmmmm..." Roarke was scratching an itch behind her neck.  "Who?"

	"Well, seems like we all have our paths set before us," Prowse remarked.  "Still, seems like a bloody shame to leave you ponies alone on your trek east."

	"You kidding?"  Josho smirked.  "You couldn't hold us down even if you hammered our bladders to the ground."

	"Josho, think about this."  Seclorum gestured wide.  "The war is over.  Everything we've ever butted heads with is history now.  Even those tattooed freaks aren't quite so bad once you get to know them."

	"Dreet drenna," Arcshod grunted.

	"Love ya too." Seclorum turned back to Josho.  "Why not hang a ride on the Aatxe Express here?  Two old stallions?  Returning home?  It'd be like old times... only without all the killing and explosions."

	"Yeah, well, one of those I don't miss," Josho grumbled.

	"Honestly?"  Seclorum raised an eyebrow.  "It's peace time, Josho.  Don't you feel that a couple of old soldiers deserve something like this?  Happens once in an age..."

	Josho took a deep breath, then trotted over to stand before Seclorum.  "I know what I deserve and don't deserve.  And believe you me, if I had something back in Ledomare, I woulda thought twice about ditching it all in a blaze of glory."

	Seclorum stared at Josho, then glanced over his shoulder.

	Eagle Eye blinked innocently.

	"You're a lot different from the stallion I flung mana with."  Seclorum's eyes darted back to Josho.  "But be honest with yourself," he murmured in a low tone, leaning forward.  "Do you honestly think you'll live as long as him?  Or the rest of them?"

	"Probably not."  Josho smiled wearily.  "But I'll live..."

	Seclorum stared back.  Slowly, his ears drooped.  "Dumbass..."  He sighed and drifted forward, forelimbs wide.  "I'm gonna miss ya, pal—"

	"Please."  Josho held the hug back with a firm hoof.  "Not in front of the Xonans."

	Arcshod raised an eyebrow.

	Seclorum glanced aside at him, then rolled his eyes.  He saw an outstretched leg ahead, glanced up at Josho, and smirked.  The two former enforcers bumped hooves, then shook.  "Beats kicking the shit out of each other."

	"You say that as if we won't meet again," Josho said.

	"Pffft.  You have to make me really... really pissed off at you for me to hunt you down that far east."

	Josho patted Seclorum's shoulder and murmured in his ear:  "You haven't seen your bar tab back in Green Slope."

	"Buh?"

	But Josho was already trotting away.  Rainbow Dash watched him, then turned towards the others.  "Right... so this is how it's gonna be..."



	"Did ya set up the communications array just like I told ya, lass?" Prowse asked.

	"Mmmmmhmmmm."

	Prowse glanced across the Tarkington.  "And you turned it to the frequency I gave ya?"

	"Mmmmhmmmmm..."

	Prowse took a breath and glanced down.  "And can ya stop drooling on my chest?"

	"Mmmm-mmmmm..."  Props leaned back from nuzzling her uncle.  She wiped her eyes and stared up at him with a sad smile.  "You sure I can buzz you whenever I want?"

	"Mmmmhmmm..."  He caressed her golden mane.  "I'm just a turn of the dial away.  There was never a communications signal too faint that my bloomin' tech couldn't pick up!"

	"Even when you're busy transporting the ponies west to their families?"

	"Yup.  Even then."

	"Even if you're being chased by giant mutant flying squirrels?"

	"Especially so in that case."  Prowse grinned.  "I'd need some flesh and blood to help me flush out the insanity."

	She grinned, her little blonde tail swishing.  "You're the best uncle I could ever have outrun evil melting zombies with..."

	"That's what family's all about, lass."  He leaned down to nuzzle her and murmured, "Now move yer arse.  I don't want my Propsicle asleep on the job."

	"Right..."  Props backtrotted from the cockpit, sniffling and smiling, smiling and sniffling.  "I'll be thinking about you... while I caress the walls of Nancy Jane's womb!"

	"Now there's a promise you'd better keep!"

	Props bit her lip, then forced herself to turn around.  She quickly shuffled past Rainbow Dash.  "Let's go now before I kerplunk in my own k-kerfluffle!" she whimpered.

	"Right.  Just one sec."  Rainbow turned towards the ponies on board.  "When you come into contact with the Ledomaritan army, look for a mare named Zetta.  She should be located not that far from the former Eastern Front."

	Seclorum blinked and blinked again.  He exchanged glances with Arcshod.  "Uhm... y-you might wish to give us more to go by.  It's kind of a common name."

	"Dreit."

	"Ungh..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes and exclaimed, "She'll be with a huge friggin' stallion named 'Basso.'  You can't miss him.  He's like a steamroller with fuzzy ears."

	"And what do you wish us to do when or if we find them?"

	"Tell them that the crew of the Noble Jury is okay.  We... uh..."  Rainbow sighed.  "We ran into a few nasty... nasty bumps along the way.  But... we're okay."  She smiled faintly.  "We're okay."

	Arcshod nodded, squinting.  "Oh... kay..."

	"Yeah, he's got it."  Rainbow turned to exit the Tarkington, but found a tall, elegant unicorn standing in front of her.

	Lasairfion's eyes narrowed.  With a neutral expression, she said, "It has agreed to keep the traveling, though it has the uncertainty ahead?"

	Rainbow slowly... slowly nodded.

	"Hrmmm..."  Lasairfion exhaled calmly.  "Then it is the Austraeoh..."

	Rainbow gulped.  "You... uh... you had your doubts?"

	"No more than it did."  A regal smile.

	Rainbow's muzzle curved.  "I don't suppose you... uh... have any wise, matronly advice concerning Val Roa and the rest of the lands ahead of me?"

	Lasairfion leaned in and narrowed her eyes.  "It must not water on the burning dogs."

	"... ... ..."  Rainbow raised her hoof with an open mouth.  "... ... ...Propsy!"  She side-stepped and grabbed the mare's flank.  "Time to go!  Say good bye to all the background ponies!"

	"'Good bye to all the background ponies—' Eeep!"  Props' golden mane flounced as Rainbow dove out the side of the Tarkington and glided towards the Noble Jury.  Once landed, the two joined the rest of the ship's crew as they turned to wave at the vessel.

	"Ach!  How do I get this bloody thing into gear?  Oh!  Right..."  Prowse's voice wafted out of the door for the last few seconds that it hung open on its hinges.  "Whelp, time to get this show on the clouds!  Ha!  You get it?!  That's a sooter joke!  Bye—"  CLACK!  The Tarkington's door clamped shut, blotting out the images of waving Ledomaritans and Xonans.  Tilting about, the ship roared over the Noble Jury and soared its way west on burning engines.

	Belle, Kera, Pilate, and Zaid turned, waving at the ship until it became a distant speck.  Eagle Eye and Ebon stared silently, leaning against each other.  Elma, Josho and Floydien poked their heads out of the cockpit while Roarke stoot closer to the stern in silence.

	"They... they are gone, right?" Pilate asked.

	"I really need to get O.A.S.I.S. working for you again," Belle muttered.

	Pilate smirked.  "Not sure it would do the moment justice."

	Kera covered her nose.  "Their ship's exhaust reeks..."

	"Heheheh..."

	"I-I couldn't work on it in time..."  Props sniffled, slapping her goggles over her moist eyes as she bowed her head to the deck.  "I wanted Prowse's ship to be full of love... not farts..."

	"Blonde boomer did her best best," Floydien said.

	"Yeah, Propsy..."  Ebon trotted over, along with Eagle Eye.  The cook smiled and placed a reassuring hoof on her shoulder.  "I know this has been very hard for you, but I'm so glad you decided to stick with us.  I'm not sure how I'd feel without my best gal pal from Gray Smoke along for the ride—"

	"Mmmmmmmmmmm!"  Props pounced, hoisting both Ebon and Eagle into a strangling embrace.  "Quick!  Drown me with flufffffffffffff!"

	"Gaaaie!"  Eagle wheezed and tried to calm Props down.  "We... grkkkt... h-have to breathe first...!"

	"Yeah..."  Ebon hissed, blue in the face.  "What h-he said.  Gaah!"  THWOMP!  The three collapsed onto the deck.

	"Tch tch tch..."  Zaid stepped over them, shaking his head.  "Not quite a threesome, but it'll do."  He came to a stop beside Rainbow Dash.  "Head in the clouds?"

	"Just wondering..."  Rainbow sighed, staring west.  "...if sending them west on their own was such a good idea."

	"I know, right?"  Zaid scratched his mane, staring at the horizon along with her.  "Hundreds of miles.  No bread.  No cheese.  No toasters?"  He sighed.  "That's a long trip, girrrrrl."

	Rainbow glared at him.  "Thanks for broadening my horizons."

	"Hey!"  Zaid shrugged with a smile.  "If we can dream it, we can do it!"

	"I wouldn't be too concerned about their journey, Rainbow," Pilate said, smiling in her general direction.  "We all know that the landscape is far less perilous now."

	"Yeah..."  Josho nodded.  "Beside, danger is almost always in front of you, not behind you," he said.

	Rainbow twitched, but said nothing.

	Floydien quietly slapped a hoof against Josho's knee.

	"Augh!  Dammit..."  Josho retreated downstairs with a slumping trot.  "So it's gonna be like that for the rest of the trip?"

	"If fat boomer is lucky..."

	In the meanwhile, Elma hung her head with drooping dragonfly wings.

	"Elma...?"  Belle trotted over with Kera and Pilate.  "What's the matter?"

	"What's the point in asking?"  Elma sniffled.  "What's the point in anything?"  She looked up, her green eyes moist.  "I have nowhere to go.  I... belong to noplace."

	"There is always Alafreo," Roarke droned from the distance.

	Pilate and Belle winced.

	"How could I possibly go there?" Elma muttered.  "That isn't my home..."

	"It's all you remember, though, isn't it?" Pilate remarked.

	"But that doesn't make it real!"  Elma hissed, then deflated low to the ground.  "It doesn't make me real."

	"Well, what is it that you want, Elma?" Belle asked.

	"I... I..."  Elma grimaced, but eventually squeaked forth, "I want to see the mountains I grew up in.  I... I want to know what happened to my hatchlings..."  She sighed.  "Elma's hatchlings..."

	Belle knelt down and tilted Elma's chin up.  "If that is what you really want, we can make it happen.  Or if not, you can come with us."

	"Come with you...?"  Elma's eyes darted between the different ponies.  "Come with you where?"

	"Wherever you need to go before you feel that you're home," Pilate said with a smile.

	Elma was silent.  Her gazed turned to the rest of the jurists, then at Rainbow Dash.  "Is that what this is all about... this ship... this journey...?"

	Rainbow smirked.  Eventually, she nodded.  "Pretty dang much.  With a few exceptions."

	"Seriously, couldn't we have given them a toaster oven?" Zaid muttered into the cold winds.

	Rainbow rolled her eyes.

	Elma looked back at the ponies directly in front of her.  Her gaze fell on Kera.  Bending her head low, she stared the filly in the face.  "And you... are you home, little one?"

	"Mmmmm..."  Kera bit her lip and clung slightly to Belle's forelimb.  "Almost... th-thanks to you..."

	Belle and Pilate smiled at each other.

	With a tender breath, Elma nodded.  "Alright..."  She gulped.  "First Alafreo... and after that, we'll see..."

	"As you wish," Belle said.

	"Ya hear that, Floydien?" Rainbow Dash asked.

	"Yes yes yes."  The elk was already yanking at the controls of the ship.  "Paint bucket doesn't need to bark bark."  The ship hummed loudly as its skystone engine above came to life.  "Enough with the frosting and the snowing. We've got land to land."

	"Whoopsies!"  Props galloped to her hooves, knocking back Ebon and Eagle with a grunt.  "That's my cue!"  She flew down the crawlspace.  "I'll be in the womb, handsome!"

	"As well you damn should be!" Floydien hollered.  As jurists quickly trotted to the cockpit, he initiated the skystone drive.  "The wastes can kiss Floydien's flank-flank!"

	"Heh..."  Rainbow Dash kicked off the ship's hull and glided off.  "I'll scout ahead."

	"Good luck with that."

	Then, with a vaporous blast of disrupted air, the Noble Jury fired east like a bullet, following closely behind the prismatic blur piercing the clouds ahead of it.

		//------------------------------//
		// Away With the Frozen Wastes		//------------------------------//

	The arctic wastes were the very definition of calm.  A full day into the eastward trek, and the crew of the Noble Jury no longer had any reason to doubt that Stratopolis was the thing responsible for the alleged "Strip of Flurries" to begin with.  At all times, the ponies on board Floydien's ship needed only to glance down, and they would see an immaculate reflection of their skystone vessel gliding across the glass-like frozen waters.  The icebergs grew less and less frequent, and the smallest of sounds resonated across the frigid seascape.  Even the northern edge—a distant dim glow at this point—still issued thunder across the thin air from afar.

	Rainbow Dash's job of scout lasted barely a day and a half.  As it grew more and more obvious that there was next to nothing for her to observe before the bow of the Jury, she ultimately relented, retreating to her post on board the ship and allowing her wings a chance to relax, as well as her wounds of battle to heal.  For the most part, however, she remained on board the top deck of the Jury, eyeing the horizon with an instinctual wariness.  By the beginning of the third morning, she had given up worrying, and started trotting downstairs to join the rest of the crew in their regular meals.

	The mood on board the ship was calm.  The crew conversed with a general degree of liveliness, be it in small groups or as a whole over dinner.  Roarke, as always, kept her distance from the rest of the jurists, excusing herself more often than naught to examine the readings of her Lounge tech, checking up on the conditions and whereabouts of her alleged transport.  Elma didn't touch a single morsel of food.  Pilate and Belle weren't ignorant of this, and they kept their mealtimes short—choosing instead to congregate around the changeling and remain in her company as often as possible.  It took much coaxing—not to mention a regal amount of redundant conversation topics—but they eventually succeeded in making the shape-shifter smile from time to time.  A renewed glow of green energy flowed through her eyes; the changeling's health was satiated for a little while longer.

	At the start of the third day, Rainbow Dash, Pilate, and Floydien had a frank discussion concerning the ship's bearings.  Taking into account the memories Elma had to share about Alafreo's whereabouts, the crew decided to bend the ship's trajectory ever so slightly south.  The vessel's skystone carried them swiftly, scaling the parallels south of the extreme arctic regions.  Props worked hard to keep the engine running in best shape, and soon the Jury was operating at the best efficiency since they first ever stationed themselves in Gray Smoke.

	By the fifth day, Rainbow Dash noticed a slight spike in temperature.  The icebergs had completely vanished.  The waters below were considerably warmer.  Rainbow tested herself, gliding lonesomely above the lapping waves and dipping her hooves through the current.  Soon enough, the crew could walk the topmost deck without needing thick wintry gear.  Everypony welcomed the sensation, and many came up for fresh air for the first time in days.

	All the while, there was still no sign of land.  Although Elma assured them that the western edge of the continent was ever-looming, several members of the crew started to get antsy.  Most of all was Ebon, who fretted that the food supply might not last the remainder of the journey.  Hesitantly, the crew decided to conserve their rations, which cut down the volume of their daily meals by nearly two-thirds.  This left Josho in a less-than-pleasant mood, to put it lightly.

	To keep their minds off the lethargy and hunger of the trip, several ponies collaborated in constructing a make-shift hull to cover the damage done to the ship's forward observation room.  This involved utilizing much of the metal scrap confiscated from the Lounge's vessel.  Seeing as how even Roarke lent a hoof to the operation, this proved to be no real issue.  While the crew were able to seal off the observation room from the outside, it was still deemed too dangerous for occupation.  This meant Rainbow Dash had to find another place to sleep.  Begrudgingly, she chose the sofa inside the bottom deck's navigation compartment right across from the observation room.  The pegasus got very little sleep those evenings.

	To stave off the insomnia, Rainbow Dash resorted to pacing about the ship.  She even did this while most of the equines were asleep.  No matter how far she trotted or in how many circles, she always returned to the same spot—or rather the same thing.  The Sword of Solstice was being housed in the engine room.  It was Props who hypothesized that—perhaps just like the lavender tome—the enchanted blade might have some sort of a positive impact on the Noble Jury's skystone engine.  This, however, proved fruitless, and the engine room simply became a place to house the ancient artifact.  So, as a consequence, Rainbow Dash often found herself standing there, eyeing her reflection in the blade, pondering over the number of beasts it had slain in its time...

	And if Commander Hurricane ever purposed for another pegasus to pick the blade up.

		//------------------------------//
		// A Name Like No Other		//------------------------------//

	On the sixth day since setting out from Stratopolis, the Noble Jury had decelerated to a slow cruise.  Since Props insisted that the crew rest the engines, Ebon suggested they pass the cooldown time by bringing the vessel low enough to cast fishing lines into the sea.  If there was a chance of catching fresh meat, then they might be able to increase the volume of meals for an evening or two.  Naturally, most ponies jumped upon this idea.  Rainbow Dash gladly bowed out.

	So it was that by noon, the ship hovered a few naked feet above seal level with its hangar doors yawning halfway open.  Ebon, Zaid, Eagle Eye, and Josho sat inside the ship's rear, their legs dangling as they dragged fishing lures through the calm waters right beneath them.  Ebon's hunch proved right, and between the four of them they had already made seven meaty catches.

	"Way to go, sailboat," Josho said through a smirk.  He had to talk above the sound of his rumbling stomach while he casted another line.  "I'd kiss you if this damn hangar didn't stink so much."

	"I told Floydien.  I told him."  Ebon frowned as he held his fishing pole.  "We should have chiseled ice out of the icebergs before we headed south.  That way we could have resupplied the freezer unit and done something to better preserve caught fish, much less stave off the smell."

	"Well, at the rate at which we're crashing in on their parade, I'd say we'll be eating like kings soon," Zaid said.  He turned to grin at the other stallions.  "All in all, I'd say that things are going swimmingly."  His eyes turned rounder above a maniacal grin.  He took turns gawking at every stallion.

	"You really, really suck," Josho grumbled.

	"Yes."  Eagle Eye muttered.  "What the old stallion said."

	"Awwwwwwwww..."  Zaid pouted.  "Not you too."

	"Everything alright, EE?" Ebon asked.

	Ebon fought a burning, burning frown.  "This... smells... horribly."

	"Grin and bear it, princess," Josho said while casting another line into the glossy sea.  "Maybe you don't wanna get fat on your bones, but the rest of us do.  So be a part of the team and ignore it."

	"I can't..."  Eagle shuddered, his lavender muzzle turning green.  "I can feel it getting into my pores."

	"Well, don't worry," Ebon said with a smile.  "Just a few more catches, and then you can march inside to shower."

	"Yeah..."  Zaid chuckled.  "We'll all get into a circle and spit on you."

	"Ew!"  Eagle blanched and nearly fell off the hangar door from writhing.  "Ew ew ew ew!  You guys are impossible!"

	"You know, for once..."  Josho's muzzle curved.  "I kind of liked that one."

	Zaid brightened.  "You did?"

	"Move aside."  Metal-laced limbs trotted forcibly between the four stallions.

	The ponies looked up, shuffling aside.  "Excuse you, Roarke," Ebon griped.

	"Hmmmm... breeders going to breed..."  Roarke kept her copper-lensed eyes locked on a glowing yellow device in her grasp.  "Such a shame to interrupt your festivities, but I think it's finally catching up with me."

	"You don't say?" Josho droned without looking at her.  "Because it was starting to smell good until you arrived."

	"Too bad nature decided to trade your humor for fat."

	"Works for me, lady."

	"Wait wait wait..."  Ebon waved his hoof at the others and squinted up at Roarke.  "What do you mean?  What is catching up with you?"

	"It'll only matter to you in about a minute," Roarke said, operating a dial on the control.  "Unless, of course, you want to be crushed to a pulp by reptilian metal.  It makes very little difference to me."

	"Oh jeez!"  Eagle flinched, scrambling with his fishing pole to move aside.  "Oh jeez oh jeez oh jeez!"

	"Calm your crotch tits," Josho grunted, then turned to squint at the metal mare.  "Isn't this being a bit optimistic?  Especially for you?"

	"Could you flatulate a little louder?  I can't hear you."

	"You supposedly left that thing floating on its own on the far west edge of the Stratopolitan cyclone."  Josho's eyes narrowed.  "What makes you think it even has the juice to respond to your signal?"

	"It's highly-advanced Lounge tech."

	"So?"

	"I augmented it."

	"Ah.  So, I'm guessing it's swung by several merchant ships and murdered every respectful stallion on board."

	Ebon chuckled.

	"Unfortunately, I didn't have enough time to program that into it," Roarke said.  "Though, you're giving me plenty of reasons to do so now."

	"Just what kind of a transport is it, anyways?" Eagle Eye asked.

	"Ah..."  Roarke lowered the control and pointed out the hangar's rear ship.  "See for yourself."

	"Hmmm?"  Zaid and the others stood up to look.  Everypony squinted—save for Eagle Eye who merely blinked at the northwest horizon.

	"Hey... uhm..."  The unicorn trotted backwards on jittery hooves.  "Is it supposed to be coming in that fast?"

	"Mmmm... probably not."  Deadpan, Roarke reached a hoof out and yanked at a lever.

	Whurrrrrr—CLAK!  The hangar doors opened wider.  With a shriek, Ebon nearly slipped down into the blurring waters below.  Josho heaved him up while Zaid and Eagle Eye scrambled for a hoofhold.  Many of them turned to glare at Roarke, but had very little chance when a spherical black body sailed in from outside.

	WHOOOSH!  A tiny scale replica of the Lounge Ship came to a stop just inches from Roarke's muzzle.  She stood her ground, exhaling calmly, her breath forming a foggy splotch of condensation against the thing's pearlescent black hull.

	"Well, a little tardy, but quite responsive."  As she backtrotted, she pulled a knob on her control, forcing the thing to levitate forward on glowing amber engines until it settled to a stop, completely swallowed up by the hangar's interior with room to spare.  Roarke turned a dial, and six spokes came out of the bottom of the ship, balancing itself neatly against the floor of the hangar.

	The orb was small—for sure—but it looked to have enough room to fit two adult ponies, maybe three.  As Roarke turned a tiny lever on her control, this became obvious, for the opposite sides of the ship slid up and out like onion layers, revealing a dimly-lit interior with blinking consoles and a highly-advanced mana-powered forward display.

	"Reptiles built this thing?" Ebon remarked.  "I didn't realize it could be so... erm... comfy-looking inside."

	"It was only ever meant to be piloted by one naga at a time," Roarke droned as she leaned in to inspect the interior.  "Seeing as on their lonesome they're at peace with Quezaat, they can afford themselves some luxury."

	"Well, lucky you," Ebon said.

	Eagle Eye glanced inside.  "Ooooh... I like the red velvet interior."

	"It's not red," Roarke said.  "I had to acquire this ship from Vaughan from force."

	"Meaning...?"

	"I blew the lizard's brains out."

	"Oh, ick!"  Eagle jumped back from the ship and grimaced.  "That's it..."  He marched furiously towards the stairwell.  "I'm taking my shower!"

	"So, what's it name?" Zaid asked.

	"It does not have a name," Roarke said.

	"Pfft!  Get out of town!"  Zaid smirked.  "It's gotta have a name!"

	"All this vessel provides is utility," Roarke said.  "When the situation calls for more than two members of the Jury to split up and explore a region, we can once again rely on more than just Rainbow Dash to fly."

	"The cultist has a point," Josho droned.  "It's bad buckin' luck to pilot something without a name."

	"Forgive me if I don't share your superstitious sentiment."

	"I know!"  Zaid grinned wide.  "Whizzball!"

	Roarke turned with folded ears, practically hissing at the stallion.  "It... shall not... be called... Whizzball."

	"Don't be so silly!  I mean look at it!"  Zaid pointed.  "It's a ball!  And it whizzes!"

	"And you're a stallion and you leak.  What's the point?"

	"I'd be insulting the grand history of aviation if I called it anything else!" Zaid smiled.

	"I'll be right back," Josho said, trotting off with a smirk.  "Blondie and Dr. Bellesmith are going to want to see Whizzball now that it's in Floydien's hangar."

	"It is not Whizzball!" Roarke actually hollered.

	"Nancy Jane and Whizzball!"  Zaid chanted, pumping a hoof in the air.  "Together at last!"

	"Nnnnngh..."  Roarke leaned into the cockpit seat, looking around.  "Where's the self destruct mechanism...?"
	
		//------------------------------//
		// Let The Sun Shine In		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash squatted low to the floor, her fuzzy blue chin resting on crossed hooves.  She sighed through flaring nostrils as her tail slowly flicked every half-minute.  All the while, her ruby eyes remained locked on the polished golden lengths of the Sword of Solstice lying in the corner across the engine room from her.

	"If I were you, Dashie, I'd stop being shy and just ask the sword for a dance already!"

	Rainbow groaned inwardly.  She rolled until she was lying upside down and stared lethargically at Props.  "It's not that, Props."

	"Hee-hee!"  Props smiled while leaning over her communications array on the worktable and adjusting its dials.  "Then what is it?  Hmmm?"

	"It's... it's..."  Rainbow blew bangs out from her forehead and grumbled.  "I dunno what it is."  She tilted her head back and stared upside down at the blade.  "I almost feel as if there's something missing... something I totally failed to take into account since leaving Stratopolis."

	"You mean since Pilate dragged you—bruised and unconscious—out of Stratopolis?"

	Rainbow's eyes turned to straight razors.  "Yeah.  That."

	Props winced slightly, but nevertheless chirped:  "Maybe Commander Sugarcane—"

	"Hurricane."

	"Maybe she had a special code-word that would allow the sword to grow larger and shoot energy bolts from the hilt!"

	"Nnngh... I doubt it..."

	"You have to be at full hearts, though, first!"

	Rainbow squinted at the mare.  "Huh?"

	"Huh?!" Props blinked back.

	A beat.  Rainbow rolled her eyes and stood up, cracking her joints.  "It's the studs that catch my interest the most."

	"Heehee..."  Props smiled, blushing slightly.  "You and me both, sister."

	"No, I mean the six gems."  Rainbow pointed down the middle of the blade.  "The jewels studded down the length of the blade."  She stood over the weapon and squinted at each shape in turn.  "Each has a different color."

	"Like the rainbow?"

	"Pretty much.  Er... almost."  She sighed.  "More like something else.  Something that still haunts me.."

	"And what's that?"

	Rainbow's hoof tapped the edges of her pendant.  "The Elements..."  She gritted her teeth.  "The stones look like them... kinda sorta, I mean."  She shook her head with a sigh.  "Or maybe I'm just reaching..."

	"Do the colors look the same?"

	"It's... hard to tell."  Rainbow squinted across the engine room.  "It's so dim and... lavendery in here."

	"Well..."  Props stood up with a bright grin.  "Maybe Dashie should go to the top deck!  And bring the sword with her!"

	"Pffft.  What's that gonna accomplish?"

	"It's a sunny, golden sword!"  Props giggled.  "Maybe you'll see better if it gets some sunny, golden air!"

	"Hmmmm..."  Rainbow rubbed her chin.  "It is pretty bright outside still..."

	"Or, y'know, you could stay down here and help me practice wrasslin'."  Props adjusted the dials of the array as she spoke.  "I was kinda hoping Unky Prowsy would bring me up to snuff again, but—turns out we couldn't hang out as long as I thought—"

	Schiiing!  Rainbow dragged the Sword of Solstice off the floor and made a bee-line for the far door.  "Thanks for the advice, Props!  Okay.  Bye!"  Clang!

	"Hrmmm..."  Props' face scrunched up.  "What pony in her right mind would hate wrasslin'?"



	Roarke paced around the curved front of the tiny transport inside the Noble Jury's hangar, examining it.  At one point, she paused, leaning forward to study a glossy black panel that stuck out slightly from the rest of the hull.  Humming in a low tone under her breath, the metal mare pulled over a metal tray full of tools.  She gripped a needle-nosed device and shoved it into the space between the panel and the rest of the hull.  With persistent prying motions, she succeeded in popping the panel loose.  Some frayed wires stuck out from hiding, and Roarke grabbed another tool to pull the threads apart and properly examine them.

	She was so busy in her work that she barely noticed the sound of trotting hooves until they had traversed half the length of the hangar behind her.

	"Hrmmff..."  Roarke's muzzle frowned beneath her lenses.  "If you've come back to suggest more idiotic names,  you'd be better off signing your death warrant."  She attached to wires with a tiny splash of sparks and blew away the smoke.  "This vehicle will never... ever bear the name 'Whizzball.'"

	"As a stallion who's utilized his very own floating 'whizzball' for the better part of three years, I can assure you it's not entirely something to be ashamed of."

	Roarke paused.  Her lenses retracted as she turned around completely.  "Pilate.  I... did not know it was you.  I assumed it was one of the many other annoying and less-appreciable breeders."  She did a double-take.  "You are... blind..."

	"I'm glad you finally noticed," Pilate said with a nervous smile, feeling his way forward across the hangar.  He avoided bumping into a crate full of Lounge tech with a carefully placed fetlock.  "Still, if all of this time somepony had just glued my eyelids shut, I imagine it would have been a truly astronomical prank."

	Roarke rushed forward to grasp his legs and guide him away from the stacks of weaponry.  Halfway through the gesture, she fidgeted, then released his limbs.  She stepped back, clearing her throat.  "I do not understand.  Is not the Ocular Array sufficient for—?"

	"Belle is attempting to study that device you crafted to see if there is a possible way of merging it with the technology of O.A.S.I.S.," Pilate said with a calm smile.  "Until then, I am more than happy to navigate the Jury by my own means."

	"But..."  Roarke's brow furrowed.  "If I recall, Bellesmith is on the top deck.  With Kera."

	"Mmmmm... Indeed she is.  Getting ample sunlight, I imagine."

	"Shouldn't she be working around the clock to give you back your sight?" Roarke muttered, returning to her repair job on the transport's outer hull.  "Do you not deserve to see again?"

	"Fate already made its decision concerning me, Roarke," Pilate said as he calmly shuffled towards the craft.  "As for Belle, I am very lucky to have her back in my life.  Truly... truly have her."  He smiled.  "And we're both extremely fortunate for Kera to be... well... a fraction of her past self, I suppose.  That's why I'm perfectly happy for Belle to be spending the afternoon with her above deck.  It's only fitting."

	"Hmmm..."  Roarke's jaw clenched and unclenched while she worked.  "Rather convenient circumstances, wouldn't you agree?"

	"Would you mind being more specific?"

	"The changeling leeched a morbid clump of negative emotions from the filly's being," Roarke droned.  "And suddenly she's calling you both 'Mother' and 'Father.'"

	"Heh... you almost got it."  Pilate smirked only briefly.  He tilted his muzzle towards the floor.  "And, to be honest, I'm more than a little bit worried."

	"Is that so...?"

	"The only time she ever called us that was right before... before..."  He winced, but nevertheless sighed.  "Well, it was the preview to a life that never was."  He gulped.  "In Lerris."

	"So she's in denial, then?"  Roarke glanced over her shoulder.  "The filly has erected for herself a fantasy that all is well and Lerris never even happened?"

	"Now, I didn't quite say that."

	"Seems a likely scenario to me," Roarke muttered, returning to her work.  "I never once believed that the changeling was a complete cure-all."

	"Nor have I," Pilate said.  "However..."  He trotted behind her.  "Magical cure-alls are being hoofed out quite regularly as of late."

	"And what do you mean by that?" Roarke asked.

	Utter silence.

	Ears twitching, the mare spun around with a rattle to her mane's metal ringlets.

	Blindly, Pilate nevertheless stared straight at her.  "What point was there in giving me the Oracular Array in the first place, Roarke?"

	Roarke's lenses pistoned out.  "Seriously?"

	Pilate only nodded.

	"Hrmmm..."  Roarke turned back to the craft.  "Isn't there a Ledomaritan saying that addresses the act of punching gift-bearing horses in the chin?"

	"As 'Vaughan,' you had access to the Lounge's ship and all of its resources.  Razzar and his lackeys knew far more about Stratopolis than the rest of us.  Surely their devices could have detected anything and anyone in the mists."

	"Surely you have a point to all of this, zebra."

	"You must have known where everypony was at all times," Pilate said, tilting his head aside as he squinted into nothingness.  "Rainbow Dash and Josho... Eagle Eye..."  His metal brow furrowed.  "Why didn't you recruit them?  Why me?  Why call upon the supposed talents of a stallion who has been blind for many years and lacks the proper skills of a warrior?"

	"Don't be so quick to downplay your strengths," Roarke muttered.  "You were more than efficient in tackling the challenges of Stratopolis."

	"But you didn't know that, Roarke.  You couldn't have."  Pilate took a firm breath.  "You didn't know anything.  You were aware of the danger and threat of Stratopolis.  In fact, you were aware of it far more than myself, Rainbow Dash, and all of Lasairfion's company combined.  And yet you chose to put all our hope in the hooves of a blind stallion made to see through a fragile, mind-numbing device."

	"It worked well enough, didn't it?"

	"Indeed."  Pilate smirked sharply.  "Well enough for me to see you when you thought I couldn't."

	Roarke froze completely.  She slowly slumped her limbs down to the floor, hanging her head from the hull of the transport.  After several seconds, she turned around with shuffling hooves and faced Pilate.

	"At first, I thought the movement I detected was more undead creatures," Pilate said.  "I figured they had gained some intelligence and were stalking me from the perimeter of the Ocular Array's reach.  But that had to have been impossible."  He cocked his head to the side.  "And everytime I turned to examine this body more carefully, it suddenly and magically vanished.  Now... why would an undead pegasus fly away from its target while all its companions are rushing forward?"

	"Confusing things happen in combat," Roarke muttered.  "You were fortunate to have paid enough attention to deal with your immediate threats."

	"Roarke, my mind is used to working in several more dimensions than the average pony," he said, tapping the metal plate over his skull.  "And deeper, mind you.  Using O.A.S.I.S. takes intense concentration and sends my nerves on fire.  It's one reason why I prefer a calm and serene life of study and quiet reading."

	"I figured it was because you were simply a satiated breeder."

	"Hmmm..."  Pilate's lips curved.  "You truly are a clever pony, Roarke, but sometimes genius can blind you to simple details."  His brow furrowed once more.  "I know that 'Vaughan' never left me, Roarke.  When Rainbow and I flew through the clouds, when we fought at the door to Urohringr, when we nearly collapsed at Commander Hurricane's grave... you were there.  You were watching over us... over me."

	Roarke stood in dead silence.

	Pilate continued.  "I suspect that beneath all of that tough exterior... that virulent bitterness and apathy to all warmth and love... there exists a conscience, Roarke.  Am I wrong in suggesting this?"

	The mare sighed.  She sat down on her haunches and avoided the sight of his curious face.  "I had already made an assumption about the ponies Rainbow cared for, and it more or less led to our stopping by Lerris."  She gulped.  "I wanted to undo the damage done to the equines she cared for... the ones she loved.  But Kera was beyond salvaging.  Belle's mood was something that escaped my Searonese understanding.  But you?"  She tilted her head his way.  "You were the strongest link in the chain.  If I could find a way to lift you up... then perhaps... just maybe the rest of the 'family' could be dredged from the mire that I had inadvertently buried you in."

	"And your solution was to enable me to become a hero?"  Pilate raised an eyebrow.  "As if it would resurrect some forgotten piece of myself from the past?  My 'glory days,' as t'were?"

	"It worked reasonably well, from my estimation."

	"But you had no way of knowing that, did you?"

	"Erm..."

	"Which is why you chose to stick close by and monitor me while 'Vaughan' supposedly 'left for the Lounge ship?'"

	"No matter what unfolded, I was responsible for your fate.  I did not wish to shirk it this time."

	"Roarke, has it ever occurred to you that the poignance of a gift given under the pretense of enabling another pony was swiftly nullified the moment that you decided to play chaperone and guide me towards the supposed goal?"

	"I... I-I..."

	"And all of it simply to appease Rainbow Dash?" Pilate remarked sharply.  "As if my life, and even Belle's and Kera's, are all just means to and end?"

	Roarke was gritting her teeth at this point.  "I... I had thought that triumph—even the illusion of triumph—would be enough to pull you out of the abyss that Lerris had flung the whole lot of you."  She hung her head with a heavy exhale.  "I suppose I can now see how the entire endeavor can be seen as hollow and condescending.  It... simply did not occur to me at the time."

	Pilate stood in silence.

	"You... you must understand... even though I don't understand..."  Roarke fidgeted.  "I have never been proficient at expressing and empathizing feelings.  Problems in my life have only ever been solved with tools—be they weapons or mechanisms.  I engineered you to be one such tool, Pilate.  And..."  Her teeth practically cracked on the precipice of uttering it:  "I am sorry, Pilate.  I entreat you to forgive me for any wrongdoing.  You..."  She sighed and ran a hoof through her braids.  "You are not the only pony who's blind—"  She froze suddenly.

	Pilate had crossed the distance and was hugging her.

	Roarke winced.  "You are embracing me, zebra."

	"Mmmm... Indeed."

	"I... am at a loss," she grumbled.  "First Rainbow Dash, and now you..."

	"You're strangely pleasant when you are apologetic," Pilate said, leaning back with a smile.  "Do you actually think I'm angry with you?  Disappointed?  Aghast and insulted?"

	"I... I for once do not know what to think."

	"I am thankful, Roarke," Pilate said in a warm tone.  "Sight or no sight, I know an act of genuine sincerity when it crosses my path.  And I'm especially keen to recognize when it goes against the grain of what makes a pony."

	"Quite simply, I-I did not want more misery to befall you," Roarke said, squirming.  "I almost failed in that endeavor."

	"Mmmm... but you didn't."

	"Yes, but still—"

	"Roarke, if there's anything you must learn, it's how to accept that many things can be good."  He leaned forward and hugged her again.  "And that many ponies can actually be grateful."

	"Mmmmmnfffnnnngh..."  She groaned towards the ceiling, her face frowning.  "If you insist, breeder."

	"Hmmm..." He smirked over her shoulder.  "Now I know—once and for all—that you are not and have never been a changeling."

	"And why is that?"

	He chuckled slightly.  "Because you've yet to suplex me to the floor."

	Roarke's ears twitched, but she didn't budge an inch.  "I'm afraid you have me at a disadvantage..."

	"Changelings, for all of their talents and flare, don't do a very good job of changing, now do they?"

	"Erm... no..."  Roarke nodded.  A strange light lit the room, like glinting teeth beneath a brief smile.  "I-I suppose not..."



	"It's still chilly," Kera said, shivering slightly.  She turned and smiled into the high winds.  "Heh... but a good chilly."

	"Much more invigorating than staying below deck everyday," Belle said with a wink.  "Wouldn't you agree?"

	"Why wouldn't I?"

	"Yes... well... erm..."  Belle glanced aside with a nervous blush.

	Josho stood off to the side, cleaning his shotgun.  "Overprotective birds don't get much wind beneath their wings."

	"Huh?" Kera turned towards him with blinking eyes.

	"Josho..." Belle stifled a hiss.

	He merely smirked.  "Doctor, doctor?"

	"Nnnngh..."  Belle face-hoofed and sighed.  "Kera, let's just say that I'm far more keen on enjoying life than I was weeks ago..."

	"Yeah, okay."

	"Even if it doesn't make much sense at the moment..."  Belle reached over and caressed the filly's chin.  She smiled.  "I promise that I'm not going to be the same old mother hen to you."

	"Uh huh..."  Kera gazed off at the open waters, teetering left and right on her hooves.  "Boy it's windy."  She glanced over her shoulder.  "Y'know, I was thinking: what if I got my mane cut really... really short?"

	"Like Spark's blazes, you will—!"  Belle grimaced, cleared her throat, and exhaled slowly.  "We'll... uhm... t-talk about it later, 'kay?"

	"Mmmmmmmmkay."

	Swooosh!  Rainbow landed with a sheen of golden light.  "'Sup, melon fudges?"

	"Likewise."  Josho waved.

	"Enjoying the sunlight?  Good."  Rainbow spat the hilt of the sword out of her mouth and held the thing in the crooks of both hooves.  "I'm sure the sunlight enjoys you too."

	"Whoahhhh..."  Kera bounced up straight and leaned forward on her hooves.  "Is that what I think it is?"

	"Careful... Careful."  Belle tugged Kera back slightly from the blade.  "Uhm, Rainbow?  What are you doing with the pegasus zombie slayer?"

	"I've been staring at this thing all week," Rainbow droned.  "But, like, the light's too dim downstairs.  I figure I might see some of the details better if I brought this out here."

	"Just what in the hay are you looking for?" Josho spoke above the billowing air.  "I doubt these waters are gonna lend you a sharpening stone."

	"Nope, but the stones that this thing's already got are really egging me something awful."  Rainbow leaned her muzzle closer to the length of the blade.  "It's like a piece of ancient Equestria is trying to make sense to my brain from the inside out."

	"Once I get O.A.S.I.S. working again, I'm certain Pilate can help you study it, Rainbow."

	"Thanks, Ding-Dong, but for once I'd like to figure something else without the Zebra Notes, ya feel me?  And as it stands, this Sword could really use with some—"

	FLASH!  The sword lit up with golden fire from the hilt to its jagged end.  Within seconds, an ethereal voice wafted across the top deck:  "Commander Hurricane?!"

	"Aaack!" Belle jumped back.

	"Gaah!"  Rainbow dropped the blade to the floor.  Clang!

	Josho cocked his shotgun and aimed stupidly at the air.

	Kera stood in place, staring with wide eyes.

	Once more, the voice lifted, emanating from the vibrating blade itself.  "Commander Hurricane, it couldn't possibly be you.  Who is this?  Who has unsheathed the blessed blade after all these millennia?"

	The ring of ponies gawked at the blade.

	"Please.  Do not be frightened.  I am not mad.  I am simply curious.  Are you the descendants of Hurricane's brigade?  Do you know what happened to the pegasus detachment?"

	Rainbow's eyes squinted.  She stalked forward like a pensive cat.  "...Princess Celestia?"

	The sword pulsed once more with burning energy.  "Rainbow Dash...?!"

	"Princess Celestia!"

	"Rainbow, it is so unbelievably wonderful to hear your voice once more.  When you were last cut off from the moon's enchantment, we had feared the worst.  But how is it that you've come across Hurricane's weapon?"

	"Princess!  It is you!"  Rainbow yanked the blade up by its hilt and spun with it in the air.  "OmigoshOmigoshOmigosh!"  She gasped, beamed, then blinked.  "...what are you doing inside a sword?"
		//------------------------------//
		// And You Have My Sword		//------------------------------//

	"Millennia ago, Luna and I harnessed this sword out of our combined might," Princess Celestia's voice rolled against the high winds along the Noble Jury's top deck.  "It was meant to be a symbol for Equestrian sovereignty.  The harsh winter brought upon by the windigoes had just come to an end.  The three races of ponies had at last come together, and as our blessing to pegasi, unicorns, and earth ponies alike, we crafted this blade.  My sister forged it out of pure moonstone, and I imbued it with strong solar magic."

	The Sword of Solstice glowed with bright golden pulses, matching the tone of the regal alicorn's voice.

	"But not long after the unification of Equestria, a new threat had come upon the land.  It traversed the air above like a gray phantom, carrying with it boundless tempests and maelstroms.  My sister and I endeavored to banish it from the Equestrian skies, but we found the task far more daunting than we had originally imagined.  Whatever possessed this flying bastion of evil, it was empowered by pure chaos energy, the likes of which we hadn't fought since our first brush with Discord.  It became clear to us that this structure was older than even the alicorns, belonging to an age when the very foundations of the worldly plane were first set into motion.  We considered using the Elements of Harmony to banish structure, but the cost of such a mighty spell would have been far too great.  Equestria was a new, struggling kingdom, and there were still many threats from all sides.  Our subjects needed our constant intervention to survive in this new age.  Alas, when Commander Hurricane of Pegasopolis proved that she had found a way to steer the threat out of our skies, we greatly admired her courage, and we gave her our blessing..."

	Rainbow Dash nodded, gripping the sword while most of the Jury stood at a distance watching.  "You gave her the sword," Rainbow said.

	"Yes, and with it we gave a piece of our power... my power.  That is why many of Clover the Clever's later texts speak of a prolonged winter following shortly after the unification of Equestria.  I had to make the days shorter for the span of half-a-decade to compensate for the energy I had donated to Commander Hurricane.  Still, she and her fearless brigade deserved no less.  Hurricane was embarking upon a long and dangerous quest that—quite frankly—none of us knew the outcome of."

	"And... you were able to speak to her?" Rainbow asked, blinking across the golden light at Bellesmith, Pilate, and Kera.  "Just like how you're speaking to me?"

	"Indeed.  We had long made our commitments to the Equestrian homeland.  Still, that didn't change the fact that we cared very deeply for Hurricane and all of the pegasi soldiers who accompanied her on her mission.  When she left, we waited patiently and in earnest for an update.  Sporadically, every few months, she would communicate with us.  The task was difficult—from what we understand—because the Sword of Solstice requires direct sunlight in order to open a channel of communication with me.  Constant storms and cloud cover made this impossible, so Hurricane would have to risk a great deal of turmoil just to get word through."

	"Uhm... h-how long did you keep hearing back from her?"

	"Honestly, Rainbow Dash?  Not as long as either my sister or I would have wished.  In less than the space of six years, Hurricane ceased speaking to us altogether.  We assumed the worst, and it broke our hearts.  Three times over the next millennium, we sent aerial expeditions out in a desperate search for Hurricane and the accursed sky structures that she had piloted away.  It wasn't that we had expected her to somehow still be alive, but perhaps there could be survivors of her brigade—or at least a sign of what happened to her to end the communication.  However, after the third expedition ran into trouble with another kingdom—nearly costing the lives of everypony in the search party—we decided that it was no longer worth sending expeditions out in hunt for a deceased hero."

	"That at least explains how the legend of 'Stratopolis' got proliferated so broadly," Pilate said.

	"Stratopolis...?"

	Rainbow Dash cleared her throat.  "Celestia, is talking to you like this having any—I dunno—bad effect on you maintaining the harmonic field around the chaos rift?"

	"No, Rainbow Dash.  Fear not.  This is a very simple communication spell.  If nothing else, the burden lies on the enchantment that was placed on the Sword of Solstice ages ago."

	"Ah, okay..."  Rainbow smirked, her tail flicking.  "That's a good thing, cuz I've got a lot of stuff to talk to you about."

	"As I am beyond enraptured to hear.  I wish I could express how overjoyed I am at having a chance to speak with you so soon.  At first, my heart leapt at the possibility that somepony in Commander Hurricane's bloodline had finally grasped the sword once more.  But knowing that it's you, it's an even greater blessing than I had at first anticipated."

	Belle smiled, leaning in to nuzzle Pilate as the couple watched the exchange.

	"Well, I'm just sorry it's not anypony from Hurricane's brigade," Rainbow Dash muttered.

	"As it possibly couldn't have been.  I do understand, Rainbow.  It has been many, many eons and I doubt any one of them would still have stuck to such a chaotic post."

	"It's... it's a lot less cheerful than that, Princess Celestia."  Rainbow gulped.  "Hurricane... uhm... she and her party didn't last long after piloting Strato—err... the 'chaotic structures' out of Equestria."

	Silence... and then:  "I see..."

	"You'll be proud to know, though, that they gave their lives defending the rest of the world from something far nastier than even you or Luna could have imagined.  In fact, my friends and I barely got away with our skin intact.  But... y'know..."  Rainbow smiled nervously.  "It's a good thing.  I mean, a lot of good has come out of this.  I know it's hard to believe, but you can totally kiss that evil floating city good bye and—"

	"Queen Chrysalis..."

	Rainbow blinked.  "...what about her?"

	"Did you run into Queen Chrysalis, Rainbow Dash?  Or perhaps her older and wiser sibling, Tchern?"

	Rainbow gawked at the other jurists, then stared at her reflection in the sword.  "Well... yes.  I mean, pretty dang much, yeah.  Ahem..."  She leaned forward.  "Why do you ask?"

	The broadcasted voice carried warmth—almost a ringing quality.  "Somehow, I knew, Rainbow Dash."  Pride resonated warmly from the blade.  "I knew that you had a hoof involved in it..."

	"Involved in wh-what?"  Rainbow bit her lip.  "Your Highness... h-has something happened in Equestria since we last talked?"

	"A most remarkable thing indeed.  In towns all across Equestria, sparse numbers of citizens suffered fainting spells.  When they came to, they... weren't quite the same as they once were.  For a brief moment, dismay and confusion swept the landscape from Appleloosa to Canterlot.  A few panicked parties even thought that the landscape was suffering a full-on invasion.  However, the citizens came across as entirely harmless.  Luna, in her infinite wisdom as Equestria's chief ruler, calmed everypony, then gathered the altered citizens in question together... to protect them.  Over the past few days, they've been recollecting long-lost memories about who they are and where they came from.  We now have nearly five hundred ponies—a new and tiny demographic—who have been added to the cultural fold of Equestria."

	Rainbow Dash exhaled.  "Changelings..."

	"If you have indeed stumbled upon Chrysalis—and now these shape-shifters have been freed from whatever previously bound them—then I can only imagine that, someway and somehow, you have done a good and harmonic thing over there, Rainbow Dash.  Perhaps, for the sake of these timid citizens under Luna's charge, you could do us all a favor and illuminate the situation?"

	Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  She smiled warmly.  "You do love your illuminations, eh, Your Majesty...?"
		//------------------------------//
		// In Her Majesty's Royal Company		//------------------------------//

	"Nnnngh..."  Eagle Eye wandered into the ship's kitchen, his hooves taking him on a loose, zig-zagged path.  He blinked blearily, wincing from the bright light sources in front of him.

	As the room came into focus, the ex-mercenary caught sight of a familiar burgundy shape.  "Well, good morning, sleepy head," Ebon remarked with a smile, all the while stirring a pot full of a dense soup mixture.  "You certainly kerplunked for a long, long time."

	"Mmmf... I-I was up late last night, practicing sword and shield maneuvers on the top deck."

	"Pffft."  Ebon smirked.  "Didn't Stratopolis give you enough practice?"

	"Funny you should say that."  Eagle leaned against the doorframe and rubbed his muzzle, eyes blinking.  "In truth, I'm super behind.  Guess I wore myself out..."  A few more blinks, and he squinted at the cook.  "I thought we were scrimping meals for the time being."

	"Mmmm... We are.  But today, we've got reason to celebrate.  So I'm making extra broth for everyone."

	"Oh?"  Eagle Eye stifled a yawn.  "What's the occasion?"

	"You mean you don't know?"

	Eagle dizzily shook his head.

	Ebon glanced over.  "That's what you get for sleeping through half the day."  He grinned.  "Turns out Rainbow's sword that she found in Stratopolis is closely tied to Celestia."

	"Celestia?"  Eagle Eye's muzzle fell agape.  "You mean as in Princess Celestia?"

	Ebon nodded.  "The one and only!  That's why it's so empty below deck, in case you may have noticed.  Almost everypony is up top, listening to what the ruler of Equestria has to say."

	"Even Floydien?"

	"Even Floydien."

	"But... y-you came down here...?"

	"Well, somepony's gotta feed the rest."  Ebon smirked.  "Besides, at this point, Rainbow and Celestia are probably just catching up.  I already got a good earful, listening in on the Princess talk about Commander Hurricane, Chrysalis, and a bunch of freed changelings in Equestria..."

	"Wait..."  Eagle Eye suddenly stood up straight, his fuzzy ears perking.  "Freed changelings?  Chrysalis?"

	"Hmmm?"  Ebon glanced over while he continued to stir.  "Why, yes.  Seems like the Equestrians sequestered them from the rest of the populace until they could understand why there were suddenly shape-shifters in the kingdom."  He smiled.  "Turns out the changelings are mostly harmless.  Heh... almost makes you wish we ran into them instead of the ones who brought us to Stratopolis in the first place, huh?"

	Eagle Eye stared into the far corner of the kitchen.  "Did... did they even know that they were changelings?"

	"I... don't think so."  Ebon shrugged, glancing into his pot.  "From the sound of it, they've been posing as normal Equestrians for a long time.  Then, out of nowhere, they showed their true colors.  And it happened around the same time Rainbow Dash confronted Chrysalis face to face... well, maybe it wasn't her real face, but you get what I mean, Eagle—"  Ebon looked up, and he dropped the ladle in his grasp.  "Eagle?"  He blinked.

	The unicorn was gone.



	"...and that's just the thing, there were literally thousands of pegasi who were mutated by the purple slime," Rainbow Dash said, her mane blown by the high winds.  The ocean stretched around the Noble Jury in every direction as she paced a circle about the glowing sword lying atop the deck.  "I mean, I didn't exactly count them, as I was too busy kicking their ugly flanks... but you get the picture."

	"And that's quite distressing, considering that less than one hundred and fifty pegasi accompanied Commander Hurricane on her heroic trip."

	"So you see where I'm getting at, Your Highness?"

	"Indeed.  It's only logical to conclude that the majority of corrupted pegasi you encountered belonged to something other than the Pegasopolitan Officer's brigade."

	"Pilate and I think it's more of... y'know..."  Rainbow Dash swiveled and faced the sword.  "...the ancient pegasi I keep hearing about."

	"The ones to whom the 'Herald' were supposedly faithful to?"

	"All I've ever learned about them, Princess Celestia, leads me to believe that they were supremely bad dudes."  Rainbow's brow furrowed.  "What if they were responsible for all the nasty crud that happened in Stratopolis?"

	"Do you mean to suggest that they were the ones who steered the city into Equestrian airspace thousands of years ago?"

	"Erm... no.  Actually, I think they were wasted long before then."

	"Interesting..."

	"I know, right?"  Rainbow squatted by the sword, staring into its golden surfaces.  "Here's what I'm thinking.  The old world—Urohringr—was once whole, a solid ring of sorts.  But then it split up.  And these giant floaty city thingies—the Sentinels—were lost in all the chaos.  But—like—the pegasi found one of the Sentinels and took it over.  Now, based on what Belle has experienced in her past sequencing with the likes of Nightshade and Nightshade's foals, it's a firm guess that these pegasi were also responsible for splitting Urohringr up to begin with.  Now, wouldn't that make sense?  If they wanted to separate the pieces of the ring, then it makes sense that they'd want to—y'know—dominate the newer and smaller piece of real estate.  So they took over Stratopolis with the hope of flying it around and acting like they owned the place.  And, for all we know, maybe they did.  But... like... at some point they bit off a little more than they could chew..."

	"And they infested themselves with this infernal, viscous material which you described..."

	"I know, right?"  Rainbow nodded.  "Princess Celestia..."  She gulped.  "What if there aren't any of these pegasi left?  What if they ultimately killed themselves off by doing this crap?"

	"I detect a great deal of distress in your voice.  Why does this possiblity worry you, Rainbow Dash?"

	"Well..."  Rainbow fidgeted, then ran a hoof through her mane.  "If all the pegasi are gone, then who do we have left who'll have a clue to undo the damage that's been done?"

	"From what you've told me, it sounds like that part of the world has more and more hints for you to uncover.  Even with all of the resources and historical archives of Canterlot at my subjects' disposal, you still stand to learn for more than we can about this."

	"Yeah, but... I feel like there's a lot that I'm supposed to learn in so little time."  Rainbow Dash bit her lip.  She flung a weak gaze towards Pilate, Bellesmith, and the others.  "And we both know it's very... very little time..."

	Silence.  Then, at last, Celestia spoke in a calm tone.  "Rainbow Dash, I cannot pretend to know what truly happened to these ancient pegasi—nefarious or not.  However, there is one curious observation that I must point out."

	"Hrmmm... yeah?  What's that, Your Highness?"

	"The inner workings of Stratopolis—including those adorned with the symbols of 'Urohringr'—responded to you and only you.  That said, it stands to reason that they responded in a like manner to Commander Hurricane as well."

	"Right.  And just what are you getting at?"

	"Simply that I do not think that all of the pegasi of whom we speak about actually died out," Celestia's voice said.  "And, if that is the case, then I refuse to believe that they are all innately evil."

	Rainbow Dash blinked.  She plopped back on her haunches, her ears twitching to the rattle of her pendant.  She turned her head with a dazed expression and glanced nervously at Pilate and Bellesmith.  The couple stared back, their expressions no less dumbfounded than Rainbow's.

	Far away, across the deck, past where Josho, Zaid, and Roarke stood, Eagle Eye lingered in the shadows of the ship's rear stairwell.  He listened in on the conversation, and his hooves trembled slightly.  Over and over again, he fought the urge to gallop out onto the deck, for something anchored him in place.

	"Princess Celestia," he murmured to himself in the faintest of voices.  "Have you seen the changelings?  Have you talked to them?"  For a moment, it looked like he had gained the strength to charge forth, but he held himself in place, wincing.  "Nnnngh... I can't.  I just... can't..."

	His ears drooped and his eyes grew misty.  Slowly, his gaze panned across the deck... until his sight fell upon Elma's timid figure.  From afar, the changeling looked as nervous and melancholic as he did.

	Eagle heard his heartbeat pounding in his skull.  Taking a deep breath, he slowly backed up and trotted down the stairwell, though his eyes remained locked on Elma as long as they could...
		//------------------------------//
		// The Sun Will Rise Again		//------------------------------//

	Ebon Mane dropped a bowl of broth onto the table in front of Josho.  The obese stallion licked his lips, levitated a spoon, and prepared to dig in—

	"Is Rainbow still up there?" Ebon asked.

	Josho froze within inches of a scrumptious sip.  He sighed out his nostrils and grumbled, "Yes, Mister Mane.  She's still on the top deck."

	"With the sword?"

	"With the sword." Josho leaned in again to sip—

	"How is that even possible?" Ebon thought aloud, rubbing his chin as he hobbled around the mess hall.  A burning sunset lingered beyond the portholes.  "I mean, what kind of a pony has an enchantment that powerful to communicate across such a long distance?"

	"Apparently a sun goddess wise enough to rule a western kingdom full of sparkles and rainbows.  Now, if you don't mind."  He opened his muzzle again—

	"It just... seems too good to be true, y'know?" Ebon remarked.  "I mean, between all of the chaos dragons and changeling queens we run into..."

	"Nnnnnnghhhhh..."  Josho's eyes rolled.

	"...I'm a little concerned if it's the real deal, ya feel me?"  Ebon's muzzle scrunched in concern.  "What if—like—it's some trick?  What if it was Chrysalis and not Hurricane who planted that sword there for Rainbow to find it?  What if the battle for Stratopolis never ended?!"  He spun about with panicked eyes.  "What if—"  Three spoons flew into his mouth, shutting him up.  "Mmmf-mfmmmmf-mmfmfmmf!"

	"Drool on your own time, worrywort," Josho grumbled, leaning to finally enjoy some soup.  "Mmmmf... I, for one, intend to relish the golden moment."

	Ebon flung both hooves up and popped the utensils out of his mouth.  "Well...!"  He frowned.  "The least you could to is say 'thanks for the meal,' you surplus sized hippop—"  He stopped in mid-speech, then squinted across the mess hall.  "Say... uhm... has anypony seen Eagle Eye lately?"



	Elma reclined on the sofa located in the bottom deck's navigation room.  A rumpled set of blankets were draped over the end.  Choosing to remain a bit secluded, Elma was allowed to "bunk" in that particular space for the duration of the Noble Jury's journey to Alafreo.  She was grateful for the peace and quiet, even though the engineering compartment loomed just a bulkhead away, rattling the ship's frame with a constant hum.

	In the changeling's hooves was a book labeled "The Frozen Wastes:  An Exploratory Description."  Somehow, Floydien possessed the tome in his library.  It was the first thing Elma pulled off the shelves when she spent the first night in the navigation room.  The book was known far and wide by geographers and merchants on more than one continent.

	"I've read this before..." Elma murmured to herself, almost in an inquistive fashion.  Her green eyes curved and she gulped.  "Or have I...?"

	Silence.

	She slapped the book shut with a sigh, then curled up against the blanketed couch.  She pulled her legs in tightly, envisioning what it meant like to be a hatchling once more.  Only...was she ever a hatchling?

	"Did you lay me, Chrysalis?" She murmured to the walls  "Or was it my mother... my other mother...?"

	The changeling ultimately winced.  She gripped her skull, moaned, and slid off the couch.  On tired hooves, she wandered over to a map lying on the cartography table.  She squinted at the illustration.  Across from the Frozen Wastes, the continent east of Alafreo was a nebulous blob, mostly unknown to Ledomaritan and Xonan map-makers.  She ran a hoof across the jagged fjords and mountainous peaks that represented her home.  For the time being, it was just as strange looking to her as it was to the ponies of the western continent.

	There was a knock on the door.  With a slight gasp, Elma turned towards it.  She gulped and said, "Yes?  You m-may come in..."

	Softly, the hatch turned and the door slid open with a metallic creak.  A lavender shade entered, one hoof after another.

	"Eagle Eye?"  Elma blinked.  "What brings you here?"  She glanced up through the metal ceiling.  "Usually you're spending dinner time with Ebon Mane."

	"Funny you should say that," he said, attempting to smile.  All that came out of him was a weak grimace.

	The changeling squinted.  "Eagle?"  She leaned forward.  "Is everything alright?"

	"I... uhm..."  Eagle Eye shifted slightly on his hooves.  He avoided her gaze as he anxiously asked, "I was wondering if we could talk about you..."

	"About me?"  Elma blinked.  "You mean... about Alafreo?  About turtle culture?  About the kingdoms east of my home?  Belle's told me all about your career as a mercenary.  No doubt someone as loyal as you would like to protect the Noble Jury against all obstacles—"

	"Erm... no, Elma," Eagle Eye shook his head.  "I was h-hoping that we could talk about the other you."

	Elma's dragonfly wings twitched.  She sat back on her haunches, took a courageous breath, and spoke in a firm tone.  "Alright, Eagle Eye.  What is it that you would like to know?"

	Eagle Eye straightened his mane and meekly looked at her.  "All that you have to give me..."



	"...and once we arrive, I guess it'll be up to me and whoever else volunteers to go ahead and scout the place out."  Rainbow Dash leaned against the wooden railing of the top deck.  She casually cradled the Sword of Solstice across her lower body as she stared up at the dimly-glowing skystone above.  "I mean, Alafreo's the only home that Elma Boreal knows.  But... she's been through a lot, y'know.  She might be better off staying with us."

	"Do I detect a hint of concern in your voice?"

	"Well, sure, Your Highness.  Elma saved Pilate's life and helped clear the cobwebs out of Kera's mind.  And all of this after her entire friggin' world collapsed.  It'd be a darn shame not to pay her back in a way she deserves it."

	"If being on board the Noble Jury is not the life for her, then surely she will tell you."

	"That's just it.  I dunno if she does have the strength to tell us."

	"Didn't you just say that this is the changeling who saved two of your best friends, and through purely courageous and selfless means?"

	Rainbow gave a long sigh.  Her lips curved a little bit.  "I guess it's kinda stupid, huh?"  She gulped.  "After all this time, to assume that my friends can't hold their own."  She ran her hoof through her windswept mane.  "I wouldn't be as far east as I am now if it weren't for them."

	"If you ask me, Rainbow Dash, Elma Boreal has proven that she has integrity and strength.  If nothing else, she deserves your faith."

	"True... true..."

	"I believe what you're planning about Alafreo is a wise thing.  Elma will convey to you her feelings in the end."

	"I guess I'm just afraid that... that..."

	"Yes...?"

	Rainbow exhaled, then muttered.  "That some way, some how, Lerris will happen again..."

	Celestia answered much sooner than Rainbow had anticipated.  "It is understandable for you to be so paranoid.  What happened along the warfront was truly terrible indeed.  I wish it had not ended up that way, but for all of our strength and power we cannot change the past."

	"No.  No, we can't."

	"And yet, not all is hopeless in your journey.  Did you not experience quite fortuitous circumstances back in Stratopolis?"

	"Well... at least a half-dozen of Seclorum's company died, including Aatxe.  And then you had the Lounge members that—"

	"Terrible tragedies indeed.  But was it all for naught?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.  Ultimately, she murmured, "We destroyed the city... we freed hundreds of changelings..."

	"Tens of thousands, I would venture to say, Rainbow."

	"All in a blink..."  Rainbow shook her head.  "And... like... are they actually doing okay over in Equestria?"

	"Absolutely," Celestia said.  "Granted, there've been a few dramatic cases, with shape-shifters who thought they biologically belonged to certain families.  But even they—for the most part—have begun adjusting to the new knowledge.  Most households have even considered adopting the newly discovered citizens into their fold."

	"No way..."

	"Why not?  After all, every one of us seeks the betterment of others.  Of the changeling citizens discovered in Equestria, at least a quarter of them had replaced actual, living breathing ponies.  But ever since they became cognizant of their situation, they volunteered whatever residual information remained in their minds.  Over the past few days, Luna has sent companies of the royal guard to secret places hidden throughout the kingdom.  Already, they have found more than half of the replaced citizens—frozen by Chrysalis' former broods into magically-induced sleep."

	"Wow, that's... th-that's pretty great, Your Highness."  Rainbow Dash smiled.  "So everypony's getting along back there?"

	"I would whole-heartedly agree."

	"I guess... eh..."  Rainbow shrugged.  "I've seen so many places and dealth wish so much nasty stuff."  She gulped.  "Guess it's a bit hard to believe that a place as harmonic as Equestria still exists.  But, hey, that's home..."

	"And harmony exists with you, Rainbow Dash."

	"Hrmmm..."  Rainbow fidgeted, staring past the sword and into the wooden surface of the Noble Jury's top deck.  "Both you and I know I haven't exactly been doing things harmoni—"

	"Harmony exists inside of you," Celestia's voice said.  "You are doing great things.  You are doing good things.  If I cannot convince you of that, then ask any of the friends and allies whom you've earned along your journey."

	"Right..."  Rainbow nodded, her eyes a bit misty.  "I think I'll do that."

	The sword started flickering.

	With a gasp, Rainbow sat up straight. She craned her head and peered beyond the ship's stern.  The sun was going below the horizon.

	"Princess Celestia..."  She gulped.  "The Sun.  I'm afraid—"

	"I know, Rainbow Dash," Celestia said.  "Alas, it is Luna's duty."

	"Right..."  Rainbow nodded.  "I know..."

	"Still, fear not.  The Sun will rise again.  We now have quite the many opportunities to commune."

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow nodded again, smiling this time.  "The Sun will rise again..."

	"Sleep well, Rainbow Dash." Celestia's voice grew more and more distorted.  "Dream harmoniously... as y-you d-d-d-deserv-v-v-e—"

	Her voice cut off.

	Rainbow's hears drooped.  As carefully as she could, she hugged the sword and its hilt to her chest.

	From the open cockpit, Floydien turned his antler'd head and hollered back, "Done with the glow glow?!"

	Rainbow Dash nodded.  "Done with the glow glow."  She tightened her jaws and stood up.  "For now."

	
		//------------------------------//
		// It's Past Somepony's Bed Time		//------------------------------//

	Kera's green eyes opened.  She stirred, winced slightly, then propped herself up in the darkness.  Bringing a forelimb up, she rubbed her squinty eyes, then blinked at the bulkheads surrounding her.  Her ears twitched, but all she heard were the gentle breaths of two slumbering equines.

	Quietly, she shuffled over to the edge of her cot and leaned over.  Her eyes peered down through the darkness.  Two figures cuddled together on the lower bunk.  A striped shape hugged a yellow shape to his chest, sleeping peacefully.

	With a deep breath, Kera turned her body around, swung her legs out, and hung her limbs off the cot one inch at a time.  At last, after holding her breath, she released.

	The filly fell to the floor, landing on all four hooves with the slightest of echoes.  She tensed her body, squinting at the lower bunk.

	Pilate and Bellesmith shifted slightly, but neither woke up.  There was an ear-twitch or two, and once again both were still.

	Kera exhaled with relief.  After fidgeting for the space of half-a-minute, she turned towards the door, shuffled across the tiny crew compartment, and began turning the handle to the hatch.  Once it was open, she slid it slightly ajar with the tiniest of creaks, then slid out into the hallway of the second floor.

	Alone.



	"It's... very difficult to explain," Elma Boreal murmured, pacing around the navigation room.  "I mean... uhm... not that it's troubling to me, mind you.  I just don't know if I can make somepony else understand.  Somepony who's not like... well..."

	"It's too soon," Eagle Eye said, shaking his head.  "You've been through a lot.  I'm... uh... I-I'm very sorry, Elma."  He turned and made for the vertical crawlspace beyond the entrance.  "I'm sorry for bothering you—"

	"No.  It's fine."  Elma reached a hoof out, then bit her lip with her fangs.  "Erm... for the slightest moment—around the time when Rainbow Dash reached out to my... the other changelings—I felt a connection, you know?  And I don't mean with just the changelings in Stratopolis... but with every changeling who was presently obeying Chrysalis."  She stared across the luxurious room with a gaping expression.  "I felt the changelings in Ledomare.  I felt the changelings in Xona.  I felt the changelings east of Alafreo.  Changelings in places I couldn't possibly even recognize..." She winced and rubbed her head.  "Archipelagos with sandy beaches.  Cities made out of pure metal.  Kingdoms with emerald plains."

	"Was it like..."  Eagle Eye squinted.  "You were in their bodies?"

	"N-no.  More like... we all had the same body..."  Elma blinked at him.  "And we all had the same beating heart.  We were all as one... but we've always been.  Only..."  She sighed with flinching dragonfly wings.  "Only Chrysalis had always blinded us.  With pain and malice and anger and misery."  She stared up at Eagle again with thin green eyes.  "She made us think that it was what we needed to satiate our hunger.  And... we did need it, only there was so much more we could have benefited from.  And when we all realized that—when we all awoke to what we've been missing all of our lives—we all became one.  We unified as one mind... and then..."  Her words fell apart.

	Eagle watched patiently.

	Elma sighed. She stared at the floor.  Eventually, a smile came to her lips.  "We grew up.  We didn't need her anymore.  And, in a way, we didn't need each other anymore.  Now we are all separated... and yet we're still one beating heart, or at least we know that we have the capability of being so.  If we just allow good feelings to flow through us.  Goodness.  Kindness.  Love.  All of that... it's a binding element.  It always has been.  And it's what we were truly hatched for."

	"All of that..."  Eagle tilted his head curiously to the side.  "You grasped in one single epiphany?"

	"I know it's a lot to chew," Elma said.  "It's hard enough for me to put into words.  I was positively floored by the event when it happened.  From what Pilate and Rainbow Dash described of the other changelings, they were no less shocked than I was."

	"But... it was a good thing... r-right?"  Eagle asked.

	Elma winced.

	Eagle did too.

	"Erm... yes.  But... Chrysalis did so many horrible things to us... to me."  Elma inhaled hard, trying to keep a steady posture.  "There's so much to make up for.  And as wonderful as it was to have that moment of an epiphany... of an awakening... it still won't bring back my past.  Or, at least, the past that I believe in."

	Eagle Eye nodded.  "Elma, I am so very sorry for what was taken from you—"

	"Only it wasn't taken from me.  Don't you see?"  Elma grimaced.  "It was all in my head... planted there like the rest of Chrysalis' lies.  But..."  She cleared her throat and clenched her jaws tight.  "I need to keep in mind what Rainbow and Bellesmith have been telling me."

	"And what's that?"

	"That I have the rest of my life ahead of me," Elma said.  "And that this is the opportunity for a fresh start.  To discover myself and see where my life goes from there."

	"And you think that's going to happen in Val Roa?"

	Elma said nothing.

	"Erm... s-sorry..."  Eagle Eye hung his head, sighing.  "This is..."  He gulped.  "I shouldn't be bothering you with all this.  I feel terrible."

	"Yes, you do."

	Eagle Eye glanced up at her, blinking.

	"I... uhm... I-I can sense what you're feeling," Elma said.  "I... I-I always could, really.  I guess I just never gave it much thought."  Her spines twitched and she murmured, "And waking up to who and what I am certainly helped."

	"Then hopefully you feel..."  Eagle Eye stood up straight.  "You know that the ponies on board this ship care an awful lot for you."

	"Yes.  Yes they do."  Elma nodded.  Her green eyes flinched.  "Well, maybe not Roarke..."

	"Heh..."

	"And they love each other very much too," Elma said.  Her gaze lingered on him.  "Some... more than others."

	Eagle's brow formed a bead or two of sweat.

	Her eyes narrowed.  "You're dying to ask something, aren't you?"

	Eagle opened his mouth... lingered... and eventually blurted, "How did you know you were freed from Chrysalis the moment that it happened?"

	Elma blinked.  "That's not what you wanted to ask me."

	Eagle was already nodding.  "The question that really bothers me is something I'll have to figure out on my own."

	"Very well."  Elma trotted quietly towards him.  "You want to know how sure I am of my connection to Chrysalis?  I'll tell you..."



	Outside, a tiny peach-colored shape huddled against the door.  Kera pressed her ear against the frame, hearing the muffled sounds of Elma's and Eagle's voices.  One sounded decidedly more distressed than the other.  Soon, the conversation quieted, and hoofsteps came closer towards her.

	With a sharp inhale, Kera flattened herself against the wall and flinched as the hatch swung open and in front of her.

	Eagle Eye stepped out, his eyes glazed and distant.  He stared at the floor, his ears twitching.

	Elma trotted out after him.  "Eagle Eye..."  She placed a hoof on his shoulder.  "Is... is there anything I can do?"

	"I'm... n-not the one who needs help."

	"I think I've been getting by quite nicely," she said with a nervous chuckle.

	"I... w-wasn't talking about you either," he said.

	She blinked curiously at that.

	He turned and gave her a light hug.  "Thanks for being so gracious to talk to me, Elma.  I hope I didn't disturb you too badly."

	"Not at all, Eagle Eye.  Quite frankly, I'm glad to have somepony to talk to."

	"You can come visit me and the other guys anytime..."  He leaned back and smiled at her.  "No need to stay down here all the time, alone with your thoughts."

	"It's... b-been difficult coming out of my shell," she murmured, when winced.  "Especially now that I'm getting used to the shell being inside of me..."

	"Heh, I can only imagine."

	"But... I-I think I'll take you up on your offer," she said with a smile.  "These have been an anxious few days waiting for Alafreo's western bluffs to show.  I wouldn't mind getting some sunshine."

	"Yes..."  Eagle smiled faintly and climbed up the ladder to the second level above.  "Just don't let Josho blot out the daylight.  The old stallion will do that."

	"Heheh..."  Elma waved.  "Have a pleasant evening, Eagle Eye."  She stood there, hugging herself slightly.  Then, with a contented sigh, she backtrotted into the navigation room, closing the hatch behind her.  Giving the handle a twist, she turned around.

	Kera sat in the middle of the floor.

	Elma jumped back, her green eyes flaming with fright. "Goodness!"  She breathed and breathed... then exhaled with relief.  "Kera, you gave me quite the start.  What are you doing up this late, little filly?"

	The foal stared up at her with unflinching green eyes.

	Elma's fanged lips pursed.  "Kera?"  She took a nervous step forward.  "Kera, what's wrong, honey?"

	Kera started shaking.  At last, she blurted, "Fix me."

	"Huh?"

	"Please."  A tear ran down Kera's tattooed cheek as she sniffled.  "I n-need you to fix m-me again..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Welcome to the Club, Precious		//------------------------------//

	Elma couldn't help it.  She chuckled slightly, nevertheless bestowing Kera a confused expression.  "Fix you?  What... wh-what do you mean, child?"

	"Please..." Kera sniffled, trying her best to stand up straight as another tear rolled down her face.  "You can do it.  I know you can.  You've done it before."

	"I... I don't know what you mean..."

	"Don't... grkkk..."  Kera hissed, her upper body heaving in anguish.  She stumbled, but caught herself with an oustretched hoof in time to sputter:  "D-don't play d-dumb!  You're the reason I'm here.  You're the reason I'm talking... walking... living."

	Elma stared at her.  After a deep breath, she murmured, "Kera..."

	"I need you to fix me!  Right n-now!"  Kera began hyperventilating, her knees wobbling.  "Don't make me beg you."

	"What I did was very impulsive and dangerous," Elma said.  "I nearly hurt myself very badly.  And to what end?"  She tried smiling reassuringly.  "Kera, it was your inner strength that kept you preserved all this time.  All I did was pull the wool out from over your eyes.  Being 'fixed' has nothing to do with it—"

	"But you did it!" Kera shrieked.  "You totally did!  And it's... it's fading..."  Kera gave the walls a five thousand mile stare as her breaths came in tiny little squreaks.  "I can feel the fire again.  I can smell the blood."  Her ears folded as she started backing up from everything and nothing.  "He's coming... he's coming to g-get me..."  Sparks billowed out from her horn.  Everything that wasn't bolted down inside the navigation room lifted slowly into the air.  "I can see his eye in the starlight... like a beacon... and he's going to f-find me!"

	Elma panicked.  She batted floating books away, rushed forward, and grasped Kera's shoulders.  "Kera!  Please!  Concentrate!  You mustn't—!"

	"Eeenngh!"  Kera lightly batted Elma's forelimb.  The changeling flew across the room as if launched by a cannon.  As Elma's vision returned, she looked up to see Kera stumbling against the door to the engine room.  By now, the bulkheads were rattling from the sheer energy wafting off of the filly's horn.  "Fix me!  Quick!  Before he makes another pony suffer!"  She sobbed into her curled hooves while her mane billowed behind her.  "I don't him to get Mommy and Daddy!  It's all my fault!  It's all m-my f-f-fault!"

	"K-Kera...!"  Elma winced.  She saw the rivets jostling on the doorframe to the engine room.  Cursing under her breath, she briskly spun around and climbed up the vertical passageway to the Noble Jury's second floor.



	Pilate's ears twitched.  Seconds later, his blind eyes opened.  He sat up in bed, holding his breath.

	"Nnnngh... guh... b-beloved...?"  Bellesmith murmured drowsily, turning over beneath the covers.  "What... mmmf... what is it...?"

	"Do you hear that?"

	"I l-left my magical zebra senses b-back in Ledomare, Pilate..."

	"Belle, I... I think the ship is shaking?"

	"Mmmm?"  Belle looked up, eyes thin as paper slits.  "Maybe Roarke is finally taking her aggressions out on Zaid."

	"Belle, I'm serious..."

	With a creak, the door to the cabin flew open.

	"Who—?!" Pilate gasped.

	Belle looked over, squinting.  "Elma...?"  She sat up, rubbing her eyes.  "Elma Boreal?  What's the matter?"

	"Please..."  Elma stammered between panting breaths.  "You two need to come down to the navigation room.  Quick."

	"What's going on, Elma?" Pilate asked, stretching his hooves and swinging out of his cot.  "You sound terribly distraught."

	Belle blinked.  The bleariness flew out of her eyes in a flash.  "Kera...!"  She reached to the wall, lit the lamp, and glanced up at the empty bunkbed above them.  Jaw agape, she looked at Elma.

	Elma merely bit her lip.

	Belle flew out of bed and scampered into the hallway.

	"Belle!"  Pilate wheezed, stumbling to catch up.  Elma held his hoof and led him carefully towards the vertical chamber.  "Belle, don't go alone!"

	"He's right, Belle!" Elma called out.



	Belle was already sliding down the ladder between the observation room and navigation.  Before she even reached the bottom floor, a strong wave of mana shoved her off the rungs.  Her body flew heavily into the makeshift barrier erected in the doorframe to the observation room.  "Oooof!"  She rolled onto the ground, her mane kicked by an otherworldly wind.  She looked up—wincing—and saw a pulsating source of green light inside the navigation room.

	"Blessed Spark..."

	"Belle!  How bad is it?!" Pilate shouted from above.

	Elma's voice interrupted.  "I'm sorry, Belle!  She just came to me after I was finished talking with Eagle Eye!  I didn't even realize she had entered the room!"  The changeling carefully made her way down with Pilate.  The two picked Belle up and braced themselves against the waves of telekinesis.  "She asked me to 'fix her!'  The poor thing was so frightened and confused!  Suddenly, before I knew it, she was starting to have a panic attack!"

	"That's one way of putting it!" Pilate exclaimed, then bravely trotted towards the doorway.  "Kera!  Kera, darling!  Please, calm down!  We're here, Kera!  Everything's going to be alright!"

	"Nnnnnghhh!"  Kera was curled up in a little ball on the floor, gnashing her teeth as books and blankets and shredded map parts swirled around her.  "Mommmmmmy!  Dadddddyyy!  He's killing everypony!  I can't stop him!"

	"Oh Spark..."  Belle grimaced, her eyes tearing into the magical wind. "She's relapsing."

	"I b-beg to differ, beloved," Pilate said, shading himself with an oustretched hoof.  "I don't believe she's ever stopped drowning in it."

	"She came so close to begging me to help her again."  Elma gulped.  "Perhaps... p-perhaps it would be for the best if I—"

	"No!"  Belle frowned.  "That is not the solution!  Not for you!  Not for her!"

	"But... but maybe if you just let me—"

	"Pilate!" Belle called over Elma's shoulder.  "Can you get in there?"

	"Yes!"  Pilate said through gritting teeth as he trudged bravely against the telekinesis.  "I do believe so!"

	"If we can just get to her, maybe we can comfort her!" Belle said.

	"I'm... tr-trying...!"  Pilate marched and marched... and slipped.

	Belle braced his body with her own, giving him leverage.  "Here, Pilate.  T-together!"

	"Kera!  We're here!"  Pilate exclaimed, practically tugging himself one hoof at a time into the center of the magical maelstrom.  "Darling, you can relax!  You're no longer in Lerris!  Nopony is in Lerris!  Most expecially you!"

	"He won't stop for n-nothing!" Kera squealed.  "Mommy!  Daddy!  You have to go away!"

	"We're not leaving you, Kera!"  Pilate shouted in a determined voice.  "Don't you fret!  Your mother and father will be right th—"

	"Pilate."

	The zebra's ears tilted back towards Bellesmith.  His name had barely been whispered against the cocophony.  Both mates knew that only he could hear it.

	With a neutral expression she said, "We cannot feed it anymore."

	Pilate clenched his jaw tight.

	"I know it will hurt her," Belle said.

	Pilate hung his head.  Then, after a heavy breath, he lunged forward, gripping the doorframe to steady himself.  "Nnnnngh—Kera!"

	"D-Daddy?!" Kera yelped above the noise.

	"Kera, they're dead!"

	The little foal's eyes popped wide—glowing.

	The zebra struggled to shout, "Mommy and Daddy are dead!"  He took the blow of a book slapping across his metal plate and grunted, "They died years ago, Kera!  You couldn't save them any more than you could save Lerris!  But none of it was your fault!"  He barely dodged a desk lamp flinging past his skull.  "And you know what?!  You overcame that tragedy!  Your strength and charisma carried you out of that pit and brought you into our arms!  Me!  Pilate!  My beloved!  Belle!  You came to us and you saved us!"

	Kera hyperventilated, lips trembling. "But... b-but..."  She gulped.  "Mom... Dad... th-they... th-they..."

	"They're gone.  But you're not!  And neither are us!" Pilate hollered.  "Kera, please!"  He clawed across the floor with his forelimbs and tugged himself towards her with Belle in tow.  "Come back to us!  We need you!  We need the brave little filly again!"

	"I... I-I can't..."

	"Nothing hurts more than knowing how helpless one can be!" Pilate shouted.  "But listen to me!  Trust me!  There is strength on the other side!  You just have to be brave enough to cross it!  Nopony else can bridge it for you!  Don't stay alone in the dark where our love can only barely reach you!"

	"Just... just feel so..."  Kera's teeth gnashed.  "So... so..."

	Pilate nodded.  "I feel angry too!  And sad!"  Pilate stretched a hoof out.  "Welcome to the club, precious.  Induction is the worst and most painful part..."

	Kera's body shook, quivered, and heaved.  With a low pitched roar at first, then ascending into a violent wail, she yelled for a good twenty seconds.  Every floating bit of debris flew outwards like particles from an exploding atom, colliding with the walls and falling limply to the floor as the green pulsing manastorm finally ended.

	All was silent, save for Kera's quiet sobs.

	Gathering his breath, Pilate stood up straight with Belle's help.  Both rushed into the center of the room and scooped Kera up into their arms, holding her close.

	"Kera, I'm so sorry.  We're going to get through this, darling," Belle said, nuzzling the filly.  "I promise you.  You're a strong little pony.  You can take on anything."

	"It's so horrible..."  Kera whimpered, covering her eyes with a pair of hooves.  "Every time I dream.  Every time I see darkness.  He's there."

	"We can't allow him to haunt us forever, Kera," Pilate said.  "We have to live past the anguish.  We have to show that he's not won."

	"Just... so... so mad..."  Kera hiccuped, burying her face in Belle's chest.  "So stupid..."

	"Nothing stupid about needing to find yourself," Bell murmured, kissing her forehead.  "No matter how many steps it takes..."

	Kera said nothing.  She simply shivered, surrendering to Belle's and Pilate's embrace.

	Eventually, the door to the engine room opened up, and Props stumbled in, clutching a wrench.  "Where?!  Where are the windigoes?!  Hmmm?"  She slid her goggles up and blinked at the tender scene.  "Oh.  You guys.  Did Kera eat the windigoes?"
		//------------------------------//
		// A Dizzying Account of Things		//------------------------------//

	"So... uh... is she..."  Rainbow Dash scratched her chin and turned to gaze sleepily towards Pilate.  "Is she pulling on through?"

	Pilate cracked the door shut to Belle and Kera's crew quarters.  He then tilted his head towards the pegasus.  "It is difficult to say.  There really is no measure for this sort of a thing.  She'll most likely be dealing with these scars for the rest of her life, as will the rest of us."

	Rainbow Dash nodded.  "I understand.  Believe me."

	"I'm simply glad that Elma came to us when she did.  The sheer amount of magic that Kera can channel is unbelievable.  We were quite close to losing another part of the Noble Jury."

	"I heard a lot of screwy stuff went down while she was losing it."

	"Nothing we can't live without," Pilate said.  Then, with a nervous chuckle, he said, "Nothing Mr. Floydien can't live without."

	"Yeah, but we all know how much you like maps and books n'crap."

	"Regardless, most of that stuff is behind me.  Behind all of us."  Pilate leaned back on his haunches.  "I'm good at following maps, Rainbow Dash.  I'm not quite so good at making them."

	"Val Roa's east of us, right?"

	"Er... from what I understand."

	Rainbow smiled wearily.  "Then all we need is for a few good ponies to point us towards it and we're good.  Who needs a map?"

	"Well... erm..."

	She shrugged.  "I got along just fine without a map for the longest time."

	"Yes.  And it served you well."

	"It could serve us all well, you know."

	"But it's unknown territory, Rainbow," Pilate remarked with a gaping expression.  "I know we haven't yet got evidence of any wars or tyrannies taking place, but it's still a whole new continent with hitherto undiscovered—"

	"We have the Sword of Solstice," Rainbow said with a smile.  "We have first access to the voice and wisdom of Princess Celestia." She winked.  "I think we've got things covered in the safety department."

	Pilate took a deep breath.  "Yes... yes, I suppose we should look on the bright side of things.  Erm..."  He winced.  "All puns forgiven."

	"Spoken like a true blind zebra."

	"Props has the skystone working.  Kera may be struggling, but at least she's speaking again.  Roarke's on our side once more.  You're no longer having your dizzy spells.  We're about to make landfall at any moment—"

	"Four times."

	Pilate's ears flicked.  "I beg your pardon?"

	Rainbow sighed out her nostrils and murmured, "I've had dizzy spells four times since we left Stratopolis."

	"Four... t-times...?"

	"Mmmmf..."  Rainbow Dash nodded, gazing off down the second floor corridor.  "I can't very well count the moments that happen in my sleep."

	"Rainbow...!"  Pilate hissed with a shocked expression.  "Why haven't you told anypony?  Are they happening more frequently?  I-I mean, are they worse than before or—"

	"Eh, it's about the same, really," Rainbow murmured, kicking at the floor with a loose hoof.  "Truth is, they never go away.  I'm just super thankful that they haven't recently screwed me over while I'm having to kick monster butt or fly at the speed of sound with tons and tons of ponies' lives depending on me."

	"Is..."  Pilate gulped.  "Is it the book?"

	"It's me, Pilate," Rainbow said.  "Everypony knows that."

	Pilate sighed, hanging his head.  "But nopony as well as you."  He swallowed.  "I suppose, with all of the many-many horrible things that we do battle with on a regular basis, it's so terribly easy to forget that the biggest crisis of all hasn't ceased to plague you."

	"I wouldn't call it the 'biggest' crisis, dude," Rainbow said.  "The 'lamest,' sure, but that's my thing to deal with."

	"Not by yourself, Rainbow."

	"Pilate..."  Rainbow leaned forward with calm eyes.  "Everypony here is a super awesome group.  I have no doubt that—if they all wanted to—they could keep the Noble Jury flying forever.  But that's not gonna work for everypony.  And besides, who wants that?  You all need a place to settle."

	"And what of you, Rainbow Dash?" Pilate asked quietly.  "Have you put more thought into that now that we're almost clear of the Wastes?"

	Rainbow stood up straight.  "There's only one way for me to ever settle."

	Pilate was silent.

	Flexing her wings, Rainbow shuffled past him.  "You should rest.  Stick close to Belle and Kera.  They need you."

	"Rainbow—"

	"With the observation room wrecked, I really have no snazzy place I like to sleep.  Not that I could get much shuteye anyway."  She headed towards the crawlspace and pulled herself up the ladder rungs.  "I think I'll hang out up top and wait for sunrise.  I still got lots to chat with Her Highness about."

	Once she was gone, Pilate silently hung his head, turned towards his room, and slid inside quietly.



	Inside the mess hall, Eagle Eye sat on a sofa facing the port side windows.  He was slumped down with his chin resting on his folded hooves.  Silken violent hair draped over his head as he gazed lethargically into the metal surfaces of the bulkheads.

	Something cast shadows against the manalight.  Ebon trotted over, exhaling with relief.  "Yeahhhhh... feels like it's been ages since I gave the kitchen that good of a scrub down."  He paused, blinking down at Eagle Eye.  A tiny chuckle escaped his lips.  "Looks like I'm not the only one who's sleepless."

	Eagle Eye said nothing.

	Clearing his throat, Ebon leaned against the sofa.  "I heard there was... er... some unpleasant business downstairs where Elma was bunking."

	"Hrmmm... I wasn't privy to the conversation," Eagle Eye muttered.  "Something to do with poor little Kera."

	"Or perhaps you couldn't hear over Josho's snoring?"

	"... ... ..."

	Ebon fidgeted.  "I... I-I'm sorry.  That was inappropriate timing for a joke—"

	"No.  It was..."  Eagle exhaled.  "It was pretty funny."

	"You seem exhausted.  Perhaps you'd rather sleep where it's less bright?"

	"It's not sleep," Eagle Eye droned.

	"Then what's bothering you?"

	The stallion didn't say anything.

	Ebon bit his lip.  At first, it looked like he was collapsing in slow motion.  Whatever the case, with little hesitant shudders, he drooped down until he was lying on the sofa besides Eagle Eye.  Leaning over, he softly rested the weight of his head and mane against the ex-mercenary's.

	"We've been through so much... but we're past it now," Ebon murmured in a shaky voice.  "We should be happy.  Don't we deserve to be happy?"

	Eagle Eye took a deep breath.  He reached over and wrapped a hoof around Ebon's shoulder.  "I am happy.  I'm just... I'm just tired as well.  But... it's different."  He sighed out his nostrils and gazed at the portholes once more.  "Everything is different."

	Ebon fought the urge to reply, but failed.  "I don't want you to be different."

	"Hey."  Eagle Eye raised Ebon's face so that they were gazing at each other.  "Hey.  Look right here.  It's me.  Okay?  I haven't gone anywhere and I'm not about to."

	Ebon gazed anxiously at him.  After several seconds, he cracked a soft, weak smike.  "Okay...."

	Eagle slid both forelimbs forward, enveloping Ebon into a tender hug.  Ebon sniffled once, but quieted as he nestled his chin into Eagle's soft mane.  All the while, Eagle remained staring quietly—pensively—into the corners of the room.

	Hours passed.  Somepony fell asleep before the other.  The night carried on.
		//------------------------------//
		// Laugh Tracks Are Not Included		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash lay upside down, her head dangling off the very bow of the Noble Jury.  She squinted at the dim horizon while the wind kicked at her prismatic mane  After several languishing minutes, she rolled her eyes, yawned, and kicked off the ship's hull.  Flapping her wings, she carried herself around and about until she glided to a stop in the middle of the top deck where the golden sword waited.

	Picking the hilt of the weapon up in the crook of her hoof, she swung it a bit left and right, feeling the weight of the thing.  Not long after, a shuffling sound came to a stop behind her.

	"Hmmmf... morning, Floydien," Rainbow muttered without looking.  "Say, it's gonna be sunrise soon.  Ya mind slowing the ship down a bit so that the wind won't be so noisy?  Thanks."

	"The only thing I can do with wind is break it," Josho's voice said.

	Rainbow blinked, then glanced over her shoulder.  "Oh."  A bleary smile.  "Hey, big fella."

	"Hi yourself, ya talking surf board."  Josho strolled to her side, his eyes on the sword.  "You still out here talking to Your High and Sliceyness?"

	"Actually, just about to," Rainbow said, stifling a yawn.  She motioned towards the half-open cockpit where Floydien's cloven hooves could be seen.  "Was hoping to tell the sky elk to slow us down a bit so I can hear Celestia's voice better when the dawn breaks."

	"Don't we have some place to be?"

	"And we'll get there better with an alicorn's illumination to light the way.  Trust me."

	"Yeah.  Sure."  Josho turned around and leaned lazily against the edge of the deck.  "You think she'll tell us anymore about Chrysalis?"

	"Believe it or not, but I think we know more about her than the Princess does."

	"No kidding?"

	"I guess?  I dunno..."  Rainbow shrugged and stared at her reflection in the blade.  Her eyes spun around each of the six multi-colored jewels.  "You know, you think you're on your own.  Even with a gaggle of friends, you think that all that matters is fighting off creeps and getting out alive.  And then you find out that something you've done has incidentally saved an entire race of ponies all across the world.  Saved them from oppression and all that unsexy stuff."

	"Do you feel like a hero?"

	"I feel freaked out of my featherstalks," Rainbow Dash muttered, her eyes darting over towards him.  "It's enough that I worry about you and the rest of the Jury.  But to be constantly reminded that—like—the stuff I do and can do may have an impact on the rest of the world?"

	"Yeah, well..."  Josho shrugged.  "You seem like the mare for the job."

	"Sure.  Maybe."  Rainbow exhaled softly as she gazed at the blade.  "Still, it was really wicked sweet to get this blade out of the whole mess.  Almost like a trophy, only it lets me catch up with stuff back at home."

	"You don't sound half as enthused as somepony might think."

	"Only 'cuz, for the longest time, I wasn't."  She turned and smiled limply at the horizon ahead of them.  "You know, there was a time when I absolutely hated the very sight of the rising sun."

	Josho squinted.  "Then why did you friggin' fly towards it?"

	"Because I had to be better than that which I detested," Rainbow said.  She turned and gave Josho a warm grin.  "Now I'm struggling to be just as good as that which I love."

	With a nod, Josho quietly said, "You know, you spend your whole life searching. But if you live long enough, you find yourself questioning whether or not you deserve all the stuff you've ultimately found."

	"Yeah, well, here's hoping I live long enough to at least find that out."  Rainbow twirled the sword around with a sigh.  "'Cuz I sure don't have time or room for a trophy case."



	Bellesmith snuggled tightly against Pilate's side in the warm shadows of their bunkroom.  She stirred and stretched, a contented smile on her face.  Turning over, she reached a hoof out and stretched it around a foal-shaped impression in the cot... only the foal was gone.

	Belle's eyes fluttered open.  She lifted her head up, staring at the blank space.  A length of bedsheets lay on the floor, trailing towards the compartment's cracked door.

	After a long exhale, she droned:  "Pilate."

	"Mmmm?"

	"She did it again."

	"Mmmm..."

	Not even half a second later, a high-pitched screech emanated from the far side of the Noble Jury.  Frightened out of his stripes, Pilate jumped straight up and slammed his metal forehead against the top bunk.  "Augh!"



	Inside the mess hall, Eagle Eye flew out of the sofa with a start.  He telekinetically tugged all around him for a sword that wasn't there.  Panting, he heard the shriek once again and whirled to face the kitchen.

	"Ebon?!"

	"How in all that is roasted and garlicky could this have happened?!"

	"Ebon!"  Eagle Eye hyperventilated and broke into a gallop.  The panicked figures of Belle and Pilate weren't far behind.  "Hold on!  I'm coming!"



	Eagle Eye burst into the kitchen, breathless.  There, he and Belle and Pilate saw the cook sitting on his haunches, pulling at his mane in utter shock and horror.

	"It... but... that... wh-why...?!" Ebon sputtered.

	Several pantry doors were hanging wide open.  Dozens of pots and pans and containers lay on the floor amidst a liberal scattering of spilt foodstuffs.  Sitting atop an overturned pot inside a halo of crumbs, Kera balanced a bowl of lettuce in her lap and munched, munched, munched away.  Upon the culmination of Ebon's ramblings, she stared up with bored eyes.

	"Hrmmmfff?"  She gulped.  "What?  I was hungry."

	"But... but..."  Ebon whimpered, lips quivering.  "I was saving that!  Rationing it!  For all of us!"

	Kera gulped again.  "Well, that's kind of selfish, don't you think?"

	"Kera...?!" Belle squeaked.

	"Hey Belle.  Hey Pilate."  Kera smirked and held up a hoof-full of greens.  "Want a helping?  It's not grasshoppers, but I'm sure your squishy belly can deal.  Meh."

	"Kera, what's gotten into you?" Belle remarked, flabbergasted.

	"Half of our rations in one sitting, that's what!"  Ebon stomped his hooves, frowning.  "What I want to know is how!  You're just one filly!  What could possess you to raid our own storage like this?!"

	"Nnnnng-mmmmmmff!"  Zaid slid out from behind an open closet, scarfing down a carrot stalk.  He gulped and waved a clump of half-eaten vegetables in front of the filly's face.  "Hey, kiddo, you've got to try this crud out.  It can make your eyes see for miiiiiiles."

	"Grrrrrrrrrrrr—Zaaaaaaaaaaid?!"  Ebon's teeth grind so hard they could produce sparks.

	"Hey there, Sailbuttboat!"  Zaid grinned.  "Nice stalks.  I didn't know you had so many of them!  Well... urp... until an hour ago, at least.  Seriously, did it ever occur to you to bake a cake?"

	"What's the meaning of all this?!" Ebon shouted.

	Eagle tried sneaking up.  "Ebon, calm down—"

	"I'll calm down once he's tossed into the ocean along with a ball and chain!" The cook pointed and hollered.

	"Hey, relax!"  Zaid shrugged.  "So the little tyke comes to me, saying she's got a case of the munchies.  And I was like 'Shoot, that's funny, I've had the same case for thirty-five consecutive days, only no munchies!'  So that's when we figured, 'Hey, let's tackle our munchies together, and then the rest of the crew will be safe!'"  He belched, then grinned crookedly.  "That makes sense in some parallel universe, right?"

	"We have vanquished the munchies," Kera said in a dramatic voice.

	"Belle..."  Pilate tugged at the mare's front right forelimb.  "If you don't mind..."

	"My pleasure."  She stuck her hoof out so that the zebra could rest his face against it.

	"Ebon..."  Eagle patted the enraged stallion's back and whispered into his ear. "The first killing is always the hardest.  Are you sure you wanna trot down this road...?"

	"Wuh oh..."  Kera said, wide-eyed, from behind a head of lettuce.

	Sweating, Zaid gave a nervous smile before dangling a limp bag of loose breadcrumbs.  "Uhm... some croutons...?"

	"Blaarghalblarghalblarghal!"  Ebon charged homicidally.

	"Whoops-a-poopsy!"  Zaid scampered to his hooves, scooped Kera up, and bolted out into the stairwell.  "Time to make like leaves and burn!"

	"Get back here, you pee-haired cult-sucker!" Ebon bellowed in a hysterical pitch.

	"Ebon!  Don't!  Ebon!"  Eagle galloped after him.

	Belle and Pilate were left alone in the littered kitchen.

	"Is it safe to look?"  Pilate tilted his head up. "Even for a blind pony."

	"I don't know..."

	"And should we be worried for Kera?"  Pilate fidgeted.  "Or happy for her?"

	"I... don't know."  Belle gulped.  "Perhaps both."



	"I'm gonna strangle you with your own manure-eating grin!" Ebon's voice shouted from the stairwell.

	"Whoah, doggy."  Josho spun about with wide eyes.  "No way in Ledo's uvula did the cook's balls drop overnight."

	"Buh?"  Rainbow Dash craned her neck to see.

	Zaid galloped at full-speed onto the deck with Kera strapped to his back:  "Weeeeeeee!"

	"I mean it!"  Ebon snarled, nearly foaming out the mouth as he chased the gangly stallion around and around the skystone support masts.  "I'll bury you so deep at sea that even whale crap won't reach you!"

	"H-heyyy!"  Josho grined, cracking his neck joints.  "I want in on this!"

	"No, you don't, old stallion!" Eagle huffed, then tried in vain to throw his petite weight in between the bodies of the fray.  "Everypony, please!  Murdering each other is very unfriendly!  At least last time I checked!"

	"Eagle, I adore you, but the next time you hug me it'll be through the trenchcoat I've made of his flesh!"

	"Pfft.  A trenchcoat?"  Zaid stuck his head out from around a mast, grinning.  "Be economic, dude.  Make a hoodie."  THWACK!  An angry burgundy hoof slammed into the wood, forcing Zaid to peak out the other side.  "Fine.  A scarf?"  THWACK!  Zaid backtrotted, sweating, from the middle of the deck.  "You know what?  Screw it.  Hipsters stopped getting into taxedermy as soon as it became popular."

	"Grrrrrr!"  Ebon launched himself at Zaid, only to be held back by Eagle Eye.  This didn't stop Ebon's hooves from reaching Zaid's neck, and soon all three stallions were being jostled and tugged around.

	"Hey!"  Kera giggled, pointing at Ebon's face.  "I didn't think it was possible to be that red!"

	"Yeah..."  Josho chuckled.  "It's like a raddish giving birth to beets that like to pleasure themselves in vats of ketchup!"

	"Josho!"  Rainbow gasped.  "Ebon!"  She gasped again.  Flapping her wings with a snarling expression, she hung over the wrestling crowd.  "Dudes!  For real!  Quit it before I wreck it!"

	"Don't look at me, Ralphbow Dash!" Zaid wished.  "He's the one with the Jockey Dahmer complex!"

	"You cost us our entire remaining stockpile of food!"

	"Dude, I offered you croutons!"

	"This is seriously getting out of hoof, Ebon—"

	"Zaid, knock it off!"

	"He's the one with the knocking and the offing!"

	"Please, just—"

	"Everypony—"

	"If we could only—"

	"Hey..."  Kera squinted eastward, shadowing a hoof over her eyes.  "Why's the sun so tiny?"

	"Kera, what are you even talking about?"  Rainbow Dash turned to look.  Her eyes blinked wide.

	The struggling stallions froze in place.  Zaid, Ebon, and Eagle blinked like some three-headed beast.

	Josho stepped out onto the ship's edge, staring out onto the horizon.  High above the water, a tiny light pulsed... pulsed... and pulsed again.  It stood out as a pinprick of illumination against a flat, dim horizon.

	"That... that's not the sun," Rainbow Dash murmured.  She glanced down at the dull, glossy sword, then back at the horizon.  "It's not up for at least a half-hour."

	"That's because some boomer is giving us the glow glow."  The cockpit door opened the rest of the way.  Floydien poked his head out from the pilot's chamber.  "Nancy Jane has been seen."

	"You mean...?" Ebon murmured.

	"A lighthouse," Eagle Eye said, his expert gaze locked east.

	Rainbow Dash hovered a bit higher.  As she did so, she heard the distant roar of crashing waves.

	"Land," she breathed.
		//------------------------------//
		// Another Testament of Rainbow Dash		//------------------------------//

	Floydien had slowed the Noble Jury's approach with Props' help.  The vessel was now cruising eastward at an easy glide.  The entire crew stood on the top deck, peering into the spectacle before them.  The closer they came to land, the louder the crashing surf pounded their ears from below, approaching an almost absurd volume.  This was because the land didn't have any soft, sandy shores to be seen.  Everything was sharp rock and jagged shoals.  The earth didn't rise gently out of the surf.  It jutted steeply and violently out of the ocean, forming a series of outrageously thin pillars that stubbornly resisted the tide.  In fact, these needle-thin mesas stretched eastward for as far as the crew could see, rising gradually with taller and taller spikes—dark and gritty at the bottom but topped off with dewy frost and splotches of alabaster marble at the peaks.  The air was cold, but not frigid.  Constantly, the waves threw themselves at the jagged bluffs with such strength that the spray reached as high up as where the Noble Jury hovered, sprinkling moisture onto the timid flesh of the gazing crew.

	The lighthouse that first alerted the crew turned out to be a far more elaborate thing as the vessel drew closer.  It wasn't anchored to the ocean floor, but rather propped on the very top of the westernmost cluster of earthen spikes.  Several of the jagged peaks had metal braces attached in a circle. These iron beams crossed over in a spiraling fashion, supporting a heavy vertical stalk in the center that erected itself high above the rest of the landscape.  A skeletonous array of diagonal metal bars wound about the entire vertical length, encasing a spiral staircase that culminated in a singular black box of a room within the bars—located right beneath the brightly lit lamp that illuminated the lighthouse as a whole.

	Down by the base of the "tower," several metal planks and walkways led to a cluster of humble little shacks—all crafted out of iron and aluminum—that balanced themselves perfectly atop an array of flat brass plates.  Along the outer fringes and facing the ocean, a series of gardens and planted flowers rested in shallow troughs.  A few spaces over, several windsocks and pinwheels faced the sea, twirling in the constant breeze.  It was a strangely tranquil sight that precariously loomed a few dozen feet above cacophonous, crashing waves.

	The sun had risen by the time Rainbow and the crew passed by the pulsating light house, and yet Rainbow's focus wasn't on the Sword of Solstice.  She hovered in little hummingbird zig-zags around the ship, studying the landscape from every possible angle.

	"It's... it's not abandoned, is it?" Ebon remarked.

	"Who do you think lit the lighthouse?" Josho grumbled.  "Cockroaches?"

	"I can't imagine anypony having to constantly deal with this noise," Bellesmith said with Kera balanced on her shoulders.

	"I don't think it is ponies, beloved."

	"I can't see anyone," Rainbow Dash said.  She glanced back at the ship from where she hovered alongside it.  "Who would want to live out here?"

	"I know!"  Props nodded.  "It's only an island!"

	"I don't think so," Eagle Eye said from where he leaned over the deck near the bow.  He looked north and west with a peering gaze.  "Or, if it is, it's a large island."

	"Do you see where the jagged bluffs end?" Ebon asked.

	"Uhm... I think the jagged bluffs are what make this place."

	"Neato keano," Props murmured.

	"If this is the mainland, then we stand to be outnumbered," Roarke droned.  She gazed over at Josho.  "This might be a good time to grab your gun."

	"Right—"

	"No!"  Rainbow Dash spun, waving a hoof.  "We're here to be peaceful!"

	"And how do we know that they are gonna be peaceful?" Josho muttered.

	Ebon gulped.  "Everywhere we seem to go, things are wanting to kill us."

	"Come on, burgundy."  Zaid smirked.  "Have a smidgeon of faith for once."

	"You're lucky I don't give you a smidgeon of arsenic."

	"Pfft.  You still on that, buddy?"

	"I'm with Mr. Zaid on this one," Pilate said, then squirmed.  "Partly."  He cleared his throat.  "Let's not jump to conclusions."

	"Yes," Roarke nodded with glinting lenses.  "Let's just let the local populace jump us first."

	"Roarke..." Rainbow muttered.

	"Hey."  Kera pointed.  "Look."

	Everyone turned their heads to see.

	As the ship passed over a cluster of jagged peaks, they spotted a round plate situated on the very top of it.  A two-story shack was situated in the center of the plate, and the crew could see a figure shuffling slowly, slowly out of the front door.  In the early dawnlight, a peppery turtle shell glinted.  A reptilian head looked up, then smiled a beaked smile before waving limply at the Jury.  As the shadow of the ship passed, the turtle continued his long stroll towards the first of several metal hanging bridges fastened between more plates resting atop more stone peaks.

	"Well, they seem friendly enough," Props said.  She adjusted the goggles over her eyes and blinked at the others.  "Unless waving is a turtle's way of saying 'Die a thousand deaths in candle-time.'"

	"So, is this it, then?" Ebon remarked.  "Is this Alafreo?"

	"All of it is Alafreo," Elma said.  Everypony turned to her.  She stood in the doorframe to the cockpit with a dull expression hanging off her chitinous features.  "The province covers a good chunk of the northwest edge of the continent, at least until the land draws dense to the east, beyond the Churning Line."

	Rainbow flew down and hovered before Elma.  "We could totally use your help in getting around this place, Elma."

	The changeling gulped and nodded. "I'm very much willing to do what I can."

	"But still... if you're up to it, we could..."  Rainbow Dash rubbed the back of her head.  "You know..."

	Elma nodded.  "I've been thinking about it a lot.  Especially... uhm... especially overnight."  Her eyes fell upon the furthest edge of the group.

	Eagle Eye avoided her gaze, fidgeting.

	Elma glanced back up at Rainbow Dash.  "But... b-but would you be willing to talk to the cityfolk first?  I... I-I don't think I'm quite ready to see my family again.  I mean..."  She winced.  "Elma's family..."

	"Sure thing."  Rainbow nodded.  "We'll do whatever we can.  So... uhm..."  She cleared her throat.  "What city is this and how do we find it?"

	"Look for a large cluster of brass plates centered around a tall stone spire with pronged peaks.  There'll be a bright violet torch burning in a cauldron hanging from the two promontories.  It's... r-rather high up, and definitely north from here.  There'll be some snow, but no blizzards.  At least... hopefully not."

	"Uhhh..."

	"And the township's name is Abinadi," Elma said.  "If you have a hard time finding it, you can ask any of the sentries."

	"Sentries?"

	"Peak Watchers on small dirigibles," she explained.  "They're probably taking off right now as we speak.  Eagle could easily spot them.  They're always tethered to a rocky Sentry Station on the outlying spires."

	"Well, alright."  Rainbow nodded and flew out beyond the edge of the ship.  "Watching for Peak Watchers.  You got all that, EE?"

	"Right.  On it," the stallion said, peering.

	"Is it a bad thing if I'm excited?" Props said in a bouncy tone.

	"Speak for yourself," Roarke droned.  She sat back on her haunches and folded her forelimbs.  "Looks like I'm not shooting anyone today."
		//------------------------------//
		// When in Alafreo, Do As		//------------------------------//

	"Good heavens!"  A snapping turtle adjusted his bifocals and smiled against the early morning glow.  "They have wings now!"

	Rainbow Dash hovered in front of him.  "Errrrrr... yeah.  Sure."

	The Noble Jury was yards behind her, coasting eastward slowly.  Rainbow had jumped off and flown over to speak with the pilot of a tiny, tiny gondola suspended from a wobbly balloon.  Tiny gears and motors puttered all around the miniature gondola, and a thick rope connected it to one of several jutting cliffaces down below.

	"Tell me, madame, are they real?" the turtle asked.  "Or the product of leather stitchwork combined with mana reinforcement?"

	"Seeing as I was born with them, I'd say they're about as real as horse wings get," Rainbow said with a nervous laugh.

	The turtle laughed, coughed, then ultimately cleared his throat.  "Ahem.  Yes.  Well, we certainly don't get much like you visiting around these parts."  He adjusted the controls of his dirigible, pivoting it around to face her more directly.  "As a Peak Watcher, I often dream of spotting more exciting things than the errant, stray seagull."

	"Believe me.  There are a lot of 'exciting things' from back west that you are better off without brushing paths with."

	"So you are from across the Wastes, then?  Hmmm?"

	"Er... yeah.  You could totally say that."  Rainbow nodded.  "Well, I guess the bulk of my friends on board, are."  She pointed at the Noble Jury.  "Three are Ledomaritan.  One's a Xonan, another's Searonese.  Two are from Gray Smoke.  One's from Franzington.  And then we've got an elk and... uhm... an idiot."

	"Sorry to say, but very few of those names have any meaning to me, madame," the turtle said.  "Except for Ledomare and Xona, of course.  Horrible... terrible war they're embroiled in, from what we Alifreons have heard."

	"Well, actually, that war's kinda sorta over."

	"Oh really?"  He smiled through his beak.  "How fanciful.  There seems to be a common pattern now."

	"What... k-kind of pattern?"

	"Three fishing ships have returned to the Churning Bluffs over the past week, and all of them have claimed that the Flurries have dissipated.  Hah!  Can you imagine, the Wastes without a maelstrom!"  The turtle adjusted his bifocals again.  "I'll tell you one thing for sure.  It'll certainly make trade and shipping lanes a lot less treacherous."

	"Yeah, imagine that."  Rainbow fidgeted in midair.  "Say, uhm. Sorry to break a conversation short, but I gotta get my friends someplace."

	"And just where might you be heading?"

	"We're looking for a town called 'Abinadi.'  I... uh... I do hope I'm pronouncing that right."

	"Hmmmm... Good metalworking village.  Also, home to some of the finest filet of fish this side of the Churning Line."  The turtle smiled.  "The twin peaks above the township hold a burning brazier that is almost impossible to miss."

	"Yeah.  I've heard about that.  But I still dunno whether we're to head north or south."

	"You'll wish to turn north a bit," the turtle said, rotating his gondola about so he could point past a ridge of rocky spires.  "Skim the southern edge of the bouldery ridges.  You'll know you're getting close once you see smoke in the air.  There's a foundry not far from the twin peaks, and it's constantly billowing fumes from the forging stations.  They built it so that the smog is carried off along the northern currents, you see."

	"Alrighty.  Thanks a ton."

	"No, thank you."  The turtle smirked as he pulled a pair of levers and ascended his balloon.  "For giving me a conversation I won't soon forget."



	Rainbow Dash flew low over the crooked rock structures.  Every now and then she'd look behind to make sure the Noble Jury was following closely.  Floydien and somepony else inside the cockpit would signal back, so Rainbow continued her careful flight.

	Every now and then, a nervous twitch would overcome the mare, and she'd jerk her eyes left and right, envisioning some horrible battleship emerging from the spires or a deeply nestled sniper with a manarifle attempting to pick her friends off.  But nothing dramatic of the sort happened.  The air was calm, blisteringly cold, but somehow soothing.  Flakes of snow fell gently to the rock summits, and far below Rainbow could hear the roar of waves constantly churning between the hard foundations of the slender mesas.  It made for a soothing backdrop of white noise to the mostly peaceful environment.

	At last, she did see smoke.  A current of dark gray fumes carried its way north, bending sharply towards the arctic horizon from a trough of wind.  Following the source of the trail, Rainbow could spot a billowing pulse of light along the horizon.  What looked like a tall tower loomed in the distance.  As the sun rose and as Rainbow scaled more plateaus, she saw the tower morph into double spires, in the center of which—high up—was a wide and shallow cauldron suspended from four massive chains.  A blazing fire rippled from the center of the brazier, casting a cool, pale glow across the plates below.

	The metal platforms almost entirely covered the rock formations beneath Abinadi.  For the first time since entering Alafreo, Rainbow Dash saw massive courtyards and four story buildings and urban districts with enough room to allow roadways and traffic.  A ring of dense apartments formed in the center, and they connected via suspended walk-ways and metal hanging bridges to other plates where blacksmiths and metalwork shops were huddled.  It was still early morning, but Rainbow could see that more than half the city was already awake and bustling.  She saw turtles at their forges, hammering metal tools and planks into shape.  From what she could tell, they were building pieces of bridgework, presumably for expanding Alafreon cities all across the continental shelf.

	Several of the residents looked up at Rainbow Dash and the Noble Jury.   Most of their eyes were locked on her and her wings predominantly, and this led to all sorts of bright eyes and murmuring conversations.

	Rainbow Dash fidgeted.  She looked up at the Noble Jury and signaled them to come to a stop.  As the vessel hovered still, she glided down and landed in the middle of a random street.

	Her hooves struck metal plates and rivets.  It was an odd way to make her first landing on a continent, but she wasn't about to complain.  Sea turtles, tortoises, and snapping turtles gasped and murmured from apartments, workhouses, and store fronts.  Rainbow glanced at them all, cleared her throat, and said, "I'm... uh... looking for the Boreal family."

	"You mean you talk too?" a female tortoise uttered from a street corner.

	Rainbow couldn't help but smile.  "Yeah," her voice cracked.  "So I've been told.  Anyways, the Boreals—?"  She felt a scaled foot touching her feathers.  She glanced behind her.

	A young male turtle was stretching and unstretching her wings.  "Just like a bird.  How ingenius."  He glanced at her.  "How long did you take to build them?"

	"They're real.  Look, this is really important, here.  I'm trying to find a specific family of snapping turtles.  Do they even live in this place anymore?"

	"What name did you just say, dearie?"

	"The Boreals."

	"Hmmm... quite the common name.  Could you be referring to the Boreals who own the western foundries?  Or the Boreals who fish along the central canal?  Or maybe the cave diving Boreals of the Churning Ridge?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow gulped.  "The Boreals who... recently or not-so-recently lost a family member."  Her eyes narrowed.  "By the name of 'Elma.'  Elma Boreal."

	The various turtles and tortoises glanced at one another.

	A citizen walked out from a nearby house and tugged at Rainbow's mane.  "Perhaps, ma'am, you would like to speak to Boxer."

	"Who's that, your leader or something?"

	"Hmmm... something to that extent." The turtle smiled.  "He is the elder of the group.  Every turtle in Abinadi looks up to him."

	"You think he'll know all about the Boreals?"

	"Presuming the family you're asking about have been hatched sometime over the past four hundred years, then yes."
		//------------------------------//
		// How Many Licks It Takes		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash stood on a metal balcony beneath the twin spires and their burning brazier.  Using her wings to stabilize herself, she motioned at the object floating down from the Noble Jury.  The black sphere followed Rainbow's directions, descended slowly, and landed on the balcony's edge.  Then, with a hiss, its sides slid open, revealing three ponies inside.  Bellesmith and Eagle Eye trotted out, followed by Roarke who climbed out of the pilot's seat.

	"Roarke," Rainbow grunted.  "Leave the manapistol inside."

	The metal mare froze with the weapon in her grasp.  "Certainly you can't expect me to—"

	"No, I am ordering you to ditch it."  Rainbow frowned.  "These guys are friendlier than fuzzy kittens on Nuzzle Day.  Also, they're pretty dang intent on making us their guests.  I won't allow you to aim a boomstick at their beaks.  Got it?"

	Roarke's metal lenses pistoned in and out.  "Hrrrrrmmmf..."  She tossed the pistol back into the tiny Lounge transport with nonchlance.

	"Good."  Rainbow nodded.  "Now, let's—"

	With a metal snap, Roarke detached another pistol from her hip and threw it inside.  Then, with the others watching and blinking, she pulled a rifle out from behind her shoulder, retracted it, and dropped it into the ship.  She then unsheathed two concealed daggers, a trio of grenades, and a ring of shuriken.  At last, she stood before the group, relatively "naked" with just her metal leg-braces and brass plugs.

	Bellesmith stammered, "Is... is th-that it?"

	"Technically, I still have a taser on me," Roarke said.  "But..."  She glanced at the row of reptile onlookers.  "...removing that from where it's currently hidden may... come across as 'lewd' at the time being."

	"Uh huh..."  Eagle turned to Rainbow.  "Please tell me you found the Boreal family."

	"Almost.  I want you guys here for this.  Come on..."  Rainbow gestured and then trotted forward.

	"What do you need us for?" Eagle asked.

	"Moral support."

	"And as for Roarke?" Bellesmith remarked.

	"She's basically just walking metal porn," Rainbow muttered with a slight smirk.  "I mean, look at this place.  These Alafreons admire all things to do with metal work.  To them, Roarke is probably a goddess."

	"How delightful," the Searonese mare droned.  "I'd ask for a harem, but I'm sure the scales would chafe."

	"Shhhh!"  Rainbow led them into a dark tunnel at the base of a domed building.  "Okay, dudes, the guy's leader is named 'Boxer.'  He's super old but he's also super cool.  Just... let me take the lead, alright?"

	"Sure thing, Rainbow," Eagle whispered back, then peered upwards with glistening eyes.  He watched as they passed underneath hanging banners, rippling torches, and dangling braziers brimming with incense.  The interior of the building had a mystical, hazy atmosphere to it, and the rusted black walls were chiseled with elaborate designs and words and texts that depicted a glorious history.

	Soon, everypony's direction was centered on a series of cushions in the center of the room, flanked by incense and candles.  A turtle with an enormous shell sat in the center, his old thick legs draped in every direction.  At the sound of the ponies hoofsteps, he raised a wrinkly head.  A pair of gray eyes blinked through a filmy layer of mucus.

	"Hmmmm... so you've brought four more."  The grand old turtle gave a wrinkled smile.  "It's been at least a half century since I've had hooves sounding off the plates of this chamber.  How I do delight in the complexities of horse culture.  Ambitious, handsome, and unpredictable."

	"Boxer, I've returned."  Rainbow bowed her head and gestured.  "These three are my friends.  Bellesmith, Eagle Eye, and Roarke Most Rare.  They're all members of the Noble Jury."

	"Splendid..."  Boxer nodded his frail head.  "Splendid indeed."

	"You asked to meet more of my kind, and here they are."  Rainbow took a deep breath.  "Now, perhaps, you would be willing to help me?"

	"Hmmm... first thing's first."  The aged turtle's head pivoted to face Bellesmith from afar.  "You, my darling."  Boxer's nostrils flared, then flared again.  His scaled lips curved.  "A proud mother, I take it?"

	"Actually, sir..."  Bellesmith fidgeted.  "I-I've never foaled.  But that is certainly kind of you."

	"Well, I do beg your pardon," Boxer said.  "But you most certainly carry a maternal air about you.  Your lungs quiver anxiously for something precious.  I am pleased to meet you, but do not worry, dear.  You will soon be able to return to whatever you cherish back aboard your vessel."

	Belle smiled, her eyes glistening.  "Thank you, sir.  You're most kind."

	Boxer's head turned until it faced Eagle Eye.  "Hmmm..."  He sniffed the air.  "Something so beautiful needn't be so afraid."

	Eagle blinked nervously, on the virge of sweating.  "Uhm..."  He gulped.  "I-I don't know what you're talking about, sir..."

	"Fear not," Boxer said.  "Whatever obstacle you think may or may not be in front of you, you have all that you could possibly care for.  I think you should simply learn to... relax, young one..."

	Rainbow glanced curiously at Eagle Eye.

	The petite stallion gulped.  "I'll... uh... try to, I-I guess."

	"And you..."  Boxer turned towards Roarke.  His nostrils flared.  "Why so dreadfully cold and tense?"  He sniffed again, then all his muscles froze.  His blind eyes glanced Rainbow's way, and he turned his head once more to Roarke.  A slow, wrinkly smile formed.  "Mmmmm... yes.  Yes, but of course."

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "What?"

	Boxer took a deep breath and leaned his head towards Rainbow Dash.  "Thank you for indulging me in my request, Miss Dash," the aged creature said.  "It is not so much that I doubted you.  Your words earlier were sincere enough, but I had to sense for myself what has driven you and your friends across such a long distance.  And now I feel it.  There is much love that binds you together.  But there is much fear as well.  I do hope we here in Abinadi can amend that."

	"Yes, well, that sounds like a totally awesome thing, Boxer, but what we're here for is to—"

	"You said that your ship was in disrepair.  Am I correct?"

	"Well, uh, we've certainly got more than a few good dints in the Jury."

	Boxer raised his head and cleared his throat.

	Two tortoises shuffled over from the entrance to the domed room.

	"See that our finest metal workers take a look at the Jury's hull," Boxer said.  "I do believe these travelers could use with a fixed ship."

	Eagle Eye gawked at the leader.

	"Are... are you truly serious?" Bellesmith exclaimed.

	"We... uh..."  Rainbow Dash fidgeted in midair. "We don't exactly have the money to pay for the kind of repairs we need right now."

	"From what you've already told me, it sounds like the Alafreons owe you for ridding the Wastes of the Flurries," Boxer said with a smile.

	"Anypony can make that claim," Roarke droned.

	Boxer's wrinkled neck turned towards her.  "And yet some know how to speak the truth, young one."

	Roarke fell dead silent.

	Boxer smiled again.  He tilted his head towards Rainbow Dash.  "It will please us to patch up the holes in your ship.  For, after all, I sense that you've come here to patch the holes in Abinadi."

	Rainbow Dash nodded firmly.  "Elma Boreal, Boxer."  She gulped.  "She's been missing, yes?"

	Boxer's head retracted a bit into his shell with a sigh.  "I do remember the day when she was hatched.  Her parents—the Boreals of the East Heights—brought her here along with her seven siblings to be blessed.  Her scent was the sweetest of all.  It matched her laughter.  Then, the day that she hatched her young and brought them here to me, I could sense that she had given the scent to her own children.  She divided her love equally among them, and every whiff and every soul was just as blissful and succulent as the other.  Quite the tragedy it was when—two years ago—her second eldest son perished in a boating accident along the Churning Line."

	Bellesmith gasped into her hoof.  Her eyes instantly teared.  "That's... th-that's so horrible!"

	"Mmmm..."  Boxer slowly nodded.  "All of Abinadi wept for the loss.  Well... all, save for one.  Elma did not return from her voyages, even after several letters had been sent concerning the tragic fate of her hatchling.  That is when we all knew—beyond the shadow of a doubt—that the Elma we all knew was gone."

	Bellesmith lowered her head, crying quietly.  Eagle Eye trotted over and rubbed his hoof on her shoulder.  "But..."  He glanced up, swallowing a sore lump down his throat.  "All this time, what did you think happened to her?"

	"She ventured into the west," Boxer said in a dark tone.  "Brushing paths with a culture that kills itself slowly over the centuries is an instant recipe for disaster.  Her heart followed the spirit of adventure and discovery, but everyone knew it was risking a great deal.  Still, she felt it was best, for she had hopes of mapping out the treacherous Wastes for travelers like her.  It was a selfless pursuit.  I know this, for everytime she left, the sorrow of missing her family was left in the blistering winds to haunt me."

	"I have no doubt that she died doing what she believed in," Rainbow said.

	"I believe you," Boxer said with a nod.  "And I also believe in the sincerity you have for what brought you here.  Although..."  He stretched his wrinkly neck out.  "If you do not bring Elma or the corpse of her with you, then I wonder—Rainbow Dash—what is it that actually bring back to Abinadi."

	Roarke glanced anxiously at the pegasus.  Belle and Eagle leaned against one another.

	In a firm breath, Rainbow flew forward and outstretched her hoof.  "See for yourself."

	Boxer leaned forward, his aged nostrils inhaling the air all around the pegasus.

	She said, "Elma may have died.  But the love she has for her family—for all of Alafreo—lives on.  It was just... passed on to someone else.  That someone... I have brought here."

	Boxer leaned back.  His filmy gray eyes blinked, and in a ragged breath he said, "So that's the scent."  He tilted his head up and smiled wearily.  "I believe you..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Lux Be a Lady Tonight		//------------------------------//

	"You still there, Unky Prowsy?"  Props stammered, nervously fumbling over the controls to the engine room's communications array.  "I think you're breaking up!"

	"Snrkkkkt!  No, I'm still here, lassie."

	"Squee!"  Props hopped in place while Pilate, Zaid, and Kera looked on.  "So, go on!  Like you were saying so sexily?"

	"I swear.  Everything's all confetti and arse sparklers over here!  You'd never have guessed that a bloody long war just ended!"

	"Are you actually inside Ledomare proper?" Pilate asked.  "At this rate, in a ship as fast as the Tarkington, you could easily have passed beyond the demilitarized zone."

	"Laddy, we've practically pole-vaulted past all that rubbish.  Right now, we're in a place the locals call 'Blue Peak.'"

	Kera glanced up, blinking.  "Say.  I've heard that name before."

	"As well you should," Pilate said, nodding in the direction of her voice.  "It's southeast of Blue Nova, not far from the eastern front."  He faced the communications array.  "Did any of the guards give you trouble for arriving from the east?"

	"No.  That's just the thing.  It's warm welcomes all around.  Everypony's pissed drunk with happiness over this war being over.  But that isn't the half of it.  I looked for those ponies that Rainbow Dash asked for..."

	"Yes, and?"

	"Well, maybe it's best that one of 'em does the explanation for me.  Hold on a tick..."

	There was the sound of shuffling hoofsteps and microphone scratches.  After a brief whine of manafeedback, another voice crackled into being.

	"H-hello?  Rainbow Dash?  Are you there?"

	"Heyyyy..."  Zaid smirked.  "I know that sultry tongue."

	Kera gasped with a little bounce.  "Zetta!  Zetta!"

	The voice giggled on the other end.  "Glad to know you both are doing well!  We split ways under such chaotic circumstances, I wasn't sure you'd make it past the Xonan front!"

	"Oh, we made it past alright," Zaid said, though he fidgeted slightly.  "Mrmmm... for the most part."

	"Such a remarkable device you have here, Mr. Prowse.  Usually you need government tech in order to build something that communicates over such a range."

	"Heehee!  My Unky Prowsy knows how to spit a cosmic loogey!"

	"Miss Zetta," Prowse spoke up.  "Rainbow Dash is busy visiting the local township here in Alafreo.  Still, any of us would be happy to know that which you've got to share about the continent."

	"Well, there have been quite a few changes to say the least.  Just this week, the New Council has been preparing the first of several long-term peace accords with the Xonan Empire."

	Props blinked back at Pilate.

	The zebra cleared his throat and leaned closer to the microphone.  "I beg your pardon.  Did you say... the New Council?"

	"Yessir.  Ever since the incident on the eastern front and the ensuing cease fire, a huge investigation went underway to determine the extent to which the higher echelons of both kingdoms have been infiltrated by shape shifters.  However, the Council of Ledo under the Queen herself wasn't complying with established investigative protocols.  This led to a great deal of civil unrest, with several city governments voting to replace the Council altogether.  Although the majority of votes necessitated an election of new Council members, the current administration was refusing to comply."

	"Great Spark..."  Pilate grimaced.  "Please don't tell me that Ledomare fell into civil war!"

	"Oh no!  You won't believe it!  This actually has a good ending!"  Zetta continued, "Before anything could happen, there was an inexplicable event that took place about a week and a half ago.  Several hundred shape shifters appeared all across the continent.  They were frightened, confused, and—above all—non-aggressive.  This also included over half of the members of the Council of Ledo alone!"

	Kera gasped, staring wide-eyed at the others.  "The changelings!  Rainbow Dash stopped them, didn't she?!"

	"Must have been around the same time we were all farting around Stratopolis," Zaid thought aloud.

	"Huh?  Wh-what was that?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Props cleared her throat.  "Basically, this isn't exactly a major surprise to us.  But we're happy to hear it anyways!"

	"Well, that's good.  Because I'm certain it's changing this nation for the better."

	"Do tell..." Pilate said.

	"The shape-shifters who were exposed gave themselves up freely without posing any more harm.  It's almost as if they were completely different ponies!  What's more, they fully complied with military questions, exposing years upon years of abuses committed by the executive powers, even crimes against the citizens that were made before the shape shifter incursion!"

	"So all the crazy bad stuff that Ledo got away with..."  Kera blinked.  "...it's finally coming back to bite them?"

	"So much has happened in so little time.  But, to make a long story short, Ledo found herself with a lot to answer for, and none of her explanations have made anypony happy.  As a result, the provincial governments have enacted Vote of Monarchal Reform."

	"The Vote of Monarchal Reform?!"  Pilate's jaw dropped.  "But... th-that hasn't happened in centuries!  That must mean..."

	"Yup!"  Zetta's voice cheerfully exclaimed, "Ledo has been forced to step down from the throne! Over the last few days, a New Council has been established, and are preparing to crown a new Queen.  Already, the prime candidate is a pony who's very popular among the citizenry, and she supports the New Council's peace accords with Xona.  So, in a month's time, you may very well be speaking with a proud defender of the Luxmare Confederacy!"

	"Weeee!"  Kera hopped up and down.  "Hah!  Take that, fatso!"  Kera turned to blink at the others.  "Ledo was fat, wasn't she?"

	"I can imagine another fatso who'd be enthralled to hear this," Zaid said with a smirk.

	Josho stumbled into the room.  "What would I be enthralled about, exactly?"

	"Did you hear the good news, Josh Josh?!"  Props spread her forelimbs with a bright grin.  "Ledomare is now Luxmare!"

	"Hrmph..."  Josho tossed his mane back and grumbled, "Different name, same morons."

	"Awwwwww..."  Props pouted with drooping ears.  "Do I have to be the only pony who's excited?"

	"I'm always excited when I'm around you," Zaid said.

	Prowse's voice crackled through the speakers.  "Huh?!  Who in the bloody hell said that, lass?"

	"Oh.  Uh.  Uhhhhh..."  Props slapped at the dials of the array.  "Crkk-Crkkk!  Oh noes!  Crkkkk!  You're breaking up, Unky Prowsy!  Crkk-crkkk!"

	"You're makin' that sound with your bloomin' mouth, aren't you?"

	"Sorry!  Crkkkk!  Gotta get back to you!  Crkkkk!  Thanks a ton, Zetta!  So happy to hear back from you!  Crkkkkk!  Bye bye!"  Flip!  She slapped the machine off and spun towards the others.  "Well, that was fluffy!"  She smiled.  "No more Council of Ledo!  Why, Pilate, that means you and Belle could fly back there and live without the fear of being whipped to death or something, r-right?"

	"Hmmmm..."  Pilate smiled.  "Not even if you gave me a million working eyeballs."

	"Bleachkkk!"  Kera faux-vomited.  "I'm with the zebra of awesomeness."

	"Yowsers."  Zaid smirked.  "You guys really know how to hold a grudge."

	"Yes, well, the blood of the innocent will do that."  Josho said, then turned towards Pilate.  "You may wanna head upstairs, copper bottom."  He glanced at the array.  "You too, blondie."

	"Oh?" Props blinked.

	"Rainbow's back," Josho said.  "Turns out the local yokels are crazy enough to offer fixing the Jury for free."

	"Oh!"  Props swung her legs and bounced off the stool.  "Coolie Crispies!  I'll be up in a jiffy!"

	"What do you need me for?" Pilate asked.

	"You and Dr. Bellesmith are super close to Elma," Josho said.  He paused, glanced at Kera, then glanced at the zebra again.  "Rainbow and Company just got back from seeing a few members of the Boreal family.  Elma... uh... she may need some coaching on this one..."
		//------------------------------//
		// A Blessing To the Boreals		//------------------------------//

	"We found your family," Rainbow Dash said, almost immediately wincing.  Her eyes traced the walls of the navigation room.  "Elma's family."  She took a deep breath.  "The 'Boreals of the Eastern Heights,' or at least that's what the village elder Boxer refers to them as."

	Elma's green eyes lit up.  "You've talked with Boxer?"

	"Yup.  Totally did."

	Bellesmith glanced over Rainbow's shoulder.  "You know him?"

	"Why... of c-course!"  Elma nodded vehemently.  "Every turtle looks up to him!  We all depend on his blessings.  I met him several times in my hatchling years..."  She winced.  "I... I-I mean... I have memories of meeting him."  She gulped.  "Elma's memories..."

	Rainbow Dash and Belle exchanged glances.

	"Elma..."  Eagle Eye walked past Props and Roarke, smiling gently.  "They would very much like to meet you."

	"They..."  Elma glanced up, shivering slightly.  "They would?"  Her fanged muzzle hung agape as she glanced incredulously at the group.  "But... how?  Why?!  I'm nothing but an imposter!"

	"From the looks of things, what Rainbow and Pilate did in Stratopolis affected the whole world," Roarke suddenly said.  Her copper lenses reflected the green illuminescence from Elma's eyes across the room.  "Even here in Alafreo, the population has witnessed several of their numbers turn into changelings.  You... won't exactly be a surprise."

	"What..."  Elma curled her forelimbs pensively.  "...wh-what have you told them about Chrysalis and the hive?"

	"Nothing," Roarke said, shaking her head.  "All they know is that it was never your will nor your intent to ever impersonate one of the Boreals."

	"Turns out they all collectively figured that something was up," Rainbow Dash said, looking squarely at the changeling.  "The real Elma Boreal should have returned over a year ago.  Seeing as she's not one to ditch her family—"

	"No."  Elma shook her head.  "She's not."

	Rainbow cleared her throat and went on, "They kinda sorta expected to hear the worst."

	"You mean..."  Elma fidgeted.  "That the real Elma is dead?"

	"As horrible as it sounds..."  Pilate slowly nodded.  "It stands to reason."

	"But... b-but perhaps she is still alive somewhere!" Elma exclaimed, glancing at everypony.  "Princess Celestia said that several of the replaced ponies back home have been found in the abandoned hives!  Maybe the same is... t-true for Elma..."  Then changeling's gaze fell on Roarke's cold expression.

	"You know this landscape far more than anyone," Roarke droned.  "What is the likelihood that a hidden hive would have been found in Alafreo in time for its victims to have survived?"

	Elma bit her lip.  Her gaze tilted down to the floor of the navigation room.  "Not very good.  Everything is so vast... so remote."

	Silence.

	"Elma," Belle spoke.  "None of us can bring the real Elma back to these Alafreons.  But you have in yourself the next best thing to bless them with."

	Elma looked up.

	Belle smiled.  "You have Elma's memories.  And they carry with them the love and admiration she has for her family and hatchlings."

	"As horrible as things have been, this may be your opportunity to bring the Boreal family closure," Eagle Eye said.  "And for you as well."

	"Me?" Elma remarked, blinking.

	"Do you wish to be Elma all your life?" he asked.

	"I... I don't know..."  Elma shuddered, then ran a hoof over her forehead.  "All I do know is... is..."  She hesitated slightly, her green eyes turning moist.  "I want to see them."  She looked up with an earnest gaze.  "I really... truly do..."

	Belle and Props looked at Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow flapped her wings and hovered.  "Then there's one turtle whom you should see first."



	The large doors to the domed structure opened wide.  Accompanied by drifting flakes of snow, Elma pensively trotted through the entrance to Boxer's domain.  Her eyes darted nervously between several torches.

	"Good heavens," she murmured.  "It's like I was just here yesterday."  She gulped.  "And yet... I-I was never here, was I?"  A chill ran through her body, and her carapace shook.  "I... I-I don't know if I can d-do this."

	Eagle Eye stepped up, resting a hoof on the shape-shifter's shoulder.  "It's okay.  You're not gonna be alone."  He smiled.  "Alright?"

	Elma took a shuddering breath, nodded, and trotted forward.  Eagle Eye accompanied her.  Not far behind, Bellesmith and Pilate shuffled along.

	Rainbow Dash hovered forward.  She paused halfway towards the center of the chamber, turning around to glance over her shoulder.

	Roarke stood emotionlessly in the wings.  She stayed within the penumbra of the torchlight but didn't move any further.

	Rainbow Dash narrowed her eyes.  Upon hearing Boxer's voice, she turned and looked towards the massive shape in the center of the dimly-lit room.

	"Ahhh... do come here, child," the elder said.  He stretched his wrinkly neck out from the inside of his shell.  His forelegs gripped the floor as he leaned his weight forward slightly.  "Do not be afraid.  I only summon those to whom I extend full welcome."

	"Oh great and wise elder..."  Elma surprised everypony by charging forward and then lying—face down—to the metal floor before the large creature.  "I am blessed by your presence."

	"Hmmm..."  His old lips curved.  "Spoken like a true Alafreon."  He narrowed his gray eyes.  "Keep still, child.  This will only take a second."

	"What does he mean by that?" Pilate asked.

	"Shhhhh..."  Belle squeezed the crook of her hoof around the zebra's forelimb.  "Not all the blind use O.A.S.I.S., beloved," she whispered in his ear.

	Boxer held his head above Elma's skull.  His nostrils flared several times.  For a few seconds, he lingered, then spoke, "That scent... hmmm... yes.  Yes indeed."  His leaned his head back.  "I know you are desperate to hold back."

	"Elder...?" Elma glanced up.

	"Relax, child," Boxer said.  "Be that which you feel.  There is no fear of deceiving me."

	Elma's face was locked in a puzzled expression.  At last, Eagle Eye leaned in and whispered, "It's okay, Elma."

	The changeling gulped.  She closed her eyes... then exhaled.  Her muscles relaxed, and then a swath of green flame poured over her body.  Within seconds, she morphed into a large snapping turtle with a scar across her shell.  A few of the reptilian guards along the fringes of the room murmured in surprise.

	Boxer, however, merely nodded.  "Ahhhh... it masks the scent well.  But not well enough."  He smiled.  "Over the past three decades, I have encountered no less than fifteen Alafreons with that same scent.  A very pungent smell, I must say—some acquired halfway through adulthood, which I used to find quite puzzling.  It isn't until now that I know the reason behind it."

	"F-forgive me, Elder," Elma stammered, once more bowing her scaled head to the floor.  "It was never my intent to deceive you—"

	"Your breath carries truth," Boxer said.  "But it also carries many other things."  He took a deep breath.  "Strange, sad, painful things."  He lifted his massive foot and used the very tip of it to tilt Elma's weak chin so that she faced him.  "Whether we are hatched from eggs, foaled from our mothers, or spawned in riverbeds, we all carry a heartbeat that makes us all the same.  And your heartbeat is the most passionate and fervent I've encountered in years."

	"I... I-I've been told that it's the way of changelings... the way of my kind to feed off of emotions," Elma said.  With a nervous breath, she reverted back to her dark naked form.  "We are empaths.  And yet... we are thieves, Elder Boxer.  We are robbers and plunderers of the absolute worst kind."

	Rainbow Dash and Eagle Eye exchanged glances upon that.

	Boxer didn't waste any time.  "Robbers and plunderers, you say?"  He leaned his head down towards her yet again.  "Tell me, these friends of yours, have you gone out of your way to wrong them?"

	Elma blinked.  "Uhm... no.  No, Elder, I have not."

	"And do they hold any malice to you for your supposed misdeeds?"

	Elma glanced over her shoulder.

	Eagle Eye, Rainbow Dash, Pilate, Bellesmith, and even Roarke stared back.  Patiently.

	Elma exhaled, and she smiled.  "No.  No, Elder."

	"Even at my age, I suspect I have much to learn of the nature of shapeshifters," Boxer said.  "But so long as they have a beating heart, then I extend to them the same grace as I would to any other creature who wanders into Abinadi, seeking fellowship and encouragement.  You are welcome here, child, as welcome as the Elma Boreal whom I was pleased to bless right after her hatching."

	Elma turned towards him.  Her lips quivered.

	"Is there something you wish to say, child?"

	A spasm ran through Elma's body.  She broke down crying.  The changeling hid her face in the crooks of her hooves.

	Bellesmith bit her lip as she watched.  Pilate leaned in and nuzzled her.

	Eagle Eye sniffled, then trotted forward to squat down by Elma's side, patting the changeling's shoulder.

	Meanwhile, Boxer spoke, "That's it, child.  There is nothing to be ashamed of.  Whatever you may have been bred for, know this:  your emotions are your own.  You may speak honestly and earnestly in this town."

	"This t-town..."  Elma whimpered and raised her chin.  She leaned against Eagle Eye for support as she stammered to say:  "I w-want this to be my town.  With every fiber of my being, I want to believe that I have a home here."  She shook her head.  "But it's not!  They belong to Elma Boreal!  They belong to a turtle that I never was!  And yet I still have her memories!  I still have her love!"

	"If you so desire, you can dwell here," Boxer said.  "Until the memories of Abinadi become your memories.  And as for the love... there are many on board your vessel that would love to share it with you in genuine comraderie."

	"I know..."  Elma hiccuped and smiled before nuzzling Eagle Eye.  "And I-I'm so grateful..."

	"And yet..."  Boxer spoke.  "There are those here who would wish to share your love as well, if even for a day."  He cocked his head to the side.  "Would you do me a favor, young one?"

	Elma sniffled and nodded.  "Anything, Elder.  Anything..."

	"Would you go to them?" he asked.  "Would you see the hatchlings of Boreal at least once?"  His aged lips curved.  "I have full faith in your tranquil future.  A lot of turtles here would be in your debt if you gave them the gift of a tranquil past."

	
		//------------------------------//
		// Bless This Home, Our Home		//------------------------------//

	Elma strolled through the metal streets of Abinadi.  She wasn't alone.  A good half of the Noble Jury trotted alongside her.  It didn't make the trip any less nerve-wracking.  In jittery little bursts, Elma flung her gaze left and right, spotting groups and clusters of turtles watching from blacksmith shops, eateries, storefronts, and libraries.  Dozens upon hundreds of pairs of reptilian eyes watched the changeling's every step.  The turtles murmured amongst themsleves, their scaled expressions bright and full of wonder.

	Elma glanced up.  She passed under metal-laced apartment buildings where young hatchlings gazed out the windows with wide glossy eyes.  She shuddered, hanging her head slightly towards the floor as she trotted along.  Eagle Eye caught up with her and gave the shape-shifter a reassuring touch with his hoof.  Collecting her breath, Elma stood up straight and proceeded forward.

	At the rear of the group, Rainbow Dash hovered alongside Roarke.  The two lingered so far back that they mixed with the crowd of turtles shuffling curiously after the changeling.  Without taking her eyes off of Elma, Rainbow spoke aside to the Searonese mare.

	"You know, you barely know Elma.  Nopony will fault you if you wanna go back to the ship."

	"This is my place," Roarke said in a neutral tone.

	"You sure of that?"

	"Aren't you?"

	Rainbow squinted aside.  "For real, Roarke.  What brings you out here?  So far from the ship and all your stuff?"

	"Somepony had to bring half of your friends to Boxer via the transport."

	"That's not what I mean.  This kind of thing totally isn't your bag," Rainbow said, squinting at the metal mare.  "What are you hoping to get from this?"

	"To be honest, Rainbow Dash, I'm not entirely sure," Roarke muttered.  Her lenses twitched as she trotted along, facing forward.  "Let's just say I've grown tired of making hypotheses in my life."

	"Oh?"

	"Besides.  Elma's part of the crew, is she not?"

	"I'd say she is."

	"Then my duty is here with her," Roarke droned unemotionally.  "Where she needs me."

	Rainbow Dash smirked.  "Pilate's right.  You have changed."

	"Are we supposed to be keeping score?"

	"Well... uhm... no.  But—"

	"But nothing."  Roarke gestured ahead.  "Observe.  Something is transpiring."

	Roarke and Rainbow Dash came to a stop.  Ahead of them, in the centermost portion of the metal plate upon which the visitors and citizens stood, a clearing had formed in the crowd.  Elma stood in place... for she was staring at a full line of snapping turtles with shells of matching color and pattern.  Reptiles both young and old stared at her.  Their expressions were mixed—but most blinked with bright eyes and gaping beaks.  On top of two of the turtles, baskets were rigged with seats for tiny, drooling hatchlings.  Three whole generations of a single family had gathered, numbering no less than thirty.

	Elma exhaled.  She plopped back on her haunches, her lips quivering.  "Kelvin... Belinda... Squire... Aunt Alessa..."  She gulped, her eyes wandering from one hauntingly familiar face to another.  "Naidre... Uncle Hector... Sven..."  Suddenly, she gasped, and her green eyes watered upon the sight of four young adult snapping turtles staring steadily at her.

	Belle leaned against Pilate as both gazed at the scene.  Eagle Eye leaned in.  "Are those her...?"

	Belle nodded.  "I do believe so," she whispered.

	All the while, Elma was steeling herself.  She stood back up and trotted forwards the group.

	The turtles' eyes darted back and forth, gawking at the changeling's features.  It was suddenly apparent that they were just as anxious as her.

	This brought Elma's words out with a quivering exhale:  "I know whom you all are hoping to see," she murmured.  "But... I cannot help you there.  All I would offer is a facade... a shade of the mother you once knew when I..."  Elma winced, gritted her teeth, and squeaked, "...when she hatched you."  Clearing her throat, she courageously continued.  "But what I can offer is her memories... her feelings... and her adoration—for each and every one of you."  Sniffling, she smiled and gazed lovingly at each face.  "Claude... Helene... Rheba... little Maven."  Elma shuddered.  "Her every waking thought was centered on you and your own children.  She dreamt of you.  She sobbed over you.  And the first and last thing she wanted out of life was to return to you after her long and treacherous journey.  But... but th-that cannot be.  And... I am sorry... I am so so sorry for th-that..."

	The crowd gathered around the scene was dead silent as Elma broke down into quiet sobs.  She hiccuped for breath, wiped tears away from her black face, and continued.

	"But while I may not be able to bring your beloved Elma Boreal back, I can bring you her knowledge.  I can bring you her joy.  And I can bring you her love."  She gave a fanged smile as more tears rolled down her face.  "And she had so... so much love to give.  Of all the creatures I could have been made to be, she was the greatest blessing.  And if it is in my power to bring that blessing to you, then I will do everything in my power to make it so.  I may not have a name... or a home... or a family... but if I can make sure that the thoughts and hopes of Elma come here to her home to rest, then I can finally be at peace with myself."

	Silence.  There were a few errant coughs, but nothing more was said.

	Fidgeting, Elma sadly shook her head.  The sound of shuffling footsteps shook her out of her melancholy. She looked up and twitched to see all four children gathered around her.

	One reached a hand out and caressed Elma's face.  A female turtle tearfully smiled.  "You're not the only who can now have peace," she said.  "And, if you want, you can have a home as well."

	Elma clenched her jaw.  She looked to her side as another turtle came in, rubbing the side of his face against her shoulder.  The other two approached, laying their hands on her.  As Elma found herself more and more collectively embraced by the Boreals, she cracked a weak smile.  It didn't last long, for she was soon sobbing with joy.  Her black face billowed in and out of a scaled beak, but soon—with a shuddering breath—she relaxed in their company, adrift in a natural black carapace supported by their arms.

	Bellesmith sniffled, leaning her smiling face against Pilate's mane.  Eagle Eye had to contain his squeals while the crowd around the courtyard broke into soft and endearing applause.

	Rainbow Dash exhaled from where she hovered.  In the pale glow of the cold Alafreo afternoon, she felt strangely warm.  She looked up at the sun, squinting into its golden glaze beyond the misty mountain clouds.  A smile overwhelmed her, and she closed her eyes while drifting through the air.

	"Yeah... that's more like it..."

	
		//------------------------------//
		// Something To Write Home About		//------------------------------//

	In the candlelight, a pen dipped into an inkwell and ran its way across a sheet of parchment.

	Ebon Mane sat cozily on his cot, smiling pleasantly into the dimness as he wrote his words across the sheet.  His ears twitched on either side of his head, and his muzzle stirred to fabricate the sentences forming in his head.



	Dear mother,

	The Noble Jury has been through hell in high places.  We've watched ponies die, suffer, and lose all that's precious to them.  And yet, in the last few weeks, we've begun to see the light that shines beyond the darkness.  I mean that quite literally.  Rainbow Dash has found a sword that lets her communicate with Princess Celestia back in Equestria.  Kera has rediscovered her voice... more or less.  Either way, it's a fantastic improvement.  On top of that, Bellesmith and Pilate are back together, Elma has discovered her extended family, and Roarke—believe it or not—hasn't tried to kill any of us in the past few days.

	For the first time in as long as I can remember, I can very truthfully say that life is good.

	Life is very... very good.



	Pilate and Bellesmith sat side-by-side on a metal bench.  From there, they gazed upon a circular plate amid the shadowy spires of Abinadi.  Kera ran circles around hatchlings—giggling—while the young turtles tried in vain to catch up with the petite Xonan.

	Off to the side, Elma sat amidst a crowd of turtles—all squatting around her.  With a brighte-eyed expression, the changeling talked and talked, energized by a thick crowd of gawking listeners.

	"...and then after the fishing season, Elma took her mate Garen to the sunny plateaus.  That's the day she told him the answer to his question."  The changeling giggled in a certain turtle's voice before continuing, "But, she almost had second thoughts at the very last second."

	"You mean..."  One of the young adults gasped.  "Mom almost turned down Dad?"

	"Well... it couldn't be helped."  Elma bit her lip.  "He was bagging trout every hour of every day.  He didn't exactly... erm... smell good."

	The family chuckled.

	"But he made up for it!"  Elma said with a chuckle.  "I mean, of course he did.  How else would so many beautiful hatchlings be around today?"  A wink.

	"What did Daddy do?"  A female turtle exclaimed.  "Mother never told us this."

	"Uhm..."  Elma's black carapace gave way to blushing scales for a brief moment.  "Do you all really want to know?"

	Several turtle heads bobbed up and down furiously.

	Elma took a deep breath.  "He... uh..."  Her eyes rolled.  "He threatened to toss himself off the bluffs."

	"No way!"

	"That sounds like Dad alright."

	"Shut up!  He was never that dramatic!"  A beat.  "Was he?"

	"Heheheh... now don't you think differently about him," Elma said with a smirk.  "Soon, he learned to respect me—erm..."  She grimaced.  "Elma.  He learned to respect Elma.  Good heavens..."  She rested a hoof against her head.  "I keep doing that..."

	"It's okay... really..."  A turtle placed his hand on her shoulder.  "We get it.  Believe me."

	"Please..."  One of the lady turtles leaned forward, wide-eyed.  "Do continue.  What ever happened to Aunt Regina and the leeches?"

	"Oh... oh dear... did she never tell you this one?"

	"Uhm... did she have good reason to?"

	"Pfffft!  Only if you wanna keep your lunch!"  Elma slyly grinned.  "Okay.  I don't think anyone will hurt for knowing this.  Ahem.  So... one day, Aunt Regina fled by her lonesome to the Southern Shoals in hopes of cleaning in the Alafreon waters before any turtle could discover her... predicament.  Little did she know that Elma and Garen were following closely behind in a tiny dirigible... with cameras..."



	We've been in Alafreo for only a short time.  And yet—in these past three days alone—the citizens of Abinadi have treated us like we were one of them.  Somehow, I don't think this has anything to do with the fact that Elma has brought back a piece of them that had been lost for months.  From the Elder Boxer to the youngest Boreals to the common stranger—they have all gone out of their way to help us feel at home.  They've even agreed to fix the damage that the Noble Jury has suffered since Blue Nova without charging us anything!  Can you believe that, mother?"

	My stars, what a huge difference a single continent can make...



	"Skystone, eh?"  A turtle stopped welding just long enough to tilt his mask up and expose a smiling, grease-stained face.  He hung along the bow of the Noble Jury, fastening the last bar of a fresh metal frame to the outer shell of the observation room window.  "I knew I recognized that crystal when I saw it.  A few crazy explorers brave the Strip of Flurries just to get here and barter mana stones for fish oil.  I always thought they were crazy—but I suppose that comes with the territory... a territory wracked with war."

	"And yet that war is over like red rover!" Props chirped from where she stood peering over the upper deck alongside Zaid.  The ship was propped on an upper metal strut overlooking the metallic depths of Abinadi below.  All along the vessel's hull, turtles clung by roped platforms and hovering dirigibles, tending to every square inch of the damaged vessel.  "And so is the Strip of Flurries!  Isn't everything so deliciously topsy turvy?!"

	Zaid winked.  "Not to mention sexy-curvy—"  A cloven hoof shoved him aside.  "—narf!"

	"Be careful with Nancy's bumpy bumps!" Floydien spat, pale and frazzled.  His eyes twitched as he struggled to oversee every reptile's handiwork at the same time.  "She hasn't burped her wild way through thunder glimmer just to be mawed to turd-lengths by shell boomers!"  He spun about and galloped frantically towards the stern.  "Hey!  Hey!  Not so swift on the zap and zappy!"

	The reptilian welder blinked.  "What is he stressing about?"

	"Oh, don't mind him."  Props grinned from ear to fuzzy ear.  "His paranoia and his handsomeness love to dosey-do!"

	"Yeah, well..."  Zaid wheezed, standing up.  "I really wish somepony would take him back to the barn."

	"Did you really build the steam rig to this thing all by yourself?" the turtle exclaimed.

	"Well.  Mostly me and a squirrel," Props said.  She sniffled briefly.  "And Simon gave his life so that Nancy Jane's womb would hum another day."  She wiped the edge of her eyes dry.  "We've put more than our sweat and blood into this ship.  We've given our souls'n'smex too!"

	"Well, I'm all the more pleased to be getting it back into perfect shape!" the turtle said with a grin.  "You'll be the first skystone explorers I know of who bothered to travel beyond the Churning Line!"

	"Well, pizz fah wizz!"  Props gleamed.  "Bonus points for a waxed shine!"

	"Heh..."  The turtle lowered his helmet and returned to welding.  "You know who you're talking to, right?"

	"Heeheehee!"

	Zaid tossed his mane back.  "You know, I never did meet Simon the Space Squirrel, but I heard traveling with him was nuts!"

	"Hey handsome!"  Props called across the deck.  "I think Zaid-kun here bent one of Nancy's panels loose!"

	"Wat."

	"That's it!  The boomer dies at midnight!"  With the sound of thunder, electrical manalight shimmered across the top deck and slammed Zaid into the cockpit.

	"Ooof!"  Zaid stumbled to a stop inside.  A few quiet seconds later, his voice limped out, "Okay, I deserved that one."

	"Heeheehee."  Props laughed and blushed.
		//------------------------------//
		// Something to Look Forward To		//------------------------------//

	There've been times, Mother, especially lately, where all I had to look forward to was the next second spent alive.  There was no point in dwelling on tomorrow, because—between changelings and prime enforcers and tattooed warriors and chaos dragons—there was no assurance of a morning after.

	I want to say that all of that has changed, but—the truth is—it's always been an adventurous pursuit of the next dawn.  We've all been galloping to the beat of Rainbow's drum since day one.  Sure, there was a lot of mess and mayhem in the way, but so long as we followed Rainbow's example—and put our muzzles to the grindstone—then fate would eventually unravel itself straight once more.

	And what a fortuitous dawn it was that awaited us...



	"If I didn't know better, Your Highness, I'd say that a little piece of Equestria was dropped here along the western shoals of Alafreo."

	Rainbow Dash smirked from where she perched high up on a rock outcropping just beneath the burning brazier of Abinadi.  With a rag from her saddlebag, she polished the Sword of Solstice to an immaculate shine, even as it glowed in her hoofed grip.

	"Everypo—er... everyturtle here is just so kind and selfless and gracious," she said, staring down at where the Noble Jury was reaching full-repair.  From afar, she could even spot where Elma spoke with a crowd of Boreals and other Abinadi locals.  "I think Boxer—the elder—can be thanked for a lot of their attitude.  But it's somehow more than that.  These guys just... are happy to be alive.  There are no crazy politics or bickerings or any of that other stupid stuff."

	"It is rather difficult to imagine a completely blameless society," Celestia's voice said.

	"Oh, for sure, Princess.  But compared to what I'm used to running into, it's certainly a breath of fresh air."

	"You've since learned of a startling revolution in the lands you've already crossed, correct?"

	"Yeah.  Apparently Ledomare is no more.  According to Prowse and Zetta, the place is being called 'Luxmare' and is voting to end the years of war with Xona altogether."

	"With their long-lost monarch back, I would imagine Xona is happy to embark upon an era of peace and tranquility."

	"From what I can tell, Lasairfion was a pretty sweet Queen.  She's got nothing on you and Luna, though," Rainbow said with a wink.

	Celestia's voice chuckled in the frosty winds.  "Is it not clear to you now, Rainbow Dash, that in spite of all of your trials and tribulations, you are still a sower of peace in this world?

	"Yeah, well..."  Rainbow Dash sighed, staring at her ruby pendant in the golden sword's reflection.  "It certainly could have taken a lot less deaths to get to that spot."

	"In over ten thousand years of faithfully guarding Equestria, Luna and I have thought the same thing to ourselves more times than even an alicorn can count.  And yet, every morning we see the sun rise over the emerald landscape of this kingdom, we can live with the realization that our labors have been worth it."

	"I wish I could have your kind of confidence, Your Majesty."

	"Don't you?  Rainbow Dash, you are but a mere mortal—and a very vexxed one at that.  And yet, in only a smattering of months, you have gone farther and done more for this world than Luna and I have accomplished in eons."

	"Pffft.  Please.  Princess, you and Luna have to stick to one place and control the sun and moon.  Without that, the rest of the world wouldn't even tick."

	"Mmmm.  Yes.  But would it prosper?  Would it thrive?  Would justice and retribution make themselves manifest so swiftly on their own?"

	Rainbow was silent.

	Celestia said, "From a land ravaged by dragons to an entire continent bloodied by endless war to a wasteland haunted by a damnable city—you have carried the spirit of harmony with you, and you have blessed millions, Rainbow Dash."

	"I've just been... y'know..."  Rainbow Dash shrugged.  "Following the sunrise."

	"Rainbow, do not pretend to be a mere servant of light.  For you are the beacon.  Our pride in you knows no boundaries, and I'm certain my sister and I can speak the same for your friends... if th-they were still here to smile upon you as well."

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  She sniffled and smiled crookedly into the sword.  "Friggin' princesses... why can't you just be ballroom gowns and tea parties?"  She wiped her eye dry and cleared her throat.  "Why you gotta be so friggin' wise all the time?"

	"We've lived long enough to be enlightened by brave souls such as you..."



	While Elma continues to socialize with her extended "family," the rest of the Jurists are already preparing for the next leg of our voyage.  It's amazing how swiftly we can operate at this point in our sojourn.  We're like a well-oiled machine, and certainly the expedient repairs by the Alafreon populace has helped give us the enthusiastic boost that we needed.

	I've been granted access to a veritable cornacopia of vegetables, fruits, and spices.  At some point, I think we started to feel a little too fortunate for the influx of bounty, and we opened trade with some of the outlying townships, bartering some of the metal tools that Roarke was willing to part with in order to get some scrumptious ingredients for my kitchen.

	The things I have to cook with now are amazing.  I haven't felt this stocked up since the days of working the restaurants in Gray Smoke.  There's no doubt I can feed the entire crew for a month and a half... maybe two.  What sort of ground could we cover in that time?  I shudder to think... and yet I find myself actually excited for once, intead of frightened.



	"Yes, I am very well acquainted with the ponies of Val Roa," Boxer said with a wrinkled smile in the torchlight.  "While I may not have been blessed with venturing to their kingdom, I did entertain their ambassadors on several occasions over the last few centuries."

	"Is there anything you can tell us about them?" Josho asked.  Roarke stood in the shadows, gazing from afar while the obese stallion trotted closer to Boxer.  "For example, just how large is their kingdom?"

	"Oh, it's hard to say," Boxer remarked.  "Unlike the rumors I hear of the land west of the Strip, the Val Roans aren't exactly territorial."  His jaw clenched and unclenched in thought.  "I've seen a few illustrations of the countryside.  Most of Val Roa is outlying farmsteads and a few mining operations.  However, at the heart of the kingdom?  Upon the eastern crest of the Polished Mountains?"  The elder turtle smiled.  "Their capital city lies, and it is a veritable jewel of a metropolis, with beautiful architecture that will put most other kingdoms to shame."

	"It's just on the border of the Grand Choke, right?" Josho asked.  "We've been told it's the 'last bastion' of civilization or some other fartsmoke..."

	"Ah, yes, indeed.  Val Roa is a lush and beautiful countryside.  But not that far east of its valleys, the landscape turns arid... lifeless.  It is said that magic and the elements do not function in the Grand Choke like they do in the rest of the world.  That is why very few creatures have been known to ever cross the desert... or the rumored waters that lay beyond.  For that very reason, Val Roa exists in near-perfect isolation.  Its citizens within the capital city live in tranquility.  They are affluent—yes—but they do not hog their wealth.  Above all else, they appreciate art, luxury, and the equal opportunity to enjoy life's bounties.  If they weren't so isolated, it's difficult to believe that such a pinnacle existence could be achieved."

	"Do they have a military?" Roarke asked.  "Are they fond for using weapons of war?"

	Josho squirmed awkwardly.

	Boxer raised his head, squinting at her across the way.  "A most interesting question... from a most interesting pony."

	"I simply wish to know what we may have to contend with if we were to accidentally offend these 'affluent artists,'" the metal mare said.

	"No doubt you wish to engage in some vile target practice," Boxer said coolly.

	Roarke's lenses immediately retracted.  "I beg your pardon?"

	"You are obviously a mare bred for death and carnage," the elder continued.  "If there's any chance of bloodshed—even in a land of peace—you will immediately sieze it."

	"That..."  Roarke grit her teeth.  "That is not the purpose of my inquiry..."

	"Admit it, child.  You've been anxious for setting scaled flesh on fire ever since you got here.  It's a wonder you haven't already assaulted any of my hatchlings."

	"You misunderstand me," Roarke said, her voice rising slowly before turning into a heated snarl.  "My motivation is not bloodthirst!"  She angrily stomped her hooves against the metal floor, making the nearby guards flinch.  "There are ponies in my party who—compared to me—are ill-equipped to deal with insurmountable threads and I simply demand to know if my friends are running into anything too—"  She stopped in mid-sentence, breathing heavily.

	Boxer was smiling at her.

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "What are you trying to do here...?"

	"I knew I smelled something deep inside your rusted shell, child," Boxer said calmly.  "You may think that it betrays your character, but I'd say that it exemplifies it."  He stifled a raspy chuckle.  "Perhaps it would do you well to exercise your passion among your friends instead of reserving it for strangers."

	Roarke merely frowned.  She heard a rattling sound.  Glancing down, she realized she was trembling through to her metal braces.  She gripped herself and stared aside.

	Josho turned and blinked at her.  "You think I'm 'ill-equipped?'"

	"Just get this over with, breeder," Roarke grunted.

	Josho turned back to Boxer—but paused.  He squinted at Roarke's brown coat, detecting a slight rosiness.  Shrugging it off, he faced the elder once more and said, "So, unless you're gonna go on a tangent to troll my fat flank over visions of pasta, would you mind telling us a bit more about who exactly runs the show in the Val Roan capital?"

	"It would be my pleasure, good sir.  And perhaps when we're done, we can enjoy a little bit of red wine.  I do believe it matches your companion's complexion right about now."

	"Grnnnngh!"  Roarke kicked at the wall and stomped angrily out of the domed building.

	Boxer smiled after her.  Once she was gone, he uttered, "I've always found that a soul is most precious when it's on the virge of shedding its outer shell."  He turned to face Josho.  "What do you think?"

	Josho smirked.  "I think I friggin' love this place."

		//------------------------------//
		// Something to be Watchful For		//------------------------------//

	I haven't put much thought into what waits for me at the end of this journey.  I don't know how many of the other Jurists have.  I guess—for us—the voyage has always centered upon Rainbow Dash.  She's been the one to inspire everypony on board, after all.  Her goals have been our goals, and her conflicts have been our conflicts.

	I'm certain that—by this point—we are determined to reach Val Roa.  So long as we have full knowledge of Chrysalis and her presence there, we owe it to the rest of the world to put a stop to her infamy once and for all.  How long it will take us to get to the kingdom she's nestled in, I'm not entirely certain.  The skystone will undoubtedly get us there quickly—or, at least, quicker than the average air vessel.  I don't even know if airships are common over this continent.

	But what about that which lies beyond Val Roa?  From the sound of things, the Grand Choke isn't exactly mana-friendly.  There's no telling if the enchanted tome in Propsy's engine room—or the skystone for that matter—will survive the trip.  But, then again, there's no telling if Rainbow Dash would either...

	I can't be the only pony who worries about her.  Surely Bellesmith and Pilate have their hearts full of dread whenever the topic comes up.  Who's to know what Eagle Eye or Propsy think... or Josho or Floydien or Zaid for that matter.  Or Roarke...

	Rainbow may be courageous, stubborn, and mule-headed at times, but she's no idiot.  She wouldn't have survived as long as she has and against as many obstacles as she's encountered if she didn't have a level head on her shoulder.  Surely the questionable nature of the crew's future has crossed her mind.  Her loyalty isn't exempt of thoughtfulness and empathy, one would think.

	She's not a pony to go down fighting, Mother.  That quality in and of itself has saved the whole lot of us on countless occasions.  I just hope she takes the not-too-distant future into careful consideration.  I hope she does what's best not just for herself... but for the ponies who love and care for her.

	I think the time has come for Rainbow Dash to realize that everypony's journey can't go on forever.  So, then, the choice is hers.  Does she stay with the ones whom she's come to love?  Or does she fade off into the eastern wasteland, preserving herself forever as merely an awesome memory?  I honestly do not know which of the two is the better choice, and I certainly don't envy her position...



	"Certainly you've all heard of the Churning Line," Josho said as he paced to a shuffling stop.  He faced several other crew members across the Noble Jury's top deck under starlight.  "Well, according to Boxer, it's the eastern extent of these jagged bluffs.  Beyond, there's a steep series of mountain ranges—known to most Alafreons as the Sky Stabs.  Most vessels aren't capable of scaling the altitude required to pass over them."

	"But Nancy Jane isn't like most vessels," Floydien said, almost bitterly.  Props giggled off to the side, causing the elk to grumble.

	"Right."  Josho nodded, then turned to face the others.  "Because of the Sky Stabs, most airships don't even bother to venture into central Alafreo.  They typically take the winding ravines to the south.  But—according to Boxer—the quickest way to Val Roa means scaling the Sky Stabs directly."

	"Does he know what's beyond these peaks?" Pilate asked.  Kera lay against his striped coat, curled up and yawning from the throes of an exhausting day.  "These turtles don't exactly strike me as avid pilots."

	"Yeah, well, Boxer's lived long enough to catch word of mouth from everything that passes through Abinadi," Josho said.  "Central Alafreo is apparently lush, not to mention heavily forested.  Fir trees for days, from what I hear.  There's a very large valley that stretches across most of the continent, before ending up in the Polish Mountains just west of Val Roa and the Grand Choke."  He cleared his throat.  "However..."

	Eagle Eye blinked.  "However what, old stallion?"

	"There's an area in the northwest corner of the valley that's separated by a smaller mountain range east of the Sky Stabs.  A curved mountain range.  The landscape makes a perfect circle, according to most travelers, and it's vastly unexplored."

	"What are we talking about?" Bellesmith remarked.  "A plateau?"

	"More like a crater," Josho said.  "And a very large one at that.  Over two centuries ago, a group of ponies and turtles tried scaling the southern heights to explore what lay beyond, but a blizzard struck the expedition.  They lost several members of their party and had to cancel the journey.  No one has tried venturing into the crater since, and most pilots east of the Sky Stabs simply avoid it altogether."

	"Is it dangerous?" Eagle Eye asked.

	"Meh.  More like annoying," Josho said.

	"Hmmmm..."  Kera smiled deliriously, nuzzling Pilate's side as she yawned.  "M-maybe it's full of pillllllowssss..."

	Belle rolled her eyes with a smirked.  "Somepony needs to hit the hay."

	"Yeah!"  Props snorted.  "She can count tortoises hopping a fence!"  Eagle Eye giggled.

	Josho glanced left and right.  Clearing his throat, he leaned forward.  "Has anypony seen the paint bucket around?"

	"Rainbow's been speaking with Celestia all day," Belle said.

	"It's night now," Josho droned.

	The mare shrugged.  "Perhaps she's gone to sleep.  The Alafreons finished polishing up the observation room this afternoon."

	"That's so neato keano of them," Props said with a warm smile.  "Don't you agree?"

	"Is something the matter, Josho?" Eagle Eye asked.

	The obese stallion sighed, plopping back on his haunches.  "All this Chrysalis business..."  He narrowed his eyes at the group.  "Just what are we even going to do to her once we get to Val Roa?"

	"What else?"  Floydien inhaled, eyes twitching.  "March up to insect boomer's face and give her the hoof hoof."

	Josho's brow furrowed.  "I'm serious."  He clenched his teeth.  "We damn-near chopped off our heads and tails to get out of the trap that her broodlings set for us over the Wastes."

	"Yeah, but she doesn't have her broodlinglinglings anymore!" Props exclaimed.

	"Doesn't make her any less powerful," Josho said.  "According to what Rainbow Dash has told us, she's old as sin and has connections with the dark side of the world."  He gestured with a meaty fetlock as he spoke.  "What's to say that she's not going to spring an even bigger trap for us when we arrive in the Val Roan Capital City?"

	"It's okay to be worried, Josho," Eagle Eye said.  "I'm not exactly thrilled about getting into a grunge match with Chrysalis either, but this group has been through crazier straits before."  He smiled gently.  "I have every bit of confidence that we'll figure something else!  Besides, we've got Rainbow on our sides!"

	"Yeah, but we're not gonna have her on our sides for long."

	Pilate said, "She's proven to have greater fortitude than the rest of us combined—"

	"But not forever," Josho firmly said.  "Please.  Let's be real here.  You guys know this better than the rest of us."

	Pilate opened his mouth, but he had nothing to say.  He hung his head while Belle's hooves squirmed against the top deck.

	Josho's gaze washed over the group, finally settling on Eagle Eye's melancholic expression.  With a sigh, he closed his eyes and said, "Look, bad things are going to happen in this world.  That's a given.  We've all seen it for ourselves.  But, we've also seen a lot of that bad stuff get kicked in the rear.  Rainbow Dash has done a lot of good for almost every ass-backward place she's flow through.  Plus, she made me sober."  His eyes opened dully.  "I know that I'm both the first and the last pony who should be saying this, but... I think it's high time she considered retiring."

	"Her journey is an epic one, Josho," Belle said.  "Not to mention a necessary one.  It goes beyond what any of us can comprehend."

	"And just where is that written in stone, huh?"  Josho frowned.  "As far as I'm concerned, all this Austraeoh prophecy stuff is a bunch of hooey.  Never mind what an enchanted book and a bunch of freaky cultists think.  Hell, just take one look at Zaid.  Morons will believe in anything given enough idiocy and dedication.  Or if somepony just promises them grilled cheese."

	"The role of Austraeoh and Eljunbyro is quite clear," Pilate said.  "My beloved and I have not only witnessed it—we have lived it.  Embodied it."

	"Won't make a damn difference once death and chaos catches up with Dash."

	Belle exclaimed, "She's had every reason to die already!  But with each peril she's faced, each beacon of the machine world she's touched—she's miraculously lived on!"

	"And you think that'll make her go on forever?"  Josho raised an eyebrow.  "It didn't work for Hurricane.  And from what I hear, they both had the whole 'Austraeoh' thing going for them... up until the end at least."

	Belle bit her lip.  Her eyes moistened slightly.

	"Don't get me wrong.  I care for the gal," Josho said.  "She's changed my life in more ways than I can count.  It freaks me out to think that I ever once tried hunting her down like she was a rabid winged dog in Foxtaur Forest."  Her looked at the others.  "But someday, her journey's going to end.  She... is going to end.  And I think we all owe it to her—I think the whole dayum world owes it to her to make it a good end.  Good... relaxing... and p-peaceful."  He swallowed.

	The Noble Jury was silent.

	Clearing his throat, Josho continued, "Or... y'know..."  A sigh.  "We just... play along with her until she can't go on any further.  I dunno if that means beyond the Grand Choke or what... but if you can't retire the hero, then at least you can help warm up her blaze of glory.  You feel me?"

	"We... we f-feel you, old stallion," Eagle Eye said with a sniffle.  "I just... d-don't really like what I'm feeling..."



	This has been a happy week.  A joyful and prosperous week.  And yet, I can't shake this unsettling feeling that—at some point far from now—things will stop being this joyful.  And, as silly as it sounds, I'd much rather have it happen tomorrow as opposed to constantly hanging over our heads for an insurmountable time.

	I love these ponies.  They are like family to me.  I adore Propsy and I cherish Eagle Eye.  But, without a shadow of a doubt, Rainbow Dash is at the center of it all.  And once she goes away—be it to a grave or to the east beyond—I fear for what will happen to this family.  I fear the idea of being ungrounded... of being lost.

	For I have been lost before.  And it was not a pleasant feeling.  It still haunts me... tears at me in the dark of night.  And for all of the warm comfort of the Jurists' companionship... for all the loving things that Eagle Eye says to me...

	I'm still scared, Mother.  I'm scared that I'll forever be lost, searching... searching for you... searching for myself.

	But, who knows?  If Elma Boreal's found herself, then maybe there's hope for me.

	Maybe there's hope for all of us...



	Rainbow Dash finished attaching a knotted rope-end to a bulkhead.  With a satisfied sigh, she leaned back and blinked blearily at her hoofwork.

	A newly knitted hammock hung neatly across the port side of the Noble Jury's refurbished observation room.  The metal framework of the bubbled window had been repaired completely.  The room looked like it had never been trashed by zombie pegasi to begin with.  Even new glass panels filled up the webbed frame, peering out into mountain mist and starlight.

	Stifling a yawn, Rainbow Dash trotted across the room and braced the Sword of Solstice against the corner.  Dimming the lights, she spread her wings and prepared to leap into the hammock.  On the final heave, however—

	"Uhm... Rainbow Dash?"

	Rainbow tripped, pratfalling onto her chest.  "Ooof!"

	"Gah!"  Elma winced, biting her bottom lip with a pair of fangs.  "S-sorry!  I'm so sorry!"

	"Nnnngh..."  Rainbow Dash stood back up, teetering slightly.  "Naw, it's alright..."  She brushed herself off.  "The day isn't complete until I've crashed into something or another."

	"Still, please forgive me.  I didn't mean to startle you—"

	"Elma, it's alright."  Rainbow turned to smile tiredly at her.  She slapped a nearby lantern with her prismatic tail, brightening the observation room slightly.  "What's up?"

	"I haven't seen you around that much lately."

	"Well, that's to be understood.  You've been catching up with your family."  Rainbow winced.  "Erm... Elma's family, I mean.  Ungh..."  She face-hoofed.  "I'll never get over that, I swear."

	"Eheh..."  The changeling gulped and nodded.  "You're not alone..."  She paced about.  "I spent all afternoon with the Tundras."

	"The whats?"

	"Distant relatives of the Boreals," Elma said with a smile.  "I used to fish with two of their elders when I was a hatchling—er... I-I mean Elma..."  The shapeshifter sighed.  "You understand."

	"If you insist."

	"So many memories..."  Elma shook her head, gazing into the bulkhead in thought.  "And so many turtles to catch up with.  And that's not even the half of it."  She looked up, bearing a perky smile.  "I keep remembering all of these... these projects that Elma left in limbo..."

	"Projects?"

	"She was a cartographer and an enviromentalist," the changeling said.  "She had all of these expeditions and operations set in motion.  They've all been cut off because of her untimely demise, of course.  And yet... it's like... it's like they haven't."  She looked at her own porous forelimbs.  "They're right within reach of my hooves.  And I remember everything about the parts where I—I m-mean where Elma left off at.  There are hundreds if not thousands of turtles waiting on these expeditions to go underway.  Lots of money is just floating around... turtles' livelihoods.  And... and..."

	"Hmmm?"  Rainbow squinted.  "And what?"

	"Just... just seeing my—I mean Elma's hatchlings again..." She gulped.  "There're so many things I want to learn about... to know about.  Cousins and nephews I haven't seen in ages.  Promises that were made to them and to their children and their children's children..."

	"I'm guessing it's a lot to take in."

	"You have no idea."  Elma slowly shook her head.  "And... and all this time, the Boreals have been extremely welcoming.  The Tundras as well.  But that's not all.  I think... no, I'm pretty sure that this is helping them as well."  Elma nodded at her own words.  "I think something about me being here is helping them come to terms with the fact that the matriarch of the Boreal family is gone."

	"And she is gone, right?" Rainbow Dash asked.

	Elma looked at her.

	"Who you were and who you are?"  The pegasus shook her head.  "Two completely different things, girl."

	The shape-shifter gulped.  "How do you even know that I'm a girl?"

	Rainbow stared blankly.

	"How do you know that this is my real form?"  She flexed her dragonfly wings.  "Or that it's the real form of any broodling hatched from Chrysalis?"  She stared at her own hooves.  "Or that this is what I truly should be beneath it all..."

	"I... I guess I don't know."

	"Neither do I, Rainbow," Elma murmured.  "All I know is what Chrysalis made me into... what she robbed the Boreals of.  And, yet, it's like they've never been robbed at all.  Because... she's still here.  She's not alive... she's not even a soul... but she's a gift now... and a talent."  She clenched her jaws.  "Something that I'm not about to take for granted."

	"Elma..."  Rainbow Dash chuckled.  "If I didn't know better, I'd say you were almost wanting to—"

	Elma looked pointedly at her.

	Rainbow Dash stopped in mid-speech.  She blinked.

	Elma stared at her.  She exhaled and smiled weakly.

	Rainbow's ears folded.  She glanced down at the floor, then gulped.  "Oh."

	Elma slowly, slowly nodded.

	"Have you... uhm..."  Rainbow ran a hoof through her mane.  "...have you told anypony?"

	"I'm telling you," Elma said.

	Rainbow glanced up at her.  "Why me?"

	"Because you're the reason I'm here, Rainbow Dash.  You're the reason I'm alive... why I still believe in myself..."

	"Pffft... bite your tongue..."  Rainbow chuckled awkwardly.  "It was Pilate who showed you compassion in Stratopolis.  And then Belle single-hoofedly carried you to safety—"

	"But it was you who saved me through them, Rainbow..."  Elma stepped quietly towards the pegasus.  "It was you who whisked them away from their troubles.  It was you who inspired them to be courageous and to show compassion and to never give up."  She stopped and rested a hoof on the mare's shoulder.  "It was you who brought the Noble Jury together... who led them my way... who helped them bless my life when I didn't know I had one to call my own."

	Rainbow gulped and murmured, "And is it your own, Elma?"

	"It will be," the shape-shifter said.  "Thanks to you... and thanks to Elma."  She smiled, her green eyes tearing.  "You've both been foundations... stepping stones toward where I need to be."

	"I..."  Rainbow Dash shuddered, forcing a smile across her muzzle.  "I wish I could take you there faster, Elma.  I really... really do."

	"I know that," Elma said with a nod.  "But for some of us, the quickest way to finish a journey is to stop moving."

	Rainbow Dash blinked at that.  Eventually her voice cracked, "I don't know if I can even understand that."  A weak smile.  "But I have full faith that you can."

	"Good..."  Elma nodded, sniffling.  "I'll take that as a blessing."

	"Sure."  Rainbow leaned forward, smirking devilishly.  "Just promise me one thing, at least."

	"What's that?"

	"You darn well better pick yourself a name," she said with a wink.

	Elma did a double-take, then broke into giggles.  She leaned forward as Rainbow Dash hugged her gently in the starlight.

	
		//------------------------------//
		// Good Things Can Be Born		//------------------------------//

	Ebon's muzzle hung open while his body softly rose and fell with slumbering breaths.  Spread across the cot around the stallion were several sheets of parchment and a dried up quill.  A candle was burnt halfway down its length on a shelf across from him.

	At some point, the metal door to the crew compartment squeaked open.  Eagle Eye poked his head in.  He saw Ebon's sleeping figure and quietly stepped inside.  A gentle smile crossed his muzzle as he raised a hoof and brushed Ebon's dark bangs.  Using his magic, Eagle drew a bedsheet over Ebon.  The stallion stirred slightly, but ultimately fell even deeper into slumber.

	Slowly turning, Eagle glanced at the parchment.  He lifted several sheets from the bed, blinking at the headers of each letter.  After a few seconds, the ex-mercenary sighed.  He clung a wad of sheets to his chest and hugged himself, staring worriedly into the metal bulkheads.



	"We're planning to scale the Sky Stabs," Rainbow Dash said, hovering before Boxer.  "It'll be our swiftest way towards Val Roa."

	"Wishing to avoid distractions, I take it?"

	"Heh..."  Rainbow smirked.  "If all of Alafreo's 'distractions' are anything like this place, I'd be happy to run into all of them."  She gulped.  "But there's trouble brewing in the east.  It's the sort of thing we'd be jerks to not deal with."

	"I presume you speak of this... supposed 'Queen Chrysalis.'"

	Rainbow nodded.  "Though she may have been rendered powerless after the last time I saw her 'face-to-face,' there's no telling how quickly Chrysalis could regain strength.  The mare used to be an alicorn.  She could be real versatile."

	"Oh, how I do wish I could be of assistance to you in this matter," Boxer remarked.  "Alas, conflict is not our strong suit."

	"You've helped quite enough.  Believe me," Rainbow said.  "And—if there's anything I can do about it—I intend to stop this with as little conflict possible."

	"Have you a plan in mind?"

	Rainbow sighed through a weak smile. "Not yet."

	"How invigorating it must be to live in the moment."  Boxer's wrinkled lips curved.  "Such impulsive heroism has its merit."

	"It has a lot of other things too that I could do without," the pegasus muttered.  "But, it's all for the best.  At least, that's what I have to tell myself."

	"I heard that the changeling with Elma Boreal's memories is staying."

	"Yes, sir."  Rainbow nodded.  "That she is."

	"Is this a decision she came to on her own?"

	Rainbow's brow furrowed.  "Why, of c-course!  She came to me about it personally.  I really couldn't convince her otherwise.  Besides, I feel that it's the best thing for her right now, so who am I to talk her out of it?"  She exhaled heavily, her ears folding.  "Believe me, there're a lot of ponies on the Jury who are sad to see her go."

	"She's become part of the family, I imagine."

	"For a lot of us, Elma's proof that—even in our darkest hour—good things can be born.  Before we found her, we had just climbed out of the roughest spot imaginable.  We didn't expect anything miraculously awesome to happen.  And yet, it did.  She should be a sobbing husk in the northern skystone fields along with the rest of Stratopolis by now, but she isn't.  We pulled through for her and she pulled through for us."

	"Something tells me that a sign such as this has been a long time coming."

	Rainbow gulped, her eyes slightly misty.  "Yeah.  It was... pretty nice to witness..."

	"Look at me, child..."

	Rainbow's eyes tilted to meet with Boxer's.

	The aged tortoise said, "Remember this moment.  Dwell on it.  Meditate on it.  In the future, when your life once again becomes intolerably bleak, think back to what you've felt today, so that you may remind your future self that not all is lost.  Hope stands to bring light to us in the strangest places.  There is a purpose to living, otherwise there would be no life whatsoever.  Everything would be death."

	"There are times, though," Rainbow murmured, "When death is all that I see."

	"Which is proof that you are in the position to triumph over it," he said.

	She blinked at that.  A smile came to her face.  "I think Elma's gonna be super okay here."

	"And when the day comes that she isn't, and she misses you and the rest of the crew terribly..."  Boxer nodded his head.  "I'll tell her how you looked and felt this hour before me."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Spark That Keeps Glowing		//------------------------------//

	Bellesmith finished nuzzling Elma.  She leaned back, wiped her moist eyes dry, and smiled weakly at the changeling.  "Are you absolutely sure you won't be changing your mind?  You do know that we have a lot of love to give."

	"Bellesmith..."  Elma caressed the mare's fetlocks.  "You have done so very much for me.  It would be doing you a terrible wrong not to capitalize on it.  I need to be here.  In Abinadi.  Once I have everything squared away, I'll surely discover that I have a lot of love to give as well."

	"Of that, I have no doubt," Belle said, sniffling.

	Elma turned to look at the rest of the Jury gathered in the metallic courtyard.  She trotted up to Pilate.  "You..."  She leaned in and hugged him dearly.  "You showed me true compassion when nopony else would."

	"Yes, well..."  Pilate chuckled and patted the back of her shoulders.  "You saved my life."

	"And you and your beloved gave me one," Elma said.  "Thank you for putting me on a path towards learning that I wasn't expendable."

	"Nopony is," Pilate said as he leaned back, smiling.  "I don't see why changelings should be."

	Elma smiled tearfully.  Her gaze fell downward, and soon she was crouching before a tiny Xonan.  "I have a long journey of discovery ahead of me.  I'm sorry that I won't be around to help you with yours."

	Kera gulped and nodded.  "It's alright.  You already totally did."

	"Mmmm..."  Elma slowly shook her head, then reached forward to caress the filly's chin.  "You are your own savior, Kera.  I wouldn't have even bothered reaching out to you if I didn't sense the strength and courage you had within yourself in the first place.  You have what it takes to carry yourself past any challenge or obstacle that lifes throws your way."

	Kera muttered, "I wish I could believe that, instead of being a friggin' lame-o."  She gulped, trying not to look at her as she whimpered, "I'm s-so sorry for freaking out on you that one time.  You totally didn't deserve it."

	"But I can understand it," Elma murmured.  "And I'm glad to see how well you've started to pull through."  She nodded towards the two adults beside her.  "Pilate and Belle can understand it to.  When the going gets tough, go to them.  Share with them.  They love you more than I can put into words... and I know love."

	"Yeah..."  Kera nodded, smiling sweetly towards the shape-shifter.  "You do, don't ya?"

	"But not as well as you."  She leaned in and kissed the filly's forehead before caressing her green mane.  "You're going to grow up into a spectacular mare, Kera.  Don't give into despair.  Even those of us who've had nothing... who have been nothing can achieve wonderful things."

	She stood up and gazed across the crowd.

	"You all mean so much to me.  It pains me to leave you be on your journey, but this is the closest thing I have to home.  The turtles of Abinadi need me..."

	"And you need them, Elma," Ebon said, nodding.  He smiled painfully.  "It's all for the best, really.  I've never been good at cooking emotions."

	A good half of the Jury chuckled.

	Eagle Eye bit his lip and stared at the ground.

	Elma saw it.  She leaned her head down.

	He glanced up at her.

	Elma smiled.  "Everything will be okay.  Love has led me out of the depths of despair.  I have every reason to believe it will take you someplace even brighter."

	Eagle's lips parted.  He felt a tender hoof on his shoulder, and he giggled while leaning into Ebon.

	"Props?"  Elma spoke while backing up.  "Next time you speak to your Uncle, tell him I'm sorry I never got to know the real Prowse, but if he's anything like his niece, then I truly wish I had been stranded on a sunken frigate with him instead."

	"Heeheehee!"  Props waved.  "I'll tel him!  Good bye, Elma!"

	"Bye!"

	"So long!"

	"Spark's blessings!"

	"Let not the turtle boomers bite bite!"

	"Ungh... let's get out of here, already."

	"Heheheh..."

	Elma watched as the crew trotted away.  She sensed a sea of shells shuffling towards her, and she smiled as she leaned back into the gracious company of the Boreals.

	The crew got on board the Noble Jury.  The last two were Roarke and Rainbow.  After Roarke had shuffled on board, Rainbow Dash lingered at the hangar.  She stared down at the changeling, left alone in a sea of friendly reptiles.  With a devilish smirk, she saluted, then slipped inside the vessel just as the hangar doors were closing.

	With a flash of enchanted skystone, the ship undocked from the upper struts, pivoted east, and flew past the spires of Abinadi, piercing the haze of smoke from the bright brazier hanging above.

	The changeling exhaled heavily, her eyes moist as she watched the ship grow distant and distant across the mountainous eastern horizon.
	Around her, the turtles stopped waving, muttering towards one another.

	At last, a citizen said, "They really were a remarkable bunch of travelers.  We're truly blessed that you've decided to stay with us, Elma."

	"So am I.  But I am no longer Elma..."  She turned around.  "In fact, I've been thinking about a new name."

	"Oh yes?"

	"Mmmmm..."  She nodded.  "A name that's beautiful... that deserves to be beautiful, for the brightest spark yearns to be found when everything is seemingly dire and hopeless."  She smiled at the others.  "Please, call me 'Lerris.'"
		//------------------------------//
		// Things We Do For Love		//------------------------------//

	Ebon finished pouring a cup of grape juice atop the table.  As the cook drew away, Josho's hoof reached in and lifted the glass.  The obese stallion held the container below his muzzle, sniffed, and muttered, "Eh... guess it'll have to do."  He stood up, facing the rest of the ponies gathered inside the brightly-lit mess hall.  "For this toast, I gotta use my own hoof.  I'm not about to dirty it with magic.  Ya feel me?"

	"Mmmm... some of us do, I suppose," Bellesmith said with a smile.  Pilate chuckled.

	Josho's face was straight and serious as he stood up tall.  "A toast... to Elma Boreal," the former enforcer said.  "Maybe she wasn't a talking snapping turtle.  Maybe she wasn't a scum-sucking broodling of Queen Chrysalis.  But she was a damn fine Jurist."

	"Amen."

	"Buck yeah."

	"I'll drink to that."

	"We've met and parted ways with quite a few snazzy hooves in our journey together," Josho said.  "Crimson... Lucky Strike... Tweak..."

	"Phoenix," Bellesmith said.

	"Basso," Zaid said, pointing.  He smirked.  "Sassy Zetta."

	"Unky Prowsy," Props murmured, sniffling.

	"Jasper Clark," Ebon said from the kitchen's doorframe.

	Josho raised the glass higher.  "Here's to her having a peaceful life for many, many friggin' years."  He gulped.  "And that she may find peace in ways... l-less painful than the ones whom we've lost."

	Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  "Aatxe," she said.

	Kera hung her head.  "Dalen."

	Zaid fidgeted before whispering, "Khao..."

	"Beau," Bellesmith murmured.  "Golden Happenstance..."

	"Simon," Floydien muttered, staring through the table.

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip.  She looked across the room.

	Roarke stood alone in a distant corner, leaning back on her haunches.  Her head tilted up upon Rainbow's eye contact.  After a few seconds, the metal mare cleared her throat and muttered, "Imre."

	The room hung in silence for several seconds.  At last, Josho gestured towards the group.  They all reached in with their glasses the best that they could.  After a festive clinking, they all took hearty sips, exhaling in one accord.

	The quiet was somewhat unsettling, until Zaid said:  "I'd sing a touching ballad, if only all that I knew didn't involve one-night stands with working fillies at port towns."

	Belle choked on her drink.

	"Snkkkkt!"  Props slapped the table and broke out in wheezing laughter.  "Zaidstainnnns!"

	"What?!"  The stallion gestured.  "Okay, so I was in a pretty bad place when the Herald recruited me!"

	"Sticky boomer will be in an even worse place at the rate he's spitting," Floydien said.

	"Nah..."  Zaid shook his head, smiling.  "I'm in a good place." He took a deep breath, his cheeks slightly warm.  "A really, really good place."

	"That makes the two of us," Props said with a wink.

	"Uhm..."  Kera blushed, raising a hoof.  "Three of us?"

	"Heeeeee!"  Props leaned in and nuzzled the filly.  "Hope right in, silly-willy!"

	Kera giggled in the mare's grasp.

	"I don't know about singing," Pilate said.  The zebra smiled gently.  "But perhaps a discussion is in order."

	"It'd be a darn good idea to go over the travel plan," Josho said.  "Once space elk here takes the Jury off autopilot, we've got some tall mountains to scale."

	Pilate shook his head.  "No, there'll be time for that."  He tilted his head aside.  "I mean... just talking.  I feel as if we haven't had much time to... to relax and get to know each other more."

	"I think that's a marvelous idea," Ebon said, smiling sweetly.

	"I'm all for it, myself," Belle said with a nod.

	"Well, sure thing!"  Zaid finished his glass and slapped it onto the table.  "Who's first?"

	"Oooh!  Me!"  Props bounced up, grinning.  "So, twenty-three years ago, I was conceived inside the broom closet of a book store!"

	"Spkkktkkktt!"  Josho spat out the rest of his drink, stumbled, and wiped his muzzle.  "Dammit, blondie!"

	"Whelp..."  Zaid sighed.  "I can't top that."

	"Blessed spark..."  Belle face-hoofed.

	Kera squinted at Props.  "I didn't know two ponies could fit in a broom closet."

	"Actually, you can fit four!"  Props grinned sweetly.  "At least, that's what my mom always told me!"

	"That's it."  Floydien spun and marched off.  "Floydien's checking on Nancy's instruments."

	"Awwwwwwww..."

	"How about this..." Pilate stepped closer to the table's edge.  "How about I tell you a bit about my days as a zeppelin navigator."

	"Oooooh!"  Kera hopped in place.  "That sounds adventurous!"

	"Believe it or not, it actually was."

	"Hell, I'm all ears," Josho said.

	"Well, granted it was a rather short career," Pilate said.  "Coming to an end on Ledo's Pride, for better or for worse."  He tilted his head in Belle's direction with a smile.  "Mostly for better..."

	She smiled and nuzzled him.  "Tell them about the high-altitude run-in with the parasprite swarm, beloved."

	"Oh!  That's quite an exciting tale!"  Pilate cleared his throat and faced the general direction of the huddled group.  "It was nighttime, and I was on observation duty, when all of the sudden we experienced a great deal of turbulence..."

	As Pilate spoke, Rainbow Dash hovered in place, smiling proudly at her close friends.  She blinked, then looked towards the corner once more.

	Roarke sat in place, her copper lenses fully retracted.  Her breaths came in heavy, melancholic waves.  After a moment, a shadow crossed the floor before her.  The metal mare looked up.

	Rainbow Dash hovered with two glasses in her hooves.  She held the full one towards her.

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  She looked at the glass, then at Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow smiled.

	Gulping, Roarke leaned forward... hesitated... and eventually grasped the glass.  Upon seeing Rainbow's gesture, she slowly tilted the container to her lips... and drank half of it in one fell swoop.  She gulped, exhaled—and suddenly felt herself being pushed forward.  Stumbling, she saw that Rainbow was urging her towards the table with her hoof.  She clenched her teeth once... but soon relented, all tension leaving her metal-laced shoulders.  The two mares hung side by side as they listened to Pilate's tale.

	Ebon smiled, his ears twitching from where he leaned against the table of the mess hall.  His head tilted aside.  Glancing across the way, he saw Eagle Eye.  The ex mercenary stood several feet from the table's edge, looking lethargically at the gathered crowd.

	Biting his lip, Ebon stealthily snuck out of the group and shuffled his way towards the far end of the mess hall.  When he slid up to Eagle Eye's side, the unicorn didn't even flinch.

	"Uhm... is... erm..."

	"Hmm?"  Eagle Eye looked up as if from a dazed dream.

	Ebon smiled nervously.  "Is there something wrong with your drink?"

	"Huh?  No... it's... it's very tasty... I..."  Eagle winced.

	Ebon looked down.  The glass was full.

	Eagle Eye gulped.  "Guess I'm not very thirsty..."  He fidgeted.  "Or hungry..."

	"I see..."

	"It was still very nice of you to prepare it for the crew."

	"Heh..."  Ebon ran a hoof through his mane and shrugged.  "We got practically overloaded from the turtles' generosity in Abinadi."  He looked at the stallion, smiling warmly.  "It's gonna be really, really hard to feel guilty over gluttony for a while."

	"So, no more of you barking at us to fast?"

	"Hah!"  Ebon shook his head and giggled.  "No... noooo.  No more of that.  I'm... uh... I-I'm sorry for being so hard on everypony.  I know it's not cool to be abrasive."

	"You have a very important job here on the Jury.  Nopony envies it... but we all respect you for it."

	"That's... uh... that's good to know."

	"Yeah..."

	Silence.
	
	Ebon bit his lip.  His ears folded against his better judgment.  "Eagle... is..."  He looked at him with glossy eyes.  "...is something wrong?"

	Eagle blinked.  He turned towards him.  "Wrong?"  He shook his head.  "Nothing's wrong."

	"You sure you're f-feeling alright?"

	Eagle opened his mouth.  "I feel..."  His features tensed.

	Ebon stared at him.

	Eagle exhaled and formed a weak smile.  "I feel that the worst is behind us..."

	Ebon nodded.  "Because the best is right before us, right—?"  He gasped.

	Eagle Eye was hugging him dearly, nuzzling his neck down and over the back of Ebon's head.  "No," he said, rubbing his cheek softly through the stallion's mane.  "Because the best is right here."

	Ebon exhaled.  He smiled, and his eyes watered.  So he closed them, lifting his head up to nuzzle against Eagle's chin.  "I... I was sc-scared..."

	"What for?"

	"Because... I... I dunno... I guess just—"

	"Ebon, look at me."  Eagle leaned back and stared the pony face to face.  "There is nothing... nothing to be afraid of."

	Ebon squinted quizzocally.

	"You are right where you need to be," Eagle said.  He smiled gently.  "We... are right where we need to be."  A slight giggle.  "And I couldn't be happier."

	Ebon sniffled again and smiled.

	"Okay?"

	Ebon nodded and squeaked back, "Okay."

	Eagle smiled, and yet his tail drooped behind him as he glanced aside at the bulkheads.

	"You look exhausted."

	"Guess I can't help it."

	"Here..." Ebon took the glass from him and stepped back.  "I'll take this for you.  There's plenty more where it came from."  He motioned down the adjacent hallway with his head.  "Why don't you get some shuteye?  If Zaid tells another zinger, I'll be sure to tell you."

	"Won't that be something to wake up to?"

	"Heheheheh...."  Ebon chuckled.  He stepped back, smiling.  He smiled some more.  Then, finally, he turned around, taking his eyes off Eagle as he made for the rest of the group.

	Eagle Eye turned around.  He made two steps... three... and slowed to a crawl.  With a pained expression, he leaned against the doorframe to the hallway.  His lungs heaved as if having carried the weight of the Noble Jury on his shoulder.  Clenchings his eyes shut, he fought tears, then gazed forward into the dim shadows beyond the crew quarters.




	Eagle Eye sweated anxiously from where he stood in the Navigation Room.

	Elma Boreal's green eyes narrowed.  "You're dying to ask something, aren't you?"

	Eagle opened his mouth... lingered... and eventually blurted, "How did you know you were freed from Chrysalis the moment that it happened?"

	Elma blinked.  "That's not what you wanted to ask me."

	Eagle was already nodding.  "The question that really bothers me is something I'll have to figure out on my own."

	"Very well."  Elma trotted quietly towards him.  "You want to know how sure I am of my connection to Chrysalis?  I'll tell you."  She shuffled to a stop, locking eyes with the stallion.  "When I became my natural self... when the outer shell of Elma Boreal was—for the first time ever—completely shattered, I felt as though I was weak, naked, infantile..."

	"So..."  Eagle tilted his head aside.  "...you felt like a child?"

	"I knew that I was a foal.  Subconsciously, I was always a foal.  A broodling.  But much more than that.  In my creation, I had a purpose.  When I lost my disguise, I realized and that that purpose all along was never mine.  Instead... it was hers..."

	"Chrysalis'?"

	Elma gulped and finally said, "Mother's"

	Eagle's ears folded.

	"Her face... her eyes... her fangs... the c-color and smell of her mane..."  Elma stared painfully into the distance as she said this.  "I knew it all.  I felt it all."  She looked back at him.  "I had a mother... the Mother... and I was made to either honor her or fail her."

	Eagle stepped backwards, breathless.

	"I... I can't bring myself to hate her.  I think, in some ways, I've always loved her."  She gave a shuddering sigh.  "Even when I was 'Elma Boreal,' I knew her... I felt her.  Wherever I go in my life—in Alafreo or beyond—my Mother will always be with me..."  She blinked, then glanced awkwardly at him.  "Eagle?"

	He was shivering, on the verge of hyperventilating.

	"Eagle Eye?" she asked.

	The stallion raised his hoof and bit on the edge of it, finally calming his quivers.

        The changeling leaned back, her lips pursing.  "You... you've heard this somewhere before... haven't you?"

	With a jolt, Eagle Eye spun about.  He burst through the hatch of the Navigation Room, but came to a limping stop at the bottom of the vertical crawlspace outside.  With glazed and distant eyes, he stared at the floor.

	Elma trotted out after him.  "Eagle Eye..."  She placed a hoof on his shoulder.  "Is... is there anything I can do?"

	He slowly shook his head without looking at her.  "I'm... n-not the one who needs help."

	"I think I've been getting by quite nicely," she said with a nervous chuckle.

	Eagle's face grimaced.  "I... w-wasn't talking about you either," he said.







	"Please tell me the others are alright!" Eagle Eye shouted above the thunder and winds of Stratopolis.

	Zaid looked at him across the Noble Jury's cockpit.  "Thanks to you, a bunch of us are."

	"Define 'a bunch of us.'"

	"Kera's in one piece.  Floydien recovered just in time to paint the skies with shape-shifter intestines.  I'm still all around best background pony—"

	"Ebon..."  Eagle Eye gasped, his eyes growing wider.  The fresh droplets of rainwater shook off his body as he sputtered, "Where's Ebon?  Is he...?"

	Zaid blinked, then smiled.  He tugged at Eagle's wet forelimbs and switched places with him, taking the pilot's seat.  "Let me be the autopilot pony once again until Floydien's ready.  You go down into the engine room and check on yours turly, Romeoats."

	"Okay..."  Eagle Eye panted, shimmying swiftly down the crawlspace.  "Okay okay okay..."

	The stallion galloped straight past Floydien's stirring body.  He lept over Kera's limp form.  Breathless, he threw himself across the length of the navigation, swung open the hatch to the engine room... and froze.

	The ex-mercenary stood dead-still, panting and panting.  His pupils shrank upon a fixed point in the floor.  At last, the ship shook with a jolt of turbulence, rocking him out of his stupor.  Flinching, he spun to look behind him.  Floydien was just then getting up.  His eyes peered around the ship's interior from a compartment away.

	Slowly, Eagle Eye crept into the Engine room.  He closed the door behind him and rotated the hatch shut.  Then he leaned limply against it, clenching his teeth.  At last, he turned and looked at the floor again.  Swallowing hard, he slinked forward on trembling hooves, crawling across the way until his hoof made contact with a dark black limb with porous holes.

	Eagle Eye pulled the body towards him, cradeling is abnormally light-weight body against his chest.  His breaths came in frightful spurts, all the while he ran a hoof along the sleek carapace and folded dragonfly wings.  At last, he caressed the creature's muzzle, exposing two fangs that shimmered in the lavender light of the Jury's engine.

	Eagle stifled a cry, biting onto his own hoof.  His shivering tripled, and he gazed all around at every wall of the room.  He was hyperventilating so hard, he nearly passed out.

	Then the creature moved.

	"Nnnngh... mmmm... M-Mother..."

	Eagle clamped his mouth shut.  His ears twitched.

	"M... M-Mother..."  The creature whimpered, his gossamer eyelids fluttering along with his tender wings.  "I... I-I c-can't feel anything..."  He seethed, murmuring in Ebon Mane's voice.  "So... so alone..."

	Eagle Eye gnashed his teeth.  He leaned forward, burying his head in the shapeshifter's glossy webbed mane.  A silent sob wracked through his body... followed by a second.  Then, out of nowhere, his body relaxed.  Sniffling, he lifted his head and hugged the creature's body from behind.

	"Ebon..."

	"M-Mother..."

	"Ebon."

	The creature merely flinched, dim pulses of green light emanating from beneath his eyelids.

	"Ebon..."  Eagle Eye spoke into what he judged was the thing's ear.  "It's me.  It's Eagle Eye..."

	The ship shook again.  Bulkheads rattled against them.  The lavender light pulsed on and on.

	"You have to change back, Ebon," Eagle Eye said.  "Please... please.  Everything's going to be okay..."

	Another shake.  Hoofsteps pitter-pattered through the ship, coming closer.

	"Now, Ebon," Eagle Eye hissed, eyeing the door in abject terror.  "Somepony's coming.  They're all going to see you.  So you have to change back now."
	
	"Hey!  Hey!"  Zaid's muffled voice accompanied a salvo of hoof-knocks from the other side of the hatch.  "Eagle Eye!  Ebon!  Is everything cool in there?"

	Sniffing, Eagle Eye nuzzled his head against the thing's glossy black cheek.  "Please, Ebon.  I love you..."  He hugged his arms around the changeling tighter.  "I love you so much... but you have to come back now..."

	"Mmmmm..."  Ebon's lips slurred.  Two liquid streams ran down his face.  "Eagle... Eye...?"

	Eagle clenched his eyes shut, squeaking an indecipherable sound.  The room suddenly resonated with unfolding heat.  He shuddered, his teary eyes flashing open.

	He caught sight of the last few inches of the changeling's body turning to a fuzzy bergundy coat once more.  The limp figure of the ship's cook lay draped in his embrace.

	Eagle was too busy crying to register Zaid's words until the last second:  "Guys?  For real.  Are you both okay?  Can I have a look—or are you two being a pair of sticky stallions?"

	Eagle gulped hard and called out, "We're doing j-just fine, Zaid."  He clenched his teeth to fight back a monumental sob.

	At last, the hatch rotated and the door creaked open.  Zaid stuck his head in with a worried expression.

	Under flickering lavender light, Eagle Eye could be seen cradling Ebon Mane's limp body.  A pair of glossy violet eyes glanced over.

	"Everything's okay," Eagle Eye squeaked.

	Zaid blinked.  "You... uh... you s-sure of that?"

	Ebon stirred slightly, murmuring unintelligible words.  Eagle Eye immediately nuzzled him, planted a kiss on his forehead, and glanced over with a sniffling smile.  He slowly nodded.

	Zaid bit his lip, smiled awkwardly, and backstepped out of the engine room.

	As soon as he was gone, Eagle Eye exhaled through a grimacing expression.  He held Ebon tight, gently rocking the stallion's figure as he stared—worriedly—into the nearest bulkhead.





        That same expression hung off of Eagle's face as he limped down the dark corridor lined with crew quarters.  Behind him, inside the brightly-lit mess hall, the Jurists laughed and talked merrily around the table.

	With a heavy sigh, Eagle came to a stop.  He glanced to his left.  Quietly, he opened the door to Ebon's room and crept in.

	His eyes immediately fell upon the bed.  Squatting down, he reached under the mattress and pulled out a pile of written parchment.  He held them out at forelimb's length.  After several heavy breaths, he smiled.

	His body shook as he cried quietly.  Clenching his eyes shut, he tilted his head to the ceiling.

	And he smiled.

	"Do not worry," he stammered to the room.  Then, with a firmer breath:  "Fear not, Mother."  He reopened his glossy eyes, smiling painfully at the sheets of paper.  "I will take care of him for you."  His lungs heaved, and he rolled along the crest of a cleansing sob.  "I will m-make sure he never runs out of love."

	Then, hissing, both a threat and a promise:

	"I swear it."
		//------------------------------//
		// East, Beyond the Churning Line		//------------------------------//

	Night fell.

	The sun rose to a bright morning.

	A misty day blistered by.

	The sun set to a cool evening, and rose again hours later.

	Over the course of two days, the Noble Jury cruised over the remaining cluster of jagged spires that made up the bulk of northwestern Alafreo.  The slender mesas blended together, forming a craggy plateau that sloped upwards, evening out and collecting soil and sediment.  Soon, the landscape below had turned into a thick alpine forest, with expansive canopies covered in moisture and dewy frost.



	"I think we've just crossed the Churning Line," Rainbow Dash said as she trotted into the cockpit after touching down from a scouting flight.  "There's no more bluffs or watery ravines below.  Feels like we've reached the main contintental shelf."

	"Spit all you want, it's still a strange land," Floydien mumbled.  He zapped the consoles, accelerating the ship slightly now that Rainbow was on board.  "Did paint bucket see any new boomervilles?"

	Rainbow shook her head.  "Not in the last twelve hours.  We haven't passed a settlement since that mesa full of platforms about a hundred miles back.  I think the turtles choose to live where the water is."

	"Then who are we gonna find in all these fir firs?"

	"Beats me."  Rainbow smirked.  "But I wouldn't mind some close contact of the hoofed kind again."

	"Meh."

	"Come on, Floydien.  Wouldn't you be thrilled to see some other elks for once?"

	"Floydien has Nancy Jane and a basket of glimmer boomers.  It's all it needs to be."

	"Sure thing then."  Rainbow scurried over to the crawlspace.  While shimmying down the ladder, she paused, glanced up at the pilot, and smiled.  "Though, oddly enough, I remember a time when you only cared for Nancy."

	Floydien's ears twitched.  He clenched his jaw and said nothing.

	"Heh... fine.  Be that way."  She slid down.  "Zoop!"



	"How about now, beloved?"

	Pilate gritted his teeth, his metal brow furrowing as the runes across it flickered and flickered.  "I am... s-sensing shapes," he said, hissing slightly.  "It's fading in and out, as if in a faint dream."

	"I could increase the manaflow," Belle said from where she stood in the cramped infirmary next to him.  Using precise movements, she connected one of several wires between the O.A.S.I.S. sphere on his choker and the Ocular Array.  "But I'm concerned about overloading your synapses."

	"If you're somehow frightened about repeating the debacle that happened at Lerris, I wouldn't be too concerned.  That was out of your control."

	"What?!  No!"  Belle frowned.  "I simply do not wish to—"

	"Belle..."  Pilate smiled and raised a hoof to her shoulder.  "I'm used to the unpleasant side effects of this technology.  When Roarke first attached the Ocular Array to my skull, it was hardly a walk in the park.  What I'm simply attempting to convey is that a little bit of discomfort could go a long way in making this synchronization work."

	"I... I just don't want to hurt you, Pilate."

	"And I'm glad for that."  He nuzzled her hoof and smiled in her general direction.  "And I hope you realize that—like you—I too can be brave."

	She exhaled, smiling weakly.  "Right... right..."  Clearing her throat, she bundled three wires and attached them at once.  "Well, then, how about now?"

	"Gnkkk!"  Pilate winced, sweated slightly, and exhaled.  "Whew!  Blessed Spark!  I... I-I do believe it's working..."

	"It is?!"  Belle grinned wide.  "What do you see, Pilate?  Describe it!"

	"I see... I see..."  Pilate's gray eyes twitched as his choker flickered.  Suddenly, he blushed, his ears folding.  "Uhm... oh dear... h-how do I say this...?"

	"Huh?"  Belle blinked.  She looked over her shoulder and realized where the ocular array was pointing.  Her cheeks turned blood red.  Clearing her throat, the mare lowered her tail and side-stepped across the cramped room.  "Sorry.  There.  Better?"

	Pilate smirked mishievously.  "Depends on one's definition of 'better.'"

	"Pilate—"

	Outside in the main corridor, Kera scampered by.  "Mrmmmmf!"  She giggled into a pair of goggles dangling from her mouth.  "You'll never catch me!  Not in a million years!"

	"Give those back, you adorable little fuzz scamp!"  Props' voice cracked as she galloped after her.  "I can't fix Nancy's womb without them!"

	"You should have thought of that before you called me a 'cute bag of giggle kittens!"'

	"But th-that was a compliment!  Honest!  Ohhhhhh—Zaidy Waidy!  Help me!"

	"Operation filly tackle is a go!"  Zaid galloped after the other two.  "She's on the thirty... the forty... the fifty!"

	"Hey!"  Bellesmith barked, making to dash out into the corridor.  "Knock it off!  Kera, give those back this instan—"

	"Belle..."  Pilate rested a hoof on her shoulder.

	"But Pilate, they're both four times her size and—"

	"Let them be."

	"But—!"

	He smiled.  "It's okay.  She's okay."  He chuckled.  "We have to learn to let go..."

	Belle winced, grimaced, then sighed.  She slumped down to her haunches, hung her head, then turned to smile weakly at him.  "Will I ever stop being so overprotective?"

	"I doubt it.  It's in your blood."

	"Mmmf... don't I know it?"

	"I wouldn't love you any less."

	"Sometimes I wonder if I should attempt to restore your sight... for fear of exposing you to your own sap."

	"Heheheh..."



	Roarke's lenses took on a dark shade as she crouched beside her spherical transport inside the Jury's hangar.  She welded a loose plate back together, careful not to miss a single square inch of the hull.  The door to the chamber flew open.  The metal mare shut off her welding device and looked up.  With a flick of her fetlock, she removed the tint from her lenses to see clearly.

	"I mean it, scampsies!"  Props craned her head around crates and boxes, sweating.  "I can't see squat without those!"

	Kera stuck her tongue out from where she crouched behind a container.  "Then operate by fuzzspace!  You know you want to!"

	"Pleeeeeeease please please please give those back?"  Props smiled nervously.  "I'll let you juggle thermo-conductive-mana-filters."

	"Not until you say 'Kera strikes fear into the heart of all things that pretend to sleep!'"

	"Ewww!"  Props shivered.  "Why in the bubble-streaks would I ever say that?"

	"And that is why you fail."

	"Ah-HAAAA!"  Zaid swooped in and snatched Kera from behind.  "Sacked on the final yard line!"

	"Hey!  Let go!  You can't—"  Kera's green eyes bulged and she flew into a giggling fit.  "Gaaaugh!  No fair!  You're cheating!"

	Zaid smirked while tickling her.  "Give up the Blonde specs and the torment will be over!"

	"Stop it!  Cut it out!"  Kera writhed in hysterics.  "I'll make you explode from the inside!"  Her horn glowed.

	"Holy chapstick!" Zaid sputtered as the two of them suddenly hovered upside down.  "Blondie, help!  She's using ESP!  Especially Scary Ponytricks!"

	"I dunno how, Zaidstains!"  Props stifled a giggle.  "Unless Josho and Eagle Eye are stallions of the cloth—"

	Suddenly, with a metal pop, a grappling hook flew across the room, grasped the goggles in Kera's hooves, and yanked them out of her grip.

	"Hey!" Kera pouted.  Her horn immediately dimmed.

	"Ooof!"  Zaid wheezed, falling flank-first against the floor.  He let go of Kera who trotted away safely.  "Eughhh... who intercepted?"

	Roarke retracted a hook into a metal band around her fetlock.  She held the goggles out before Props.  Her lenses retracted as she droned, "I... simply presumed you needed these."

	Props smiled and took the item in question.  "Oh, totally-dotally.  But it's not like we were gonna crash and burn any second without 'em."  She giggled.

	Roarke cocked her head to the side.  "I see..."

	"This isn't over!"  Kera scampered out into the stairwell.  "The War of the Fuzzies has just begun!"

	"You'd better sign the peace treaty!" Props hollered back.  She giggle-snorted and shook her head.  "How can something with legs that tiny run so fast?"

	"I'm guessing she's tapped into the Sass Force," Zaid wheezed while standing up.  He smiled across the way.  "Hey Mickey.  How's Whizzball doing?  Squeaky in all the right places?"

	"I've considered furnishing the interior with your pelt."

	"Whoopsies!"  He trotted eagerly away.  "That's my cue to make like a tree and get lost in a Descoltian Conundrum!"

	"Heeheehee..."  Props winked at the metal mare.  "He'd never have gotten the goggles back to me if it wasn't for you."  She smiled warmly at her reflection in the thick lenses.  "Though... he's a real sweetheart for trying."

	"If you say so," Roarke said.  She turned towards the transport, but stopped, fidgeting.  "Erm... Props..."

	"Huh?"  The mare looked up, blinking her blue eyes.  "Did you just say my name?"

	Roarke nodded.  "If... perhaps you are needing any assistance in monitoring the skystone engine or... improving the steampipe array..."  She gulped and half-looked at the mare.  "I am certain I can lend you help in any areas that you would like."

	Props stared and stared at her.

	"Or, if you don't, then that is fine," Roarke muttered.  "But, as it stands, I too have thorough knowledge of engineering, and though it... mrmmm... m-may not compare to the excellence of yours, it would be a disservice to the ship and its crew if I did not offer what I have."

	Props slowly smiled.  "I think I would be really super-blessed to have your assistance, Roarke."  She shrugged.  "Or, y'know, if ever you just feel like chatting it up, girrrrrrl, then I'd be fine like wine!"

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "That would not be necessary."  She made to turn around again—but flinched.  "Erm... unless you or the other ponies... feel like you need it?"  She suddenly grimaced.

	Props was hugging her from behind.  "Heehee... it's okaaaaaay, Roarke.  But we'll let you know."

	Roarke shuddered, giving the mare's fetlock an ineffectual "pat."  She said, "Right... uhm... you do that.  I guess."

	"I will!  Heehee!"  And Props bounded away.  "Catch ya later, friendsies!"

	Roarke stood in place for a minute or two.  Then, with a calm breath, she knelt back down beside the transport and resumed welding.  The bright flame of the tool canceled out any reflection of her own expression in the spherical vehicle's hull.

	It gave her a chance to practice.
		//------------------------------//
		// Stop and Ask for Directions		//------------------------------//

	"Eagle, I can't thank you enough," Ebon said.  He trotted across the cramped kitchen with a bowl of sliced lettuce and rinsed it over a sink with a pitcher of water.  "This is cutting my work in half.  Seriously, it's such a relief!"

	"If you say so," Eagle Eye murmured, slicing carrots up on the counter with a telekinetically controlled knife.  "I really don't know why I didn't help sooner.  I feel awful..."

	Ebon giggled and patted the ex-mercenary's shoulder.  "No reason to.  This is always a job I've elected to do on my lonesome."

	"To be honest, I kinda expected something more... more..."

	"What, glamorous?" Ebon smirked.

	Eagle Eye shook his head.  "Difficult."

	"Oh."  Ebon blinked.

	"I mean, it just seems so simple."  Eagle dumped the slices into a bowl and levitated over another carrot to slice.  "All it takes is certain ingredients and a keen eye for blemishes."

	"Well, it's a lot more than that," Ebon said.  "There's the spicing and the blending and—in this case—adding just the right mixture of vegetables..."

	"I suppose it's the tedium that turns most ponies off."

	"Mmmm.  Maybe."  Ebon smiled.  "But I wouldn't wanna do anything else."

	"Why's that?"

	"Being a cook gets you a feel for what other ponies want."

	Eagle paused slightly, his ears twitching.  "A feel, you say..."

	"Mmmhmmm.  It's certainly how I stayed sane in Gray Smoke," Ebon said while rinsing.  "Even with perfect strangers, I got to know ponies in ways nobody else did."

	"You're a very resourceful stallion.  Has anypony told you that?"

	"Sure..." Ebon shrugged, then smiled bashfully.  "Though I don't think anyone's meant it until now."

	Eagle smirked.  "So, you feel like you've got a grasp on everypony on board the Jury, huh?"

	"Well, being in my position certainly helps."

	"So you know what to expect at all times?"

	"Yes.  No.  Maybe?"  Ebon shrugged—but as he did so, he felt a whole carrot being slid between his ear and his head.  "Gah!  What the—?"

	"Heehee.  Did you expect that??"

	"Eagle?  What are you doing?"

	"I dunno, but I think it looks good on you."  Eagle rubbed his muzzle, squinting at the strategically planted vegetable.  "Fantastic mane accessory."

	Ebon rolled his eyes.  "It is not."  He paused, fidgeted, and glanced nervously at his reflection in the back of a metal bowl.  "Is it?"

	"Mmmmmm... could use a little trimming."  Eagle leaned in, nibbling.

	"Eeep!  E-E-E-Eaggggle!" Ebon was stuck between gasping and giggling.

	"Oh.  I'm sorry," Eagle Eye droned, his smile growing.  "Did I get all ear instead?"

	"You're insane!"

	"Hmmmm..."  Eagle hugged Ebon's side, resting his cheek against the stallion's neck with a contented sigh.  "Guilty as charged..."

	"Heehee... come on.  For real.  Not here."

	"Oh?"

	"We'll g-get something in the salad."

	"Like what?"

	"Erm... uhhhh... uhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh..."



	"Alas, Rainbow Dash, what doth make that most horrifying sound?!"

	"I must admit that I share Luna's concern, Rainbow.  Are you encountering a ferocious dragon of some sort?"

	"Nah."  Rainbow shook her head with a smile from where she reclined on the bow of the Jury.  "That's just Josho, Your Highnesses."  She craned her neck to look.  "The dude's picked up the habit of napping on the top deck in broad daylight."

	"It soundeth terribly unhealthy," Luna's voice said from the glowing sword.

	"Yeah, well, that's Josho in a nutshell... albeit a cracked one."

	"In a way, we art quite relieved to hear that such is the worst of thy encounters as of late," Luna said.  "Thou hast encountered innumerable things of a dismaying quality.  It seemeth to us that thou hast earned this satisfying reprieve."

	"Heh... well, I won't argue with you there," Rainbow Dash said.  She hung her head upside down and stared at the fir trees and rolling hillsides below.  Tiny currents of frost bespeckled the treetops with a fine powder.  "It's been a good long time since things have been this chillaxed."  The pegasus gulped.  "I'm doing my darndest not to let my guard down, though."

	"A wise precaution."

	Celestia's voice spoke up.  "I invited you to the sarcophagus to assist in Rainbow's encouragement, not to fuel her paranoia, beloved sister."

	"Alas, Celestia, we desireth her prosperity with the same passion as thou.  We simply wisheth to keep a rational head upon our shoulders.  It carrieth on no differently in our monthly conversations by moonlight."

	"Yes, but surely you know that she's been through many a great ordeal!  If fate has warranted her relaxation, then who are we to confound that?"

	"Rainbow Dash is more than capable of dealing with any emotion—both tranquil and turbulent.  We feareth that thou underestimateth her, Celestia."

	"Underestimate her?!  Why—"

	"Princesses... Princesses!"  Rainbow Dash sat up, smirking.  "Please, there's plenty of me to go around."  A voice-cracking chuckle.  "Don't start a civil war on my behalf!"

	"A civil war?  Please, Rainbow, do not insinuate such a horrid thing."

	"Thou musn't worry, Rainbow Dash.  We certainly receiveth the jest of thy jocularity."

	"Unnnngh... Luna..."

	"Heeheehee... For real, Your Highnesses, just chillax," Rainbow said.  "Things are crazy cool right now.  My friends are safe.  We've got clear skies ahead.  There's even a rough map that we've thrown together for how we'll arrive in Val Roa."

	"We presumeth thou has considered all potential hazards along the way?"

	"No offense, Luna, but we're what you would call 'professionals,'" Rainbow Dash said.  "If we took on a floating city full of zombified pegasi and lived, then I'm certain a mysterious crater won't do us in."

	"We admitteth that we were quite vexed when our sister Celestia related such a remarkable story to us.  It's alarming to think that Commander Hurricane suffered such a tragic fate."

	"Well, just like I told Celestia, I really don't think all of those possessed ponies were proto-Equestrians.  I wouldn't doubt it if I got muzzle-to-muzzle with what was left of... y'know... the ones responsible for splitting Urohringr apart to begin with."

	"Thou meaneth the winged ponies depicted in the ancient murals and stained glass?"

	"Or, y'know, the ones whom the Herald called 'Angels,'" Rainbow muttered with a sigh.  "More like demons."  She hung her head upside down again.  "Whatever turned them freaky did a real number on their brains.  What I wouldn't give to have had at least one zombie capable of chatting with me."  She gulped.  "Explaining the origin of that horribad slime... or that giant freaky plant they were all experimenting with... or what they thought they could do with the Sentinel in the first place..."

	Celestia spoke up:  "The Sentinel was far from one of a kind, correct?"

	"Er... right..."  Rainbow Dash scanned the upside-down horizon.  "From the shape of the Urohringr symbol we all saw, there were once tons of them.  At least two for every ring..."

	"Then doth that mean that there remaineth another one in close orbit of this plane?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "I dunno, Luna.  I sure hope not.  If only..."  Her eyes suddenly squinted.

	"If only what, Rainbow?"

	"Hold the Sword, your Highnesses."  Rainbow Dash hopped up to her hooves and slid the blade into a makeshift scabbard along her saddlebags.  "I think I see a village of some sort."  She kept her eyes trained on a series of wooden buildings nestled in the crook of a mountain ridge due east.  She tapped on the cockpit windshield beneath her.  "Hey!  Floydien!  Slow us down!  I got something that needs checking out!"



	"Heh.  You've met with turtles, alright!"  A mountain ram smirked.  He squatted on a stool along the front porch of a sawmill and resumed hammering together planks of wood.  "I can smell their good-nature on your coat.  Swell bunch of neighbors, them Alafreons.  Kind of give me the creeps, personally."

	"I guess that could be forgiven," Rainbow Dash said.  Behind her, the Lounge sphere had landed and Roarke, Bellesmith, and Pilate stood in a leafy clearing between fir trees and wooden cabins.  Ponies, rams, and deer wandered from storefront to storefront, some of them peering up at the hovering sight of the Noble Jury.  "Do you do much trade with the turtles?"

	"Well, obviously, those dudes are super generous," the ram said as he moved onto another plank.  "That's a good thing for wandering travelers like yourself, but for us locals?"  He shrugged.  "Meh.  Altruism doesn't exactly make for a competitive market."  He hammered and hammered.  "We prefer exchanging goods along the Green Curve."

	"Green Curve?"

	"Yeah.  Wow.  You really are out-of-towners, aren't ya?"  He glanced up past his horns.  "It's what we mountain folk call the trade route that follow along the southern end of the Skystabs.  It heads south from here to the Fir Nests, then bends east into Crater Fall and Boulder City."

	"What about the crater itself?"  Pilate asked.  "Do you ever do trade from within?"

	"Ha!"  The ram dropped his hammer and hugged himself, nearly falling off the stool.  "Ha ha ha ha ha!"

	Belle fidgeted.  Roarke's brow furrowed.

	The ram wiped his eyes dry with a cloven hoof before smirking at the Jurists.  "Whew!  Sorry, but that was just too rich."  He cleared his throat.  "You've been through the Flurries, haven't you?  Tell me, what's the sense in doing trade in the skystone fields?"

	"Er... none whatsoever," Belle said with a nervous smile.

	"Especially after what just crashed into the fields," Roarke droned.

	"Shhhh!"  Rainbow hissed, then turned back to the ram.  "Is there seriously nothing inside the crater?"

	"Oh, there's something inside, alright," the ram said.

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow.  "Oh?"

	"But whatever it is, it couldn't be assed to come out and open a trade route with us," he remarked.  "And it's not like we have enough skystone to scale the Sky Stabs and find out for ourselves."  He gestured towards the vessel overhead.  "That's a sweet ship.  It'd be a shame to wreck it over something so mysterious."

	"We're quite versatile, good sir," Pilate said with a smile.  "After what we've been through, I doubt we'll let anything overcome us so easily."

	"Besides," Belle added with a nod, "The fastest way to Val Roa is to scale the crater."

	"Val Roa?  Pffft... just use the Green Curve, my friends," the ram said, picking up another plank.  "You'll thank me in the end, so will your future children."  He hammered away.  "Hell, you might run into some fine trade along the way."

	"Is there really something worth fearing from within the crater?" Roarke asked.  "Or is your advice simply rooted in fear of the unknown?"

	Rainbow quietly glanced at Roarke, then back at the ram.

	The ram took a breath, placed his tools down, and stood up.  He turned around and faced the group directly.  "Every day, without fail, something beams out of the land within the Sky Stabs."

	Pilate cocked his head to the side.  "'Beams?'"

	"You can only see it on a clear day, which—admittedly—doesn't come often this high up the western slopes."  The ram's eyes narrowed.  "But that doesn't change the fact that the lights are still there... and they pierce the skies at least three times a day."

	"How do you mean?" Belle asked.

	"Just as it sounds like, ma'am."  He flicked his ears and said, "It's like a beacon... about as bright as the sun itself.  None of us know what causes the lights.  And, quite frankly, none of us want to.  The last expedition that tried scaling the Sky Stabs didn't even make it up the peaks before freezing to death.  So, if you wanna try it with your fancy skystone, be our guest.  Don't say you weren't warned."

	"We... uh... we appreciate you being so upfront with us," Rainbow Dash said before cracking a nervous smile.  "For real."

	"I believe you," the ram said.  He smirked bitterly.  "But if you really mean that, then you'll take my advice and follow the Green Curve.  I dunno what your business is in Val Roa, but surely it can wait."

	"Unfortunately, it cannot," Belle said.

	He shrugged.  "Suit yourself."  He turned and sat on the stool again.  "Still, I gotta admit, you've got my curiosity piqued.  Any chance you happen to come back this way again, perhaps you can drop in and tell me what you saw beyond the Stabs."

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow Dash chuckled.  "We're all pretty much 'east or bust.'  This is kinda/sorta a one way trip."

	"Hah!  Haha..."  The ram laughed again.  He smiled back at them.  "Hell, I coulda told y'all that!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Please, I'm Just Joshin' Ya		//------------------------------//

	"Grnnnn-brbrbrbrbrbrrrrr..."  Josho seethed through clenched teeth.  Vapors wafted out of his muzzle as he paced back and forth across the top deck.  All the while, the Jury swiftly ascended at a sharp incline to clear the Sky Stabs passing gradually beneath it.  "I swear, if I have to go for another full week of these Spark-forsaken temperatures, I'm gonna piss out pine cones!"  The stallion paused every now and then to shrug his shoulders in his leathery coat and clap his hooves together.  "Why couldn't the turtles be assed to strap big burning brazers to this part of the continent, huh?"

	"If you don't like it, then why not take your complaints downstairs?" Rainbow Dash muttered from where she stood along the ship's bow.  "It's a lot warmer there, courtesy of Props' steam pipes."

	"Ugh.  You been down below lately?"  Josho frowned with chattering teeth.  "It's loud as all get-out!  You can't swing a dead cat without running into a laughing youngster or a frolicking fruit basket!"

	"It's called happiness," Rainbow Dash said with a smirk.  "I'm sorry that you can't get used to it."

	"I can get used to things fine," Josho grumbled, plopping against the railing right beside Rainbow Dash.  He rubbed his muzzle—made rosy by the cold—and squinted at the rock formations passing underneath them.  "Ehhh... who am I kidding?  Old soldier's gonna old."

	"If you ask me, I'd say you were adjusting perfectly fine."

	"So you're the expert on Ledomaritan veteran psychology, eh?"

	"Pffft.  Better than you are."

	"True.  True."  Josho nodded towards the cockpit.  Even Floydien refused to open the door more than a crack.  Delicious steam wafted out through the slit in the elk's compartment.  "I can't help but feel like we should be preparing for something."

	"It's only natural, I guess."

	"What'd they say exactly at that town back down there?"  Josho's brow furrowed as he stared at Rainbow.  "That ponies see beams of light shooting up out of the crater?"

	"Something like that."

	"And it doesn't freak you out at all that we may very well be floating into the mother of all traps?"

	"I think the ponies who live in the shadow of the Sky Stabs have gotten comfortable with their superstition," Rainbow Dash said.  "I mean, this place doesn't exactly strike me as a war-torn continent.  I suppose the residents here have to choose something to be anxious over."

	"My, if you aren't a confident spitfire."

	Rainbow twitched upon hearing that word.  "Hah!"  Rainbow clenched her eyes shut and giggled helplessly.

	Josho raised his eyebrow.  "What?"

	Rainbow cleared her throat and waved a hoof.  "Eh... it's nothing.  Just..."  She sighed.  "Ancient history.  Really... really... ancient stuff."

	Josho concentrated, sent a glow through his horn, and used it to warm the immediate area.

	"Mmmm..."  Rainbow shamelessly drifted over and hovered close to him.  "Thanks..."

	"Don't mention it," Josho muttered, rubbing his forelimbs together in the coat's sleeves.  "Figured while I'm here..."

	"Being sober has done loads of good for ya, Josho."

	"Mmmf.  Now you're starting to sound like that little lavender bed stain I'm saddled with."

	Rainbow smirked.  "Don't tell me you're not proud of Eagle Eye."

	"'Proud' may not be the word for it," Josho said, staring at the deck beyond his own hooves.  "'Content' is more appropriate, I guess."

	"Seems like the dude's more than content," Rainbow said.  "Looks to me like very day is his best day ever now."

	"Yeah.  A little burgundy goes a long way."

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow.  "You don't approve?"

	"Pffft!  I ain't his dad!"

	"Aren't you?"

	Josho clammed up.

	"Y'know, I barely knew my parents," Rainbow Dash said.  Her eyes took on a brief, bitter twinge.  "And as for my dad, I wish I knew him even less."  Clearing her throat, she nevertheless continued.  "I used to tell myself that the day would come that I'd get everything squared away in my life."  She gestured with her hoof while speaking.  "A career with the Wonderbolts... a bunch of kickflank trophies... a big house... a fortune to live off of..."

	"A wife," Josho droned.

	Rainbow blinked savagely at him.  "...is it that obvious?"

	"Do pigeons shit earthward?"

	"Heh... touche."

	"Please, do go on."

	Rainbow did.  "And I told myself that once I had everything together, I'd go back home and make everything square with my relatives, old acquaintances, the school teachers whose lives I made a living nightmare.  All that sort of fluff."

	"What happened?"

	"Jee..."  Rainbow smirked bitterly, adjusting the pendant around her neck.  "What do you think?"

	"Hmmm..."

	"Long story short, I've had no choice but to accept my life for what it is... or—more realistically—what it isn't."  She gulped.  "Words such as 'orphan' and 'outcast' and 'homeless' don't really have that much of a punch to my heart.  Because it's not like it can be helped, y'know?  At least not in my case.  So, I might as well make the best of it all, and seize the things around me that I really, really love."  She smiled at the stallion.  "The Noble Jury is my family.  This ship of Floydien's is pretty much my home.  And—"

	"You getting to a point somewhere or do I gotta shove you towards the finishing line?" Josho muttered.

	"Yeah, there's a point."  Rainbow nodded, staring at him.  "The point is that Eagle Eye's kind of in the same boat as me, but thanks to you, he's not sinking.  And it's funny, cuz I envy him."

	"You what-now?"  Josho glanced over.

	Rainbow gulped.  Her voice wavered, "I would kill to have a dad like you."  A few seconds passed, and she smiled calmly beneath a pair of glossy eyes.  "Anypony would, really.  Just..." She gulped.  "Pure inspiration, ya feel me?"

	Josho's nostrils flared.  He glanced off the starboard side.  "I don't take much stock in feeling."

	"At least you admit you can," Rainbow said.  "I think that's the real reason Eagle's happy these days."

	"Mrmmmf... maybe..."

	Silence.

	"You can head on down, now," Rainbow said, ruffling her wingfeathers.  "I'm out here to keep watch, is all."

	"Eh..."  Josho shrugged.  "I'll stick around with ya."

	Rainbow smirked at his glowing horn.  "I was born in Cloudsdale.  I can deal with the temperature."

	"Who said anything about the temperature?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth... but paused.  With a blink, she smiled.

	Both ponies stared out at the passing mountainside.

	"... ... ...so what do you think is really waiting for us in that crater?" Josho grumbled.

	"Eh... some ancient horror that'll probably wanna fry us all to a crisp."

	"Great.  Wonder what Sailboat's cooking tonight."

	"I dunno.  Something crunchy, I hope."

	"Oh, girl, I'd castrate myself for 'crunchy.'"

	"Heeheehee..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Dizzy Spells and Roarke Shells		//------------------------------//

	"Alright... how about now?"

	"A screwdriver," Pilate said.

	Belle nodded, then glanced down at Kera.

	Kera floated the screwdriver behind her back, licked at her lips, and levitated an empty mug in its place.

	Belle turned to her mate.  "And now?"

	Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  Meanwhile, the O.A.S.I.S. sphere—dangling from his choker—fired a manabeam into the ocular array over his eyes.  A swath of amber and red energy flickered across Kera and the object floating in front of her.

	After two and a half seconds, Pilate's ears twitched and the zebra said, "A cup."

	"Very nice."  Belle smiled down at the filly.  "Kera, darling, pick something of your choice.  Be random."

	"Really?"

	"Hmmm.  Yes, really."

	Kera clenched one eye shut, her horn glowing brightly.  Soon, something slipped out from deep within the roots of her mane.  She waved it in the air between her and Pilate.  "Ta daaaa!  What am I holding up now?"

	"Eungh..."  Belle face-hoofed.  "Kera..."

	Pilate smirked, trying not to chuckle.  "I do believe that is a grasshopper leg."

	"Did you really use the O.A. to determine that?"

	"Yes and no, but that's the beauty of how I 'visualize' things," Pilate said.

	"Well, all and all, this is looking very good!"  Belle said with a grin.  "So far, you've been observing things with about eighty percent accuracy!"

	"I still didn't know how I couldn't recognize the third item," he said.

	"That's because Kera was holding the horseshoe the wrong way."

	"Hey!"  Kera pouted.

	Belle giggled.  "I'm only teasing, dear."  She reached down and straightened the filly's mane.  "You've been very helpful."

	"Eh."  She shrugged.  "It beats hiding in Ebon's cupboard and pretending to be a spatula."

	"Marvelous work, beloved," Pilate said as he reached up to remove the Ocular Array.  "It's not even giving me a headache anymore."

	"One moment, bree—erm... zebra," Roarke said, suddenly walking across the lounge side of the mess hall.  She stood between Kera and Belle, looking over at the older mare.  "Erm... if you don't mind."

	Belle blinked... then blinked again.  "N-not at all!" she remarked with a nervous smile.

	Roarke turned towards the stallion.  "Is it still switched on?"

	"Indeed it is, Roarke."

	"Good.  Now look at me."  She flicked her fetlock forward.

	Belle flinched, but maintained her composure.

	A tube sprung out from the metal framework encasing Roarke's limb.  With a low hum, it flashed a bright red light straight at the Ocular Array.

	"Now, Pilate, what am I holding in my hoof?"

	"I... I..."  The zebra fidgeted, his muzzle tightening.  "I-I can't make it out.  Everything's gone red.  Like wool's been pulled over my eyes."

	"Then you don't see what's in my hoof?"

	"She's lying!" Kera raspberried.  "She doesn't have anything in her hoof."

	"Kera..."

	"Indeed, it was a trick question," Roarke said, retracting the pointer and lowering her leg.  "What do you see now, Pilate?"

	The zebra exhaled with relief and smiled.  "Two fine warriors."

	Kera giggled as Roarke turned towards Belle.  "You're making good progress in upgrading the array," the metal mare said.  "However, you should take into account its vulnerability to light and mana feedback.  This can make the difference between your mate accurately seeing the environment around him and being crushed to a bleeding pulp."

	Pilate cleared his throat.

	Roarke fidgeted.  "But... truly... truly..."  She nodded her head towards Belle.  "A good job."

	"Uhm... uh..."  Belle glanced at Pilate, then back at the Searonese pony.  "Th-thank you, Roarke!  That's... uhm..."

	"A very kind piece of advice," Pilate said, smiling.

	"Yes!  Very kind."  Belle exhaled calmly.  "Really, Roarke.  I can't thank you enough for providing us with the Ocular Array in the first place."

	"It was necessary for overthrowing the Lounge and assuring the continual safety of continental airspace from the flying undead."  Roarke's lenses retracted slightly.  "And... my pl-pleasure, of c-course."

	"Of course."

	"Have you..."  Roarke lingered.  "...most of you seen where Rainbow Dash was last?"

	"Up on top!" Kera said, pointing at the ceiling.  "Doing her scout-scout thing, I bet."

	"At this time of night?  I imagine it's even colder, as high up as we are."

	"You know very well that we can't stop her, Roarke."

	"Hmmm.  Indeed."  Roarke trotted towards the kitchen and the stairwell beyond.  "Carry on, my little ponies."

	Belle turned to watch her leave.  "Beloved?"

	"Yes, Belle?"

	"Is it odd that I'm more scared of her when she tries to be friendly?"

	"Heheheh... I find it charming."

	"You've always seen the best in ponies... even when you couldn't see."

	"Hey Belle!"  Kera hopped.  "When you're done with Pilate, could you guys build me a cool Searonese implant so I can roast grasshoppers alive?"

	"Not on your life!"

	"Awwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwww.  Poop smears."





	Roarke stepped out of the stairwell and onto the top deck of the Jury, a slightly difficult job considering the vessel's twenty-five degree incline while ascending.

	Her lenses pistoned in and out as she scanned the snow-sprinkled surface between the skystone and the hull.

	"Rainbow...?"

	Silence.

	"Rainbow Dash...?"

	More silence.

	"Hrmmm..."  Roarke scowled.  "It's not exactly fortuitous for a late-night reconaissance flight.  Perhaps she has a sound stone on her—"  She froze.

	A limp body lay over the starboard railing.  Wings twitched and a prismatic tail flicked.

	"Rainbow!"  Roarke rocketed forward on metal-laced hooves.  She scooped Rainbow off the ship's edge.  As soon as she made contact, she became aware of how heavily the pegasus was convulsing.  "Rainbow, what's happened?"

	"Gnnngh..."  The mare winced, her fluttering eyelashes sprinkled with snowflakes.  Despite her shivers and spastic jerks, she managed the faintest smile.  "You... d-don't... you sure d-don't c-call my n-name out much... h-heh heh... you know th-that...?"

	"Damn it!"  Roarke hissed, dragging the mare with her towards the stairwell.  Once sheltered from the snowfall, she sat Rainbow up against the wall and rubbed her limbs.  "You've spent far too much time out there in the cold!  As the leader of this crew, you should know better than to put yourself at such unnecessary risk—!"

	"It's... it's n-not the cold..."  Rainbow hissed, clenching her teeth.  "It's... it's just... the usual..."

	Roarke stood still.  Her brow furrowed above her lenses.  "I... I had no idea that they could get this bad..."

	"Lately, they h-haven't..."  Rainbow gulped.  "But ever since we cleared Stratopolis, they've been h-happening more regularly."  She panted and curled her limbs up to her chest.  "Guh... mmnngh... I-I can usually feel a dizzy spell coming.  Try t-to get to the hammock in time..."

	"Very well."  Roarke proceeded to lift Rainbow up.  "I shall carry you there—"

	"No, not now!"  Rainbow seethed, clinging to the wall.  "Spinning.  Sp-spinning to friggin' much.  Just... just g-gotta be still."  She gulped.  "Let it p-pass..."

	"And what if it doesn't... 'pass'?"

	"Then every Jurist will have a bigger helping of Ebon's carrots."

	"That is hardly amusing."

	"Heheh..."  Rainbow managed a tearful smile.  "Stuntmare first... comedian... nnngh... ninety-ninth..."

	Roarke fidgeted, glancing at the walls.  "Rainbow, I... I do not know what to do to assist you..."

	"You and me b-both, sister," Rainbow wheezed.  "Just... g-gotta stay still... from... the sp-spinning..."

	Roarke was silent.  Ultimately, she slumped down against the wall besides Rainbow Dash.  She lifted her hoof up—hesitated... and eventually rested it on Rainbow's far shoulder, pulling her in close, anchoring her.

	"How is that?"  Roarke asked.  "Does it help?"

	Rainbow shivered and shook.  "Does wh-what help?"

	Roarke glanced at her hoof holding Rainbow close, then back at Rainbow herself.  "Never mind.  Just... attempt relaxation."

	"Are we inside?"

	"Not exactly.  It's the stairwell, sternside.  I offered to carry you to the observation room, but—"

	"Y'know, the crew's b-been warming up to you as of late."

	Roarke's mouth lingered open.  She cocked her head aside.  "How do you mean?"

	"Exactly what it s-sounds like," Rainbow smiled in spite of her shivers.  "Seems like you're threatening them with d-death less and helping around the k-kitchen more."

	"As an integral member of this crew, I find it necessary to be helpful in any way possible."

	"That's n-never stopped you from b-being a total stick in the mud before."

	"Hrmmmm..."  Roarke frowned, staring off.

	"Heh..."  Rainbow hissed through her teeth, curling her dizzy head inadvertently against the mare's shoulder.  "Is it so tough to admit th-that maybe you're st-starting to like this motley crew of sky farters?"

	"We have a task to do in Val Roa.  It is a very important loose thread that needs to be pursued.  It would be counter-productive if I was to act abrasive during this leg of our journey."

	"Funny you should call it that."

	"Call it what?"

	"A 'leg,'" Rainbow said.  She was starting to shiver less.  "Because I would almost put it as a 'last leg.'"

	Roarke jolted.

	Rainbow felt it through her trembles.  "Does that bother you?"

	"Does it bother you?"

	"I've been flying into death for... for... well... maybe going on for a whole friggin' year now."

	"Perhaps Pilate would be the appropriate timekeeper to make that esti—"

	"Doesn't m-matter.  Look, the point is..."  Gathering her nerves, Rainbow Dash sat up against the wall beside Roarke, sighing.  "Things are pretty bad right now."

	"It was my understanding that we had reached an unprecedented moment of tranquility in our journey."

	"For me specifically, I mean," Rainbow Dash said.  "I've felt this bad before... but they were always... like... r-right before I found a way into the machine level."

	"You speak of the ruby flame?"

	"Yeah.  Pretty much."

	"You believe that has a direct relation to your predicament?"

	Rainbow giggled.  "You even hearing yourself right now?"  She smirked, shivering less and less.  "That friggin' lavender tome nearly crippled me!  Why, if it wasn't for that Odrsjot hooflet thingy that Zaid and the Herald used—"

	"I know that," Roarke said, growling slightly.  "What I mean to inquire is whether or not you think that contact with an underworld flame has anything to do with you recovering from your ailment?"

	"I'm half chaos monster, Roarke," Rainbow Dash said.  "It's not really an ailment.  It's... like... my future.  And if you know anything about how my culture feels about chaos..."  Her words trailed off.

	Roarke took a deep breath.  "You don't strike me as an avid supporter of suicide."

	"Who said anything about something lame as that?"

	"Is it no less analogous?"  Roarke's lenses rotated as she turned to look at her.  "Everything about your trip has been self-destructive... or at least destructive."

	"Heh... I wasn't born yesterday, y'know," Rainbow smirked bitterly.  "I've flown circles over ideas like this more than I've scaled the world's surface.  Silvadel... Aridstone... Ledomare... Lerris..."  She gulped.  "Seems like a lot of bad stuff follows me wherever I go.  Almost makes my trip seem like a bad thing in and of itself."

	Roarke let loose a woeful sigh.  Her ears flicked above her braided mane.  "However..."

	"However... would you call Elma destroyed?  Would you call the freed changelings destroyed?"  Rainbow Dash's teeth chattered one last time as her body began to relax.  "Or Luxmare?  Or the survivors on board the Tarkington?  Or Belle and Pilate?"  She blinked, then tilted her head over.  "Or you?"

	Roarke clenched her teeth.

	Rainbow smiled.  "The way I see it, if I just gave up and rolled over like a cockroach back in Equestria, a lot of good stuff east of my kingdom wouldn't have happened.  Duke Zaap Nator would still be murdering foals.  Axan would have massacred the remaining Silvadelians before abandoning the other Divines forever.  Hell, your friggin' mentor, Lady Pissedoffagus, would still be running the show in Searo's Hold and—"

	"I get the picture," Roarke droned.  She glanced over.  "But does all of that necessitate the awful things that have happened."

	Rainbow was silent for a while.  Her wings coiled tightly as she said, "There was something Twilight taught me once... that eons ago—before the Alicorns could straighten up Equestria well enough that a harmonic nation would be formed—the land was full of angry, bickering, violent ponies.  And, even after the Elements of Harmony were established, a lot of nasty crud went down—even within the boundaries of my homeland."  Rainbow took a deep breath.  "For millennia, Luna and Celestia have only been able to maintain harmony in one tiny spot in the center of this... bigass floating plane.  Never before has there been a feasible opportunity to send a representative of harmony outward in any direction."

	"Do you qualify as this?"

	"Heh... if I do... it's kind of bitterly ironic," Rainbow said.  "Though, I'd like to think, if there was any Element Bearer capable of stomaching the reality of what it takes to make Harmony 'work' this far from home?"  She shrugged.  "It was me."

	"Then, perhaps, it was a good thing that you survived the chaos-bearer."

	"Yeah, I guess.  Cuz—hell—if Fluttershy was the one of us who made it, I couldn't friggin' see her making it past Windthrow."  Rainbow chuckled maniacally.  "Or even Luna-forsaken Dream Valley.  Goddess!"  She giggled and giggled again.

	"I..."  Roarke fidgeted.  "...will pretend to understand the humorous implications of that."

	"Eh... it's sad, really.  But I don't know what to do with sad these days other than laugh at it."  She gulped.  "My whole journey—before and after meeting Belle and Pilate—has always been about letting these underworld beacons guide me.  It seems like—with each flame I come across—both good and bad things happen, but it's all for the best... y'know?"  She exhaled.  "Like... Harmony had a plan... long before even the alicorns knew what to do with this world."

	"And if you fail to grasp or perform this supposed 'plan?'" Raorke asked.  "What then?  From what I understood from your talk of Axan, this world isn't exactly prospering.  In fact, it is dying."

	"Yeah.  Bummer, huh?"

	"And if Austraeoh should perish before the journey's end?"

	Rainbow shrugged.  "Eh... somepony else will probably pick up the torch.  I mean, that's what happened after Hurricane, right?"

	"That's still a subject of debate."

	"Not from where I'm looking at it."

	"If you insist."

	"I do."

	Silence.

	"I take it... erhm..."  Roarke gazed at Rainbow.  "You are feeling better now?"

	"Yeah, sure..."  Rainbow nodded.  "Good enough to feel your hoof around my shoulder this whole time."

	Roarke jerked so that she sat perfectly on her haunches.  "I am... unaware of that which you are referring to."

	"Uh huh.  If you say so."

	Roarke fumed, staring down the steps of the stairwell.

	Rainbow chuckled... then giggled... then fell over in convulsing laughter.

	Roarked groaned, covering her face with a hoof while the pegasus beside her writhed on the floor.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Rainbow and Roarke Show		//------------------------------//

	"Did I ever tell you about the one time I kicked a dragon in the face?"

	"Do you refer to Nevlamas?  Because I do believe I was somewhat of a witness to that."

	"No no no.  Before that.  Waaaaaaay before that."

	"Axan?"

	"Nope.  Even earlier."

	"You're playing on my ignorance, then."

	"Well, I did.  I totally did.  This was back when my friends were alive.  This big ol' dragon was hibernating in the mountains southwest of Ponyville.  Its snoring breath blotted the sun out with nasty smoke.  If things remained the way that they were, then most of central Equestria was gonna experience a super long winter."

	"Sounds like a mild crisis if I ever heard one."

	"Yes, well, it was pretty big business for us in Ponyville.  Turns out Princess Celestia was right on top of it, and she ordered her apprentice—my friend Twilight—to strike a peace agreement with the dragon."

	"How so?"

	"She was gonna politely ask the thing to move and resume its sleeping elsewhere.  That way, everypony could be happy."

	"Certainly sounds easier said than done."

	"Right.  So Twilight enlisted the help of me and the rest of her friends.  We had just barely gotten to know each other at that point in our lives, and I think a lot of us were still rubbing off of one another the wrong way—like new friends are bound to do, y'know?"

	"I take your word for it."

	"Anyways, now that I look back at it, the whole quest was more a test for all of us than just for Twilight.  Could Celestia or Luna have talked with the dragon themselves?  Pfffft.  Totally.  But this was an opportunity for the Elements of Harmony to work together on the first super-serious thing since Nightmare Moon tried to cover Equestria in eternal night."

	"I was promised dragon kicking..."

	"I'm g-getting to that!  Yeesh... So where was I?  Oh, right, so we march up the mountain—"

	"On hoof?"

	"Er... yeah."

	"Sounds rather counter-productive."

	"Not all of us were pegasi, y'know."

	"My mistake..."

	"What, you assumed I only hung out with winged ponies in Equestria?"

	"Seems strange that you would let yourself be bogged down otherwise."

	"Er... uh... huh..."

	"...so you ascended the mountain?"

	"Right.  And we met with the dragon.  He... wasn't very cooperative, to put it lightly.  Twilight and the others were patient, but I had just about all I could take of this huge scaled freakjob.  An entire afternoon of hiking had gone by.  All the ponies I knew and cared for were in danger 'cuz of his foul breath.  On top of all that, I hadn't had a bite to eat in over a dozen hours."

	"I'm guessing you pulled a 'you.'"

	"Wham!  Right in his friggin' snout!"

	"And you lived to tell about it."

	"Heh.  Barely.  He let loose a dragon roar straight in my face.  I was thrown out of his mountain cave, and then my body barreled through my gal pals.  Then the dragon came out, all stomping and snarling and spouting fire..."

	"I thought it was some terrible chaos lord who ended your companions' lives."

	"Oh, that's another story... one that I'm... erm... not b-big on retelling..."

	"I see..."

	"Anywho, we all trembled, expecting this dragon creep to gobble us all whole.  I remember all of us hugging each other, shivering like filly scouts during a thunderstorm.  Heh... I really didn't like cuddling back in those days..."

	"And you're somehow different now?"

	"Anyways, the most anticlimactic thing happened.  Fluttershy—dainty wuss extraordinaire—trotted up and stared the big scaley dude down.  Out of nowhere, she shows this... well... awesome display of guts, and she single hoofedly convinced the dragon not only to leave us alone, but to fly off to another part of the landscape.  Wherever he ended up going, his smoke wouldn't bother Equestria anymore."

	"Somehow, that wasn't quite what I expected."

	"What?  You wanted a story with more explosions?"

	"In truth, I expected a heavy helping of blood."

	"Yeah, well, that wasn't like me... at least n-not at that time."

	"What changed?"

	"For real?"

	"Mmm-hmmm..."

	"... ... ... I guess when my friends all passed away, it's like whatever was holding me back suddenly vanished.  If you've no longer got ponies to be loyal to, then why bother being loyal to your morals?"

	"Is it really that simple?"

	"Pffft.  Of course not.  But it's helped me reason things out in my head when I feel like absolute trash... which... wh-which is a lot more often than I'd like to admit.  Meh..."

	"What brought upon this sudden nostalgia?"

	"I dunno.  Everything.  Nothing.  Feh... I guess it's just this shivering time bomb of an affliction I'm having to deal with."

	"I see..."

	"I'd say it was karma.  But... if it was truly karma, then I'd have been done in a lot earlier, ya feel me?"

	"Perhaps."

	"But, for some reason or another, I've been allowed to live... even beyond death itself."

	"That's something you have over Hurricane."

	"Huh...?"

	"She perished during her journey.  But you?  You perished and came back."

	"Heh... yeah, well, Hurricane never ran into technologically gifted and egotistically psychotic Ledomaritans."

	"Or perhaps it was fate."

	"I doubt I'll ever take you for a mare who subscribes to fate."

	"And what of casual conversations in stairwells?"

	"Oh... uhm... huh..."

	"Indeed."

	"... ... ... It's strange to think that adventuring was once fun."

	"You no longer feel thrilled by flight and exploration?"

	"Okay.  So maybe 'fun' isn't the right word.  There was a time when dragons, diamond dogs, and parasprites seemed like serious business.  That one moment when the big scaley creep was staring down my friends and I?  I felt seriously friggin' scared.  I wouldn't have admitted it to my buddies at the time, of course, but it freaked me the heck out.  But... looking back?  I don't think I ever once thought I would die.  It's weird.  Even when dealing with Nightmare Moon, I felt like things were somehow gonna be okay in the end.  Maybe that was because I was part of something bigger and far more harmonic than just myself..."

	"Are things any different now?"

	"Well... y-yeah!  And no.  I mean... unnngh... Like weeks ago, when I was flying circles around Stratopolis with Pilate dangling in my grasp and a ton of undead pegasi on my tail?  I wasn't scared.  I mean... not really scared.  I was just... going through the motions.  So much of what I've done since Ledomare—heck—since Windthrow has been me just flying by the seat of my saddle."

	"You're certain of that?"

	"Huh?"

	"I don't know the mare you were before you began your epic journey.  Are you certain it's been the same ride all throughout?"

	"... ... ...I guess Silvadel changed me."

	"The place where Axan nested, yes?"

	"It was a landscape that had seen death.  Like... it was almost a glimpse of what Equestria could perhaps have been like if creatures like that one snoring dragon had gotten their way in the end.  The ponies who still lived there—Sam Rose and all his subjects—they had nothing but the ashes of once-happy lives to build a future on.  In a way, they had already lost before they were even born into battle."

	"And yet, your intervention saved them, yes?"

	"Doesn't change the fact that the whole situation royally sucked!  That was... th-that was an eye opener for me!  I had gotten used to the high of doing fantastic things for ponies whenever I breezed by their towns.  But there?  In Silvadel?  The best I could do was shine light onto a graveyard.  Sure, I may have convinced Axan to get up and leave, but that doesn't take back all that the Silvadelians lost."

	"You could have flown on without helping them."

	"Sure.  And yet... no... I couldn't..."

	"What held you back?"

	"I guess... I-I realized I was my own Silvadel.  I was a living sepulcher of all that was once precious to me.  The last Element of Harmony was around my neck, and it was a flimsy seal to a vessel of chaos.  Gone were the days when simple misadventures in Ponyville would make my heart race.  If I wanted to deal with Axan... like really deal with her, than I had to put everything on the line.  I probably wouldn't have come out unscathed.  In fact... I didn't.  I should have died... I should have stayed dead..."

	"But it's a fortuitous thing that you didn't, right?"

	"I... I like to think so.  I like to think that it was worth it just to meet Belle and Pilate... Eagle Eye and Kera..."

	"It stands to be said that one life put at risk to help so many others is a sign of true heroism."

	"And I got to meet you, Roarke."

	"... ... ..."

	"For real.  Don't you think that's a fantastic thing?  That you're here right now?  That we're both here?  Instead of—I dunno—lying in separate ditches somewhere?"

	"I could perhaps hypothesize about the ample bounty I'd be in posession of right now if it weren't for your inexplicable intervention."

	"Pffft!  At what cost?  Being the lap dog of the big-flanks up in Searo's Hold?"

	"Well put..."

	"I often think about what it'd be like if Discord hadn't dropped in on my friends and me.  Like... imagine an alternate universe where we never died... where we'd still be hanging out... doing the whole Elements of Harmony thang... battling—pfft—I dunno... pillow monsters and sea ponies..."

	"You can't be expected to predict something like that."

	"But still, it just... it used to seem like such a happy, dreamy scenario to me.  But now?  Now that I've unearthed all the crap that Chrysalis has been up to?  Now that the likes of Shell and Zaap Nator and Nightshade and Nevlamas have been dealt with?  I can't fathom having lived another existence.  Even... even if it m-means that my friends have to stay dead.  It's like I was meant to come out this far... to do so many awesome—and not so awesome stuff... just to make sure the world becomes... y'know... better."

	"I think it's the mark of a strong pony to account for all of her calamitous circumstances and see them for the good that they've brought about."

	"Yeah, I guess.  I just wish I didn't have to struggle with such a perspective for so long."

	"Indeed."

	"How about you?  Do you ever pine for the life you had before you got caught up in all this nonsense?"

	"There was one particular occasion at a young age where I commissioned by an older warrior to fetch her a dozen eunuchs from the southern kingdoms.  It wasn't until the delivery was made at the cost of much blood and sweat that I realized she actually desired a dozen studs for a private brothel."

	"... ... ..."

	"It... erm... was exceedingly amusing to me at the time."

	"Maybe we should go downstairs where it's closer to the lavatory or some other place where I could vomit."

	"Agreed."
		//------------------------------//
		// Like Some Giant Goddess Salad		//------------------------------//

	Ebon Mane tossed and turned.  No matter how hard he tried, he couldn't get comfortable enough in his cot.  Even with all the blankets bundled around him to ward off the chill of the Jury's high altitude climb, he remained restless.

	With a groan, he sat up, rubbing his eyes with a burgundy hoof.  Staring blearily across the dimly-lit compartment, Ebon groaned and plopped down onto all four legs.  He opened the valve and shuffled out into the narrow corridor outside.  Once there, he looked down towards the bow.  Emptiness hung with shadows and more shadows.  He turned and looked towards the mess hall—

	Eagle Eye's slender frame was obstructing the light from the lounge.

	Ebon did a double-take.  Blinking hard, he shuffled down the passage.  "Eagle Eye?"

	No response.  The ex-mercenary stared gloomily into the bulkheads.

	"EE?"

	Finally, Eagle twitched.  He glanced up.  At first sight of Ebon, his features softened and he breathed, "Ebon?  You're up."

	"Yeah..."  The cook nodded, shuffling to a stop before the other stallion.  "Seems to be contagious."

	Eagle fidgeted.  "Yes, well..."  He glanced down at the floor.  "I couldn't fall asleep."

	Ebon leaned his head aside.  "Too busy thinking about what awaits us in the crater?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Eagle brushed at his silken bangs.  He blinked and grinned mechanically.  "Yes!  That's... uh... that's it!"  A dry chuckle.  "Fear of death and gloom and spontaneous village murders!"

	Ebon raised an eyebrow.

	Eagle gulped.  "Also some indigestion."  He bit his lip. "Just a little."

	"For real?"  Ebon leaned in and placed his fuzzy ear straight up against Eagle's side.  "Oh jeez!  I hope it wasn't because of what I cooked!"

	"Uhhhh... buhhhh..."  Eagle flushed deep red and gently pulled Ebon back up into a standing position.  "Nah!  It's... it's fine!"

	"Eagle, I'm a little worried about you."

	"Ehhhhhhhhhhhhh..."  Eagle grinned.  "Why?"

	"Well..."  Ebon's brow furrowed.  "You seem so... preoccupied lately."

	"Isn't everypony?"

	"Honestly, no.  Not really."  Ebon shook his head.  "Ever since Abinadi, we've been really chill."

	"We h-have?"

	"Yeah.  Even Roarke is starting to come out of her shell.  Haven't you noticed?"

	"Well... uhm... I-I guess I'm just not used to being... er... weaponless!"

	Ebon's eyebrows were flat.  "Weaponless..."

	"Yeah!  I lost my sword in Stratopolis!  And my shield is practically garbage now!  Why, back in Foxtaur, I used to practice with my sword every morning, noon, and evening!  It got my mind relaxed.  Heh... although Zenith used to say I'd go blind sooner than later."

	"... ... ..."

	"Eh..."  Eagle Eye avoided Ebon's mane.  "I guess that's only a joke that the old stallion would laugh at."

	"Eagle..."  Ebon leaned forward, speaking within a warm whisper's distance.  "If... if s-something was troubling you, you'd tell me wouldn't you?"

	"Oh, t-totally!  I mean... why wouldn't I?"

	"Because I think... that is..."  Ebon exhaled quietly and murmured, "We have something special, don't we?"

	Eagle stared back.  He simply smiled.

	Ebon's eyes wandered into the shadows.  Suddenly, his lips curved.  "You know..."  He leaned in again.  "If you're having trouble sleeping in your quarters... you c-could always try mine."

	Eagle blinked.

	"I mean... at th-this point..."  Ebon played with his mane and giggled aside.  "Why not?"

	"Heh... heheheh..."  Eagle wheezed through a crooked smile.  "Yeah, why n—"  He suddenly flew forward and collapsed into Ebon.

	"Gaaaah!"  Ebon fell hard to the floor, his legs tangled up with Eagle's.  "I-I didn't m-mean like th-that!"

	"It w-wasn't me!  I sw-swear!" Eagle stammered, struggling to disentangle himself.  The bulkheads around them shook with massive turbulence.  "It was the ship!"

	"Wh-what's happening?!"

	"I can't t-tell!  I can't even get up!"

	The ship shook and rattled some more.  One by one, bleary-eyed jurists slipped out of their rooms.

	"What in Spark's name...?" Belle and Pilate reeled.

	"Unnnngh..."  Props clutched a blanket while rubbing her blue eyes, yawning.  "I was dreaming of some really smexy soot..."

	Josho frowned.  "By Ledo's balls, what's fartin' at us now?"

	"One way to find out!"  Zaid hopped nonchalantly over the fallen stallions.  "Hey Eagle.  Hey Ebon.  Nice pretzel."  He rushed up to a starboard porthole within the brightly-lit lounge and squinted out.  "Whoah... now that's a lot of squirrel homes!"

	"'Squirrel homes?'" Pilate stammered.

	Zaid craned his head.  "I mean 'trees,' you silly magical zebra!"  He galloped back down the narrow corridor and brushed his way past the sleepy ponies.  "Looks like our boring days are over with!"

	"Oh great."  Josho rolled his eyes.

	"How can there be trees up this high in the Sky Stabs?" Belle thought out loud.

	"That's what I aim to find out!"  Zaid reached the vertical crawlspace and motioned down the hallway.  "Come on up, Blondie!  Anomalies are soooooo you!"

	"Oooh!  Ooooh!"  Props ditched her blanket and scampered—frazzled—after him.  "I wanna be confounded!  Wait for me!"

	"Me too!"  Kera scampered towards them.

	"Hold it, little lady," Belle caught Kera by her tail.  "Let's wait for some of the craziness to boil down first."

	"Awwwwwww..."  Kera squatted, pouting with folded forelimbs.  "How come only Props gets to chase Zaid around these days?"

	Belle glanced at Pilate while the zebra bit his lip.



	"Htttt!"  Zaid climbed up into the cockpit and helped Props up after him.  He looked towards the sparkling antlers while the cabin shook.  "What's the story, elkbone?"

	"Grnnngh!"  Floydien snarled, jerking left and right on the controls while foggy mists unfurled against the cockpit windows.  "Nancy Jane's run into thermals!"

	"What, you mean like socks?"  Zaid raised an eyebrow.  "I'm afraid I left my copy of playcolt on board Khao's ship."

	"No, not stockings."  Props leaned forward.  "You mean rising warm air currents, don't ya, handsome?"

	"Pffft..."  Zaid rolled his eyes.  "Find, take Rudolph's side...

	"They came a'glimmering up Nancy's chest out of nowhere!"  Floydien's red eyes darted to the corner of his vision.  "The heat heat is starting to settle out, but it's still gonna fill boomers with bumps for a spit minute!"

	Knock knock knock!  A hoof pounded against the outer deck's doors.

	"Really?"  Zaid blinked.  "This high up, and we're still being hoofed copies of Whinnytower?"

	"It must be Dashie!"  Props jerked a handle, opening the doors wide.  Warm air billowed into the cockpit as the pegasus stumbled through.  "Dashie!"  Props blinked.  "You're all wet!"

	"I was knocking for nearly ten minutes!" Rainbow sputtered, slicking her mane back as she stumbled in and stood behind Floydien.  "I'm guessing you couldn't hear through all the turbulence!"

	"Seriously, did you go for a skinny dip or something?" Zaid asked.

	"What, you mean this?"  Rainbow pointed at her soaked hair.  "This is from the frost!  It's all melted!"

	"Melted?!"

	Floydien spat, "What kind of glimmer is this?"

	"I saw trees when I looked out the window!" Zaid said.

	"Damn straight, you saw trees!"  Rainbow smirked devilishly, then patted Floydien's side.  "Take 'er down a bit, why dont'cha?"

	"What?!  Lower into the heat spit?!  Is color wheel crazy?!"

	"Trust me!  I have a reason to believe we'll be safer the lower we go!"

	"Mmmmff..."  Floydien pushed at the controls.  "Floydien isn't too sure of this..."

	"I'm not asking you to be sure.  I'm asking you to have faith!"

	"When has that ever gone wrong?" Props said with a nervous titter.

	Zaid stood up, squinting over the shoulders of the pegasus and the elk.

	The ship lost altitude.  Gradually, like spreading curtains, the thick of the fog faded.  An enormous basin appeared before them, covered all over in sprawling flora and fauna.  Thick, emerald tree trops dangled in wet, humid air.  The gentle haze of a morning sun fell into the landscape, casting a lively glitter across the entire flouncing canopy.

	"Pizz fah whizz..."  Props cooed.

	"It's like some giant Goddess salad," Zaid stammered.

	"Heh..."  Rainbow Dash smirked, her eyes aflame with curiosity.  "Now there's a title if I ever heard one."
		//------------------------------//
		// "What Is This, 'Urohringr Crater?'"		//------------------------------//

	At last, the Noble Jury lowered far enough that it was no longer being rocked about by thermal currents.  It still hovered relatively high above the bottom of the crater—or at least the bottom as perceived by those on board the vessel.  As the sun continued rising, a golden haze glittered across the dense forest canopy below.  The basin was colored by a verdant emerald hue all throughout—even in the few sparse patches of wet and exposed earth.

	Roarke stepped gingerly out of the rear stairwell and onto the main deck.  Her lenses retracted to take-in the enormity of the landscape below and around them.  Beyond the ship's stern, the east faces of the Sky Stabs were covered with dangling foliage that spilled over cliffs with copious vines and lichen.  Along various spots of the craggy summits, enormously tall waterfalls had formed, emptying melted frost from the western heights into the belly of the crater.  As the skystone ship hovered its way east, its crewponies experienced the continuous roar of rushing water and the ensuing echo against stone walls.  Beneath all of that was the ever-present hum of nature, shrieking wildlife, and buzzing insects.

	The door to the cockpit opened.  Rainbow Dash trotted out, followed shortly by Zaid and Props.  Rainbow made her way to the port side, staring out with a gawking expression.  Zaid and Props were no less awestruck by the enormity of the microcosm they had just stumbled upon.

	"I suppose this defeats the point of wearing leather coats," Roarke neutrally mused.

	"Just look at the size of this place!"  Rainbow Dash said.  She pointed off the port side, outlining where the western wall of the Sky Stabs bent northeasterly, disappearing into gray humid mist and fog.  "I can't even see to the far side of the crater!"

	"Same can be said from this angle, Dashie!"  Props said, pointing past the bow.  "I can't tell where anything begins or ends in this super sauna!"  She smiled.  "Reminds me of the factory districts of Gray Smoke!"

	"Oh yeah?" Zaid muttered.  "Reminds me of the showers back in the Herald's monastery."

	All three mares stared at him.

	"What?"  He shrugged.  "Khao hated stinky robes.  I couldn't blame her."

	"It's unnaturally humid," Roarke remarked.  "Judging from the distance between the mountain summits and the tree canopy, I suspect that the base of this crater is well above sea level."

	"What, you think this is some sort of volcano or something?" Rainbow asked.

	"It would be the simplest explanation."

	"Yeah, well..."  Props giggled, tossing her blonde mane in the warm breeze.  "We're not exactly used to 'simple', are we, Roarkie?"

	Roarke raised an eyebrow above one lens.  "Roarkie...?"

	"I'm not seeing any crazy light beams," Zaid commented.  "Maybe the dudes west of here were exagerrating?"

	"They've had plenty of decades to do it," Roarke said.  "There's nothing more appealing to superstitious ponies than the unknown.  We could very well be the first living beings to have explored this place."

	"I dunno about that," Rainbow said.  "But it sure is friggin' exciting."

	"Totallies!"  Props giggled.

	Roarke sighed.  "Shouldn't we simply ascend and fly as swiftly as we can out of this place?"

	"I don't think Floydien will want to encounter more turbulence if he can avoid it," Rainbow said.  "We're pretty safe at this altitude.  I'd say, let's just coast on through like this and..."  Her words trailed off as she stared down over the ship's edge.  "No way..."

	"What is it?" Props asked.

	"No friggin' way!"  Rainbow's ruby eyes sparkled.

	"It's squirrels, isn't it?"  Zaid winced.  "Please say it's not a civilization of sentient squirrels.  Cuz then we'd have to explain to them about Floydien's dead friend.  Plus, squirrels don't make good cheese."

	"Floydien heard that spit!"

	"Elks don't make good cheese either!" Zaid hollered.

	"I can't believe it!"  Rainbow giggled, a smile plastered across her face as she hovered on flapping wings.  "Celestia on a bike!"

	Flash!  The sword hanging off of Rainbow's saddlebags glimmered in the morning haze.  "Yes, Rainbow?  You summoned me?"

	"D'oh!"  Rainbow turned her head over her shoulder, gripping the hilt.  "Call you back, Your Highness!"  She sheathed it the rest of the way into her satchel.  "Buck me, this is amazing!  I gotta get a closer look!"

	"A closer look?" Zaid asked.

	"A closer look at what, Dashie?!"

	"Apples!"  Rainbow said, already flying out into the misty air.  "From real apple trees!  The edible kind!"  She began descending.  "Goddess, they look delicious even from here!"

	"Rainbow!" Roarke galloped up to the deck's edge.  "Are you sure this is wise?!"

	"Nope!"

	"Whatever happened to flying swiftly to Val Roa and stopping Chrysalis?!"

	"We can charm her with apples!"  Rainbow laughed, then shouted up as she dove backwards with a salute.  "Tell Floydien to bring the ship to a stall!  Oh, and grab a pony or two and come down and join me for the plucking!  Better bring Whizzball!"

	"It is not..."  Roarke slammed her hoof down so hard against the deck it produced sparks. "...called Whizzball!"

	"Ha ha ha ha!"  Zaid doubled over, slapping his knee.  "Looks like Best Pony disagrees with ya, robo-ovaries!"

	"Gravity is about to disagree with your testicles, Mr. Zaid."

	"Yeah... ahem..."  Zaid gulped and trotted briskly for the cockpit.  "Count me out of this away mission..."
		//------------------------------//
		// How Rainbow Was My Valley		//------------------------------//

	The Noble Jury hung in the air at a great distance, floating listlessly above the trees.  Meanwhile, the Lounge sphere hovered east, descending gracefully until it lowered past the thick moist branches of the crater's forest canopy.  It landed not far from where Rainbow Dash was eagerly zipping about, bucking one apple tree after another and collecting the fallen fruit in her outstretched wings.

	With a hiss, the doors to the transport opened.  Eagle Eye and Bellesmith immediately hopped out.  Roarke trotted gingerly after them, her lenses glistening with humid condensation as she peered across the misty jungle.

	"Well, it certainly is... green," she murmured.

	"I for one really like it!"  Belle said.  She took a long, deep breath, her fuzzy muzzle smiling.  "Mmmmmmm... it's like Blue Shelf on a warm summer day!"

	"Girl, I'm sure this place blows Blue Shelf off the mountains!"  Eagle Eye giggled as he trotted over and batted a hanging tree branch with his hoof, watching as the water-slick leaves flounced.  "The plants here are practically bursting with moisture!  And you hear that wildlife?"

	"Memories of Foxtaur, EE?"

	"Pfffft.  That forest felt like a threadbare fossil compared to this place."  He gasped, his nostrils flaring.  "Do you smell that?"

	"Smells like... like..."

	"Pears!"  Eagle Eye galloped to a smattering of trees with low-hanging branches.  He grinned into his reflection on the golden globules of fruit.  "Oh wow—I bet Ebon would be beside himself once he hears about this bounty!"

	"Over there..."  Bellesmith pointed.  "Are those orange blossoms?"

	"This crater has everything!"  Eagle exclaimed.  "See those flowers in that bed by the brook?"

	"Oh, Spark, yes!  What are those, marigolds?"

	"Bellesmith, I think we've just stumbled into paradise..."

	"Unnngh..."  Roarke shuddered all over.

	Belle stifled a giggle.  "Not a fan of beautiful tranquility, Roarke?"

	"I've lived long enough to never trust anything labeled as 'paradise,'" the metal mare said.

	"Awwwwwww... don't ruin the moment!" Eagle said with a smile.  "Instead, why don't you help us pluck some of these pears?"

	"You don't seriously plan on eating those...?"

	"Well, it's not like we're going to let them eat us."

	"Heeheehee!"  Belle called across the grove.  "Hey!  Rainbow!  Did you see?  We've found pears and oranges!"

	"Buck your pears and buck your oranges!"  Rainbow Dash hollered back, ever smirking.  "I've got nature's candy right here!"  She spun and kicked another tree.  "Hnnngh!"

	The branches shook.  Two crimson delights fell earthward.

	She caught one with the stem of her tail and another with her left wing.  With one thrust of her rump, she flipped one apple upwards, turned, and caught it in an open pocket of her saddlebag.  Chuckling to herself, she rolled the other apple across her wing, over her shoulder, and bounced it off her head.  Catching it in two hooves, she turned it over, observing her smiling expression in the red skin.

	She gave it a sniff, turned it over, rubbed its edge against her forelimb, then opened her jaw wide.  Her mouth was instantly flooded with an explosion of sweetness.  Juice ran through her tonsils and trickled down her throat.

	"Hrmmmm-mmmmffff..."

	She slumped back, closing her eyes as she relished in the frest, juicy taste overwhelming her body.  After two more bites, she smiled to herself, her wings outstretching.  She glanced at the half-eaten fruit, then leaned forward to inhale its pulpy center.  The edges of her face tingled, and she felt her heartbeat quickening.

	"Hmmmm... yeah... can't believe I've almost forgotten..."

	She sighed warmly, glancing at the forest ahead.  More apple trees lingered beyond a swath of springy, waving high grass.  Clamping the apple in her mouth, Rainbow Dash galloped forward, practically frolicking.  She leapt over a cluster of bushes, using her wings to glide forward. Landing, she made her way for the thick of the fruit trees.  The other three ponies were far behind her now, their pleasant voices like dull echoes against the dense forest.  The Noble Jury was practically unseen through the lush canopy.

	When Rainbow approached the trees, she saw that a bunch of apples were already lying on the grass besides the trunk.  Despite having been plucked from their branches, the fruit was still noticeably fresh.

	"Hrmmmmfff..."  Rainbow pulled the half-eaten apple out of her mouth.  "That's weird."  She glanced up at the branches and their fruit.  They were shaking to a stop.  The mare's brow furrowed.  "Uhm..."

	Something emerged from the bushes ahead with a loud rustling.

	Rainbow Dash glanced over.  The apple fell out of her grasp.

	A pony with a fuzzy gold coat was calmly foraging through the grassy forest floor, picking one apple after another and slipping them into a satchel at her side.  With each movement she made, she tossed an ivory swath of mane hair to one side or the other.  A matching tail flicked thoughtfully as she stopped to inspect a bundle of apples, sniffing them, then choosing two or three out of the bunch to toss in her bag.

	Rainbow blinked... then blinked again.  "Uhhhhhh..."  She raised a blue hoof and waved nervously.  "Greetings?"

	"Hey."  The mare didn't even look at her, instead scraping at the roots of a tree and squinting at its bark.  "Hrmmmf... Not as thick as last month.  Better keep a mental note for Jerrio..."

	"Uhm..."  Rainbow leaned her head to the side, feathers twitching.  "You... it... I mean... how?"

	"Any luck on your end?" the mare asked.

	"Excuse me?"

	"What, Jerrio's not got your flank on sample collecting?"  The mare sighed.  "Lucky goose."  She looked straight up at the dangling apples overhead.  "Hmmm.  Those should do."

	Rainbow glanced up at them, then smirked at the mare.  "You want me to grab a few for you?"

	"Nah, I got 'em."  The mare spread her golden wings and soared up with a burst of air.

	Rainbow did a double-take, her jaw dropping.

	In swift fashion, the mared plucked several apples and tossed them into her satchel with a flick of her feathers.  She twirled around the trunk, glided upside down, and cruised upside down in a casual hover.  "Hrmmmmm..."  She sniff-sniff-sniffed one apple, took a bite, and smirked lightly to herself.  "Hrmmf... screw it.  These samples are mine."  She took another bite, relishing in the taste.

	Rainbow simply stared, dumbfounded.

	At last, a pair of pink eyes darted down.  The mare descended until she was drifting in a lazy circle around Rainbow Dash.  "Hrmmmf... I like those colors."  She took a few more bites, gulped, and muttered, "Where're you from?  West D or East D?"

	"Uhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh..."

	"You certainly sound like East D," the mare said, flipping so that she glided upright.  She gulped the remainder of the apple, crunching the core in her mouth before swallowing.  "What?  You felt like stretching your wings a bit?  Y'know, I used to fly the length of the green too.  That was before I found other ways to 'stretch.'"  She giggled mischievously.  "I'm just kidding, first born."

	"I... uhm..."  Rainbow fidgeted, her eyes locked on the mare's shiny, shiny feathers.  "I-I like your wings," she blurted.

	"Hmmmf..."  The mare flipped with ease and landed on the other side of Rainbow.  "You're not half bad yourself, girl."  She reached down and unabashedly grasped Rainbow's tail.  "I like this.  Most first-borns don't bother giving their tails the Valkyrie treatment.  Now I know you're East D."

	"Oh... y-you bet!"  Rainbow smiled awkwardly, feeling the tug of her tail as the mare hoofed through each colored layer. "Uhm... east side represent!"

	"Rayvinnnnne?" a voice echoed from above.  "Where in Valkyrie's name did you fly off too?!  Jerrio will be pissed!"

	"Unngh..."  The mare rolled her eyes, then shouted towards the forest canopy.  "Why don't you be a big pony and home for once, Kitsune, ya stupid pigeon?!"

	FWOOSH!  A mare with a midnight black coat landed heavily beside her.  Rainbow reeled—gasping—as a cyclone of air settled around the pegasus' outstretched, onyx feathers.  Coiling her wings, the mare turned about, her bright amber eyes like spotlights against her dark face.  A mane hung off her head in three-toned braids: red, green, and blue.  "Rayvinne, who's this?"

	"East feathers," Rayvinne said, casually picking up apples, inspecting them, and slipping them into her bag.  "Out for a gust, it seems."  She tilted her muzzle up, smirking.  "Certainly puts your head to shame, Kitsune."

	"Yeahhhhh..."  The other mare squinted.  "Your folks get a little carried away there?"

	"Yeah, well, I-I guess I couldn't stop 'em!"  Rainbow said with a nervous titter.  She shook her mane in a sliver of sunlight and smirked.  "But hey, nopony's perfect, right?"

	"Kitsune..."  Rayvinne leaned in and murmured in the mare's ear.  Both looked at Rainbow's tail, then giggled collectively.

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow.

	"Ahem..."  Kitsune tilted her head aside.  "What's your name, sparrow?"

	"Rainbow Dash."

	"Pffffft!"  Kitsune nearly wretched.  "The buck kind of name is that?"

	"An awesome one," Rainbow smirked.  "At least when I say mine out loud, I don't sound like I've got mosquitoes caught on my tongue!"

	"Ohhhhhhh!"  Rayvinne danced sideways, giggling.  "She plucked you something awful, Kit!"

	"Well, at least we know she's not Central."  Kitsune smirked and panther-trotted Rainbow's way.  "What's a matter, fartspeed?  Did you break your homing on the same thing that broke your voice?"

	"At least I'm not so slow that I became my own shadow like you," Rainbow said.

	Once again, Rayvinne squealed.  "Oh, she's great!  Really great!  Heehee!  I gotta head to the east greens more often!"

	"You're not half bad, Rainbow," Kitsune said with an approving smirk.  She trotted really close and gave the mare's mane a heavy sniff.  "Mmmmm... not bad at all."

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow fidgeted, her cheeks slightly red.  "You're welcome...?"

	"Hmmm..."  Kitsune fanned herself with her own wingfeathers.  "That remains to be seen."

	"Rainbow!  Where'd you go, girl?  You won't believe what I found!"  Eagle Eye galloped over a mound of grass and held up a cluster of fruit with a victorious grin.  "Peaches!"

	Rainbow winced.  Her eyes darted between him and the two mares.

	Both pegasi had frozen, their gazes locked on the unicorn stallion.

	Eagle Eye blinked, his smile slowly melting into a confounded expression.  Not long after, Bellesmith trotted up.  "EE?  What is it?  Did you find—?"  She froze, covering her muzzle with a pair of golden hooves.  The mare's eyes were instantly locked on the ponies' wings.

	"Ermmmm..."  Rainbow Dash gulped.

	"K-K-Kitsune...?" Rayvinne bit her lip as she trotted nervously beside her friend.  "Who... what are those...?"

	Kitsune's amber eyes darted between the one-and-a-half growths coming out of the Jurists' skulls.  "Uhhhhh..."  She stared at their wingless sides.  "By Valkyrie's shouts..."

	Rainbow flew into the air.  "I'll tell you who these are!"  She shot down and landed in a nimble slide, standing between the two pairs of equines.  "These are my friends!  And—since they hang out with me—they're totally awesome!"  She smirked.  "I'll prove it!"  Grasping two apples from her saddlebags, she spun and threw them hard at Eagle Eye.  "Think fast, lavender!"

	"Gaaaaiiie!"  Eagle Eye leaned back, wincing with curled forelimbs.  The apples stopped just inches from his muzzle, expertly hovering in a magic field that matched his glowing horn.

	"See?"  Rainbow turned back, smirking.  "Cooler than a blizzard with lightning!"

	"Whoahhhhhhhh..." Rayvinne cooed, eyes sparkling.

	"That's..."  Kitsune slowly smirked.  "...pretty cool."

	"Will you look at that?"  Rayvine hissed aside, eyes staring at Eagle Eye.  "He's got the gold lights!"

	"Don't be a gull," Kitsune grunted, nevertheless staring.  "Nopony can make the gold lights..."

	"Then how do you explain this?"  Rainbow grasped Eagle's petite body and flung him skyward.

	"Rainbowwwwww—?!"  Eagle clenched his muscles, catching his whole body in a glowing field and hovering just a few inches above the ground instead of hitting it.  "Nnnnngh... must you...?"

	"Heeheehee!"  Rainbow Dash smiled proudly and pointed his way.  "See?"

	"That's amazing!" Rayvinne said.

	"Wrong a-word, but everypony misses on their first try."

	"Heehee!"

	Kitsune squinted at Bellesmith.  "What's wrong with yours?"

	Belle smiled.  "I'm afraid my gold lights are broken."  She turned towards Rainbow Dash.  "Rainbow, this... this is incredible.  Where are these ponies from?"

	"Pffft.  Where all ponies are from," Kitsune said, raising a hoof towards the treen canopy above.  "Durandana."

	"Nnngh..."  Eagle Eye fumbled, then plopped himself down on even legs.  He panted for breath.  "D-Durandana?"

	"She's and east bird, for sure," Kitsune said, pointing at Rainbow Dash.  She trotted forward and shamelessly tapped Belle's horn-stub, forcing the mare to flinch slightly.  "But you guys?  I couldn't be feathered to know."

	"Bet with homing like that you could scale beyond the greens," Rayvinne said, trotting up to Eagle Eye.  She squinted, leaned in, and sniff-sniffed his mane.  She leaned back with a gasp.  "A stallion!"

	"Er... yeah..."  Eagle sighed, glancing aside with folded ears.  "I get that a lot..."

	"So... uhm..."  Rainbow Dash stepped in the center of the group.  "About this Durandana..."

	"Heh..."  Rayvinne smirked at her.  "Why talk so funny about it?"  She gestured towards the unicorns.  "How about telling us where you met these friends of yours?"

	"Well, we flew in here on a skystone sh—Mmmmmmf!"  Eagle went cross-eyed.

	Rainbow leaned over from where she had her hoof planted over his muzzle.  "I found them... wh-while on a hike!"

	"Rainbow..."  Belle droned.

	Rainbow grimaced at her, then turned to smile at the ponies once more.  "But we're an awful long way from... uh... East Durandana!"  She smiled nervously.  "Been so long since we hung out with our Western and... Central sisters."

	"Heehee... we can tell."

	"Jerrio's gonna pop all his feathers once he sees you."

	"Think we can have a chat with him sometime?" Rainbow asked.

	"Depends on when Sivrem's flock is done sky herding."

	"Uhhh..."  Belle leaned her head aside.  "Excuse me—who?"

	Kitsune gawked at her, then at Rainbow Dash.  "You seriously haven't told your friends about Sivrem?"

	"Why?"  Rainbow fidgeted.  "Does he smell?"

	"Mmmmmm..."  Rayvinne tossed her mane, blushing pleasantly.  "And how..."

	Several shadows rushed overhead, briefly breaking the sunlight through the trees.

	Eagle gasped, glancing straight up.  "Rainbow... d-did you see that just now?"

	"Ah!  That must be Sivrem's flock!"  Kitsune said, smirking.  "Bet the leatherbacks are extra stubborn this morning."

	"Leather... backs...?"

	"Can't blame him for slacking off.  We all know Sivrem's a great stallion, but he can't be feathered to milk a calf for Valkyrie silver."

	"Hahahahah... I know, right?"

	Just then, Roarke galloped up, breathless.  "Rainbow!  Something large flew over us just now!  We have to warn the..."  Her face twisted in confusion as her lenses retracted.  "...Jury."

	"Gaaah!"  Rayvinne flinched.  "Speaking of Valkyrie silver...!"

	"Hoo boy..."  Eagle Eye shuddered.

	"Oh... uh..."  Rainbow turned to grin nervously at the alarmed pegasi.  "This here's my friend Roarke.  She's also got a horn."  She winked.  "It's just stuck someplace hidden."

	"Is that so...?"

	Just then, more shadows darted overhead.  The tree canopy shook as several bodies swiftly drifted down, coming to a low hover over the forest floor.  Pegasi of every coat color imaginable gathered in the dimly-lit air, shaking the nearby leaves with their collective wings.  About a third of them had noticeably colorful manes, with dyes of red, yellow, green, blue, and violet.

	"Kitsune!  Rayvinne!"  A stallion with a four-toned mane sighed, adjusting a pair of goggles over his brown face.  "You broke your homing or what?  We need to carry the fruit back to the West Tower before First Light!"  He flinched, tilting his head down to glance at the four strangers.  He raised his goggles, exposing a pair of green eyes.  "Who're these gulls?"

	"Uhhmmm... Jerrio?"  A pegasus beside him leaned in, eyes wide.  "I don't think they're gulls... or ponies."

	"Of course they're ponies!" a stallion spat.  "Look at them!"

	"I am.  And I'm about to puke my eggshells."

	Several pegasi laughed while Belle and Eagle squirmed awkwardly.

	"Roarke!"  Rainbow hissed, squinting at her.  "Quick!  Do something cool!"

	Roarke turned and droned, "What is that going to accomplish?"

	"These are pegasi," Rainbow said.  "It'll accomplish everything!"

	"Nnnnngh..."  Roarke groaned, ears drooping.  "Eagle Eye...?"

	"Why me?"

	"Relax, breeder.  Just toss up a bunch of fruit."

	"Uhhhh... sure."  Eagle Eye grasped as many pears and peaches from his saddlebag that he could, then tossed them up high.

	Roarke flicked her neck to the left.  A panel opened up along a metal brace across her shoulder.  Three tiny barbed missiles flew through the air, impacted the fruit in mid-air, and sent juicy bits of mush flying across the flinching faces of every pegasus in attendance.

	"Roarkkkke!"  Bellesmith squealed, frowning.  "That wasn't very smart!"

	"You say that as if it was my idea," Roarke said.

	"Uhhhh..."  Rayvinne flinched, trying in vain to shake fruit pulp off her limbs.

	"That... that..."  Kistune stammered.

	"That was so awesome!"  One stallion overhead hollered.

	The air filled with cheers and whoops and hollers as the winged ponies all voiced their approval.  The wind kicked up by their combined feathers made it difficult for the three grounded ponies to stand upright.  At last, several pegasi touched down and crowded around the group, leaning in and murmuring a cascade of awestruck words and exclamations.

	"Hmmm..." Jerrio smirked slightly, folding his forelimbs from where he observed the ceiling.  "Well, if this hasn't been an interesting morning."

	"Yes... uhm... v-very..."  Eagle Eye said, squirming as several ponies reached in to poke his mane and horn.  "Uhm... Rainbow?"

	"You enjoying yourself yet?" Roarke grunted, shaking slightly as pegasi tapped her metal braces and leaned in to see their reflections in her lenses.

	"Heeheehee..."  Rainbow hugged herself in mid-air, wiping her eyes dry as she smirked.  "Ohhhhhh this is too rich..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Alas, Ponies of a Feather...		//------------------------------//

	Pilate's head turned, his ears twitching.

	Kera glanced up from where she and Ebon were peering over the edge of the Noble Jury's top deck.  "Pilate?"  She waddled over and tapped his fetlock.  "What is it?"

	"I..."  Pilate shifted uncomfortably.  "I think I heard something."

	"Jee, could it be one of the millions of indeterminate animals hiding away in this bush?"  Ebon sighed, slumping against the edge of the ship.  "Mmmmf... I still don't know why Eagle Eye dives into these things."

	"He's good at bouncing back with a smile, Ebony!" Props exclaimed.

	"Besides, his coat's a few good shades away from red," Zaid mused, stifling a yawn as he leaned against one of the skystone masts.  "He'll come back safe.  Don't worry."

	"I'm serious, everypony," Pilate said, trotting down the center.  "I heard... something out of place."

	"Did a tree sneeze or something?"  Zaid cocked his head to the side.  "It's not very windy."

	"It almost sounded like an explosion," Pilate claimed.  "Or rocket fire."

	"Well, Roarke is with them!" Kera exclaimed.

	"Then just what does that mean?" Props remarked.

	"If we're lucky?"  Ebon muttered.  "They found a giant rampaging beast and Roarke's just won us some steak dinners for the next month."

	"What is every boomer spitting about?" Floydien stuck his head out.  "Floydien sees nothing but mist mist."

	"Pilate's getting one of his funny feelings again!" Kera exclaimed.

	"It's not funny."  Pilate briefly frowned.  "I'm just... feeling a bit uneasy."

	"Relax, stripes!"  Props trotted towards him, smiling.  "It's okay to be worried about Belle, but she's come back from shadier places than this!"

	"Yeah, besides, they've got the comfort of Whizzball not that far away," Zaid said.  Just then, a huge shadow woooshed by, rocking the ship slightly.  He blinked dumbly into the metal bulkheads.  "...speaking of whizzing."

	"Wh-what in the heck was that?!" Ebon exclaimed.

	"See what I mean?" Pilate spun about, ears pricked.  "We're not alone out here!"

	Josho galloped up the rear stairwell, breathless.  "What just rocked the ship?  I thought we were stationary!"

	Something wooooshed by again, this time causing the vessel to rock back and forth.

	"Yeepsies!" Props squelched, grabbing onto Zaid for support.

	"Floydien does not like this glimmer," the elk muttered.

	"Hey!"  Kera peered over the port side, grinning.  "That's so awesome!"

	"No no no, little larva boomer.  Wrong spit."

	"Nah..."  Kera turned as she pointed towards several approaching shapes.  "I'm talking about the huge flock of nightmare-black creatures soaring our way!"

	"Buh?"  Ebon craned his neck, and his eyes widened.  "Buhhhhhhhh!" he stumbled back onto his flank.

	Just then, the rest of the shadows arrived, their scaled bodies glistening in the morning sun.  Cartiligenous "fins" rippled in the air, pivoting their bodies so that they sliced right past the Noble Jury with long leathery tails whipping behind them.  They resembled enormous manta-rays, even down to the dual cephalic extensions at the front of their triangular bodies.  Instead of gills, they possessed large porous pouches that consistently belched fumes of light gases from the lateral edges of their fleshy bodies.  Dull bass purring notions emanated from their gaping mouths as they roared just inches off the Noble Jury's hull, one by one.

	To say the least, this rocked the vessel heavily, nearly flinging Floydien and his fellow crew ponies off the sides in the first fly-by alone.

	"Gaaah!"  Kera yelped, suddenly being flung into the green space beyond.

	"Kera!" Pilate hollered.

	In a flash of telekinesis, Josho caught the filly and floated her back to where he stood, gripping a mast.  "Elk!  Get us the buck out of here!"

	"Floydien... grnnngh... is trying!"  Floydien clawed his way back towards the cockpit in futility.  "Stay still, Nancy!"

	"Guys!"  Ebon whimpered, peering past the stern with wide eyes.  "More of them are coming!"  He gulped.  "They're going to hit us!"

	"Floydien, we have to move!"

	"It's too late!"

	"Everypony grab onto something!"

	Just as the creatures were about to bear down on the ship, the air filled with the chorus of eagle and osprey calls.  Tiny, colorful shapes darted in and out of the flock of leathery creatures, herding them northward so that they avoided the Noble Jury by mere feet.  The airship rocked less and less, hovering once more to a stand-still as the beasts soared harmlessly northeast over the jungled basin.

	"What... what...?"  Ebon stood upright, panting.  "What just happened?"

	"Did a bunch of birds save us?" Zaid remarked.

	Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  "Friends... I do not think that those are actual birds."

	Ebon glanced back, frowning.  "Then what the hay made that sound?"  Th-Thud!  A winged stallion landed on the ship's railing in front of him, staring the cook in the face.  Ebon looked up and immediately flailed backwards.  "Gaaaaie!"

	"Ledo's girdle!" Josho stammered.

	Dangling in his magic field, Kera grinned upside down.  "Cool!"

	"Uhhh..."  Zaid and Props craned their necks to look better.  "Did Rainbow Dash get a sex change...?"

	The light-blue stallion turned his head about, wide red eyes peering intently like an owl's.  The bulk of his mane hung down the back of his head in a dark green braid, but two separate locks hung down past each ear—one blue and the other red.  Around his head there dangled a necklace comprised of multi-colored feathers and songbird skulls.  His fetlocks were bound with fossilized talons wrapping all about, and a smattering of thin scars blemished his otherwise shiny coat.

	"Somepony, please..."  Pilate murmured aside.  "...tell me what just landed on the ship."

	Floydien squinted.  "Floydien wishes he could say..."

	"Uhhhh..." Props trotted up, smiling nervously at the stallion.  "Hey there, bright eyes!  Welcome to the Noble Jury!"  She leaned forward, blue eyes blinking.  "Do you have a name?"

	The stallion squinted, sniffed the air between them, then tilted his head skyward.  His muzzle opened, letting loose a loud, hawk-like shriek.

	Props fidgeted.  "Uhm... I-I'm not sure I can pronounce that."

	The wind kicked up, accompanied by several flapping feathers.  The Jurists glanced up, gasping to see that they were surrounded by five... ten... twenty... over thirty pegasi, all hovering above the ship and staring intently down at it.

	"Hoooooo boyo..."  Zaid gulped, eyes darting from one winged pony to another.  "Talk about Alfred Haycock presents..."

	"I'm so confused," Pilate wheezed.

	Josho leaned in and whispered, "Lots... and lots of pegasi."

	Pilate's blind eyes twitched.  "...undead?"

	"Nope."  Josho winced.  "Creepy nonetheless."  He jumped as one pegasus landed not far from him.

	Then another pony landed.  Then another.

	The whole ship rocked as—one by one—the bulk of the pegasi made contact with their hooves, trotting over the top deck and running their hooves across the various metal surfaces.  They cooed and made birdsong with clicking tongues, smiling at one another.

	"Hey!  Hey!"  Floydien snarled, shaking a cloven hoof.  "Get your feather glimmer and chicken spit off my Nancy!"  His antlers began sparkling.  "Floydien means it!"

	"Mr. Floydien!"  Pilate called out, stretching his hoof blindly.  "Whatever you do, please don't—"

	"Ooooooh..."  A stallion gasped, eyes locked on Floydien's antlers.  "Home in on those gold lights!"

	"By Valkyrie's shout," another said, flying towards Floydien.

	"Grnnngh!"  Floydien fired a volley of energy.

	"Handsome, no!" Props shouted.

	It was too late, the male pegasus took the brunt of the energy blast.  His body toppeled backwards, but hovered to a stop in the air off the port side.

	Every Jurist winced.

	"Hnnnngh!"  The stallion shook the pain off, tossed his mane, and grinned.  "Again!"

	"Wooo!"

	"Ha ha!"

	The air filled with whoops and cheer as pegasi flew in tight circles around the confounded elk.

	"Do me now!"

	"I'm first born!  I can handle it!"

	"No!  Do me!  Do me!"

	"Beak it in, Jagold, you'd only puke up eggshells."

	"Nuh uh!"

	"Uhhhh..."  Floydien backed up until his haunches were planted against the cockpit's doorframe.  "For the first t-time, Floydien is c-confused..."

	"Just relax, Mr. Floydien, I... I don't think they mean us any harm—"  Pilate stopped in the middle of his speech, for a pegasus was hovering right in front of him, tapping the runes of his metal plate.

	"Look at this gull!" she said.  "Valkyrie silver becomes him!"

	"And here as well," another pegasus crouched low, tapping the O.A.S.I.S. sphere.  "Hmmmm..."  He smirked.  "I wonder if all his balls are shiny."

	"Hahahaha!"

	"Please..."  Pilate gently shoved their hooves away, backing up into Josho.  "That's quite enough, thank you."

	"Look!"  A mare squatted low, beaming as she stared Kera in the face.  "This one glows all over!  And she's got a rod in her head!"

	"Heeheehee..."  Kera smirked.  "You ain't seen the half of it, lady!"  She lifted a coil of roap with her magic and made it twirl like a serpent in the air.  "Tadaaaaa!"

	"Aaack!  Aaack!"  The mare and several other pegasi fled skyward, perching frightfully atop the skystone and peering down.  "Gold lights!  Gold lights!"

	"Not a very good idea, pipsqueak," Josho muttered aside.

	"What?"  Kera glanced up, smirking.  "Better than shooting your boomstick at them!"

	"I'm almost tempted..."

	Suddenly, an eagle shriek flew across the top deck again.  Most of the pegasi cleared a path across the top deck in an instant.  The stallion with the colored locks and bird necklace trotted down the center, approaching Pilate.

	"You are not of the Valkyrie's flock," he said.  "Tell me."  His red eyes narrowed.  "Are you from beyond the greens?"

	"Uhm..."  Pilate cleared his throat.  "If you mean to ask if we are outsiders, then I do believe the answer is yes."

	"You manage to make Valkyrie silver fly," the stallion said, his bone necklace rattling.  "How?"

	"It... is certainly a long and complicated explanation," Pilate said, smiling nervously.

	"Hrmmm..."  The stallion's lips curved.  "Fortunate for both of us, Durandana does not favor long and complicated things."  He leaned in close, sniffing the flinching zebra's mane.  He leaned back.  "You have a mate?"

	"Yes.  As a matter of fact, I do."

	"Good."  The pegasus smiled.  "That means through your gullish stripes, you are still a pony."  His wings outstretched, nearly knocking Ebon and Props off their hooves from the sheer gust.  "I am Sivrem, First Born of the Central Tower.  This is my flock.  We are all warm lovers and fighters of the Valkyrie."

	"And... uhm... I am Pilate, faithful navigator of this ship, the Noble Jury."

	Suddenly, Sivrem lunged forward, snapping his teeth just an inch in front of Pilate's face.  The other jurists flinched—but Pilate didn't.  Sivrem's red eyes widened.  "You are blind?"

	"That I am, sir."

	"And yet you home?"

	"I... suppose I do?"

	"Heh... heh heh heh heh!"  Sivrem let loose a booming laugh.  "The Gray Feathers will never believe this!"  He turned and smiled at the other pegasi.  "I've not imagined such wild things!  Even in the Gold Lights!"

	The pegasi laughed and whistled shrilly.

	Just then, a half-dozen more winged ponies flew in and touched down on the ship's bow.

	"Sivrem!" a stallion with a gray coat spoke with a rattle of his bird-bone armor.  "The leatherbacks have been herded back to the raked earth.  I sent two ponies to home in on Jerrio."  He paused to gawk at the ship with a dumb smile, his green mane billowing in the wind.  "By Valkyrie's shout... it's even shinier up close!"

	"Where are the feathers on these ponies?" asked a yellow-coated mare with shiny blue hair.

	"Smythe... Jagold..."  Sivrem whistled, summoning the two pegasi at his side.  "These are ponies from beyond the greens."

	"Beyond the greens?"  Smythe trotted in, sniffing Josho's muzzle, then immediately reeling back with a forelimb stretched before his wrinkled muzzle.  "Nnnngh!  Eggshells!  You take us for gulls, first born?"

	"By the Gold Lights, it's true!" Sivrem said, smiling proudly.  "The leatherbacks almost reduced them to down.  I do not believe they can fly."

	"Well, one of us can!" Kera said.

	Josho cleared his throat.

	Smythe blinked quizzically.  "What's that, little sparrow?"

	"Jerrio's group hasn't shown up at Central yet," Jagold said.  "Maybe they met more of these gulls?"

	"We're simply passing through," Pilate said.  "We had no idea that there were actual ponies living in this place.  When our leader saw fruit trees below, we decided to stop and stock up on supplies."  He gulped.  "Please, forgive us for intruding.  We meant no offense."

	"Offense?  Intruding?"  Sivrem laughed loudly.  "Does the gull know that Durandana's skies are free to all ponies, Valkyrie's flock or not?"

	"You mean..."  Ebon bit his lip.  "You don't want to tear us limb from limb?"

	"Hmmmm..."  Smythe trotted over, sniffed Ebon's mane, and smirked coyly.  "That remains to be seen."

	Ebon sweated nervously.  "Uhhhh..."

	"Relax, sailboat," Josho grumbled.  "These hippies strike me as harmless..."  Josho nevertheless batted two curious mares away.  "Among other annoying adjectives..."

	"Uhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh... guys?"

	Everypony looked over.

	By this point, the majority of the pegasi had flocked around Props, all forming a tight circle.  Several hooves poked/tapped her face, cheeks, leg muscles, and even her cutie mark.  She broke an awkward smile, giggling breathily.

	"Okay... okay!  Heehee!  That tickles!  Smokestacks!  You guys are really, really friendly, aren't you?"

	"By Valkyrie's shout!  She even sounds like silk."

	"Why doesn't a mare so airy have feathers?"

	"Is..."  One stallion batted at her dangling tail.  "...is it actual gold?"

	"Heeeeeeeeee!" Jagold leaned in, hovering upside down as she nuzzled-nuzzled her head deep into Props' mane.  "I could just sleep in this for daysssssss!"  The other pegasi chuckled and laughed.

	"Heehee!  I bet you could!" Props sing-songed.

	"Okaaaaaaaaaaaay..."  Zaid stealthily trotted his way in, ushering the tight circle of ponies to spread apart.  "Petting zoo hours are over.  For realsies, even birds build nests.  Personal space, much?"

	"Oh Zaidy waidy, they're only saying 'hello,'" Props said with a smirk.

	"I hate to see how'd they say 'good bye.'"

	One mare leaned in, sniffed Zaid, and pointed at him.  "This one smells like a leatherback cave!"

	"Hey!"  Zaid cackled.  "My mother was a saint!"

	Kera giggled.  "Isn't this awesome?"

	"That's an operative term," Josho mumbled.  His eyes scanned the eastern mists.  "Speaking of which..."

	"Our leader would be very... very interested in seeing you and your fellow ponies, Mr. Sivrem," Pilate said.  "Is there a chance you could... uhm... allow us a chance to meet up with our fellow friends again?"

	"If they are in Durandana, then I assure you that they are safe."

	"That... that's nice to know, but even still—"

	"You cannot mask your own scent that easily," Sivrem said with a smirk.  "Anxiety clings to you like a plague.  But don't worry.  I will send Smythe to fetch your friends.  His homing is a solid gift from the Valkyrie."  He whistled at the stallion in question.  "Go and seek the other outsiders, so that we may commune as one."

	"But Sivrem!"  Smythe winced slightly.  "First Light is upon us!"

	"Then these outer gulls shall bear witness and rejoice in the Gold Lights."

	"What will the Gray Feathers say?"

	"The Gray Feathers only need to know what we sing to them."  Sivrem winked, then chuckled.  "Now gust, already."

	"Yes, First Born."  Smythe leapt off the Noble Jury's side and glided out into the mists.  He whistled over his shoulder.

	"Whoops!"  Jagold backflipped and flew after him.  "He needs his wingpony."  She winked and blew a kiss at Props before diving out of sight along with three other pegasi.

	Zaid glanced at Jagold, then did a double-take at Props as the mare pleasantly waved back.  "Oye... I don't know whether to feel sick in the good or bad way."

	"Hold your eggshells in," Sivrem said, trotting leisurely across the top deck full of pegasi.  "And tell me more about the land beyond the greens."

	"Well, uhm..."  Ebon scratched his chin.  "There's a lot of death and mayhem and wars and—"

	"Ahem..."  Pilate calmly blushed aside and approached Sivrem with a smile.  "Allow me, Mr. Mane."

	"Fine.  Handle every multicultural first contact, then."

	"I believe I shall.  You, on the other hoof, can think about cooking them a complimentary meal."

	"Hoo boy..."  Josho groaned.  "Then they'll have a real excuse to go to war with us."

	"Hey!" Ebon squeaked.

	Kera and Props giggled.
		//------------------------------//
		// She Said "Flock This Way"		//------------------------------//

	"That is a most striking manestyle, Ms. Kitsune," Bellesmith said.  She then glanced at the other numerous pegasi gathered around the apple trees.  "May I ask what's inspired you and your friend Mr. Jerrio to color it so?"

	Kitsune's amber eyes twitched as her face contorted in confusion.  "For real...?"  She looked sharply at Rainbow Dash.  "You mean you haven't told her?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "Uhhhhhh..."

	"She's your friend, ain't she?"  Rayvinne giggled.  "And your name's 'Rainbow Dash' for crying out loud!  Heehee!"

	"Hey, one thing at a time!"  Rainbow curtsied with a smirk.  "It took them a long time to get used to my feathers!"

	"And a whole lot of bruises," Roarke droned.  Eagle Eye lightly swatted her forelimb without looking.  The mare's lips tightened.

	"But, y'know, one thing at a time!"  Rainbow turned to smile awkwardly at the winged ponies.  "Now I've... f-finally introduced them to you West Durangos!"

	"Durandanans, girl."

	"Whatever.  Just tell them the age-old mane story," Rainbow said with an air of sarcasm.  "If I do it one more time, I swear, my tongue will fall off."

	"Well, it's kind of boring, really," Kitsune said with a wry smirk thrown in Belle's direction.  "The First-Borns get to dye their manes as a sign of their higher allegiance to the Valkyrie.  It's all in her image, after all."

	Jerrio nodded and said, "The Gray Feathers teach us from the scrolls that they represent both the Valkyrie's natural colors as well as her fiery, righteous passion for defending Durandana from all that would try to corrupt the Gold Lights with—"

	"Blah blah blah blah..."  Rayvinne rolled her eyes, then flew in to nuzzle Kitsune cheek to cheek.  "What matters is that it's downright beautifullll."

	"Heehee... Please, Ray..."  Kitsune nudged back.  "Nothing beats your mane."

	"So... being First-Born makes you a leader?" Eagle Eye asked.

	"Pretty much, yes," Jerrio said.

	"Pffft!  Makes you 'lucky' is more like it," Rayvinne said.

	Jerrio frowned across the clearing at her while several pegasi chuckled and laughed.  "The Rite of the First-Born involves a great deal of wisdom and responsibility—"

	"Face it, Jerrio.  All that happened was you were squirted out first!"

	He stomped his hoof and snarled, "Come on, guys!  For real!"  They nevertheless laughed as he leaned back with folded ears.  "Hrmmmph... none of you would say this to Sivrem's face if he was here."

	"That's because, unlike you, he's friggin' handsome."

	"Yeah!  Hahahaha!"

	"Nnnnnngh..."  Jerrio face-hoofed, groaning.  He turned to the strangers.  "My apologies.  I imagine you all must have a ton of questions.  Valkyrie knows I do..."

	"Oh, naturally," Belle said with a nod.  "Though, to be perfectly honest, I'm a little worried about the rest of our friends."

	"Yeah..."  Eagle Eye trotted up.  "We had no idea that this place was populated with such incredible ponies!  If we're this surprised, then there's no telling how surprised the others may react."

	"The... others?" Jerrio asked, squinting.

	"They're perfectly harmless!" Belle insisted with a nervous smile.

	"Yeah!"  Eagle turned and pointed skyward.  "Why, we left them way up back there in the—"

	"In the cave!"  Rainbow's voice cracked as she flew in between the unicorn and the Durandanans.  She smiled nervously.  "High up... in the outer gr-greens, y'know!"

	"Uh huh..."

	"Rainbow, seriously..." Belle turned towards her.  "It's more than obvious that these pegasi are nothing but friendly."

	"Belle..."

	"I think it will make things all the better if we simply dropped the act and told them about the Noble Jury."

	"The Noble What?" Kitsune made an awkward face.

	"Hey!"  Smythe and Jagold touched down with a flurry of feathers.  A small group of bone-armored equine landed beside them as they approached Jerrio and the others.  "Guys!  You'll never guess what we saw back there!"

	"A giant slab of Valkyrie silver!" Jagold exclaimed.  "Suspended from crimson lights!  And it's full of ponies without wings or feathers or—"  She turned, her pupils shrinking upon the sight of the strangers in the group.  "...eggshells!"

	"Oh, hey!"  Smythe smirked.  "You found them!"

	"Huh?"

	"The others said that their 'leader' would be here with a whole group.  I guess you met the outsiders as well."

	Jerrio turned towards Rainbow Dash.  "You came in with another group?"

	"Heh..."  Rainbow brushed her mane back, blushing slightly.  "Guess there's no pulling the wool over your eyes."

	"I... don't get it," Kitsune murmured.

	"Look, I just didn't want to freak anypony out," Rainbow said, suppressing a giggle.  "It's hard enough—heehee—as it is trying to c-contain my own inner explosions, ya dig?"

	"Why?  Is there a reason for shovels?"  Rayvinne asked.

	"No.  It... that... unnngh..."  Rainbow face-hoofed while a few nearby pegasi giggled.

	"I think you're doing more harm than good, Rainbow," Roarke droned.

	"Oooooooh..."  Jagold trotted up, cooing.  "This one is made of Valkyrie silver..."  She raised a hoof to Roarke's braced flank.  "...and it talks."

	"It also does not like being touched!," Roarke hissed, several metal bands popping loose with errant sparks.

	"Eeep!"  Jagold zipped to the far end of an apple tree and hid, trembling.

	"Did you really have to do thatttt?" Eagle Eye sighed.

	"Yes..."  Roarke grunted, retracting the metal pieces while the gawking pegasi flinched from a distance.  "I did."

	"I'm a little confused..."  Smythe pointed Rainbow's way.  "Is she with these ponies?"

	"That would seem to be the case," Jerrio said.  He looked pointedly at Rainbow Dash.  "What I want to know is—how come you didn't bring this to the Gray Feathers?"

	"What's that, now?"

	"Wingless ponies?  Flying Valkyrie silver?  This has gotta be the most significant discovery of our lifetime!"

	"Not to mention the coolest," Kitsune sing-song'd.

	Jerrio sighed and continued, "Were you afraid that the Gray Feathers wouldn't approve?  You're First-Born.  You should know more than most ponies that they're not like that."

	"Actually... uhm..."  Rainbow Dash fidgeted nervously.  "I'm not exactly from around here either."

	"Awwwww... don't think you can fool us anymore, girl!"  Rayvine floated around Rainbow Dash, doing backwards "swim-strokes" through the air while grinning.  "You're slick, swift..."

	"You've got a gorgeous mane," Jagold said from a distance, but instantly hid back behind the tree when half the ponies glanced her way.

	"You're Durandanan through and through!"  Rayvinne giggled.  "Probably East D.  Central is too stiff for you."

	"Heh... heheh..."  Rainbow slicked her mane back and smirked.  "I dunno how to break it to ya... but I'm just as native to this place as my featherless buddies here.  Not that I don't mind all the kickflank flattery and—" She paused, glancing out the side of her vision.

	Bellesmith was smiling softly at her from afar.

	Rainbow blinked.  Her cheeks blushed a little.  "What?"

	"Either way, their friends up on the flying silver are a bit worried about them," Smythe said to Jerrio.  He smirked with perking ears.  "And Sivrem would absolutely love to meet the rest.  Then we can take them to see the Gray Feathers together!"

	"Uhm..."  Eagle Eye fidgeted, then raised a hoof.  "Now hold on one second..."

	"Yeah, one cloud burst at a time," Rainbow said, hovering a little higher.  "Who's this 'Sivrem' dude?"

	Jerrio was about to reply, when suddenly a loud metallic gong echoed against the earthen walls of the crater.  The very branches of the trees shook, and several birds flew out from their leafy hiding.  Instantly, he coiled his wings at his side and faced east.  "First Light.  The towers rise."

	"The Towers Rise," every pegasus said in perfect unison.  They whistled and chirped briefly between each other, then squatted low to the floor as one.  Each of them faced in one direction, their ears folded and their faces glazed with solemnity.  After whispering a few quiet words, they closed their eyes and stretched their wings outward—as if embracing the sunrise.

	"Uhhhh..."  Belle murmured, trotting nervously through the statuesque huddles of bowing ponies.  "What's going on?"

	"I... I-I dunno..."

	"Shhhh!" Eagle Eye insisted.

	The two mares looked at her.

	He gulped and whispered, "Isn't it obvious they're praying to something?"

	"Yeah... but what?"

	"Hrmmm..."  Roarke tilted her head up.  Something glinted off her lenses, and she murmured, "I think we're about to find out..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Off to See the Lights		//------------------------------//

	"You will certainly love Central!"  Sivrem said with a smirk.  "It's a magnificent city, run by the Gray Feathers and built by the Gray Feathers before them and the Gray Feathers before them."

	"Yes, and plenty of fruit and leatherback milk to go around!" another pegasus exclaimed.

	"Wait..."  Zaid tilted his head aside from where he stood on the Jury's top deck beside Props.  "You mean to say you milk those giant floating devil ray thingies?"

	"Yup!"  A winged mare said with a smirk.  "They provide us with nourishment and we provide them with protection from Durandana's elements!  Symbiosis with nature is the Valkyrie's way, after all..."

	"Plus," a stallion nodded and said, "The milk is delicious."  Several other pegasi chuckled and whistled in approval.

	"I see..."  Zaid rubbed his chin.  "So... ahem... it stands to reason th-that—"

	Before he could finish his sentence, an enormous gong echoed across the Crater.

	"Oh come on!" Zaid spun, frowning.  Props giggled as he spat, "What now?!"

	Sivrem produced an eagle's cry, lifting himself up high with a serious expression.  "The Tower Rises."

	"The Tower Rises"  Every pegasus lifted up, their faces as serious as the First-Born.

	"What is this, now?"  Zaid frowned.  "Batmare?"

	"Zaid, shhhh!" Ebon insisted, squinting nervously aside.  "They're going someplace—"

	Every pegasus flew over the edge, soaring down towards the jungle canopy below.

	"Where are they all going?!" Kera's voice cracked.

	"Hrmmmf... good riddance, Floydien says."

	"Handsome, please," Props said while trotting down the now-empty deck.  "Something must have spooked them!  They're not used to seeing the likes of Nancy, after all."

	"No, I-I think it's something else," Pilate muttered.  "Did you hear the seriousness in their voices?  It was a completely different tone."

	"Speaking of tones..."  Josho rubbed his chins, blinking.  "What was that loud noise just now?"

	"A dragon farting?" Kera squeaked.

	"Don't even g-go there," Ebon said with a shiver.

	"Uhhhhh..."  Floydien twitched, blinking high towards the eastern mists.  "Don't every boomer glimmer inside out, now..."

	"Why?  What is it?"  Props turned to look, then threw herself into Zaid's forelimbs with a shriek.  "Aaaackie!"

	"Whoah..." Kera cooed.

	Out of the jungled basin to the east, an enormous wooden structure spiraled its way skyward.  It rose at first like a drill, growing thinner and thinner as several helixes of wooden architecture locked in place.  At last—when the tower was at its thinnest—it ended in a bulbous egg-shaped hollow, with large gaping holes carved into its east and west sides.  Once it had reached its maximum height, the lantern-like structure swiveled ever so slightly, rotating its open sides in swaying motions.

	After staring so long, the Jurists could make out a pulsing beacon emanating from some distant position east of the tower.  At last, the golden beam made its way into the hollow at the top of the structure.  The light made contact with something deep in the center, and suddenly the light intensified, leaving a fiery bright laser of gold light shooting due west, slicing the air above the heads of every crewpony on board the Jury.

	"I'm at a loss," Pilate murmured, fidgeting.  "What is everypony murmuring about?"

	"Some sort of focused light is being funneled through the top of a stupidly tall wooden tower," Josho said, still blinking with wide eyes.  "The source of it appears to be due east."

	"Due east?"  Pilate's ears twitched in thought.  "Like... the Sun?"

	Floydien nodded.  "The walls of this mist hole are high enough to catch the glimmer shine at this time of day," the elk said.

	"Well put, handsome..."  Props climbed out of Zaid's grip, gulping.  "But why?  What for?"

	"Because it looks cool?" Kera remarked.

	"Pffft!  We all know that, adoracuddles!"



	Suddenly, the pegasi flew back up, hovering around the jury.  Their lips moved as they finished a collective mantra under their breaths.

	"...to secure and to protect the Gold Lights forever," Sivrem said, his grin slowly returning across the relaxed muzzle.  "So promise the—"



	"—foals of the Valkyrie forever," Jerrio and Kitsune murmured the loudest while the pegasi all around them gradually stood back up.  "From First-Born to Last."

	The rest of the winged ponies ended the mantra with several whoops, chirps, and cheers.

	Belle and Eagle Eye were gawking at the peak of the brightly-lit tower high above them.

	"At least now we know that they treasure something," Roarke said.

	"Huh?"  Rainbow glanced aside.

	Roarke gazed at her.  "A society that values something stands to lose that something."  Her brow furrowed.  "It's a key weakness we can exploit the moment they feel inspired to turn on us."

	"Roarke!"  Rainbow winced, glanced over her shoulder at the cheering pegasi, then leaned in to whisper.  "Will you keep your friggin' paranoid bounty hunter delusions to yourself for one bucking day?!  These ponies are not going to turn on us!"

	"It helps to be prepared, Rainbow," Roarke droned.  "After all, the predominating pattern of contact made with cultures during our flyby's have consisted of a fair shair of explosions."

	"Yeah, well, these guys aren't gonna explode us!"

	"And just how do you know that?"

	"They're pegasi for crying out loud!  They're not going to tear us limb from limb!  Life's too awesome to spend it with empty skies!"

	"I think you're making gross assumptions."

	"And I think you're a poo poo buckethead!"

	"Hey!"  Rayvinne craned her neck, grinning.  "What are you two lovers bickering about over there?"

	Roarke and Rainbow immediately spun, shuffling a foot-and-a-half apart.  "That gold!  It sure is... golden!  Yup!  Totally!"

	Bellesmith pointed up at the bright beam of light slicing through the misty air.  "Is that the gold lights that you speak of?"

	"Mmmmm..."  Jerrio shook his head, smiling.  "That is First Light.  In four hours, there will be Mid Light.  Then, eight hours from now, there will be Last Light."

	"That's qu-quite the schedule you Durandanans have made for yourselves," Eagle Eye said.  "Very elaborate."

	"It is not a construction of ours," Kitsune explained.  "The Gray Feathers before us built the towers, yes, but it is all to honor the Lights From Above."

	"Lights From Above?" Rainbow asked.

	Jagold giggled.  "The Sun, ya silly gull!"

	"Nothing other than the Righteous Lights that the Valkyrie and her foals owe their lives to," Jerrio said.  "The Gold Lights try to emulate the Lights From Above, but the Gold Lights are fragile and require the constant protection of the Valkyrie's children."

	"Oh really..."  Belle turned and gave Rainbow a silent look.  "How interesting..."

	Rainbow gulped.  She shook her saddlebag, causing the hilt of the Sword of Solstice to sink in deeper.  "So... uhm..."  Rainbow Dash squinted.  "There's more than one tower?"

	"Oh, totally!"  Rayvinne and Jagold flew up high, grinning in one accord.  "Would you like to go see them now?"

	"Don't forget about Sivrem," Smythe said.

	"Hey, enough standing around here!"  Rainbow Dash said.  "How about we kill two birds with one st—"  She instantly winced.  "Er, I mean, let's meet Sivrem and check out the towers along with my friends all in one go?  H-huh?"

	Eagle Eye face-hoofed while several pegasi laughed and chuckled.  Belle smiled, her giggles joining the fray.

	"Let's gust!"  Jerrio said, taking off with Smythe and Kitsune in tow.

	"There's no way we can catch up with them," Belle said.

	"I doubt they'd let us even if we tried."  Rainbow flapped her wings.  "I'll go on ahead and follow them to the Jury."  She turned and glanced down.  "Roarke?  Whizz it up?"

	Roarke groaned, her ears folded.  Motioning to Eagle and Belle, she turned around and trudged back towards where the Lounge sphere was parked.  "Whizzing away, Rainbow..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Stewards of the Green Basin		//------------------------------//

	"How fascinating..."  Sivrem nodded, then leaned forward, squinting at the golden pendant around Rainbow's neck.  "And the purpose of this piece of jewelry...?

	"Oh boy..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes, smirking.  She and Sivrem and several other pegasi flew meters ahead of the Noble Jury as they slowly glided east, following the steady beam of golden light piercing the misty heavens above.  "I could write a book on what the Element of Loyalty means and does."

	"Then why don't you?"

	"Pffft.  Too busy flying east to do novels, dude."

	"But how is that possible?"  Sivrem cocked his head aside in mid-flight.  "You'd eventually run into the end of the greens."

	"Eheh..."  Rainbow tossed her mane and smirked.  "I may have been a bit coy at first, but—for real, buddy—I'm not from around here.  I flew in from someplace beyond the crater."

	"From beyond Durandana?"  Sivrem's muzzle scrunched.  "I may be willing to believe that about your outsider friends.  But you?"  He pointed.  "You have the Valkyrie's colors written all over you.  You even have the mane of a First Born!"

	"Yeah... about that..."  Rainbow cleared her throat.  "I didn't do any dying or coloring or nothin'."  She fluffed her mane with a weak smile.  "This is about as real as it gets, dude."

	"Hah!"  Sivrem smirked.  "You certainly have the Durandanan sense of humor."

	Kitsune flew backwards in front of the two.  "Heheheh!  As if somepony could be born with something that gorgeous."

	"Call it what you want!  But it's the Real McColt!"  Rainbow blinked.  "I promise!"

	"One thing I wanna know..."  Jagold flew up, hovering alongside Kitsune.  "Just how do you condition it."

	"Nnnngh..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "Same as any pegasus!  Rainwater, sunlight, and lots and lots of wind."

	"Heehee... cute..."  Jagold stuck her tongue out.  "But you're not convincing anypony."

	"Alright, think of it this way..."  Rainbow pointed back at the Noble Jury.  "Before today, you never saw or even imagined a big hunk of... errrr... 'Valkyrie silver' flying on its own, huh?"

	"Well..."

	"And what about ponies without wings or feathers, huh?"  Rainbow grinned devilishly.  "Or lavender stallions with horns that can make stuff float?"

	"She has a point there," Smythe said, flying up alongside the rest of the group.  He smiled pleasantly.  "Strange things have happened before. Remember the time when the Lights From Above refused to light the beacons?"

	"I don't see how that's related," Sivrem said, fidgeting in mid-air.

	"The point is, nopony could understand what happened that day," Smythe remarked.  "But then the Gray Feathers explained that records show it had transpired before."

	"But how can the Gray Feathers explain this?" Sivrem remarked.

	"Pffft.  What's to explain?"  Rayvinne flew in and nuzzled Rainbow in mid-flight.  "Heehee!  She's the most awesome thing to have gusted our way in years!"

	"Eh heheheh..."  Rainbow gulped, her cheeks slightly flushed.  "Seriously, though, my buddies and I were just passing on through.  We're on our way to Val Roa."

	"Val Roa?" Kitsune asked, squinting.  "Who's that?"

	Rainbow stared at her blankly.  "You seriously haven't heard anything about Val Roa?"

	The pegasi flying closest to her stared in dumb silence.

	"Or what about Alafreo?"

	More awkward silence amidst the winds.

	Rainbow gulped.  "Erm... oceans?"

	"Oceans..."  Kitsune tapped her muzzle.  "Are those anything like forests?"

	"Yes."  Jagold nodded with a happy grin.  "Because we know all about forests!"

	"Hooooooo boy..."  Rainbow stared ahead with drooping ears.  "This is gonna be a tough one..."

	"Perhaps you can humor us, Rainbow Dash."  Jerrio flew down, staring at her with a curious smirk.  "Just what kind of a world exists beyond the greens?"

	"You mean none of you have seriously tried flying past it to find out?"  Rainbow grimaced.  "Don't tell me it's 'forbidden' or some crap."

	"Heh... hardly," Jerrio said.  "The winds are simply too chaotic for any pony to fly past them."

	Rainbow blinked.  "For real?"  She turned and squinted past her shoulders at the barely discernible edges of the Sky Stabs.  "Huh... must be from all of the rising thermals and stuff."

	"Plus, there's a lot of nasty cold stuff that slams into your face everytime you try it!" Rayvinne exclaimed.

	"What?"  Rainbow turned towards her.  "You mean like snow?"

	Rayvinne's eyes twitched.  "Snow...?"

	"Several ponies try and fly past the greens," Jerrio said.  "None have succeeded."

	"Oh?"

	"Every First Born tries it," Rayvinne said.  "It's something of a tradition.  Heehee... not to mention a pretty wicked stunt."  She turned towards Kitsune.  "Isn't that right, K?"

	Kitsune rolled her eyes.  "I certainly didn't enjoy the flu I battled with for a month afterwards."

	Rainbow winced.  "Yowch... talk about a rite of passage."

	"Heh, sometimes we get bored in the basin."

	"Jee..."  Rainbow pivoted her head to gawk at the jungles and ravines below.  "I can't imagine how..."

	"Sivrem almost made it through!" Smythe exclaimed.

	"I did not," Sivrem grumbled, his bone necklace rattling.

	"You totally did!"  Smythe chuckled.  "You were up there for half-a-day, zig-zagging through the currents—longer than any First Born on record!"

	"The Gray Feathers have been lazy with their bookkeeping as of late."

	"Hah hah hah... come onnnnnn, Sivrem!  Enough with the eggshells..."

	"There was a time when I felt it was my duty to pierce the winds beyond the greens," Sivrem said.  "That was years ago, and I've since taken on my duty as a First-Born."

	"You seem to be doing a pretty swell job of it," Rainbow said, glancing back at the Jury.  "My buddies tell me that you saved our ship from being smacked to bits by flying fish monsters."

	"The leatherbacks are a treasure of Durandana," Jerrio said, brow furrowed.  "We provide for them, and they provide for us."

	"In fact, this entire basin is a blessed treasure," Sivrem said, nodding.  "Once I grew old enough to recognize that, I put away my more adventurous ideas and committed my life to honoring the Valkyrie's legacy."

	"Which is fitting," Jerrio said with a nod.  "Seeing as you'll be a Gray Feather before me."

	"Huh?"  Rainbow blinked.

	"You've only got two years left, Sivrem!"  Rayvinne said.  "That beats Jerrio by nearly four!  Heehee!"

	Jerrio sighed.  "Must you rub it in?"

	"So, you mean you guys become Gray Feathers someday?" Rainbow asked.

	Kitsune smiled.  "Only the First-Borns, such as Sivrem, Jerrio, and... erm... myself..."

	Rainbow squinted.  "How come you don't exactly sound too excited about that?"

	"Yes, well..."  Kitsune rolled her eyes and smirked.  "Gone will be the days of flying, homing, herding, and making love."

	"I'm down with at least two of those," Rainbow said, then gulped.  "Still, that kinda stinks.  Sorry to hear it."

	Everypony laughed loudly around the mare.

	"Are you kidding?"  Kitsune smiled.  "Being a Gray Feather means having the honor of maintaining the scrolls."  She stared up at the beam of light looming overhead.  "All of my life, I've admired the legacy of the Valkyrie.  It'll be an honor to serve her in a higher regard."

	"Well, guess that's a good thing then."  Rainbow bit her lip, then stared at the passing vegetation below.  "This 'Valkyrie' character is pretty big, huh?"

	"You really... really don't know who she is, do you?"  Jerrio remarked.

	Rainbow opened her mouth, hesitated, and eventually said.  "No."  She adjusted the weight of her saddlebag.  "But I'd be totally willing to learn."

	"The Gray Feathers would love to tell you all about it."

	Rainbow chuckled.  "Can't you guys tell me?"

	"Sure," Jagold said with a nod, then giggled.  "But not as well as the Gray Feathers can!"

	"Only know that she was the most awesome pony to have ever lived," Sivrem said in a proud tone.  "And she and her fellow warriors gave their lives to protect the Gold Lights and all the realms beyond."

	"You don't say..."  Rainbow took a deep breath and stared ahead of their flight.  "Sounds like a kick-flank tale for sure..."

	"But one thing at a time."  Rayvinne smirked.  "I swear, you are going to gust inside out once you see West D!"

	"Heh... can't wait..."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Tower of West Durandana		//------------------------------//

	Bellesmith stared off the bow of the Noble Jury, and she was smiling.  As the wind kicked at her short chestnut mane, she glanced at the various pegasi escorting the skystone ship, then trotted about and made her way into the cockpit.  There, Pilate, Eagle Eye, and Roarke stood behind Floydien.  Beyond the windshield, lusch jungles and misty treetops loomed.  Far ahead, the beacon of light pulsed with platinum brilliance.

	"It truly is a paradise," Bellesmith said, leaning in to nuzzle her mate.  "I truly wish you could see it for yourself, beloved."

	"Heh..."  Pilate smirked.  "From what I've heard and smelled, it's already shaping up to be quite lovely."  He turned his head towards her.  "And who's to say?  With the work you're doing on O.A.S.I.S., maybe I can see some of it soon."

	"Just a bunch of jungles and mist," Roarke grunted, forelimbs crossed.  Her lenses retracted beneath a furrowed brow.  "Nothing much worth seeing."

	"What's the matter, Roarke?"  Eagle Eye glanced back, smiling.  "You shudder at the sight of any landscape that hasn't been blasted to bits by manafire?"

	"If that is some thinly veiled reference to my ambivalence towards Foxtaur, you are misguided, Eagle Eye."

	The stallion giggled.

	Roarke's ears twitched.  "What is so humorous?  I was being sincere."

	"I know!"  He wiped his eye and smirked.  "And you didn't call me 'breeder.'"

	Roarke simply fidgeted where she stood.

	"If metal munching boomer has something to spit than she should spit it," Floydien blurted.

	The other ponies looked at Roarke.

	She groaned and said, "I'm simply wary of how swiftly Rainbow Dash has made herself available to the accomodations of these backward strangers."

	"I wouldn't exactly call them 'backwards,' Roarke," Bellesmith said.  "Misinformed, perhaps, but that's to be expected.  They've lived as an isolated society for Spark-knows how long.  That being said, they seem to be doing remarkably for themselves."

	"Am I the only one who's witnessed them pawing all over random members of the Jury?" Roarke remarked.

	"Erm..."  Eagle Eye bit his lip.  "They did seem rather fond of Props."  He gulped.  "And Ebon," he added hoarsely.

	"I think it's too early for us to make a passing judgment," Pilate said.  "Besides, from what I hear, the mares of Searo weren't exactly shy about personal space either."

	"That's a gross exaggeration," Roarke droned.

	"Yeah."  Eagle muttered aside.  "Usually you just killed everypony before you could so much as nuzzle them."

	Roarke ignored that, instead choosing to mutter, "I just don't like this."

	"What about this, exactly?" Belle asked.

	"Everything about it."  Roarke's lenses whirred as she stared fixedly out the windshield.  "Rainbow is letting her guard down way too easily."

	"What?"  Belle smiled.  "You think Rainbow has to headbutt and dropkick every culture she runs into in her travels?"

	"It's helped her a great deal."

	Belle chuckled.  "Oh Roarke... if only you knew Rainbow as much as I did."

	The metal mare twitched slightly, but was silent.

	Belle went on, "The bulk of her collective memories still swim in my head.  In Windthrow, Emeraldine, Silvadel—almost every kingdom or township she stumbled upon, she was always trading smiles and exchanging fist-bumps first.  Only because of dire circumstances did she ever pick up the habit of having to buck first and ask questions later."

	"You've almost exclusively witnessed her during her travels in Ledomare and Xona," Pilate said.  "It's easy to get the wrong impression.  If it weren't for Bellesmith's sequencing or our collectively shared exposure to our dear friend—we'd make that same assumption about her too."

	"That's not the crux of the issue," Roarke said.

	"Then what is?"  Eagle asked.

	"Rainbow has established herself as being responsible for not only this ship—but the fulfillment of her journey," Roarke explained.  "That being said, I think it's rather obvious to everypony that her thoughts still dwell on the home she left months and months ago."

	"And now that she's meeting pegasi who aren't zombified abominations for once, you think she's somehow..."  Belle raised an eyebrow.  "...waxing nostalgic?"

	"To her detriment, yes."

	"Hah hah hah!"  Eagle Eye slapped his knee and grinned at Roarke.  "You just can't stand to see Rainbow Dash happy, do you?"

	"Excuse me...?"

	"It must not compute with Roarke Most Rare!"

	"There is nothing wrong with her being happy," Roarke said.  With another sigh, she glared out the windshield.  "Being happy and dumb is another thing."

	"Roarke, she's with flying ponies," Belle said with a sweet grin.  "Flying ponies who don't want kill her... or any of us for that matter!"

	"Mrmmmf..."  Roarke's nostrils flared.  "That remains to be seen."

	"Metal boomer's spit is a glimmer too sour," Floydien mused.

	"Hmmm?"  Roarke's ears twitched.

	"How about that..."  Pilate smirked.  "It's a unique statement when Mr. Floydien calls out another pony on her paranoia."

	"I don't know about you, but I'd rather suffer a warrior's death in a place that's not a giant toilet overgrown with weeds," Roarke muttered, then shimmied down the crawlspace.  "If you'll be needing me—which I assume you won't—I'll be in the hangar, doing maintenance on Whiz—grrghhhhhhgraaaugh... on the Lounge transport."

	The cockpit lingered in silence after the departure of the metal mare.

	"What do you suppose has her so anxious?" Pilate remarked.

	"Perhaps these mist mists threaten to rust the boomer's braces," Floydien said.

	"No, I think it's something else," Belle said.

	"Like what?" Eagle asked.

	Belle blinked... then blinked again.  She bit her lip, wincing slightly.  "I'm... almost afraid to guess."

	Just then, Zaid and Props shimmed up, barely squeezing themselves into the cramped cockpit.

	"Guys!" Zaid exclaimed, then glance at Eagle.  "...and dolls!"

	"Hey!" Eagle pouted.

	"You'll never guess what's up ahead!" Zaid beamed.  He pointed to the base of the giant wooden tower.  "Kera saw it first through the observation room windows!"

	"What is it?" Belle asked, craning her neck.

	"Only the zaniest and sexiest of treehouses ever!" Props said, giggling.

	"Hrmmff..."  Floydien muttered as he slowed the forward motion of the Noble Jury, gazing at the array of structures below.  "Now that's a lot of twigspace.  Yes yes yes..."



	Rainbow Dash's eyes sparkled.  Before her, the air was buzzing with dozens if not hundreds of pegasi, several of them flying in packs, several more in lone, spiraling patterns.  Not a single one of them flew in a manner that wasn't remotely graceful.  Every curve of the wing and flick of the tail was done in nimble showmanship and joyful flair.  Many of the pegasi seemed too busy enjoying the thrill of the moment to even take notice of the strange, sky-colored pegasus being flown in by Sivrem's entourage, or the hulking skystone vessel puttering after them for that matter.

	Several whoops and eagle shrieks sounded off below the mare.  Rainbow looked down, and she instantly dazzled at numerous wooden domes built into the jungle canopy.  Wooden houses curled and twisted like beautiful nautilus shells, with windows and smokestacks bespeckling every curve.  There were no ladders or bridges or platforms or anything else to provide hoofed access between the structures.  A plentiful smattering of balconies and ledges dotted the buildings, and pegasi proceeded to leap off of these and carry their business to the far reaches of the forest.

	Towards the lower end of the wooden tower, along the part of the shaft where the vertical sections began extending, several round platforms had been constructed.  Crude wooden shacks and buildings populated these platforms, allowing for the semblance of a central "courtyard" that hugged the circumference of the structure.  Here, the bulk of the pegasi who weren't flying were located, along with several older equines whose wings weren't quite as strong as the athletic Durandanans who had met Rainbow Dash and her friends an hour ago.

	Rainbow Dash turned and waved a signal at the Noble Jury.  Floydien guided the ship to a stop, hovering several dozens of meters away from the Tower.  It was then that most of the locals had finally taken notice of the strange ship in their midst.  Dozens of pegasi spun playful circles around the ship, gliding by the portholes and cockpit windows as they stared in amazement.  Several chirps and shrill cries flew between them.

	In the meantime, Sivrem and his flock descended to the uppermost platform circling the tower.  Rainbow Dash swiftly followed suit, landing on the edge and marveling at the thick group of equines landing down and crowding around her.  At this location, the golden beacon of the tower above cast a dim platinum shine that brought a shiny gloss to every pegasus' coat.  At random points, Rainbow spotted dyed multi-colored manes.  However, it was getting harder and harder to see as more and more pegasi shuffled up.

	"Sivrem!" A mare said, trotting up with a group of winged equines, the bulk of them wearing charms, earrings, and earrings made out of bird bones.  "You've returned early!"

	"Mmmmm... that I have."  Sivrem leaned in and gave her a passionate kiss, their wings stretching forward until their feathers touched.  Then, without hesitation, he smiled and did the same to the stallion next to her.  After a shared chuckle, the three nuzzled as one, then took a step apart.  "You'll never guess who and what I found at First Light."  He turned and gestured towards the pegasus.  "Fellow ponies, I bring you Rainbow Dash!"

	Rainbow blinked.  She cleared her throat and coiled her wings tightly at the side before waving at the mass of gawking pegasi.  "Hi there, sky guys.  How's it hoofin'?"

	"She says she's from beyond the greens," Sivrem said, his eyes bright.  His brow furrowed as he added in a raspy tone, "And she's brought friends with her!  Ponies... without feathers!"

	The entire crowd gasped.

	"No way!"

	"By Valkyrie's shout!"

	"No ponies live beyond the greens, First Born!  You know that!"

	"I only know what I can see!" Sivrem said.  "Feast your own eyes, if you can't be feathered to believe, gulls!"  He turned and pointed at the Noble Jury.  "Valkyrie silver!  It flies by its own Gold Sights!"

	"Whoah..."

	"Could it really be beyond the mists?"

	Jerrio cleared his throat.  "Please, Sivrem.  What Rainbow and her companions have is quite amazing, but there's no good to come out of attributing the Gold Lights to it."

	"Jerrio, don't tell us you haven't see what we've seen!" Rayvinne exclaimed.  She turned and grinned ecstatically at the crowd.  "Some of Rainbow's friends have horns that glow!  Like the Gold Lights!  And they can make fruit and other ponies float with their mind!"

	Murmurs and gasps echoed amongst the group.

	"And they have a large pony!" Jagold said, trembling slight.  "With br-branches coming out of his head!  And the branches shoot lightning!"

	More gasps, even as Smythe was stammering, "And a pony with shiny eyes who expresses her anger with Valkyrie silver!"

	"Heheh... come onnnnn..."  Rainbow chuckled, waving a hoof.  "Roarke isn't that bad—"

	"Sivrem, how do you know you and your feathered flock of gulls aren't making this all up?"  One from the crowd smirked.  "Eggshells, I say!"

	"Yeah!"  Another pointed at Rainbow.  "She's probably just some pretender from East D!  Look at her mane!  No First Born pony has ever pulled off a mane that amazing!"

	"That's because I'm willing to bet none of you ponies were born with this flickering piece of awesomeness!"  Rainbow Dash said with a smirk.  "Or given a wicked sick pendant to spread harmony with..."  She rubbed her hoof against her necklace, summoning a ruby glow that instantly stole the breath out of the crowd.  "Or..."  She kicked off the wooden platform and flapped her wings.  "...mastered the finest art of weather flying that only the schools in Cloudsdale could hope to come close to!"

	Then, holding her breath, Rainbow Dash zipped up to the neck of the tower, pivoted, and spun around the thing ten times in the span of five seconds.  Through sheer speed alone, she appeared as a solid streak of colors in the air.  When she came to a stop, a miniature clap of thunder echoed around her, flouncing her mane around a devilish grin.

	The pegasi immediately cheered and whooped with avian shrieks.  Several of them flew up and hovered around Rainbow, touching her mane, her tail, and staring up close at her pendant.

	"Valkyrie's shout!"

	"She's like the living sky!"

	"I've never seen a First-Born fly that fast!  Not even you, Sivrem!"

	"Alright, alright..."  Sivrem waved his hoof, chuckling.  "So she has skills... skills she may have learned from beyond the greens."  He smirked.  "But let's not smother our new friend.  Let's also be courteous to her, as our elders would want.  After all... for all of her marvels... she and her friends appear to be strangely ignorant of the Valkyrie."

	"Uhm... y-yeah..."  Rainbow gulped, sweating slightly.  "About that... uhm..."

	Woosh!  Jagold flew up and beamed in Rainbow's face.  "I know just what you're thinking!  And don't worry!"  She threw a hoof around Rainbow's shoulder and nuzzled her tightly.  "Heeheehee!  We'll teach you all about the Valkyrie!  Ohhhhhhh... what tale to share first?  The one where she defeats the wind ghosts?  The one where she stabs and bleeds the sky?"

	"Oh!"  Smythe spoke up.  "How about the one where she defeated the goat demon?"

	"Defeating a goat demon..."  Rainbow gulped, feeling the weight of the pendant around her throat.  "Sounds... pr-pretty awesome..."

	"Jagold..."  Kitsune spoke through a wry smirk.  "Sivrem said no smothering."

	"Eeep!"  Jagold parted ways with Rainbow, hugging herself and blushing.  "My b-bad, First Born."

	"Heheh... no problem..."

	"Sivrem, I think we should go about bringing Rainbow Dash to Central," Jerrio said.  "The Gray Feathers would love to see her, and perhaps they'd be the best ones to explain to her the ways of the Valkyrie—"

	"Jerrio, you silly gull!"  Sivrem slapped the stallion's back and chuckled merrily.  "Why the hurry?  It's only First Light of a new day!  And if Rainbow and her friends are truly outsiders, then it's our place to give them the finest feathered welcome Durandana can afford!"  Sivrem turned and shrieked towards the skies.  Everypony hovering tightly around the Noble Jury turned down to glance at him.  "Brothers!  Sisters!  Fetch milk from the leatherback stables and fruit and meat from the storehouses!  We shall have a feast like there hasn't been held since the days the Valkyrie sliced her feathers across the Dawnlight!"

	Everypony cheered, immediately flying every which way.

	"Sivrem... but... that..."  Jerrio face-hoofed, sighing.

	Rainbow Dash leaned in, smiling.  "If it's any consolation, I feel ya."  She whispered, "I'm actually not all that hungry..."

	"Heh..."  Jeerio smirked tiredly at her.  "For what it's worth, thanks."

	"For what it's worth, you're welcome," she winked.  Jagold flew down and nuzzled her again.  "Duahhhhhhh!"
		//------------------------------//
		// A Feast For the Birds		//------------------------------//

	"Eat up, little one!" Rayvinne said, plopping a wooden bowl of dried insects onto the table before Kera.  "They were twitching as of ten minutes ago!"

	Kera gasped, her jaw hanging wide.  She tilted her tattooed face up, eyes sparkling.  "You mean... you guys actually catch and serve dragonflies here?"

	"Mmmhmmm!"  Rayvinne grinned.  "If the local fowl can eat them, then why can't ponies?"

	"This is officially the best... crater... ever!"  Kera practically shoved her muzzle into the bowl and began scarfing away.

	"Erm... n-not too fast, darling," Bellesmith said, patting Kera's shoulder.  "You don't want to get a... erm... thorax stuck in your throat."

	Rayvinne giggled.  She fluttered over and sat at the table across from Belle and Pilate.  The meal was being served inside a long wooden hall built atop one of the center platforms.  The curved wooden body of the tower ate into the interior's frame.  Dangling lanterns full of lightning bugs illuminated the rustic interior from above while the Noble Jurists and several Durandanans sat, ate, and chatted merrily.

	"You're quite protective of the filly," Rayvinne remarked.  "Are you an instructor?"

	"Hmmm?"  Belle looked up from where she was biting onto an apple.  She gulped the bits down and said, "You mean as in a teacher?"

	"Funny you should ask," Pilate spoke up with a proud smirk.  "She used to teach extensively as a professor back in Mountainfall."

	"Is that located in... Lead's Mare?"

	"Heh... Ledomare," Belle corrected.  "And my beloved gives me too much credit.  I was mostly performing science experiments with the goal of expanding Ledomaritan physics within the region.  I only occasionally taught other ponies on the side."

	"But never foals?" Rayvinne remarked.

	"At the time, I wouldn't have imagined it.  But these days, I'd say I'm rather fond of the idea."  She smiled at Kera.  "Kera, here, we found in a city called Blue Nova.  She was estranged from her original family, so we took her under our own wing... mmm... as it w-were.  We've been inseparable ever since."

	"I imagine a long voyage together creates a strong bond," Rayvinne said.

	"Oh, absolutely," Belle said with a nod.  She chuckled lightly.  "These days, I swear, more and more ponies make the assumption that we're mother and child.  I'm surprised you didn't do the same."

	Rayvinne cocked her head to the side.  "Mother...?"  She blinked, then giggled.  "We all only have one mother."

	Pilate's ears twitched.  "Do you mean that figuratively, or...?"

	"We owe our lives and our legacies to the Valkyrie," Rayvinne said.  She gestured with one hoof while grasping a wooden mug full of milk with another.  "She gave us both life and purpose.  Durandana—the staging ground of her righteous will—has been ours to protect, populate, and enjoy for as long as our feathers can carry us."

	"Just how many families live here, approximately?"  Pilate asked.

	"Mmmff..."  Rayvinne finished her sip of milk, swallowed, and said, "One, of course."

	"One family?" Pilate asked.

	"Yes.  Foaled from one mother—the Valkyrie—as I've stated before."

	"But then... then..."  Belle's eyes narrowed.  "You don't have a father and... a-and a mare whom you call you parents?"

	"Hehehe..."  Rayvinne's feather's twitched as she smiled.  "There was a mare to gave birth to me, of course.  What?  Did you think that all Durandanans believed they sprouted out of the tree branches?"  She slapped the tabletop and laughed.

	Pilate and Belle laughed weakly, squirming in their seats.

	"Ahem..."  Rayvinne tapped her chin.  "Hmmmm... her name is Ferlanna, I believe, and she lives somewhere in Central D.  I was her fifth-born... or sixth. Eh, whatever the case, I wasn't the First-Born, but it's just as well."  She smirked.  "I'm not giving up my flight and fun for scrolls anytime soon!"

	"And..."  Pilate leaned forward, his metal brow furrowed.  "...your father?"

	"Heh... how am I to know?"  Rayvinne shrugged.  "Could have been any one stallion... or any three, if some of the stories of Lower Central can be believed."  She leaned over and nudged another pegasus sitting next to her.  "Am I right?  Hee hee hee!"

	"Hah hah hah hah!"

	"Oh... uhm..."  Belle gulped, trying her best not to grimace.  "That's... uhm..."

	"Quite fascinating!" Pilate managed.

	"Braaaaaaaaaak!"  Kera belched, then grinned up at her foster parents with a gossamer wing or two sticking out of her muzzle.  "Isn't this place super?"

	Pilate reached over blindly and patted her mane.  "It's certainly taking my breath away..."

	Several seats away, another cluster of Jurists sat.  Ebon Mane was busy examining the bowls resting in his hooves.

	"The size of these melons is amazing!" Ebon exclaimed.

	"Heehee... Don't flatter them so hard, Ebony!" Props said between bites of cabbage.

	"And they're so ripe too!"  Ebon gawked at the others.  "You think that the remoteness of this location allows for larger fruit and produce?  I mean, it's not like the crater has too much ecological competition going on!"

	"I don't really give a crap," Josho said, his chin already battered in crumbs and juices.  "Mrmmmmf... if it goes down my throat and can come out the other end without killing me, then I'm good."

	"Oh, if only that was true of everything that was shoveled your way, old stallion," Zaid said.

	Props giggled.  "Good one!  High hoof!"

	"Give it to me, blondie!"  Zaid and Props slapped their hooves while Josho groaned.  "Now..."  Zaid glanced around, fidgeting.  "If I could just find some ketchup, for the love of Goddess..."

	"Seriously..."  Ebon cooed.  "A single basket of these things could feed the Jury for a month!"  He glanced aside with eyes sparkling.  "You think they'll let us take some with us?"

	"Heh... if they see how much it makes your day, Ebon, then I'm absolutely sure of it," Eagle said with a warm smile.

	"Erm... s-sorry..."  Ebon blushed, dropping the fruit back down into a larger bowl in the middle of the table.  "I guess I get too excited when it comes to foodstuffs."

	"Hey, nothing to be sorry for," Eagle said between bites of roasted poultry.  "Food and cooking food is your life blood."

	"Mmmm..." Ebon smiled, his cheeks slightly red.  "It's worked out for me so far."

	Eagle glanced down at Ebon's side of the table.  The stallion's plate was completely empty.  Eagle was about to say something, but he stopped himself.  He glanced nervously at the other Jurists around the table, but they were all too busy eating.

	Just then, Smythe flew in and sat down across from Eagle and the rest.  "Sorry I'm late," he said.  He leaned over towards the stallion beside his seat.  Both kissed on the lips, briefly brushing feathers before nuzzling each other and sitting straight before their plates.  "I had to check on the stables.  One of the young calves had gotten out and knocked over the storage containers."

	"Heh... ever Sivrem's errand colt, eh, Smythe?"

	"Yes, well..."  Smythe smirked wryly.  "He pays well..."

	"Hah hah!  I bet he does!"

	"Heh heh heh!"  The pegasi all nudged and patted each other before digging into their meals.

	Eagle stared at the stallions sitting across from him.

	"Eagle...?"

	The ex-mercenary barely blinked.

	"Eagle?"  Ebon leaned in, looking worried.  "Is everything alright?"

	"Hmmm?"  Ebon glanced at him.  "Oh, yes... I was just..."  Eagle sighed, his ears folding.  "I was just thinking..."

	"About what?"

	"When I first joined Crimson's company, I had hoped to make my father proud of me," Eagle said.  "But I eventually had to wake up to the truth.  He would never accept me for who I was..."  He gulped.  "And for who I chose to love."

	Ebon nodded quietly.  "I remember you telling me..."

	"So, when Rainbow Dash and her friends flew into my life, the Noble Jury became a means of escape."  Eagle exhaled out his nostrils.  "And the chance for a new life.  An opportunity to find a place where... well..."  He gazed down at his plate, picking at his food.  "A place where I could live as I was meant to and not feel like I was despised for it."

	"Oh..."  Ebon glanced at the amorous pegasi sitting across from them.  Chewing on his lip, he glanced aside.  "Well... m-maybe this is it, Eagle.  For all we know, maybe this is the sort of place you could call home."

	Eagle chuckled dryly... then chuckled some more.

	Ebon glanced at him, ears twitching.  "What's so funny?"

	"'Funny' isn't the word for it.  'Comforting,' perhaps."

	Ebon simply stared.

	Eagle smiled warmly at him.  "I haven't felt that need to 'find a home' in—like—forever.  I think it's because, for the last few months, I've felt truly happy... as if I finally had what I was looking for."

	"Heh..."  Ebon grinned.  "Good thing you stumbled upon the Jury, huh?"

	Eagle reached over and placed his hoof atop Ebon's.  "Who said anything about the Jury?"

	Ebon blinked.  He then smiled, his eyes misty.

	Eagle smiled back.  The two stallions leaned their muzzles together—

	"Ketchup!"  Zaid's forelimb bumped wildly past them, snatching a bowl from the table.  "Finally!  Thank you!"

	Ebon and Eagle wobbled on their bench, struggling not to fall to the wooden floor.  Both stallions sighed, then chuckled between themselves.

	Several seats away, Rainbow Dash watched as a bowl was slid right in front of her.

	"There you have it!"  Kitsune said before sitting down beside Sivrem and Jerrio.  All three First-Borns smiled across the table at Rainbow.  "Flying squirrel meat!  Spiced with pepper and honey roasted."  She winked.  "Just like we promised..."

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow's wings drooped as she leaned... leaned... leaned away from the meaty morsels.  "Whew..."  She glanced down the table.  "Praise Luna that Floydien decided to stay on board the ship along with Roarke."

	"Is something the matter?" Sivrem asked, eyebrow raised.

	"It's my fault for not giving you guys that big of a hint earlier, but..."  Rainbow gulped and slid the bowl towards them with a nervous smile.  "I'm what you would call... uhhh... an anti-meatatarian."

	Jerrio's brow furrowed.  "You don't eat the lesser creatures of the sky?"

	"Where I come from, pegasi consider all creatures to be equal," Rainbow said with a grin.  "We are sentinels of the land, sea, and air.  It's our job to look after nature.  So... to eat the flesh of animals is a total no-no, since it contradicts all of that."

	"How fascinating," Sivrem said, smiling.

	"Eh..."  Kitsune shrugged.  "Suit yourself."  She then thrust her muzzle into the bowl and scarfed down a heavy helping of rodent meat.

	Rainbow tried not to throw up.  She shaded her right eye with a hoof and gazed away from Kitsune.  "I-I think I'll just stick to the greens," she said with a cracking voice.

	"All of your friends participate in eating meat," Sivrem said, pointing down the long table.  "And yet, you do not?"

	"Please, Sivrem," Jerrio droned, preparing his own plate.  "She's made her point.  Don't feather her about it."

	"Nah, it's okay," Rainbow said, clearing her throat.  "As I flew east across the world, it became obvious to me that several cultures like to do things their own way.  I'm just one pony from a land with its own rules, so why bug other ponies about stuff that doesn't click with me?"

	"Hmmm... if the world outside of Durandana is truly as vast as you make it seem, then it helps to have such openness of mind," Sivrem said.  "You undoubtedly have the soul of a traveler."

	"Yeah, well... y'know..."  Rainbow lazily plucked a head of broccoli from her plate and balanced it on her nose.  "I get around."

	"And what a fortuitous circumstance it was that brought you here," Sivrem said with a smirk.  "No doubt the Valkyrie willed it."

	Jerrio's eyes darted towards him.

	Rainbow thrust her muzzle up, flipped the piece of broccoli into the air, and scarfed it on the way down.  "Mrmmmmf..."  She gulped.  "No offense, but—like—isn't the Valkyrie dead?"

	"Ah, perhaps, but her spirit endures.  Her purpose and her command is embodied in all of us!"  Sivrem reached over and caressed Kitsune's mane.  "As well as her passion and joy."

	"Nnngh..."  Kitsune batted his hoof away.  "How many times do I gotta tell you?"  She gulped squirrel meat down and smirked devilishly.  "Not during a feast.  You'll only belch in my face!"

	"I do not—ulp—belch!"

	Kitsune and a few nearby pegasi laughed.

	Rainbow chuckled.  "I would... uh... like to know more about the Valkyrie."  She leaned forward, ruby eyes squinting.  "As well as the Gold Lights."

	"And I'd be happy to tell you—" Sivrem began.

	"I think..." Jerrio leaned in.  "...that would be something best related by the Gray Feathers in person."

	"You forget, Jerrio," Sivrem said, squinting mischievously at him.  "I am soon to be a Gray Feather myself."

	"And until that time comes, you're the best flier and leatherback herder in all of Durandana," Jerrio said in a stale voice.  "Best to leave the telling of the scrolls to our elders."

	Sivrem sighed.  "Ah... very well.  I suppose you'll next tell me that the Gray Feathers of Central would be best for this."

	"You know me too well, Sivrem," Jerrio said with a smirk.

	"Not as well as Jagold," Kitsune muttered, summoning a long-distance "Eeep!" from a blonde shape further down the table.

	Jerrio rolled his eyes.  "Yes, well, somepony's gotta keep an eye on tradition."

	"Will I be seeing the Gray Feathers this evening?" Rainbow asked.

	"I'm afraid not.  They have Last Light to attend to," Sivrem said.  "Besides, why the hurry?"  He pointed with a hoof.  "Tonight, you rest under the mist and stars of Durandana.  Tomorrow—before First Light—you can join me and my flock.  After taking care of the leatherbacks, we'll fly to Central tomorrow.  The Gray Feathers of the Middle Tower will be sure to tell you everything you seek."

	"Heh... that sounds pretty darn cool, actually."  Rainbow's wings fluttered.  "A day spent with the fastest pegasi this side of the world."  She gulped.  "The only pegasi this side of the world..."

	"I prefer the first," Kitsune said.

	"Yes, well, I prefer the second," Jerrio muttered.

	"And I prefer them all!"  Sivrem stood up.  "And everything!"  He raised a glass high.  "A toast!  To ponies inside and outside the realm of the Valkyrie!  May a swift wind carry us to love and the grave beyond!"

	Several pegasus voices cheered and whooped.

	"Gaaah!  Josho!  You spilled my ketchup!"

	"Jee... I am so very sorry..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Meet in the Briefing Room		//------------------------------//

	"And just what's going to happen once you get to this... Central Tower?" Ebon asked.  "I mean, aside from the Grand Tour—you think they're gonna try and preach their feathery religion to you or something?"

	"It's not a religion, really," Rainbow said as she paced across the Noble Jury's mess hall.  Through the portholes, starlight glittered across the misty sky of Durandana.  Torchlight dotted the trees from the many wooden houses and platforms where the pegasi were retiring for the night. "It's simply their way of life... their life-blood..."

	Ebon smirked.  "I stand by what I said."

	"Look, we gotta be careful with these guys," Rainbow said, spinning about.  "For their sake, I mean.  Sure, they're all rough and tough pegasi, but they've been living by themselves for so friggin' long that I'm a little bit freaked out about what the knowledge of the outside world could do to them."

	"That's very thoughtful of you, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "Not to mention an example of intelligent foresight.  But I think you could stand to give the psyche of these Durandanans more credit."

	"Especially since it's rather clear just what they believe in," Bellesmith said.

	Rainbow glanced at her.  "What do you mean by that?"

	Belle shrugged.  "Isn't it obvious?  All this speak of the 'Valkyrie' and this apparent worship of Sunlight..."

	"I get it, Belle," Rainbow said, nodding.  "They're totally descendants of Commander Hurricane's pegasi from ancient Equestria."

	"Seriously, though..."  Josho glanced up, brow furrowed.  "That's a bit of a friggin' stretch.  Do we really know that?"

	"The connections are simply too numerous," Pilate said.

	"And it's not like they're direct descendants of the pegasi who supposedly broke up Urohringr," Eagle Eye said.  "I mean... unless they're secretly ravenous zombies."

	"Maybe in bed they are," Zaid said.

	"Zaid..."  Belle sighed.

	"What?"  Zaid shrugged.  "Don't tell me that you of all ponies aren't the least bit shaken in your can-can about that!"

	Belle's ears folded.  "I do admit... I was stricken back by their lax views on affection, family, and... br-breeding."  She cleared her throat.  "But like Rainbow Dash said.  This is simply their way of life.  From what we can all tell, it's working out for them just fine."  She glanced up at the others.  "Who are we to judge another culture based solely on our differences?"

	"But we don't know their whole 'culture' yet," Josho remarked.  "Not at least until Rainbow Dash makes her trip to Central."

	"So you're all for her going, old stallion?" Eagle asked.

	"Hell, they seem to love her to death!" Josho exlaimed.  "Let her go to the middle tower and learn what she can from these... 'gray feathers.'  I'm sure Rainbow wouldn't mind stretching her wings a little... especially with those of her own kin."

	"They're not exactly 'my own kin,'" Rainbow said.

	"But you agree that they're probably descendants of Commander Hurricane!" Props said, blinking brightly.  "How kinnier can you get than that?"

	"Don't deny it, Rainbow," Eagle said with a smile.  "Today's the happiest any of us have seen you in a long time.  Even on our good days."

	"Did you get a chance to talk to Celestia about what you've found?" Pilate asked.

	Rainbow sighed, glancing towards the corner where the Sword of Solstice rested along with her saddlebag.  "No... There wasn't a moment all day when I was left alone.  These ponies are clinging to me like manure on velcro."

	"G-good manure, r-right?" Ebon smiled crookedly.

	"To be honest, I'm a little scared of telling Celestia of who and what I've found," Rainbow said.  "The idea of distant relatives of Equestria living thousands upon thousands of miles away?"  She grimaced.  "And in such isolation and... and ignorance too?"

	"But they're doing remarkably well for themselves, Rainbow," Belle said.  "And—aside from meat eating and an apparent lack of family structure—they appear to be embodying the concepts of Harmony.  I mean, just look at the paradise they've maintained in this crater after all these years!"

	"How'd they even get here anyways?" Props asked.  "Did Hurricane just swoop by this crater and drop them off?"

	"Doesn't seem like a general to do," Josho said.  "Also, wasn't Hurricane sworn to guard over the dark heart of Stratopolis with all of the devices at her disposal?"

	"You..."  Eagle trembled slightly.  "You d-don't think that the Durandanans went AWOL, do you?"

	"No..."  Rainbow shook her head.  "I don't believe that."

	"Don't believe it or don't want to?" Josho asked.

	Rainbow squinted at him.  "Wouldn't it be really silly for them to exalt this 'Valkyrie' persona while admitting that they screwed her over eons ago?"

	"It could possibly explain the adamance of their fealty," Pilate said.  "Guilt only gets stronger through the years.  Maybe they deem this crater as their 'prison.'"

	"Doubtful, beloved," Bellesmith spoke up.  "After all, what about the 'Gold Lights' that they're emphatic about guarding?"

	"I've got an even scratchier question!" Props said with a bounce.  "If they didn't ditch their posts and they weren't dropped off here on purpose—"

	"Like if they simply broke off from the rest of Stratopolis?" Zaid remarked.

	"—yeah!"  Props nodded.  "How could they have landed here?  It's not like Stratopolis was capable of splitting up..."  Her eyes darted amongst the other Jurists.  "Is it...?"

	"Maybe a piece broke off?" Eagle said.  "And then crash landed here?"

	"Yeah!"  Ebon nodded.  "It could explain the crater, right?"

	"Pffft.  If all of Stratopolis crash-landed here, then sure," Rainbow said.  "I dunno if you ponies have noticed, but it's a pretty dang big crater."

	"I don't think the local geography can be penned on a piece of Stratopolis," Pilate thought out loud, rubbing his chin.  "The nature of the impact is so great that I doubt any pegasi 'riding' the falling object would have survived the blast—or anything else in this landscape for that matter.  And yet, here and today, the place is lush with vegetation and animals.  If a piece of Stratopolis caused this impact, where did all the wildlife come from?  It surely wasn't on board the Sentinel, and it's not like the pegasi—who couldn't have survived the impact—planted the seeds all on their lonesome."

	"What are you thinking, Pilate?" Belle asked.

	"Quite simply that whatever caused this impact was incalculably long ago," the zebra said.  "In an age so far gone that it allowed this unique ecosystem to develop here in the interim.  I think the Durandanas are all outsiders—in that they stumbled upon this place just like we did, and due to the nature of the elements surrounding the crater, they've been stuck here, bound to a social system that they themselves had to construct in order to survive."

	"So, how and why did a bunch of Commander Hurricane's ponies end up in this crater of all places?" Rainbow asked.

	"Perhaps that's something you yourself can discover for all of our weary minds," Pilate said with a smile.  "After you've paid a visit to Central and—perhaps—witnessed these 'Gold Lights' for yourself."

	"And you can tell them all about their distant shiny Princess!" Props exclaimed.

	Everypony was silent.

	Props fidgeted.  "What?"

	"I... I don't know, Props..."  Rainbow winced.  "I think I better learn about all they've got to tell me before... uhm..."  She gulped.  "Before I tell them anything."

	"But they need to know, right?"  Props leaned forward.  "They need to know about their queens of alicorn hotness!"

	"I... really don't know if they need to know... at least not yet," Rainbow said.  "I wanna talk to Celestia about it.  Maybe I can slip a few words in the morning before First Light and when Sivrem arrives."

	"I'm sure speaking to her can only help, Rainbow," Belle said.  "We understand your concern.  We don't want anything to shake up the world that the Durandanans have established here."

	"Believe me, I wanna tell them everything about Equestria.  But..."  Rainbow fidgeted.  "What good is it gonna do, y'know?  I mean... they're so happy here.  They're perfect... perfect pegasi."  A weary smile, but then it faded.  "What good is it gonna do to let them know that they're really just long-lost birds estranged from a kingdom so far away it would take them forever to fly to by wing alone?"

	"Certainly a valid question," Pilate said.  "Not to mention a tough one.  I suggest you sleep on it."

	"Might I remind everypony that we're not exactly here to enjoy a vacation," Josho grunted.  "Isn't Chrysalis off in Val Roa somewhere, making life a living hell for innocent ponies?"

	"Without the aid of her brood," Ebon said.  "Remember?"

	Eagle Eye squirmed uncomfortably, silently.

	"Even still, we've got bigger fish to fry."  Josho turned to gaze at Rainbow.  "No offense, but we can't spend forever on the minnows."

	"I know.  I know."  Rainbow sighed.  "But I can't just ignore these ponies, especially if it's true that they're Equestrians at heart."  She paused, blinking.  "Say..."  She looked up.  "Anypony seen Roarke?"
		//------------------------------//
		// A Courageous Ambassador for Harmony		//------------------------------//

	Roarke slapped a panel shut in the side of the lounge sphere.  Wiping the sweat from her brow, she crawled out from underneath the hovering thing and stood along the side of the hangar.  Picking up a metal remote, she switched it on, summoning a low humming sound from the craft.

	The mare twisted a dial ever so slightly.

	The black sphere raised towards the ceiling on its own.

	Roarke stopped twisting, then turned the dial the other way.

	The sphere lowered until it was nearly touching the floor of the compartment.

	Roarke flipped a switch and pressed a lever forward and back.

	The sphere drifted back and forth in opposite directions, responding to the metal mare's remote control.

	A door squeaked open and Rainbow Dash trotted through.  "Having fun with Whizzball?"

	Roarke shook a bit, then exhaled heavily.  She slapped the remote and the humming died from inside the craft.  "You do realize that I have taken extraordinary care to rid myself of most of my violent tendencies."  She dropped the remote onto a metal crate and trotted past Rainbow.  "You and your friends certainly aren't helping when it comes to the transport that I'm so selflessly providing."

	"Girl, it's just a name."

	"And would you object if somepony called your prime matriarch 'Princess Sky Testicle?'"

	"I don't see how it's the same," Rainbow said.  "Lizards didn't build Celestia, and it's not like you can crawl inside her chest and fly the alicorn across a frozen ocean."

	"Then I'm glad that I shall never meet your kingdom's beloved ruler," Roarke droned as she trotted across the hangar to a workbench.  "She sounds incredibly unexciting."

	"Roarke, did an oak tree craw up your flank overnight?" Rainbow asked.  "I mean, a bigger oak tree than usual?"

	"If this is about my not being present at the feast that the Durandanans threw earlier, then you need not worry.  Much like Floydien, I am not the most adept at social functions."

	"Yeah... but the thing is—you've been trying lately.  Trying super hard."

	"Then perhaps I needed a rest," Roarke said.

	"You don't like these pegasi, do you?"

	"I did not say that."

	"Well, I can kinda read it in your actions."

	Roarke sighed, then glanced at Rainbow.  "I do not hate them."

	"That's not helping."

	"Odd.  I figured that in my case it said a lot."

	"Look, Roarke, I know these guys may appear freaky on the surface..."

	"That certainly goes without saying."

	"And, like Josho, you probably figure that we should be high-tailing it to Val Roa instead of sticking around here..."

	"Once again, you are adept at stating the obvious."

	"Look!"  Rainbow frowned.  "We're staying here."  She then gazed softly at the mare.  "Just for a little while, okay?  I have every reason to believe that these ponies—like—are long distant cousins of ancient Equestrians."

	"Kissing cousins, from what I've seen."

	"Huh?"

	"Nothing."

	Rainbow blinked.  She rolled her eyes and sighed.  "Look, I can't just ditch these ponies now that I know that they're here... now that I've seen what appears to be so many obvious connections.  Tomorrow, I'm flying with Sivrem's company to the Central Tower.  I hope to learn all I can from the Gray Feathers about this 'Valkyrie' and 'Gold Lights' business."

	"And if you find out everything that you've hypothesized..."  Roarke turned finally to stare at Rainbow Dash.  "What then?  Do you plan to adopt the entire civlization?"

	"Er..."

	"They can't all fit on the Jury, Rainbow."

	"H-huh?"

	"And even if you had the notion to escort them all around the plane so that they'd end up arriving in western Equestria years from now, they couldn't be expected to survive the trip across the Grand Choke.  By Searo's womb—you can't even be expected to survive such a trip."

	"I... that..."  Rainbow shook her confused head.  "I-I don't have such a notion!" Her voice cracked.  "What the heck's gotten into your head as of late?!"

	"A very good question we should all be asking ourselves."  Roarke fiddled with a few metal instruments.  "Isn't our business in Val Roa the one matter of prime importance?"

	"It's pretty high on my list, yeah..."

	"But not the top anymore?"

	"Roarke, I want to believe really hard that I'm on this journey for a reason.  A harmonic reason.  It seems like no small coincidence that we've stumbled upon this crater full of pegasi who worship sunlight, and here I've got a sword that can let me talk to the patron Alicorn of the Sun.  Commander Hurricane traveled far from Equestria, and—aside from saving the world from the threat of Stratopolis' black heart—it looks like she may have made even more of an impact.  If I can do something to bridge the gap between the past and the present, then that's not a chance that I would wish to ignore."

	"And does this involve me any?"

	"What?"  Rainbow blinked.  "No.  I mean... wh-why should it?"

	"Hmmmm..."  Roarke continued examining her tools.  "Then why are you even rambling to me about it?"

	"I... I..."  Rainbow shook her head, then groaned.  "I don't get you sometimes."  She turned tail, stomped out, and closed the door loudly behind.

	Roarke said nothing.  Only after a minute or two had passed did she bother to glance towards the doorframe with dull lenses.  She sighed out her nostrils and continued tinkering on her tools.



	The next morning, Rainbow Dash reclined on the hull of the Noble Jury.  Stifling a yawn, she smiled wearily at the sliver of dawnlight peaking over the eastern mists.

	"So, it might take a day... it might take several... but I aim to get to the bottom of this, Your Highness.  But, if you ask me, I think the truth is pretty obvious.  These are the descendants of Commander Hurricane's company.  How they broke off from the rest of the expedition and somehow managed to arrive here?  Well, that's what I aim to find out."

	"This is amazing, Rainbow Dash," Celestia's voice said.  "This is absolutely amazing!  For the first time since the tragedy caused by Discord, I find myself at a loss of words."

	"I'm pretty freaked out myself, Princess."  Rainbow smirked.  "But in a good way."

	"From the sound of things, you've been acting as an exemplary ambassador so far."

	"I can't help it.  I'm really digging this place.  I mean... heh... I'm not all that big on how they spit foals out and share huge beds—if ya know what I mean—but everything else about them is super awesome.  It's like... like..."  She sighed through a warm grin into the morning light.  "It's like being in Cloudsdale again."

	"I can sense it in your voice, Rainbow Dash."

	"Hmm?  Sense what?"

	"Happiness.  And warmth."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Aren't I normally, though?  I mean... like... I-I've got friends, y'know!  The Noble Jury's got my back!  They have for a while now!"

	Princess Celestia was silent for a while.  Then, at last, her voice wafted from the golden blade.  "This is different, Rainbow Dash.  I imagine you sense it too."

	Rainbow bit her lip.

	"Ponies—especially mortal ones—possess a unique resonance to their voice that changes throughout the various stages of their aging lives.  I've always valued your tenacity, courage, and unfailing loyalty.  But it goes without saying that a certain youthful vitality dwindled away once our dear friends had so tragically perished, and in front of you, no less."

	"Hrmmm... yeah..."

	"But hearing you now, and the exuberance with which you speak of these... remarkable Durandanans—it reminds me of the young pegasus whom I once had the honor to crown at the Best Young Fliers Competition."

	Rainbow's ears folded.  She glanced down at the jungle canopy and quiet wooden houses built within the branches.

	"How are your friends handling this encounter?"

	"Hmm?  Oh!  They're... uh... they're really digging it too.  For the most part, that is."

	"Oh?"

	"Well, it goes without saying: I think everypony on board the Jury is happy to be in a village where nopony is trying to kill us.  Heh.  But, that being said, a few are... a bit squirmy."

	"In what manner?"

	"It's hard to say, Your Highness.  I only hope that the crew doesn't think that I'm—y'know—being selfish."

	"Selfish?"

	"I wanna connect with these pegasi.  And I bet you want to as well.  So, as far as I'm concerned, I'm sticking around for their sake."  Rainbow gulped.  "But it could just as easily be the other way around."

	"If visiting these ponies is a blessing unto you, then I do not see why you must feel guilty, Rainbow Dash.  If you want my advice—then I say embrace this occasion.  Your heart can certainly use the merriment."

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow nodded.  Her lips slowly curved.  "Yeah, okay."

	Winged figures appeared along he horizon.

	"Whoops."  Rainbow kicked off the hull and hovered above the Jury.  "Looks like things are about to kick off."

	"I do hope you got enough sleep overnight.  It is rather early."

	"Heh.  Some things are just impossible, Your Highness."  Rainbow fidgeted in mid-air.  "Uhm... I-I'm going to leave the sword with the Jury."

	"Oh?"

	"Yeah.  I mean... if you wanna talk to any of best buds, then be my guest.  But for right now... well..."  Rainbow sighed.  "Let's just say that the next time I speak with you may be a moment when we'll have to make a pretty bold decision.  I'm not about to rush anything, ya feel me?"

	"I understand you perfectly, Rainbow.  Just remember:  do not underestimate yourself.  You have grown into a fine and courageous adventurer.  I've no doubt that you have what it takes to be Equestria's finest ambassador of harmony."

	Rainbow smirked, her eyes on Sivrem's company as they flew closer.  "Now if that don't friggin' beat all..."  And she sheathed the Sword of Solstice.


		//------------------------------//
		// Early Bird Gets the Dash		//------------------------------//

	Props yawned, stumbling up the steps of the Noble Jury's rear stairwell.  She paused to rub her puffy blue eyes with a forelimb, then ascended the rest of the way.  Before exiting onto the top deck, her knee bumped into a saddlebag.  Props heard a rattling noise.  Glancing down, she saw the Sword of Solstice.

	Fidgeting, she squinted out onto the top deck.  Sunlight glinted off the metal surfaces of the ship.  Amidst the bright sheen, the dark shadow of a tall stallion stood out.

	"I'm guessing Dashie went for her trip, huh?" Props murmured, stumbling tiredly outside.  The mists of morning tickled her ears and eyelashes.  "Hmmmff... so quiet.  So much for early birds, eh?  Heehee..."

	Silence.

	She blinked curiously.  "Zaidy Waidy?  Why so silent?  Did you finally gag on your tongue?"

	"Shhhh..."  Zaid held a hoof up without looking at her.  "Did you hear that?"

	She stood stock-still, mute.

	The stallion took a long, meditative breath.  "That's the sound of ponies not-killing-us."  He turned to grin at her.  "It's a pretty swell sound, ain't it?"

	Props smiled back.



	In the early dawn, dark shadows from the eastern Sky Stabs swept their way across the jungle foliage.  All was mist and greenery as far as the eye could see.

	Then, out of the dead silence, several dark bodies surged, diving low over the treetops. With leathery wings spread, the leatherbacks made a living train towards some unseen destination towards the north end of the crater.

	They were not alone  In spiraling formations, over two dozen pegasi glided alongside the mammoth beasts.  They zig-zagged in and out of the creatures' path, tightening around their descent and gradually guiding them in a curved, northeasterly path.

	The pegasi whooped and whistled at each other, urging ponies to fill in empty spots and keep the pressure on the flocking creatures.  Every now and then, a leatherback would break away from the rest of the herd, only for two to four pegasi to expectly swoop down and force them back into the line.

	Sivrem smiled proudly at the task.  He glanced to his right, signaling to Jagold and Smythe.  The pegasi saluted back, dove to the head of the pack, and steered the largest of the leatherbacks towards a distant ravine.  Glancing to his left, Sivrem smirked at Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow Dash grinned, her lungs inhaling and exhaling with excitement.  The mare's eyes darted all over the scene, attempting to take everything in about the speed operation.  Her ears flicked as she heard falconesqe shriekings.  She turned to see a pair of ponies diving down low and throwing their shoulders into the leathery wings of creatures, urging them back into the line.

	"If you're worried about them, don't be!" Sivrem shouted over the whipping winds.  Both pegasi took a sharp curve, following the herd through misty winds.  "They can take a beating!  Especially the bulls!"  He chuckled to himself.  "In fact, they get awfully bored without us giving them a good shove or two!"

	"Must be tough when all you can do is fly around and provide milk."

	"The average leatherback lives for about seven years!" Sivrem said.  "The way I see it, we give them plenty of exercise and excitement for the space of their lives!"

	"I'll say.  Does it do anything for the milk?"

	"Gets sweeter with each generation!" Sivrem said, smiling.  "There's nothing in the Gray Feathers' scrolls about these creatures.  I guess some things the Valkyrie couldn't anticipate..."

	"Right..."

	"But we apply her courage and tenacity in everything that we do!"  Sivrem paused to gestured at a few fellow fliers, who dove low to maintain the herd's formation as they approached the final stretch before a deep ravine.  "I've no doubt that she'd be proud of the symbiosis we've maintained here!"

	"Where I come from, pegasi are all about living with nature."  Rainbow smirked.  "Seems like you've got things pretty well-handled here."

	"Yes, well, the only challenge is getting it all done before First Light," Sivrem said.  "I like to start the day out awesomely!"

	"Heeheehee!"  Rainbow grinned wide.  "Who doesn't?"

	Jagold chirped from below.  Both ponies glanced down.

	The blonde mare exclaimed, "The lead bull's feisty today, First-Born!  We can't stop him from heading to the treetops!"

	"Right..."  Sivrem cracked the joints in his neck.  "Looks like a job for my feathers."

	"Pfffft..."  Rainbow smirked.  "Can't be that hard."

	"Oh yeah?  I'd like to see you try it yourself, Outsider," Sivrem said.

	"Hah!  That would be a laugh—" Rainbow's words cut off.

	Sivrem was smirking at her.

	She blinked, then grinned from ear to ear.  With one salute, she backflipped, plummeted, then flapped her wings hard.  With a clap of thunder, she rocketed ahead of the group, almost throwing several ponies off balance.

	"Whoah!" Smythe gawked, his eyes wide.  "What a gust!"

	"She'll run him into the greens!" Jagold's voice cracked.

	"Shhhh..."  Sivrem flew between the two ponies, squinting ahead.  "No she won't..."

	Rainbow Dash accelerated, approaching the rear of the headmost leatherback.  The enormous specimen was descending rapidly towards the treetops below.  As the air distorted between him and the approaching pegasus, the creature let loose a bass moan and thrashed its dangling tail.

	Rainbow held her breath, dodging frantically up and down to avoid the appendage.  After the last tail swipe, she corkscrewed around it, accelerated, and flew upside-down until she was belly-to-belly with the large cartiligenous specimen.  Wings spread, she pressed her fuzzy chest to the creature's, then shoved her body upwards with several heavy wing flaps.

	"Nnnnngh... grnnnngh..."  Rainbow seethed and sweated.  Despite her eager efforts, the two of them kept descending.  "Come on, you freaky space cow... fly up!"  Teeth grinding, she glanced left and right at the thing's rippling wings.  Then, with a bright gasp, Rainbow stumbled upon a wicked idea.  Clinging to the beast with one forelimb, she held on and bent her wings around, tickling its belly with the tips of her feathers.

	The creature shook all over, emitting a sporadic bass undulation.  Its wings went slack, giving Rainbow the opportunity that she needed.  With several feathery flaps, she pushed the two of them skyward, successfully lifting the bull back into the air, and aiming it towards the ravine ahead.

	"Hah!" Smythe exclaimed.  "I don't believe it!"

	Jagold giggled.  "Now why didn't I think of that before?"

	Sivrem smirked.  "Because she's one of a kind, that's why..."

	Rainbow flipped out from the line of creatures and glided northeasterly.  She glanced back, smirked, and saluted.

	Sivrem saluted back.  He shrieked into the air, and the group whistled back, gliding closer together as they urged the creatures down into the gaping canyon below.



	"A walk?" Pilate asked.

	"Yeah," Ebon said with a nod.  He glanced aside at Eagle Eye on the Noble Jury's top deck, then back at the couple.  "We figured there's no harm in it.  Might as well do something relaxing while Rainbow Dash is away."

	"Well, so long as the Durandanans don't mind," Bellesmith said with a shrug.  She glanced at the treehouses beyond the ship's edge.  Pegasi darted swiftly from branch to branch, going about their daily business.  "They don't exactly seem too territorial."

	Eagle Eye fought the urge to giggle.  "We'll be sure not to spread wing and fly into their airspace."

	"You know what I mean," Belle said, rolling her eyes.  "We'd join you, but I promised Pilate that I'd put the finishing touches on O.A.S.I.S."

	"Just as well, beloved."  Pilate leaned in to nuzzle her.  "I can't very well appreciate the sights if... well... I can't appreciate the sights."

	"Trust me, Pilate.  It will be well worth it."

	"Well, I wish you luck with that," Eagle Eye said with a wave.  He and Ebon wandered towards the hangar.  "It'd be a shame not to take advantage of the serenity while we have it."

	"Point well made, EE."

	As the two stallions made their way to the hangar, Roarke trotted out of the stairwell, tailed closely by Kera.

	"Awwwwwwwwwww..."  Kera pouted.  "Please, Roarke?  I never get to see you use your awesome tech!"

	"And there's a reason for that," Roarke droned, making a bee-line for the couple on deck.  "Pilate.  Bellesmith."  She came to a stop, her lenses retracting.  "I have come to inform you that I intend to take the Lounge Sphere for a flight.  My destination is the southern wall of the crater, where I intend to test my latest weapon upgrades in secret."  She cocked her head aside.  "Fear not.  I asked a pair of First-Born Durandanans yesterday afternoon as well as at dawn today, and they both gave me their blessing."

	Pilate tilted his ears towards Belle and the mare stared at the zebra.

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "Is... something amiss?"

	"Er... n-no!  Not at all, Roarke!"  Belle said with a nervous smile.

	"That's very good of you to be so considerate," Pilate said.  "Not just to us, but to the Durandanans... erm..."

	Roarke stared at them.

	Belle cleared her throat.  "We're just... not used to you consulting us first."

	"Indeed.  Normally you just go and do your own thing without asking."

	"Well, I am not doing that now," Roarke grunted.

	"Right!  We c-can see that!"  Belle smiled nervously and waved her hoof.  "Go on!  You... er... have our blessing!"

	"Much appreciated."  Roarke nodded her head.  "I anticipate being back by sundown."  She turned tail and trotted back towards the stairwell.

	"Hmmmph..."  Kera squatted on her haunches, folding her forelimbs. "She won't let me come with her."

	"Well, she's going to be testing dangerous technology, Kera," Pilate said.

	"Yeah, but Roarke's a super-super professional!" Kera said.  "And it's not like I haven't been front row to dangerous stuff before and come out safe!"

	"It's not that, Kera..."  Belle sighed, smiling helplessly.  "She's just... well... she's Roarke.  If this was Rainbow Dash or Josho, then you'd know it'd be fine.  But you just gotta let the mare be herself..."

	At this point, Roarke had frozen at the stairwell, fidgeting.  She took a deep breath, her ears folding.  At last, she blurted, "You're going to need to pack a lunch."

	Kera glanced over, emerald eyes blinking.  "Huh?"

	Roarke swiveled about, deadpan.  "We will be gone for the better extent of the day.  You will inevitably become hungry."

	Kera's eyes twitched.  Her jaw dropped.  "You mean... you m-mean you'll let me go with you?!"

	Roarke grumbled, "I do not cater to redundant statements.  Make a decision—swiftly—before I change my mind."

	"Oooh!  Oooh!"  Kera hopped up, grinning at the Ledomaritan couple.  "Belle!  Pilate!  Can I?  Can I?  It'll be so sweet!"

	"Uhhhhh..."  Pilate fidgeted.

	"I assure you..."  Roarke shuffled towards the two, her lenses locked on them.  "She will be absolutely safe.  That is my sworn promise."  Her jaw clenched.  "Even safer than she would be on board the Noble Jury."

	Pilate tilted his head Belle's way.

	Belle exhaled slowly through a calm smile.  "And I have no doubt of that, Roarke."  She leaned down and nuzzled Kera.  "Go on ahead, darling."

	"Woohooo!"  Kera scampered past Roarke and glided down the stairwell.  "I'll make us both sandwiches!  Dragonfly sandwiches!"

	"And whatever Roarke tells you to do—follow her every word!"  Belle sighed, then smiled in Roarke's direction.  "This means a lot to her, Roarke.  I don't know how to thank you."

	"Just keep doing what you're doing."  Roarke turned and trotted towards the stairwell.

	"Erm..."  Belle blinked.  "And just what is that?"

	"Changing."  And Roarke was gone.
		//------------------------------//
		// A Taste of Serene Things		//------------------------------//

	"So, I've been thinking..."  Ebon stammered, hopping down from a ledge of earth and landing on an overturned tree trunk.  "Maybe when the pegasi landed in this part of the world, whatever brought them here somehow caused the crater, destroying a whole bunch of the vegetation and animals and stuff."  He continued descending down the craggy landscape, following Eagle Eye at a distance through the woods.  "So, they felt bad about it.  And—according to Rainbow, at least, pegasi are really keen on maintaining balance in nature.  So they probably took it upon themselves to stay in this crater and re-plant all of the damaged trees and nurture the animal species back to health."  He grunted as he landed on grassy earth and trotted up behind Eagle Eye.  "I mean, I know it's a bit of a stretch to believe that all of this lush jungle is the product of winged ponies doing horticulture, but given enough centuries or—heck—millennia—"

	"Shhhhhh!" Eagle insisted.

	Ebon jerked to a stop, blinking.  "What... what is it?"

	Eagle pointed forward.  "Just look."

	Ebon plopped down beside Eagle, squinting curiously.  Soon, his breath left him.

	Before them stretched a shallow pond beneath a tiny trickling waterfall.  Above was a cliff overhanging with vines and loose tree roots.  As the two stallions sat and stared, a flight of butterflies fluttered across the scene, their brilliant wings reflected by the immaculate surface of the pond.

	"I... I-I've never seen them so large!" Ebon stammered.

	Eagle smiled.  "I don't think they have anything that preys on them.  So they can get as big as they want in this crater."

	"Huh?"

	"Crimson used to explain it to me.  With less predators, you have bigger herbivores and pollinators.  It's probably the same reason those so-called 'leatherbacks' are so huge and—"

	Ebon giggled.

	Eagle blinked curiously at him.

	"You don't have to explain it," Ebon said, straightening his mane.  "It's beautiful enough as it is to look at."  He exhaled.  "Thanks..."

	"Uh..."  Eagle smiled awkwardly.  "You're welcome?"  He shrugged.  "Not like I put the butterflies here."

	"Heeheehee..."

	Eagle raised an eyebrow.  "Now what?"

	"Oh, you know how to put butterflies somewhere, alright."

	Eagle chuckled.  "You sure are goofy when you're far from your kitchen."

	"Yeah.  But I like goofy."

	"No complaints here."

	Silence.

	Eagle felt a gentle weight against his shoulder.  He said nothing, stealthily bringing a forelimb up and wrapping it around Ebon's side as the stallion leaned into him.  A few breaths later, and Eagle leaned his cheek against the top of Ebon's mane as both gazed serenely into the placid scene.



	Rainbow Dash gazed down into the ravine from where she hovered.  She watched as leatherbacks flew from one end to the other, bellowing and groaning to one another.  Their booming voices echoed loudly across the steep walls of the enormous canyon, making the branches of the flanking trees flounce.

	Rainbow smirked.  As the leatherbacks she was watching retreated into deep tunnels and caverns, she spun towards the group of Durandanans. 

	"Wow.  Who'd a thunk it?  This place totally reminds me of Ghastly Gorge back at—"  She stopped in mid-sentence, blinking wide.

	Everypony was bowing down low, facing southeast with wings outstretched.  They both murmured as one: "The Towers Rise."

	Rainbow blinked.  She heard the loud clanking of wood and metal issuing over the treetops.  Glancing up, she saw a different tower than the day previous.  This one was thicker, bulkier, and had a stone frame at its summit.  Just like the tower she had seen before, its topmost piece was hollowed out with windows facing east and west.

	Nevertheless, as it lifted, Rainbow Dash swiftly dropped to the floor.  She glanced mutely at her companions, ultimately copying their body postures with a stretching-forth of her wings.

	Not long after, a beam of golden light flew into the tower, then arched overhead.  Rainbow looked up from her position to see the laser piercing the mists and shooting its way due west where—she figured—it would inevitably pierce the hollow of the tower she and the Jurists had seen the previous day.

	Just then, Sivrem and the rest of the ponies around Rainbow Dash chanted in a low voice: "We swear to secure and to protect the Gold Lights forever.  So promise the foals of the Valkyrie forever.  From First-Born to Last."

	"Erm..."  Rainbow gulped.  "'From First-Born to Last.'" She smiled nervously.

	Everyone stood up, catching their collective breaths.

	Sivrem turned around in time to see Rainbow Dash standing up along with them.  He raised an eyebrow.  "So, you feel as though you're one of us now?  To quote the sacred oath?"

	"Er... s-sorry..." Rainbow bit her lip.  "Guess I-I just felt like fitting in..."

	"Nothing to be sorry about," Jerrio said as he suddenly touched down alongside Kitsune, Rayvinne, and a smattering of other pegasi.  "Everypony dwells in the shadow of the Valkyrie's wings.  We're pleased that you would honor us."

	"Jerrio, you handsome scamp."  Sivrem smirked.  "Were you flying as the towers rose?"

	"Please."  Jerrio rolled his eyes.  "Don't think as if you can catch me being direspectful."  He gestured.  "We were a few trees away.  We heard your flock chanting too, so we gusted this way."

	"You actually herded all of the leathernecks into the ravine already?" Kirstune exclaimed, trotting up to the edge of the ravine and staring down in surprise.  "That's amazing..."

	"Well, we had help!"  Smythe exclaimed, smiling wide.  "Rainbow showed some true gust!"

	"She's no gull!" Jagold said, giggling.

	"Mmmmm..."  Rayvinne trotted right by Rainbow, brushing her side with a few of her feathers.  "I could have told you that."

	"Eh heh heh heh..."  Rainbow blushed and took a firm step away from Rayvine. "Ahem."  She slicked her mane back and said, "I just contributed what I could.  Can't let you guys do all the work."

	"You sure you're not one of us?" Jagold remarked, blinking.  "I can't help but think that all of this 'outsider' stuff is made up."

	"Yes, because Rainbow was able to make the floating Valkyrie Silver appear out of nowhere," Jerrio groaned.

	"Now now, let's not get too feathered over what Rainbow and her companions have plainly explained to us," Kitsune said.  "She's our guest, and if she wants to learn more about us, what better a way than to be one of us?"

	Jagold giggled and did a little cheer, backflipping through the air.

	"Uhhh..."  Rainbow raised her hoof.  "Question."

	"What's up?" Smythe glanced her way.

	Rainbow pointed at the enormous tower stretching southeast of them.  "Why'd you face that while giving the oath today?"  She pivoted west.  "Yesterday, you faced that tower."

	"It's simple," Kitsune said with a smile.  "It's whichever tower is closest to us when they rise."

	"Ah.  So, that is—"

	"Central D," Rayvinne said.  She smirked.  "Where our smartest and most dedicated Gray Feathers live."

	"Also the best place to be the opposite of smart and dedicated..."  Smythe nudged Jerrio's side.  "Am I right?"

	Jerrio sighed through a weak smile.  "We are most certainly not taking Rainbow Dash to the feather lounge.  She's here to fill her mind, not her other organs."

	"Maybe you're not taking her, Mr. 'I-can't-wait-to-be-a-boring-and-stale-Gray-Feather.'  But what about the rest of us who aren't First-Born?"

	While the pegasi around the group collectively laughed, Rainbow spoke up:  "Not that it... doesn't sound awesome."  She cleared her throat.  "I gotta take Jerrio's side on this one.  I really wanna know more about what makes you guys tick."

	"Like what?" Kitsune asked, staring straight at Rainbow.

	Rainbow blinked.  She fidgeted.  "Oh.  Well.  Uhm..." She gestured up at the beam of light shooting out of the enormous tower.  "What do you suppose is so big about the Light from Above?"

	Jerrio did a double-take.  He opened his mouth—

	"Allow me, friend..."  Sivrem said, stepping forward with a smirk.  "Your passion will only make your muzzle explode."

	"Nnnnngh..."  Jerrio folded his forelimbs and frowned.  Pegasi chuckled.

	"The Sun is what gives Durandana its strength," Sivrem explained, staring firmly at Rainbow Dash as he trotted around her.  "It renews life and accelerates the motion of the elements.  Without it, we couldn't exist.  The Valkyrie knew this... which is why she dedicated her life to serving the Sun's glory."

	"Yeah... fancy that..."  Rainbow nodded, fumbling with her mane as she said, "You ever think that—just maybe—there was a reason why she was so big on the Sun?"

	"Why wouldn't she be?" Rayvinne asked.  "She saw its glory up close in the days before the foundation of Durandana."

	"Yeah, but... like..."  Rainbow bit her lip, finally blurting, "What if she knew the pony who was responsible for the Sun?"

	Smythe and Jagold blinked stupidly at one another.

	"Would you mind repeating that?" Kitsune said with a confused expression.

	"She doesn't have to," Jerrio droned.  "I heard her the first time."  Clearing his throat, the First-Born trotted until he could look at Rainbow dead-on.  "The Light From Above is a force and nothing else.  The same as the Gold Lights.  The scrolls maintain this."

	"Yes, but—"

	"Being an outsider from Durandana, it can be understood that you wouldn't grasp this," Jerrio continued.  "But that's fine.  When you visit the Gray Feathers of Central, they'll most certainly be able and willing to educate you on the full history of the Valkyrie and her sworn devotion to the Sun."

	"Oh... t-totally..."  Rainbow sat back with folded ears.  "She certainly sounds like a loyal p-pony..."

	"Our Mother couldn't have been anything less," Jerrio said, smiling.  "The Sun enriched her life, and the essence of that blessing has made its way through the fiber of our very being.  We all owe it to her for preserving the glory until the end of her days."

	"Plus, it's pretty snazzy being alive."  Jagold rolled over Smythe's body and leaned in to nuzzle his neck.  "Mmmmm—isn't that right, Smythe?"

	"Heheheheh... your damn right."

	"Enough talk!"  Sivrem extended his wings.  "We've got some time to kill before the hour we told the elders that we would arrive in Central!"  He grinned devilishly.  "Perhaps we can show Rainbow here what we Durandanans are truly made of—"

	"Oh, no.  Please."  Rainbow nervously shook her hooves.  "Really.  I'm not that kind of—"

	"Who thinks that they can outrace me?!"  Sivrem said, hovering upwards.

	"Oh... whew..."  Rainbow exhaled, smiling dumbly.  "Yeah, that sounds like fun."

	"Hah!  Please, Sivrem," Kitsune said, chuckling as she hovered up alongside him.  "Don't even pretend to be unfair to an outsider.  She's still got the feathers of a gull.  You can clearly see that."

	Rainbow looked up.  Slowly, wickedly, she grinned.  Woosh!  In a blink, she was hovering in front of Sivrem and Kitsune, making the pegasi below gasp.  "You're just afraid."  She winked.  "Afraid to have your tail whooped by an ordinary outsider."

	"Rainbow, you're the only outsider," Kitsune said.  "Nothing ordinary about it."

	"Or extraordinary!" Sivrem said, smirking around at the crowd below.  "I bet she couldn't outfly a mosquito!"  Several ponies laughed.

	"You wanna put your ego where your eggshells are?" Rainbow said.

	Several ponies whooped and chirped.

	Sivrem turned, gawking at the mare.  "You're certainly not asking me to go easy on you..."

	"Then how about I agree not to be easy on you?"  Rainbow smirked.  "I'll race you.  But not just you—you and all the buddies you choose!"

	"Hmmm..."  Sivrem tapped his chin, smirking.  "Sounds doable.  How about from Central to West D and back?"

	"Pfffft.  What am I, a foal?"  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "I flew with you guys this morning to get the full Durandanan treatment."  She folded her forelimbs, smirking.  "So... show me what you've got."

	Jerrio glanced up at Sivrem.

	Sivrem squinted, then cracked a grin.  "Very well."  His voice rose as he hovered above the crowd.  "I think Rainbow Dash here could use the traditional Rite of Gusting!"

	The air filled with bird-like shrieks and whistles.

	Rainbow glanced all around, curious.

	"But, I assure you..."  Sivrem chuckled deeply.  "It certainly isn't easy."

	"Where I come from, I used 'easy' as an outhouse."  Rainbow spat.  "Bring it on."

	"Very well.  Let's see how well your wings work..."  Sivrem pointed towards the massive canyon below.  "...with very little wind."

	Jagold gulped.  Smythe leaned forward while Rayvinne trembled ever so slightly.

	Rainbow peered into the deep ravine, and she smiled.  "Now we're talking..."
		//------------------------------//
		// On Your Mark, Get Set...		//------------------------------//

	"You may wish to reconsider this, outsider," Sivrem said, clearing his throat.  "The Raked Ravine is a treacherous pass even for the most expert ponies who live here and—"

	"Pffft!  Stop being such a pigeon, Sivrem!"  Kitsune shot past him and skidded to a stop at the edge of the ravine.  Her nostrils flared as she dragged a hooff across the stone ground and smirked into the gaping canyon.  "She wants to prove herself, huh?  Well, we can prove ourselves as well!  I say bring it on!"

	"Heehee!"  Jagold giggled and flew down by the First-Born's side.  "Yeah!  Let's show her how real Durandanans gust!"

	"Count me in," Smythe said, landing down beside the other two.  "You want in on this, Rayvinne?"

	"Pffft.  I have better ways of killing myself."  The pegasus turned and smiled coyly at Rainbow.  "So, going to put your wings where your muzzle is?"

	"Way ahead of you, sister."  Rainbow Dash touched down, cracking her joints and stretching her feathers.  "But, I have to warn you guys: being in mid-flight is the worst possible position for being blown away.  You're liable to slam into something."

	"What do you take us for?" Smythe scoffed.  "Idiots who can't home?!"

	"Hey, idiots or not... losing sucks."  Rainbow smirked harder.  "Just saying."

	Sivrem chuckled long and maniacally.

	Jerrio glanced at him.  "I know that laugh quite well."

	"Bet you do."  Sivrem slapped the other First-Born's shoulder, then touched down beside Rainbow and the other three pegasi.  "I can see that our pride is on the line.  It'd be a crime for me to sit this one out."

	"How did I know this was going to happen?" Jerrio said, rolling his eyes.

	"Rules are simple, gull," Kitsune said, eyes glaring at Rainbow.  "You don't fly above the canyon walls.  First pony to make it to the northeast edge of the ravine—in one piece, mind you—wins the race."

	"It's you against all of us!" Smythe chirped.  "Think you can handle it?"

	Rainbow stifled a yawn.  "Nnnngh... nyup... sorry, what was that? I was too busy not being intimidated."

	Several pegasi giggled and chuckled.

	"It's... uhm..."  Jagold fidgeted slightly.  "It's not exactly an empty ravine.  There are lots of stuff in the way at places.  Maybe you'd like to know just what you'll be—"

	Rainbow Dash waved a hoof.  "I like surprises."  She smirked.  "I think I can manage."

	"Whew..."  Rayvinne smirked at the others stretching and flexing around Rainbow.  "She's just asking to be feathered, isn't she?"

	"You're certainly the best judge of that, eh, Rayvinne?" Kitsune said, and the others around her laughed.

	Rayvinne blushed furiously and backtrotted.

	Rainbow blinked at that—but turned upon feeling the touch of Sivrem's hoof on her shoulder.

	"Ready to gust?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth, hesitated, and smirked.  "Tell you what."  She grinned wide with glistening teeth.  "You guys get a head start."

	All of the ponies did double-takes.

	"Excuse me?" Smythe stammered.

	"You heard me," Rainbow said, smiling.  "You guys start first.  I'll give you... mmm..."  She tapped her chin.  "... twenty seconds!  Yeah!"

	"Why twenty sec—?"

	"And then I'll start flying myself."

	"Wow..."  Smythe shook his head, grinning stupidly.  "You just want to lose, don't you?"

	"Actually, buddy, I'm trying to make it even for your guys."

	"Pffffft..."  Kitsune rolled her eyes.  "Yeah.  Fine.  Whatever."  She smirked at Sivrem.  "Let's get this over with, boss guy.  I'll be the one to carry her—limp and crying—to the Gray Feathers."

	"Heh..."  Sivrem cracked the joints in his neck.  "This should be most interesting.  Jerrio—?"

	"Yes yes yes..."  Jerrio groaned, trotting over to the ravine's edge with a weathered smile.  "Whenever you need a time-keeper, you always come to me."

	"Give up the gull moans and count already."

	"Rainbow, step back and give them room," Jerrio said, gesturing with his hoof.  "You decided to do this, after all."

	"Hey..."  Rainbow shrugged and backtrotted from the cliff.  "I'm not about to argue with myself."

	Jerrio cleared his throat.  While everypony watched, he stood facing the line of fliers, his hoof raised.  "On your mark.  Get set."  His ears twitched, and he shouted:  "Go!"  His hoof fell.

	Sivrem, Kitsune, Smythe, and Jagold soared deep into the canyon.  The sheer force of their combined wing-flaps sent several ponies flailing backwards in the air.  They plunged deep into the ravine, one or two of them flipping.  The air echoed with whoops and warrioresque shrieks.

	When the thunder ended, Rainbow heard Jerrio's voice through the ringing in her ears:  "Four one thousand... five one thousand... six one thousand..."

	"You know, you're good," Rayvinne said, forcing Rainbow to glance over.  "But you can't possibly be that good."

	"What do you mean, girl?"

	"Sivrem's the best there is," Rayvinne said.  "And Kitsune's nothing to shake a stick at either."

	"Hmmm..."  Rainbow smiled, her eyes thin.  "You just watch carefully."  Her eyes wandered to the group as a whole.  "And promise not to get too freaked out."

	"Freaked out?"  Rayvinne blinked.  "By what?"

	Rainbow saluted, turning her flank to the ravine.  "You'll know when you see it.  Heh."

	"...eighteen one thousand... nineteen one thousand... twenty!"  Jerrio signaled.

	"Zoop."  Rainbow backflipped, plunged, and rocketed eastward through the canyon.  She accelerated, her mighty wings producing a vaporous burst of air that rocketed up and out of the canyon, sending leaves and pebbles of earth flying sky high.

	Jerrio had to steady himself, wincing.

	Rayvinne stumbled, breathless.  "...whoah."
		//------------------------------//
		// This Little Rainbow of Mine		//------------------------------//

	With a cool hiss, the Lounge sphere lowered to the forest floor.  Above it, the towering clifface of the crater's southern wall loomed as a virtual wall of craggy granite.  As soon as the doors to the black aircraft slid open, Kera came bounding out.  She galloped giddily across the soil and grass, leaping in jubilant intervals.

	"Woohooo!  We get to blow stuff up!  We get to blow stuff up!"

	"Not so fast, Kera," Roarke uttered as she stepped out of the vehicle, dragging a metal crate full of tools and explosives along with her.  "Don't go where I can't see you."

	"I can't help it!"  She leapt with a burst of filly magic and skidded to a stop in front of Roarke.  Roarke calmly shoved a hoof forward and stopped the foal before she could slam into the crate of items.  "Explosions are always so fun!" she exclaimed, hopping up and down in place.  "It means loud noises and fire and stuff!"

	"This is simply a test of my latest weaponry," Roarke said.  "You will remain behind me at all times and do exactly as I tell you."

	"And then we'll have wicked big explosions, huh?"  Kera grinned wide.

	"I am testing my weaponry's efficiency," the metal mare droned.  "Not their explosiveness."

	"Awwwwwwwwwwwwwww..."  Kera fwumped down to the earth, propping a pouting chin atop two forelimbs.  "But exploding stuff is fun!"

	"But not entirely efficient."  Roarke stood Kera up and trotted past her, setting up the first of many miniature turrets.  "Not only have I made a promise to Bellesmith and Pilate to keep you safe, but I have committed myself to not upsetting the environment of this crater.  That's why I've chosen to use this rock wall along the southern edge of Durandana for our testing."

	"Huh...?"

	"It's simple, child," Roarke muttered, joining metal pieces together.  "The nature in this crater is extremely fragile, making for a delicate balance.  The last thing anypony should do is impulsively throw herself into it with no regard for the consequences."



	"Wooooo-hoooooooooooooooo!"  Rainbow hollered, grinning against the beating winds as she plummeted into the treacherous canyon.  She spun a few final times, then angled her wings so that they sliced viciously against the wind.

	Below her—as her vision settled on an even plane—Rainbow spotted the tell-tail flicker of Smythe's green tail and mane.  Not wasting any time, she hurled herself past the craggy rock walls blurring on either side of her and threaded her way even deeper into the belly of the ravine.  She was within spitting distance of the stallion.

	"Hey!  Smythe!"  She sputtered, giving his flank a light swat.  "Look behind you!"

	"Huh?!"  The pegasus gasped and threw a look over his shoulder.  "What is it?"

	"Nothing!  That's what!"  Rainbow saluted with her tongue sticking out.  "You're last, buckwiser!"

	"H-Huh?!"  Smythe glanced at her and nearly stalled in mid-air.  He convulsed from muzzle to tail.  "Valkyrie's shout!  How in the heck did you do that?!"

	"Watch and find out!"  Rainbow took a deep breath.  "Better yet, you can feel it!"  With a grunt, she flapped her wings hard, propelling herself violently forward while simultaneously sending a huge gust behind.

	"Whoah!"  Smythe wobbled left and right, but gathered his wits.  "Hah... hah hah hah!  No way!"  He grinned crazily at her.

	Rainbow didn't linger around.  As a bend came in the ravine, she fearlessly threw herself past a narrow cleft of rocks, her gaze locked on the bright flash of Jagold's gold mane ahead.  Rather than coast along the shallow air currents, she flipped her body several times, planting her hooves on one rock wall and then the opposite one, kicking off so that her figure was launched jaggedly through the tight corner and into the natural straightaway beyond.

	Here, the ravine walls were line with a porous array of caverns and tunnel entrances.  Various leatherbacks rested inside these coves, several of the winged creatures sunbathing as the dawnlight wafted into the dusty ravine.  As Rainbow rocketed furiously into view with a vibrant flash of color, several of the calves quivered and bleated.

	This caught Jagold's attention.  Blinking, she glanced behind her.  "Eeeep!" She flinched, her whole body curling away from the incoming pegasus missile.

	"Ha!"  Rainbow curled around the mare, grasped her hooves with hers, and spun the two of them around in a silly mid-air dance.  "Tag!  You're fourth!."  With a wink, Rainbow flapped her wings and flew ahead, facing backwards.

	Jagold hovered in place, jaw dropped.  "How... how did she—?"

	"No excuse to be slower!" Smythe yelped as she soared past.

	"Hey!  No fair!"  Jagold stammered, beating her wings frantically to regain her momentum as she chased the stallion.  "She said I was fourth!"

	Up ahead, the ravine narrowed again, morphing into a long thin trench with uneven walls that closed in and drew away at random intervals.  Sivrem and Kitsune had this particular stretch memorized, and they flitted up and down and left and right with perfect timing to avoid grinding to a stop against the rocky surfaces.

	Rainbow Dash squinted at the scenario up ahead.  She smirked to herself.  Without declerating, she held her breath and dipped low, threading her body through a long horizontal slit wedged into the base of the trench.  Twiling upside down, she flattened her body and outstretched her wings.  Rainbow faced straight up, and her eyes bore witness to a kaleidoscope of sun flashes as she narrowly traversed the lower end of the geological corridor.

	While Sivrem and Kitsune were bobbing and weaving to make their way through the passage, Rainbow simply glided it out.  Thus, she had more than caught up with them by the time the ravine widened once more into the final stretch.

	"'Sup, dudes?" Rainbow ascended with an innocent smile.

	Kitsune glanced breathlessly aside.  Her bright amber eyes bulged.  "Eggshells!  How did you catch up so fast?"

	"I flew!"  Rainbow saluted.  "What did you do?"

	"No way..."  Kitsune shook her head, gawking at Sivrem in mid-flight.  "She cheated.  She has to have!"

	"Heh heh heh heh..."  Sivrem only smirked and beat his wings harder.  "Let's see her out-cheat this!"  He soared ahead so hard that it knocked Kitsune off-balance.

	"Sivremmmm!" she protested.

	"You might wanna hang onto something," Rainbow said, then held her breath.

	"Huh?  What for—?" Rainbow thundered forward in a blinking, causing Kitsune to reel off course.  The mare ultimately teetered to the side and grasped onto an exposed tree root hanging off the canyon walls.  Dangling, Kitsune stared breathlessly at the two pegasi at the front of the race, streaking forward to the ravine's end.

	"Wooohooo!"  Jagold and Smythe soared past the First-Born.  "Yaaaay!  Fourth again!  Just like she said!"

	"H-hey!"  Kitsune protested.  With a smirk, she kicked off the canyon wall and glided after the rest.

	Up ahead, Rainbow Dash and Sivrem were neck and neck.  The wind tore at their eyes, turned their manes into multi-colored comet streaks.  A shrill whistling noise echoed between them, and a few feathers flew loose from their outstretched wings with each passing second.

	"You're good, outsider..."  Sivrem stammered and panted.  "But you can't beat a First Born like me..."

	"That's just the thing..."  Rainbow hissed through gritting teeth.  "Beating you is a bonus.  What I really wanna do is leave you and your friends' breathless."

	"Huh?"  He jerked his gaze towards her.

	She looked aside, smiling tightly against the winds.  "Just watch.  And promise not to freak out too much."

	"Hah!  What are you planning now, Rainbow?"

	"Figured I'd live up to my name."  She winked.  "Here's to the Valkyrie, pal."  There was a flicker to her eyes, a mixture of blood and gold.  Her pendant strobed—almost as if it was pulling her ahead.  A cone of compressed air formed around her body, turning her figure into a sky-splitting projectile.

	"Ohhhhhhhhhh buck..."  Sivrem didn't realize he was slowing down until he spotted the canyon walls on either side of him oozing to a stand-still.

	Breathless, the other three racers came up from behind.

	"Sivrem!  First-Born!"  Smythe huffed and puffed.  "I don't ge it!  Why did you throw the race—?"

	KAPOWWWWWWW!

	All four cringed, crowding together as they were bathed in a prismatic aura of reflective colors.

	"Oh..."  Jagold murmured, clinging to Kitsune.  "Th-that's why..."

	"Leaping leatherbacks..."  Smythe stammered, his eyes trailing up as he followed the perfect ring of spectral energy fountaining outward from Rainbow's ascending figure.  "So much color..."

	"Sivrem..."  Kitsune gulped dryly.  "Have you seen anything like it?"

	Sivrem was dumbfounded.  Slowly, a large grin on his face grew larger... and even larger.  He let out a loud whoop, accompanied by Jagold and Smythe as the ponies cheered and hollered at the mesmerizing display.



	Along the edges of the ravine, several pegasi gasped.  Several more dashed behind trees and rocks, trembling.

	Jerrio hovered in place, his neck nearly snapping as he jerked his head up to follow the colorful streak Rainbow's body was making through the sky.  The mists parted overhead, giving way to a colorful glow that dwindled in the air like an aurora.

	As the seconds dripped harmlessly by, the pegasi came back out of hiding and clapped their hooves against the earthen floor.

	"Wooohoo!"

	"Wow!"

	"Did you see that?!"

	"She brings Lights of her very own!"

	"Not even Valkyrie Silver can make that!"

	"That's so awesome!"

	"Rainbow Dash!  Rainbow Dash!"

	"Rainbow Dash!  Rainbow Dash!  Rainbow Dash!"

	"That's... that's..."  Rayvinne exhaled, fanning herself with a wing of golden feathers.  She smirked and turned towards Jerrio.  "That's some nifty stuff, eh J?"

	"It..."  He gulped nervously.  "Certainly is..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Stupidly Short Segues and Explosions		//------------------------------//

	A plume of orange flame erupted against the southern rock wall.  Pebbles and clumps of dirt littered the forest floor following the culmination of Roarke's latest volley.  As the smoke cleared, a jagged scar could be seen blanketing the stone face where the metal mare's miniature missile had landed.

	"Hmmm..."  Roarke tapped her chin in thought.  Her lenses retracted as she murmured, "A little too combustible.  Not enough force upon the initial impact."  She adjusted the launcher from where it sat on a firmly placed tripod.  "It may please you to know, little child, that I need to buffer the explosive factor in this particular case..."

	Kera was too busy glancing over her shoulder.  "Uhhhh..."

	"Is something the matter?" Roarke asked without looking.  "I presumed that last rocket was less than satisfactory to your liking as well...?"

	"I coulda sworn I heard an explosion from behind us that last time," the filly murmured.

	"It's simply the echo of the discharge issuing from the jungle's trees behind us," Roarke muttered.  "Nothing more."

	Kera raised an eyebrow, her eyes still scanning the patch of misty sky above.  "You sure about that, Roarkie?  I could have sworn it was slightly above us too."

	"Your young imagination is playing tricks on you," Roarke droned.  "And don't call me Roarkie."

	"Meh."  Kera shrugged, then smirked towards the scarred rock wall.  "When are we gonna test your weapons on squirrels or something?"

	"Nnnnngh... I swear, is everypony in this crater after the traumatization of the elk...?"



	At last, the colors of the sonic rainboom dissipated over the canyon.  The bulk of the pegasi in Jerrio's group were still whooping with cheers.

	From a long distance, Kitsune smirked, then turned towards Sivrem and the others in her group.  "Well..."  She wiped her sweaty brow.  "The rest of the flock certainly liked it."

	"Why wouldn't they?!" Jagold grinned wide.  "That was so cool!"

	"I wonder if they saw that from Central," Smythe remarked.

	"Heh... you kidding?"  Kitsune smirked, slicking back her multi-colored bangs.  "They probably felt it."

	"Hmmmm..."  Sivrem's squinting eyes scanned the lengths of the ravine.  "Has anypony seen where Rainbow Dash landed?"

	"No, why?"  Smythe blinked.  "I figure she'd be joining us again anytime now."

	"Yeah.  Heehee!"  Jagold giggled.  "Probably just to brag in our faces!"  She turned towards the others.  "Face it, guys!  That outsider totally owned the whole bunch of us!  I don't know whether to hide my face or applaud her!"

	"Can we do both?" Smythe remarked, summoning a chuckle from Kitsune.

	Sivrem's body jerked in mid-hover.

	Kitsune glanced at him.  "Wh-what is it, Sivrem?"

	Without saying a word, he dove straight down towards a patch of stone overlooking the northern end of the Raked Ravine.  Smythe and Jagold craned their necks to see what he was flying to.  A gasp emanated between both of them, and they darted after the First-Born.  Slightly worried, Kitsune eventually followed suit.



	Rainbow Dash was curled up in a little blue ball against a cluster of rocks.  Her teeth gnashed as she clutched her head between two forelimbs.  Shivers ran through her body, culminating in a continous twitch to her tail hairs.

	Sivrem landed first.  With a blanching expression, he crouched low and spoke hoarsely, "Rainbow!  Rainbow Dash!"

	"Nnngh... guh..."  Rainbow put on a crooked smile, wincing.  "H-hey there, big guy."  She gulped.  "This isn't as bad as it looks... tr-trust me..."

	"Rainbow!"  Jagold landed beside her, instantly clutching the pegasus' shoulders and nuzzling her head.  "Oh, by Valkyrie's Shout!  You destroyed yourself!"

	"Please I-I'll be fine... just..."

	"I-I don't think you should be touching her," Smythe stammered.

	"What's going on?!" Kitsune breathlessly uttered as she landed.

	Jagold looked up, misty-eyed.  "Somepony go get help!  Jerrio, the Gray Feathers, anyone from Central—"

	"I'm fine... really..."  Rainbow weakly raised a numb hoof.  Kitsune grasped it as she and Rainbow made eye contact.  "It... it'll pass."  She gulped.  "Trust me.  Just... d-don't freak out anymore, okay?"

	"Was it the stunt you just pulled?" Sivrem asked, his eyes narrowing.  "Did that take the life out of you?"

	"Nah..."  Rainbow's winced but nevertheless smiled.  "I-I can pull off th-the sonic rainboom in my sleep..."

	"Sonic Rainboom?" Smythe made a face.

	"A trick that very f-few ponies where I come from know how to do," Rainbow stammered.  "And by few, I mean 'none but me.'"  She took a shuddering breath.  "No, this?"  She gulped.  "This is something else.  It's... it's n-normal.  Trust me."

	Jagold sniffled and nuzzled the mare closer.  "Is there anything we can do?"

	"No.  I mean..." Rainbow shuddered.  "Just... j-just gotta let it pass..."  She smiled assuredly.  "It doesn't last long.  I'll be okay.  I promise."

	Sivrem simply stared at her in thought.

	"Well, you could have fooled us, Rainbow," Smythe said with a smile.  "The way you completely owned the four of us back there?  You may as well be the healthiest mare in the world."

	"I'd like to think so," Rainbow said, her shivers starting to fade.  "Y'know, I may have ridden in on a floating barge of Valkyrie Silver, but I'm no spring chicken."

	"Huh?"

	"Bird pun.  Figured you guys would get it."  Rainbow shook, struggled, and eventually sat up.  "I'm... used to flying anywhere and everywhere I go..."  She nodded the last few waves of dizziness out of her skull.  "I'm talking hundreds if not thousands of miles.  So... y'know... I can pull off a trick or two that most of you likely haven't seen."  She smiled, taking a deep breath.  "All there is to it.  I h-hope you don't mind me showing off."

	"And yet a pony capable of so much majesty is still susceptible to the frailties of life," Sivrem said.

	"Er..."  Rainbow Dash fidgeted.  "I guess?"

	"You're feeling better now?" Kitsune asked, reaching a hoof forward.

	Rainbow took it and stood up.  "Yeah.  Pretty much."  Jagold helped her keep steady.  "Though... uhm... I-I wouldn't mind if you guys helped me with something."

	"Name it," Smythe said.

	Rainbow nodded towards the thick group of ponies still cheering from across the ravine.  "Don't let 'em know that I collapsed just now?"  She smiled nervously.  "I... kinda sorta have a reputation to maintain."

	Kitsune glanced at Sivrem.  Both First-Borns smiled.  "I don't think that'll be a problem..."



	"And then she just flew up, grabbed my hooves, and spun the two of us around like we were dancing!" Jagold chirped, doing miniature flips in the air as the whole group flew over the treetops.  "What nonchalance!  What style!"  Jagold giggled and nudged Rayvinne.  "I'm tellin' you, Ray!  She's one of a kind!"

	"Mmmhmmmm..."  Rayvine smirked and flipped her mane.  "She certainly is."

	Rainbow saw the mare's glance from the corner of her eyes.  She glanced back with a nervous smile.

	"What kills me is that she not only beat all of us, but she was able to throw in such a wicked cool stunt at the end!" Smythe exclaimed.  "I mean—we're good fliers!  But how come we can't pull something like that off?"

	"Because we have two primary functions in the skies of Durandana," Jerrio said, flying firmly through the group.  "To herd and to forage.  So long as we are able to home, then it doesn't matter what way we choose to gust."

	"Yeah... heheh..."  Rainbow Dash smirked aside.  "But it doesn't hurt to get your kicks in every now and then, r-right?"

	Jerrio merely flew on ahead without looking at her.  "I shall check to make sure the elders are ready, Sivrem."

	"Sure thing, Jerrio," the leader replied.

	Rainbow Dash blinked, staring after him.  "He's... uh..."  She cleared her throat.  "...kinda stiff."

	"Oh, we all know.  Trust me."  Sivrem smirked.  "But, for what it's worth, I've rarely seen him as enthusiastic as he's been these past twenty-four hours."

	"Maybe... uhm..."  Rainbow fidgeted, glancing up at the glowing tower as they flew ever closer.  "Maybe I shouldn't have pulled that stunt back there."

	"Huh?"  Sivrem squinted at her.  "Why?"

	"It's been a long time since I had an opportunity to show off like that," Rainbow said, then sighed.  "Especially with pegasi."

	"You don't encounter other winged ponies along your travels?"

	"No.  Believe it or not.  You're a rare breed."

	"Don't you mean we are a rare breed?"

	Rainbow blinked at that.  A giggle popped out of her mouth, followed by another one.  She rolled over in the air and flew backwards, slicking her mane back as she smiled at him.  "Yeah... yeah, I guess so."

	Sivrem smiled calmly at her.  "Frankly, I would have been let down if you didn't give us your all.  What's life if not an excuse to exhibit the Valkyrie's spirit strongly?"

	"Well, thanks for... y'know..."  Rainbow glanced at the various ponies flocking with them.  "...still counting me as 'strong.'"

	"Why shouldn't I?"

	"Well..."  Rainbow glanced down at the jungle canopy.

	Sivrem tilted his head aside in mid-flight.  "Your condition.  Does it have a pattern?"

	"Huh?"

	"I figured you suffered your spell on account of the effort it took to produce that 'Sonic Rainbooming.'"

	"Oh.  Uhm..."  Rainbow bit the edge of her muzzle.  "It's hard to say.  It comes and goes.  But... erm... it's been having a lot more commonly lately."

	"Has that been the prevailing pattern in your life?"

	"Oh, I wasn't born with this."

	"How so?"

	"I... I-I don't want to get into it all that much..."

	Sivrem nodded.  "I apologize for prying."

	"No, it's okay.  I just figured that I would have saved it for explaining to the Gray Feathers, seeing as you're all waiting to have them explain stuff to me."

	"Heh.  Fair enough."

	"But, long story short, I... g-got infected by something."

	Sivrem raised an eyebrow.

	Rainbow stammered, "It's n-not contagious!  It's more like a corruption.  Something... er... zapped me, and I've been suffering from it ever since."  She grasped the pendant around her neck.  "You see this thing?"

	"Hard not to," Sivrem said with a smile.  "It suits you."

	"Heh.  Yes, well... it's very important to me and my culture for a ton of reasons.  But, in my specific case, it's a gift from the Princesses of my kingdom."  She gulped.  "Not only that, but it's the one thing keeping me alive."

	"I... did not know that," Sivrem said, cocking his head aside.  "Do you always keep the source of your vulnerability around your neck?"

	"I-I've never really seen it as a crutch, to be honest."  She rubbed the ruby lightning bolt, summoning a slight glow.  Nearby pegasi cooed at the illumination.  "It's actually kind of cool, and..."  Rainbow sighed gently.  "It reminds me of a lot of ponies who were very close to me."

	"Then it is a blessing that you still have it on you," Sivrem said with a smile.

	"Does... does it freak you out?" Rainbow asked, fidgeting.  "Not just this, but the sonic rainboom I just did and the ship I flew in on and the fact that I'm an outsider and—"

	"Whoah whoah whoah..."  The stallion chuckled.  "Slow down!  I can see you're concerned for us, Rainbow Dash, and that's quite noble.  But we wouldn't be loyal children of the Valkyrie if we succumbed so easily to fear and uncertainty..."  He winked.  "Now, would we?"

	Rainbow gave a nervous smile.  "Heheh... g-guess you have a point."

	"Some of that which you've shown us is awe inspiring.  As for myself... heh... I'm still trying to wrap my head around flying Valkyrie Silver.  As for the lights and the sonic rainboom and the stories from beyond the greens... well... I find them all remarkable.  I have no doubt the elders will as well.  After all, Gray Feathers are simply First-Borns who have given up their days of flight for maintaining the scrolls.  I think they'll be ecstatic to talk to you.  You'll bring back the spark of youth to their minds."

	"Now there's a thought."

	"I presume you're concerned about my friend Jerrio."

	Rainbow spun around, facing forward as they flew along.  "Erm... sh-should I be?"

	"He's a stallion who takes things a little too seriously.  I swear, he was born a Gray-Feather."  Sivrem smirked as the last thing he said summoned a chuckle from Smythe and Jagold nearby.  "Personally, I don't understand how anypony could be anything but mesmerized by your presence.  I've always assumed there was a world beyond the greens—including ponies like Durandanans.  After all, the Valkyrie had to have come from somewhere, and I bet even once I have my hooves on the legendary scrolls and the words contained therein, I'll still have questions to ask."

	"I... I-I don't know if I can provide the sort of answers you might be seeking."

	"You can't?"  Sivrem cocked his head aside.  "Or you shouldn't?"

	Rainbow Dash winced heavily.  At last she murmured, "I really don't know what to say..."

	"Nor should you be troubled about it," Sivrem said.  He reached over and patted Rainbow's shoulder.  "Speak to the Gray Feathers, Rainbow Dash.  They'll be as open to your wisdom as you'll be to theirs."  He smiled and gestured ahead.  "Behold... the Middle Tower in all its glory..."

	Rainbow looked up... and up and up and up.  Her jaw hung agape.
		//------------------------------//
		// Come Meet the Gray Feathers		//------------------------------//

	Built along the vertical stalk of Durandana's central tower was a complex array of circular platforms, all interconnected by a double-helix of winding wooden lattices.  Atop these platforms, several large buildings had been fitted together out of elaborately carved wooden slats.  Many of the structures were three stories tall—consuming as much height as the base of the next upper platform could allow.  At first, Rainbow couldn't guess how the structures of Central D were capable of withstanding the mechanical extension of the tower itself, until she realized that its upper vertical pylons simply collapsed inside one another, occupying the hollow of the lower base when there was no sunlight up above to illuminate.

	As it was First Light, the summit of the Central Tower was in full glow.  Rainbow watched as a fixed point of light beamed in from a distance—presumably originating in the reflectors of the eastmost tower—and found its mark somewhere in the center of a geometrically rigid structure.  A shiny "cube" with jagged edges topped off the tower like a piece of glittery chalk at the end of a standing pool cue.  Unlike the rest of the tower, this structure was noticeably metallic, with immaculate gold surfaces carrying a wet sheen from morning dew and mist.  There were several porous holes in the walls of this structure—including an east and west opening to allow for the magnified light to shine through the very heart of the crater.  Aside from that, the entire summit resonated with a platinum glow, illuminating the base of low-hanging clouds that drifted lazily overhead.

	It was a difficult task to make a solid observation of this spectacle, for pegasi were constantly flying to and fro between the tower and Rainbow Dash, and the wandering flocks were growing even denser as the seconds rolled by.  One by one, the thick crowds of ponies took notice of the stranger with a ruby pendant hanging around her neck.  Collectively, Durandanans both young and old hovered about to stare at the Sivrem's group and the striking mare who was accompanying them.

	Rainbow heard just as much commotion below her as above.  She glanced down to see that there were numerous buildings built all along the forest floor bordering the centeral spire.  Many of them were veritable towers in and of themselves, scaling as high as seven stories tall.  Structures were built into trees, erected on platforms, and even affixed to the base of the main spire itself.  The community of Central D was a virtual city, and it easily dwarfed the tiny cluster of treehouses that made up West D.  This made for innumerable platforms from which pegasi took off and landed, making their way to the furthest reaches of the crater.

	Below all of the buildings—including the Central Tower itself—Rainbow could have sworn she saw a floor of solid wood.  She squinted, trying to see beyond the branches and foliage and pegasi feathers, but she couldn't tell if it was a courtyard or something else entirely.

	By then, a terribly thick crowd had gathered.  Pegasi murmured to one another, their eyes all locked on Rainbow Dash.  From a distance, Rainbow could hear occasional murmurs of "outsider" and "ponies with no wings" and "flying Valkyrie silver."

	"I guess I've been expected," Rainbow muttered.

	Kitsune nodded as she flew alongside her and Sivrem.  "We're a talkative bunch here in Durandana."  She smirked aside at her.  "We just couldn't help ourselves."

	"I almost wish we could have brought some of your buddies along!" Jagold exclaimed.  "No one here has seen a pony without feathers before!"

	"Er..."  Rainbow smiled nervously.  "Maybe it's best that we take things one wing flap at a time..."

	"There's no reason to be nervous, Rainbow," Sivrem said with a smile.

	"It's not me I'm worried about."

	Jerrio spoke up.  "There."  He pointed at the second lowest platform of the center tower.  "The elders await, Sivrem."

	"Calm down, Jerrio," Sivrem said with a chuckle.  He flapped his wings and dove forward.  "I've got this."

	Kitsune gestured for Rainbow to hold back, so she did.  Craning her neck, Rainbow watched as Sivrem touched down on the platform.  It was so low to the forest floor that the canopy shadowed most of the wooden surface, making for a cool and relaxing shade.  The longer Rainbow stared, she could make out several clusters of equine shapes lounging about in the sanctuary that the platform afforded.

	"Is that where all the old ponies live?" Rainbow asked.

	"Mmmm... mostly the First-Borns who become Gray Feathers," Kitsune explained.

	"All ponies are welcome to congregate there," Jerrio chimed in.  "But the Inner Sanctum belongs to the Gray Feathers.  Only they can open the door to the Gold Lights."

	"Uh huh..."  Rainbow nodded.  "Where exactly are the 'Gold Lights?'"

	Jerrio fidgeted in midair.

	"Oh... oops?"  Rainbow smiled awkwardly.  "Am I not supposed to know where they are?"

	"That... is up to the Gray Feathers to share," Jerrio quietly remarked.

	"What he said," Kitsune said with a smile.

	"Kitsune!  Jerrio!" A pony called out from up above.  The wind whistled.  Rainbow looked up to see a middle-aged stallion gliding down, only to be followed closely by no less than three dozen fillies and colts.  "Is it true?  Do you have the outsider with you?"

	"The one and only, Ice!" Kitsune said with a smile.  "Giving the little gulls their morning exercise!"

	"You bet!"  Ice said with a smirk.  "But I couldn't resist swinging by just once!"  He squinted from where he glided in a slowly descending circle, accompanied by fast-feathered foals.  "Whoah... her mane really is the real deal!  Just like they said!"

	"Uhhh..."  Rainbow nodded.  "I'm afraid so."

	"Whoah!" A colt gasped in a scratchy voice.  "She talks!"

	"Of course she talks!" A filly raspberried at him.  "She's a pony, isn't she?"

	"From beyond the greens?!"  Another colt made a face.  "Could she be a frost ghost?"

	Rainbow squinted.  "Frost... ghost...?"

	"Yeah, well, can a frost ghost make colored lights appear out of thin air?!" Smythe said with a grin.

	"What?!"

	"No way!"

	"She can make lights?!"

	"Sure can!"  Rayvinne winked at the circling youngsters.  "With explosions like thunder too!"

	"Cooooool!"

	"That's so awesome!"

	"I wanna see!"

	Jerrio sighed.  "Now's not exactly a good time, Ice..."

	"Oh, lemme guess..."  The stallion smirked in mid-glide.  "Off to feather the Gray Feathers, eh?"

	"Sivrem's chatting with the elders right now," Kitsune said.

	"By Valkyrie's shout!  How exciting!"

	"Ice, can we stay and watch the outsider make lights?"

	"Pleeeeeeease?"

	"Oh, do let them stay!"  Jagold snatched two random foals with her forelimbs and nuzzled them closely.  "Heeeeeeee!  Life can never be too adorable!"

	"Gaah!  Bleack!"

	"She smells like spider webs!"

	"Heheh... I get the point..."  Ice winked and let loose a shrill whistle.  "Alright, my little sparrows!"  He motioned towards the youngsters and ascended high above the treetops.  "We have fruit to gather for lunch, then it's lesson time!  Quickly, now!  Let's gust!"

	"Alright, Ice!"

	"Coming!"

	"Bye, Miss Outsider!"

	"I really like your mane!"

	The fillies and colts took off after the stallion.  The group of foals glided along the northern horizon, disappearing beyond the mist.

	Jagold blinked, hovering alone.  "Awwwwwwwwwww..."  She sighed, ears drooping.  Smythe drifted over with a chuckle and patted her shoulder.

	"Ice is so good with those gulls," Rayvinne remarked.  "I only wish my wingteacher was half as pleasant as that stallion when I was little."

	"You should take up flocking with the youngsters yourself, Ray," Kitsune said.  "It'd put your talents to good use."

	"Pffft.  Eggshells to that!"  Rayvinne smirked.  "I'd kiss my social life good bye."

	"Hah!  As if you only ever settle for kissing."

	"Wuh oh.  Somepony's cruising for a wet tail wind!"

	Both mares giggled.

	"Shhh..."  Jerrio pointed.  "Sivrem's returning."

	Rainbow Dash pivoted about in time to meet the stallion.

	He hovered up, smiling.  "They're ready to greet you."  He looked past Rainbow.  "Kit?  Jerrio?"

	The other two First-Borns drifted forward.  Rayvinne, Smythe, and Jagold stayed behind, with the last one waving happily.

	Rainbow waved back, gulped, and followed the other three towards the lower platform.  As they entered the shade of the nearby jungle canopy, Rainbow's eyes refocused, and she saw dozens if not hundreds of equines gathered about on the wooden floor.  There were crude chairs and benches, upon which the majority of the oldest ponies sat.  At first, Rainbow presumed that they were sleeping.  She soon realized that their lips were moving, murmuring words in quiet meditative breaths.

	Her companions touched down, so she did as well.  The closer she got to the ponies, she saw that they were all clad in plain gray tunics and gowns.  To her surprise, a multitude of the "elders" weren't exactly elders at all, but simply a few years older than the likes of Kitsune and Sivrem.  The truly senior equines didn't appear until she was led towards a building erected against the curved base of the tower itself.  There, lanterns full of flittering lightning bugs cast a dim illumination across the wooden floor and ceiling.

	A full line of ponies stood in wait.  One stood out a few feet from the rest.  She was a mare with a youthful complexion and a calm, wise smile.  As Rainbow trotted up, so did she.  Her mane was bleached white, save for the very tips of her long locks, which still possessed a faded fascimile of multi-colored dye.

	"Greetings, Rainbow Dash, we have been waiting for you," the mare said.  Her red eyes glowed in the lanternlight, adding warmth to her words.  "Sivrem has told us so much.  Welcome to Durandana."

	"Uh... yeah.  I've been made to feel totally welcome."  Rainbow's eyes darted towards the other Gray Feathers.  Most of their manes were entirely ghost-white.  She glanced back at the pony who still possessed a hint of color.  "Really, it's been pretty cool.  I was kinda sorta afraid that maybe you all would be freaked out by my friends and I."

	She chuckled richly.  "An understandable concern.  Trust me.  Durandana is all about peace and harmony.  It's something that the Valkyrie herself strove for.  She was a warrior at heart, true, but also a pacifist in spirit, which is what has made her legacy so remarkable."

	"Heh..."  Rainbow nodded with a smile.  "I totally feel you."  She swallowed.  "Uhm... how should I refer to you...?"

	"Please, call me by my foalname."  She pointed to herself.  "I am Fawful, and I've been chosen by the rest of the Gray Feathers to speak on our behalf, and to teach you the ways of the Valkyrie."

	"Oh... uhm..."  Rainbow fidgeted.  "Uh—"

	"And..."  She smiled, nodding her head.  "I'm certain that you have much to teach me in turn."

	"Well..."  Rainbow scratched the back of her head, smiling.  "I dunno about teaching, but I definitely have some stuff to share.  I... uh..."  She glanced around.  "I have a buttload of questions about this place."

	"And we certainly have many questions as well," Fawful said.  "Your presence here is a miracle in and of itself.  We never make contact with the realm beyond the greens."

	"Yeah... heh..."  Rainbow smirked.  "I sorta got that part."

	"Flying Valkyrie silver and ponies without wings?"  Fawful chuckled.  "Most remarkable indeed.  And here I thought my years of excitement were over."  A pause. She glanced aside at Sivrem, then back at Rainbow.  "I heard that you have the ability to generate your own lights."

	Rainbow glanced at her companions.

	Sivrem said nothing.  Jerrio bit his lip.

	"With all due respect, elder..."  Kitsune bowed as she said, "Rainbow Dash isn't entirely in the best of health.  It would do her well to rest while conversing with the Gray Feathers."

	"What?"  Rainbow gawked at her strangely.  "For real, I'm not—"

	"I do not wish to be rude.  If she needs rest, then we will most certainly provide it," Fawful said.  She reached over and touched Kitsune's shoulders.  "Thank you, Kitsune.  You may go now."

	Kitsune bowed again.  As she, Sivrem, and Jerrio turned to fly off, she gave Rainbow a lasting smile, then was gone.

	Rainbow sighed.

	"Is something wrong, outsider?" Fawful remarked.

	"I dunno..."  Rainbow turned towards her with a weak smile.  "I've travelled an awful lot, and I'm... just not used to ponies treating me so nicely."

	"Is that so?  How unfortunate," Fawful remarked.  She led Rainbow towards the dimly lit building before them.  "I would very much like to hear all about your journeys."

	"I get the feeling you're gonna do just that," Rainbow said.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Fuzziest of First Contacts		//------------------------------//

	KAPOW!

	A chunk of rock flew into a hundred smoldering pebbles, rattling across the forest floor along the southern edge of the crater.

	Roarke stood up straight from a nimble crouch.  With a metallic hiss, a miniature missile launcher retracted back into a sheath that was attached to her shoulder.  She flexed her forelimb, feeling the tug of the metal braces fitted neatly around her figure.  "Hmmm... I can barely feel the temperature increase.  I guess that confirms that the thermal layers are in working order."

	"Heh... that was a pretty nice one, Roarkie!" Kera said from where she sat on a grassy mound of dirt at the forest's edge.  She grinned, her horn glowing as she stared at the clearing smoke.  "I especially like the way it went 'kapow!'"

	"Yes.  It tends to do that."

	"You should make one that makes a lot of flame!  Y'know... Phwoooomb!  All bright and orange n'stuff!"

	"That's not necessary," Roarke droned, her nostrils flaring.  "My days of watching forests burn are... well behind me."

	"You know, for a pony who deals with explosions so much, you really don't seem to be all that proud of them."

	"It's not about pride, Kera," Roarke said, trotting back to her box of equipment.  "If anything, it was all about getting the job done.  Believe it or not, such tasks required more subtlety."

	"Really?"

	"Indeed.  Several of my Searonese sisters were dependent on shock and awe alone, but most of those metal mares didn't live to see their own bounties turned in.  Their weapons had the awful tendency for blowing up in their faces."

	"Oh.  Not cool."

	"Indeed, not cool in the least," Roarke droned.  "But it was to be expected.  You have an entire culture devoid of mothers and fathers and you give the blood-thirsty daughters a hoofful of death machines and... well... the results aren't entirely surprising."

	"Wow."  Kera blinked, then smiled.  "You must be super-lucky to have survived as long as you did."

	"I almost didn't," Roarke said, pausing to stare blankly into the treeline.  "I was taking jobs with higher and higher stakes each passing month.  Imre did all she could to keep me alive, but it didn't matter.  I had it in my head that I had to impress Pestiferous.  At last, I had a huge Ledomaritan bounty that would have given me a fortune.  There would have been several Franzington heads thrown in to boot.  But... looking back..."  Her words trailed off.

	Kera gazed curiously at her.

	Roarke sighed out her nostrils.  "Well..."  She muttered, "Looking back now, I realize that Pestiferous would very likely have betrayed me despite my professional diligence."  She fiddled with the equipment in her container.  "'Roarke Most Rare' was just a banal monicker.  In the end, I didn't owe my luck to myself.  I owed it to a mare simply for kicking my teeth in.  She changed my life."

	"Uh huh..."  Kera stifled a yawn, twirling several pebbles magically above her head.  "I bet it doesn't change the fact that you're pissed at her."

	"Hmmm?  Rainbow?"

	"I mean—yeah!  She beat you up, didn't she?"

	"Kera, you're still a foal," Roarke droned.  "I can't even pretend to explain to you the fine intricacies of—"  She glanced up, and her lenses retracted.  "...how long have you been doing that?"

	"Hmmm?"  Kera's eyes darted over.  "Doing what?"

	Roarke pointed.  "The rocks.  Floating them."

	"Hmmm?"  Kera looked back at the cyclonically twirling pebbles.  "Oh, these?"  She smirked.  "I snatched them from the last explosion."

	Roarke tilted her head aside.  "You caught them in midair?"

	"Yeah, sure."  Kera shrugged.  "Don't get me wrong.  I'm not bored or anything."  She pointed at Roarke's equipment.  "It just takes you so long to load another missile, so I'm just passing the time."  She kicked her legs playfully as she hummed to herself.

	Roarke turned and looked at the pockmarked cliffface.  She turned back towards Kera.  Silence.  She trotted away from the equipment case.  "Kera... I'm thinking..."

	"Huh?" Kera glanced up.

	Roarke stood above her.  "I think I've tested enough of my weapons for the time being."  Her lenses pistoned outward.  "How about you get some practice out of the way instead."

	"Me?  Practice?"  Kera's eyes twitched.  Her tattooed face grinned.  "You mean I get to fire some rockets?"

	"No."

	"Awwwwwwwww..."

	"What I mean is..."  Roarke gestured towards the shattered boulders lying on the stone floor.  "I would like to see you move some of these rocks with your magic.  What do you think?"

	"Meh.  Please..."  Kera rolled her green eyes.  "I was saving Belle's and Phoenix's skin back in Blue Nova while you were busy crashing your ship into the ground.  Good job with that, by the way.  You know, according to Propsy, that mana vessel of yours looked just like a giant—"

	"Hmmm.  I understand."  Roarke turned and trotted back to her container.  "If you deem the task too taxing..."

	Kera stood up straight, brow furrowed.  "Is that supposed to be some sort of a challenge?"

	Roarke glanced up briefly while shuffling through her equipment.  "...Meh."  She looked back at her things.

	Kera fumed and fumed.  "Yeah... well..."  She glanced at the floating rocks, then shot them off like bullets into the trees.  "I can make a rock spin into orbit!"  She hopped down from the dirt mound and stomped her hooves.  "See if I can't!"

	Roarke glanced up with a bored expression.  "Prove it."



	"An entire city?!" Fawful exclaimed, breathless.  She and Rainbow Dash stood on cushioned benches beneath an array of dimly-lit lanterns inside a wooden lounge.  "Made out of Valkyrie Silver?"

	"Floating buildings," Rainbow Dash said.  "The whole city flew.  And what you call Valkyrie Silver—well—it's really a bunch of granite and stone buildings older than I can even pretend to tell you."

	Across the way, several old ponies with white manes glanced at one another, murmuring in awe before returning their gaze upon the ongoing conversation.

	"And..."  Fawful stroked her frayed bangs back, staring blankly into the shadows.  "And while in Stratopolis, you were attacked by this matriarch named 'Axan' and her brood of fire-breathing children?"

	"No no no..."  Rainbow held her hooves up, chuckling slightly.  "That was Silvadel.  See, you're not letting me tell the stuff that I've seen in order."  She smiled.  "My friends and I survived our ordeal in Stratopolis only recently.  Silvadel was nearly a year ago... well... for me it was.  I've since flown through Ledomare and Xona and... and..."  Rainbow blinked, squirmed in place, then shrugged.  "Well, that's about it, I guess.  Heh.  But Silvadel and Darkstine and Emeraldine were all before that."

	"And you claim to hail from... Emeraldine?"

	Rainbow smiled.  "Equestria."

	"I-I'm sorry..."  Fawful shuddered.  "It's just... all so much to take in."  Her red eyes narrowed.  "To think that there's actually more than one kingdom outside of Durandana, beyond the greens!"

	"Yeah, crazy, huh?" Rainbow smirked.  "Now... hee hee hee... if you'd just let me tell it all in order—"

	"Please forgive me..."  Fawful chuckled warmly.  "I-I suppose we're just keen to ask so many questions—"

	An old stallion spoke up from another bench.  "Are there ponies living in proximity to the basin?"

	Fawful rolled her eyes and smiled, blushing.

	Rainbow craned her neck to look at him.  "What?  You mean right outside the crater?"

	"Crater?"

	Rainbow gestured with her hooves.  "This place—Durandana, as you call it—is basically one huge bowl of earth surrounded by a series of high mountains called the Sky Stabs and—"

	The stallion and several other Gray Feathers stared at Rainbow blankly.

	"... ... ..."  Rainbow blinked.  "Ahem."  She slinked back in her seat.  "Yeah, there are places right beyond the greens.  One place is called Alafreo.  It's a pretty swell community built on a bunch of bluffs overlooking the arctic wastes.  Just imagine a bunch of metal platforms overlooking crashing surf and populated by a bunch of big sentient turtles.  Really nice turtles, by the way.  Boy were those guys really swell to hang with..."

	"Turtles... as in shelled reptiles?" a wrinkled mare remarked.

	"And they can think and talk?" another stallion stammered.

	"Er... right..."  Rainbow grinned.  "Where I come from, there're dogs, dragons, sea serpents, griffons—all capable of talking, laughing, hugging, and farting up a storm.  Whew!  Boy, lemme tell you!  And don't get me started on the foxes that my buddies Josho and Eagle Eye found in Aurum.  Heh... talk about jobbers..."

	"Dragons...?"  A mare murmured.  "Sea serpents?"

	Another mare nodded.  "These names are... odd."  She squinted at Rainbow Dash from afar.  "Do you mean to say that there are creatures who aren't the foals of the Valkyrie?"

	"Yeah, well..."  Rainbow fidgeted.  "You guys are so big on birds, right?"  She smirked and gestured.  "You really expect yourselves to believe that the Valkyrie squirted out an albatross in her day and age?  I mean, come on..."

	"Animals are different, child."

	"Ahem."  Fawful cleared her throat and smiled.  "Sivrem and his flock claim to have seen ponies without feathers on board Rainbow's flying Valkyrie Silver.  The First-Borns Kitsune and Jerrio confirm this."  She stared at the other elders.  "Some ponies in Rainbow's group have horns sticking out of their head—one even has them branching out like tree limbs."

	"The dudes with a single horn are called unicorns," Rainbow said.  "And where I come from, they're just a race of ponies."

	"A race?"

	"Yeah."  Rainbow nodded.  "Just like earth ponies and pegasi."

	"So... there are ponies who can't fly?"

	"Oh, totally.  Sad, isn't it?"  Rainbow grinned.  "But hey, we're all special in our own little ways.  Unicorns can perform magic—er... what you may call 'the lights.'"

	The Gray Feathers all murmured amidst one another.

	"And earth ponies—well—aside from being boring as mud..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes with a smirk.  "They're actually really, really strong, not to mention freaky-good at raising crops and doing farmwork.  Aaaaaand... uh... as for that one dude with the 'branching horns?'  That's Floydien, our ship's pilot.  He's an elk.  As to why he can use magic... uhhh... I-I haven't actually figured it all out myself."  Rainbow gulped.  "I mean, y'know, I'm awesome and all... but I don't know the answers to everything.  Sorry."

	"It's quite alright, child."  A mare smiled from across the room.  "Your words are mystifying... but enlightening all the same."

	"And, y'know... about our 'Valkyrie Silver,'" Rainbow said.  "It's not really as crazy as you probably think.  Sure, the Noble Jury looks freaky on the outside, but really all that keeps it up in the air is a combination of a bunch of different magically-powered technologies.  But—to be honest—I find your big glowy tower thingies to be pretty snazzy as well.  I mean—heck—I don't know how they work!  But I'm sure there's a way!"

	"They magnify the Light From Above," an elder said.

	"Huh?"

	Fawful smiled.  "At the start of every day, the Light From Above appears over the eastern edge of the greens.  The earth's summit there allows for a fixed point of luminescence to shine through at dawn.  Ages ago, when the Durandanans inhabited this basin by the Valkyrie's blessing, we sought to harness the glow of the Light in hopes of better exalting its majesty."

	"So we constructed the towers," a stallion said.  "While also equipping them with sacred relics of the Gold Lights.  We were able to broadcast the glow throughout the basin, but it required three towers to do."

	Fawful continued.  "We adjust their height and rotate them at regular intervals.  By the grace of the Light's glory, we've relegated the glow to three magnified points in the day."

	"First Light... Second Light... and Final Light," Rainbow murmured with a nod.  "I get it.  The Towers are just projecting sunlight as it passes over the basin throughout the course of a day."  She smiled.  "That's so cool..."

	"We are blessed by its shine," Fawful said.  "It is one of the many signs of the Valkyrie's glory still at work in this land, along with the life-giving heat from the Gold Lights."

	"Uh huh."  Rainbow leaned forward.  "And where... are these Gold Lights."

	Fawful's eyes darted towards the other elders.

	They stared back.

	Fawful focused on Rainbow once again, smiling.  "One thing before another, Rainbow Dash.  We know you wish to comprehend who and what we are, and we feel the same way about you.  But... it is certainly challenging.  A lot of what you say is hard to fathom."

	"Yeah, okay..."  Rainbow nodded.  "No rush or anything..."

	"I'm afraid it's not exclusively up to me to share with you the majesty of the Gold Lights.  It is... very sacred to us."  Fawful chuckled slightly.  "It's an odd thing to even have to explain that fact to another pony.  You see, we've never once had a reason to prepare for speaking with an outsider about this."

	"Heh.  I get it.  It'd be like me trying to explain pizza or something."

	Fawful gave Rainbow a blank expression.

	"Erm..."  Rainbow cleared her throat.  "Did you... h-have more questions or something?"

	"Well..."  Fawful leaned back, smiling.  "I would absolutely love to hear more about where you came from."

	"What, you mean Equestria?"

	"Please.  If you wouldn't mind.  I am most excited to know more of this... multi-faceted landscape."

	"Well, you see, it's all really simple."  Rainbow leaned forward.  "It's a monarchy run by two matriarchs named—"  Just then, she froze, her expression paling.

	"What?"  Fawful blinked, her eyes bright with concern.  "Is something the matter, Rainbow?"

	"Erm..."  Rainbow shuddered with a crooked smile.  "Maybe we should... uh... g-go for a stroll or a flight or something?"

	The ponies exchanged curious glances, then stared collectively at her.

	Rainbow gulped and said, "You may need some fresh air for some of the stuff I'm about to tell you..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Take It Or Leave It		//------------------------------//

	"Focus... focus..."  Roarke paced around the petite mare before the southern clifface.  Several tiny rocks levitated between them, all covered in a glittering translucence that matched the green aura emanating from the filly's horn.  "Don't lose your grip.  Not even for an instance."

	"Heh... that's some tough talk," Kera said with a smirk.  She licked her lips and caused the pebbles to spin around them both.  "Coming from a not-unicorn such as yourself."

	"And you expect Dr. Bellesmith to treat you any better?"

	"Why don't you just call her 'Belle' at this point?"

	"You're not concentrating."

	"Pffft.  Like it's making a difference!"  Kera grinned.  "I'm rocking these... rocks!  Heehee!"

	"You're too confident.  Arrogance can prove to be your undoing.  No need to turn this lesson into your veritable swan song."

	"H-huh?"

	Roarke stood above her.  "I think I've tested enough of my weapons for the time being."  Her lenses pistoned outward.  "How about you get some practice out of the way instead."

	FWOOSH.

	Without warning, a dozen rockets launched from Roarke's suit and screamed towards Kera.

	Kera yelped in surprise and instinctively lashed out with her telekinesis. The ensuing whip of energy lanced across the oncoming missiles, deflecting them over Roarke's stoic figure. Roarke didn't even flinch as they detonated across the cliff-face behind her with a deafening roar.

	As the noise faded and the dust settled, Kera managed to recover enough from her shock to speak.

	"H-Holy poopstains, Roarke!" Kera snarled angrily. "What the hay was that for?!"

	A moment of silence passed with no answer, before several multi-pod rocket launchers extended from Roarke's sides with a loud whirring of gears. As they fell into place, Roarke responded with only one word:

	"Practice."

	And two dozen ribbons of multi-hued smoke trailed the next salvo of missiles as they arced their way inexorably towards the filly, roasting her alive.

	"...Kera!"



	"Kera?  Kera!"

	"Nnnngh—guh..."  The filly's emerald eyes flashed open.  "Huh?"

	Before her, a heavy boulder five times the foal's size was floating in a field of green translucence.  Roarke trotted into view, her eye-lenses narrowing on the child.

	"You have to concentrate.  Just what were you thinking about just now?" Roarke asked.

	"Rrright..."  Kera gritted her teeth as bulbs of sweat collected across her tattooed brow.  "That this thing weighs a ton!"

	"Do not pretend that this is out of your element."  Roarke casually shoved the boulder with her hoof, causing the thing to twirl in the air, making Kera's levitation act all the more difficult.  "From what Bellesmith has said, you've handled far more challenging spells while in hiding with both her and Phoenix."

	"Yeah, well... grnngh... th-that was... a while ago," Kera's voice cracked.  The boulder wobbled more in midair.  "Couldn't we—I dunno—let me spin around some smaller rocks instead?  My head hurts..."

	"Kera, do you or do you not wish to improve your unicorn prowess?"

	"I-I do!  But—"

	"Then you need to push yourself harder," Roarke said firmly.  "You have what it takes to do ten times that which you're tackling right now.  I have full confidence in this."

	"I don't think I can—"

	"The filly who warded off a flock of undead pegasi is inside you still," Roarke said.  "You single-hoofedly saved the Noble Jury in a burst of righteous fury.  Somewhere, that filly is waiting to show herself.  Together, we are going to find her."

	Kera trembled slightly.  "I... I-I'm not sure that I want to... to..."

	"Shhhhh..."  Roarke stood over Kera.  "Concentrate.  This is child's play.  You could shatter this mountainside if you truly wanted to."

	Kera sighed.  Closing her eyes, she tried relaxing her muscles.  Slowly—with gradual strength—the boulder lifted higher and higher.

	"Good... good... keep focusing, Kera..."



	"How exactly do you do that?"

	"Hmmm?"  Eagle Eye tilted his head aside.

	Ebon pointed at the severed blades of grass flying in complex, intersecting figure-eights before them.  "How do you make them move in such whild yet beautiful patterns?"

	"Oh... uhm..."  Eagle Eye glanced down at his hooves. He was in the process of plucking more blades of grass from the ground and tossing them into the telekinetic field before them.  With a smirk, he shrugged and nestled deeper into the large roots of a tree where he and Ebon were lying side by side.  "The key is not to think about it so much."

	"Oh yeah?"

	"It's all about being in a relaxed state," Eagle said.  The blades of grass orbited the two stallions' heads.  "Not fretting too much, y'know?"

	"I see..."  Ebon sighed gently, leaning his head against the ex-mercenary's shoulder.  He produced a tired smile.  "And are you... relaxed right now?"

	"If by 'relaxed' you mean 'happy,' then sure."  Eagle smiled.  He tilted his horn forward and "blasted" the levitating pieces of vegetation, sending them into a wild flight over the rippling pond just a few feet away.  The tiny waterfall kept trickling into that end of the basin, causing a misty rainbow to appear in the noonday sunlight.  "It's very tranquil here.  Almost reminds me of—"

	"Lemme guess..."  Ebon smirked.  "Foxtaur."

	"A little bit, yeah."  Eagle nodded.  "But, all things considered, Foxtaur wasn't a place where I should have been even remotely relaxed."

	"Why not?" Ebon asked.  "You were safe from the eyes and ears of Queen Ledo.  At least at first."

	"Yes, but we were still AWOL soldiers, and despite how righteous we may or may not have been in our reasons to desert Ledomare, we were still wanted stallions, which kept us constantly just a sneeze away from being caught and executed."

	"Yeesh.  When you put it like that, it must have been unbearably stressful."

	"And yet, it wasn't.  For a few months there, everything was... as peaceful as could be," Eagle murmured.  "I wasn't on the Xonan front, so I didn't have to deal with random orders to kill civillians.  And I wasn't in Franzington, so I didn't have to deal with my family's cold distaste for who I was."

	"I'm... very sorry that you had to deal with such terrible things, Eagle," Ebon said.  "At no fault of your own."

	Eagle shrugged.  "I had to come to terms with a lot of major stuff in life, for sure, but I was still... y'know... overall happy."  He turned towards Ebon.  "In the end, it all comes down to who you choose to spend your time with.  In Foxtaur, I had Phoenix and Zenith..."  He gulped.  "And Crimson.  Sometimes they were pretty rough to handle, but..."  He smiled calmly.  "I had no doubt whatsoever that they cared for me... and for my well-being."

	Ebon gazed towards the pond waters.  "You must have been very happy with them."  A lavender hoof tilted his face until he was gazing into Eagle's eyes.

	"Not as happy as I am now," Eagle softly said.

	Ebon bit his lip, his eyes glistening slightly.  He leaned forward, nuzzling his head just beneath Eagle's chin.  The unicorn wrapped a hoof around the stallion's shoulder and held him close.  For the time being, Ebon's mane had a very pungent... very real scent to it.  Eagle concentrated on it, and it steadied his lungs so that he didn't sob as he embraced the stallion dearly.



	"And these Elements of Harmony..."  A Gray Feather squinted Rainbow's way from where he hovered in mid-air.  "...you were one of them?"

	"Oh.  Yes.  Still am, I guess you could say," Rainbow said.  She, Fawful, and a train of elders were slowly orbiting the lower stalk of the tower.  Young pegasi zipped back and forth above and below them, curiously glancing at the group as they congregated around the fluttering outsider.  "Together, the six of us embodied all that was snazzy and good about peace.  It came with some pretty cool fireworks too... heh.  More than once, we had to combine our powers to stop evil things from taking over the Kingdom of Equestria."

	"Was there some sort of process by which the half-dozen of you were selected to possess these Elements?" another elder inquired.  "It seems quite bold of Celestique and Elune to relinquish such power to ordinary citizens."

	"Celestia and Luna."

	"My apologies."

	Rainbow giggled.  "It's perfectly fine!  And, no, there wasn't a big process, per se.  In truth, I never thought all that much about it, but it's kinda like we were all destined to become bearers of the Elements.  We found out almost by accident, and it only made sense once we perceived how we all gelled together as friends..."

	"Upon the arrival of this 'Twilight Sparkle' to your life," Fawful said with a smile.

	Rainbow exhaled, smiling faintly.  "Yeah... it pretty m-much... all revolved around her."  She gulped.  "And she was Princess Celestia's well-trained student, so... there's that..."

	"Sounds remarkable," a stallion said.  "Instead of your First-Borns becoming elders, it seems as if you only relied on two."

	"And these princesses formed a Matriarchy," a mare said.  "Even more interesting.  Tell me—did these elders have heirs?"

	"Not... exactly..."  Rainbow stammered.  "I'm pretty sure they had every intention of ruling and governing Equestria for a long... long time..."

	"Well, surely they had to pass the torch onto somepony else in the not too distant future," an elder remarked.  "Nopony lives forever."

	Rainbow fidgeted in midair.

	Fawful cleared her throat.  "This has been very... very informative," Fawful said.  "However, seeing as Second Light has come and gone, and we've chosen to ignore the call to feast—might I suggest we take a break to compose ourselves?  I'm certain Rainbow Dash would enjoy the respite as well."

	"Oh... uhm... sure..."

	"Very well, Fawful," a mare said, bowing in mid-air.  "We shall reconvene later."

	"You were right about the fresh air, child," a stallion said, floating by Rainbow Dash with a wrinkly smile.  "It's served us well to meditate on your words, though I don't know why you would find them so troubling."

	"Eheheh... hey..."  Rainbow shrugged.  "Wasn't sure how much of Equestrian business you could easily swallow..."

	"Please, elders, enjoy your rest," Fawful said.  "I'll make sure that Rainbow Dash is given all of the ammenities she deserves."

	"Very well, Fawful."  A few elders bowed, turned, and floated towards the lower platform below.

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "You know, for a while there, I was a teensy bit intimidated.  But they're all cool.  Really.  They're like a bunch of Sivrem's and Kitsune's only with their manes all dyed."  Rainbow chuckled dryly.  "And here I was expecting a room full of Jerrio's.  Heheheh—"

	"Rainbow, my little pony..."  Fawful turned and calmly gazed at the mare.  "I know you are hiding something."

	Rainbow instantly clammed up.

	But Fawful bore a gentle smile.  "Please.  Don't be afraid.  It's more than obvious that you're anxious about opening up to the other elders, but you need not hide anything from me."

	"Who's... h-hiding...?"

	"When you speak of Equestria..."  Fawful's red eyes narrowed.  "When you speak of your elders—the Princesses—you are leaving something out... something you're terribly afraid to share for some reason."

	Rainbow simply bit her lip.

	"Heheh..."  Fawful brushed her white bangs back.  "If you must know, Rainbow, the true reason I was chosen to be your direct contact here in Central D is because I am one of the youngest of the Gray Feathers.  I haven't lived so long in personal isolation and constant meditation—not like the others.  So, in many respects, I truly am like a Sivrem or a Kitsune.  The rest of the elders anticipated this—just as they anticipated that whatever you may have to share wtih me... the truth that you have to share with me could be quite eye-opening.  Please, Rainbow, you needn't fear shocking me like the others."

	Rainbow stared steadily at Fawful, gulping.  Eventually she spoke in a dry, raspy voice, "It's not so much about shocking... but it's about re-inventing.  Fawful... I..."

	"Do you truly believe that you are here completely by accident?"

	"Huh?"

	"You with your flying silver and your natural-born mane colors that match the description of the Valkyrie to a T?"

	Rainbow Dash was at a loss for words.

	Fawful flew in closer, speaking in a softer tone that only the two of them could hear.  "There is a very special reason for the Gray Feathers' existence.  Our lives serve a purpose that none of the second, third, and fourth-borns partake in.  We are protectors of the scrolls.  But we don't preserve just the scrolls' sanctity... but we also preserve their secrets... secrets that could be very alarming to the ponies who have sworn their very lives to honoring the Valkyrie's legacy."

	"What... k-kind of secrets?" Rainbow's voice cracked.

	"Truths that have mystified and perplexed us for generations," Fawful said.  "So that many Gray Feathers have been forced to take their enigmas with them to their graves."  She took a deep breath.  "I am hoping... all of us are hoping that a pony like you might be a sign..."

	"A sign of what?"

	"Illumination."

	Rainbow bit her lip.  She glanced over her shoulders, then looked back at the mare.  "Fawful, what if I was to tell you that... not only do I know who and what the Valkyrie was... but I also can tell you things you've never known about the Light From Above?"

	Fawful merely gazed at her.

	Rainbow sighed, face-hoofing.  "Nnnngh... who am I even kidding?  Nopony would believe me."  She gulped.  "I don't blame 'em."

	"Hmmm..."  Fawful smiled gently.  "Then perhaps a test is in order."  She twirled about and glided earthward.  "Follow me."

	"Huh?"  Rainbow blinked, then trailed after her.  "Where are we going?"

	"To show you the Gold Lights," Fawful said.

	Rainbow's eyes bulged.  "Wh-what?!  But... but I thought you guys said—"

	"Rainbow, this is something that I was personally tasked with doing," Fawful said.  "And if my assumption is correct, then this is a necessary step that we must take.  Do not worry—it is all for the best."  She glanced over her shoulder.  "Besides, do not pretend that you are completely devoid of curiosity yourself."

	"Heh... girl, you may not be an 'elder' but you've got the whole 'wisdom' schtick down pat."  Rainbow nodded her head.  "Light the way—er... you know what I mean."
		//------------------------------//
		// Totally Not a Light Bulb		//------------------------------//

	Beneath the glowing beacon of Central D, beneath the mushroom-shaped platforms and buildings built along the wooden stalk, beneath even the treeline and rugged clefts of earth, there was a solid floor of wooden planks.  They covered the surface of the earth that bordered the southwest edge of the tower.  Down here, a quartet of pegasi stood at attention, their forelimbs girded with stone-carved javelins.  Two were First-Borns and the other two were Gray Feathers.  While they stood in a tight circle, facing opposite directions, they nevertheless engaged in casual conversation, even affording a chuckle or two among themselves.

	When they heard hoofsteps approach, they were naturally calm about turning to observe who had arrived.  Upon seeing Rainbow Dash at Fawful's side, however, they jumped with a start, their eyes widening in the dim shadows of the lowermost platform above.

	"Rest easy," Fawful said, nodding her gray head.  "We need access to the Lower Reaches."

	The First-Borns exchanged nervous glances.

	"Fawful... how is it that you mean 'we?'" one of the Gray Feathers asked.

	"Is there a problem, Dressen?"

	"It's just that..."  The old stallion fidgeted, avoiding Rainbow's gaze.  "She may appear First-Born, but... sh-she's an outsider, Fawful."

	"The only outsider," one of the First-Borns nervously stammered, shivering slightly.  "I mean, should we?  Is... is th-this allowed?"

	"I was charged with caring after Rainbow Dash during the extent of her stay here in Central D," Fawful said, smiling calmly.  "The head elders trust my wisdom in this matter.  In order to better understand each other, it's imperative that I let her see the Lower Reaches."

	"Including..."  The other First-Born bit his lip.  "...the Gold Lights?"

	"Shhhh..."  The other elder, a mare, rested her hooves on both First-Borns.  She stepped forward and bestowed Fawful an aged smiled.  "It is true.  You are responsible for Rainbow Dash, Fawful."

	Rainbow Dash blinked at that.
	
	The mare chuckled slightly.  "Surprised?  Your name has become well-spoken of around here.  Everything I've heard about you has been exemplary."

	"Oh.  Well, that's cool."  Rainbow stirred slightly.  "I-I guess."

	Fawful nodded.  "Elders, may we?"

	The old mare turned towards the two young pegasi and let loose a chirping sound.

	They twirled their polearms around, revealing hooks on the opposite ends.  These, they latched onto tiny notches built into a square panel of the wooden floor.  With grunts and heaving muscles, they swiveled the panel open on its hinges, revealing a stone-carved stairwell leading crookedly down into a deep, dark abyss.

	Rainbow craned her neck, curiously.

	"Thank you, Gren.  Auburn."  Fawful brushed past the two and trotted gracefully down the steps.  "Rainbow...?"

	"Er... right..."  Rainbow trotted swiftly after her.

	The elder stallion called out: "The group is still down there, meditating on Second Light."

	"Understood, Dressen," Fawful said back.  "We shan't disturb them."

	As the two mares made their way down—Fawful trotting and Rainbow hovering—they heard the creek of the latched door shutting above.  Darkness overcame them.

	"Uhhh..." Rainbow fidgeted in midair.  She gazed straight up at a ceiling comprised of countless slits of dim sunlight.  "They're gonna let us back out... r-right?"

	Fawful managed a raspy giggle.  "But of course.  We are merely visiting.  I make trips down here daily.  All Gray Feathers do."

	"Uh... okay..."  Rainbow gulped.  "So... wh-what kind of a pit is this anyway?"

	"You shall see," Fawful said.  Suddenly, she sensed a ruby light behind her.  She glanced over her shoulder.

	Rainbow blushed, taking her hoof off her ruby pendant.  "S-sorry.  Force of habit."

	"That's quite alright."  Fawful continued descending the steps.  "You must be used to entering dark caverns."

	"Girl, don't you know it."

	"Hmmm... amusing."

	"What is?"

	"Nopony has called me 'girl' in years."

	"Awwww... Well that's a shame."

	"I think otherwise.  I'm honored to be a Gray Feather."

	"Guess it's one heck of a retirement plan, huh?"

	"Hmmm?  Retirement plan?"

	"Er... my bad.  Equestrian humor."  Rainbow squinted.  "Jeez... for real, though.  How do you walk so confidently down steep stone steps in the dark—"

	Before Rainbow had even finished her sentence, the ground evened out.  Fawful stepped confidently onto a polished granite straightaway.  She smiled with bright teeth.  "As I said... daily."

	"Yeah, okay..."  Rainbow nodded with a smirk as they both proceeded towards a dim light at the far end of the cavern.  Her voice echoed against the high walls of the place.  "Yeesh, this place is huge.  Kind of a freaky location to build a tall wooden tower, huh?"

	"I assure you, Central D has a firm foundation.  We constructed ut here for a purpose.  It was the first part of the basin where we Durandanans settled.  Fitting that it would be nearly in the center, as you so perceive it."

	"That seems... uhhh—"

	"Fortuitous?  We're inclined to agree."

	"You know, ever since I came here, I haven't had a single one of you guys tell me straight just how you showed up here.  And... ugh... please don't tell me that you remember your culture as having always lived here."

	"Everything has a beginning, Rainbow Dash," Fawful said as they approached a tunnel flanked by lamps full of lightning bugs.  Another set of descending steps—this time less steep—led down the winding stone passageway.  Fawful slipped in first with undaunted grace.  "That's one reason why I brought you down here.  I feel that you have as much to teach us as we have to teach you."

	Rainbow touched down, blinking.  "Really?"

	"Do you find that so hard to believe?"

	"Honestly, yeah..."  Rainbow trotted slowly after her, ducking wherever a flickering was hung in the crooked, sloping hallways.  "I mean... I know stuff.  Or at least I think I know stuff, but... I-I've been crazy-afraid of stepping on everypony's hooves."

	"A reasonable concern," Fawful said, nodding.  "But perhaps a bit too anxious."

	"You really think so?"

	"I'm a considerably young elder, Rainbow Dash," Fawful said.  "I'm... still getting used to being a protector of the scrolls.  My youth betrays me often, for I am ever so frequently pining for the days of flight and romance that carried me daily over the mists of this valley."

	"Yeah..." Rainbow winced slightly.  "That's gotta suck..."

	"And yet, the other elders believe that I am gifted with sharp perception," she said calmly.  "That is the reason that they chose me to be a direct representative in communicating with you, or at least I like to think so."

	"Oh yeah?"  Rainbow smirked.  "And just what do you perceive about me?"

	Fawful paused to turn and face her.  "I sense that you are not here to sow strife or confusion.  I believe that your courage and your sincerity are one and the same, and what you do and the way you do it is what defines you.  If you thought that being here in Durandana would be a damaging thing, then I doubt you would have stuck around for as long as you have."

	"Heh..."  Rainbow brushed her bangs back a bit.  "You sense all that, huh?"

	"Mmmhmmm."  Fawful smile.  "Also, your eyes linger on the flanks of mares."

	Rainbow bumped into a wall.  "Gahhh—I... uhhhh.. th-that's not what I'm here f—!"

	"Shhhh!" Fawful suddenly hissed.

	Rainbow squatted, wincing.  "None of the elders, though, I swear!  Please, don't think that I'm some kind of a—"

	"Relax," Fawful said, gesturing slowly forward.  "We simply need to keep our voices low for this part of the Lower Reaches."  She shuffled ahead, and it was then that Rainbow noticed equine shadows dancing against the walls.  "They are meditating..."

	"Who?"  Rainbow blinked.  Then, as she slinked ahead, her eyes grew less tense.  "Ohhhh..."

	The two mares threaded their way through a group of Gray-Feathers, all spread out and seated in various places.  Some of them faced the walls of the stone compartments.  Others huddled under flickering lamps.  It didn't matter either way, because most of them had their eyes shut.  All the while they chanted and murmured repetitive prayers, often rocking back and forth from where they were seated.

	Rainbow glanced aside.  Every now and then, she caught sight of a mare or stallion with an old dusty scroll spread open before them.  Their wings were stretched forward, framing the edges of the parchment and holding the pages down as they read and read and re-read choice passages.

	"The Valkyrie left us many words to focus on," Fawful murmured, snapping Rainbow back to the path they were trotting.  "Some of them make sense.  Then a lot of them don't.  We pay close attention to every one of them, regardless, in faith that clarity awaits the good servants of the Light in the Windlessness to come."

	"Windlessness?" Rainbow whispered back.

	Fawful stole a glance over her shoulder.  "The calm beyond death, of course."

	"Er... of c-course..."

	"Without wind—or even air—only the glory of the Valkyrie will keep us afloat, as it has allowed us to survive for so long in this basin."  Fawful brushed a hoof across a stone pillar as she trotted forward.  "After all, it helped Duranda's ponies survived in the Days of Dimness."

	"Days of Dimness.  Gotcha—" Rainbow did a double-take.  "Wait."  She winced, then galloped forward until she was even-neck with Fawful so she could whisper: "Duranda?  Am I hearing that right?"

	"Mmmhmmm..."  Fawful turned to smile at the mare.  "She was a brave and selfless soul, one of the few whom even the scrolls confirmed had witnessed the Valkyrie when she flew through the air.  When Duranda awoke upon the greens, she had very few ponies to aid her.  Many were sick and dying; so starved were they of the Light From Above.  But Duranda's quick thinking and wisdom spared the foals of the Valkyrie from certain oblivion.  She built a shelter here in the Lower Reaches—simply to survive.  Little did they know that they would unlock the majesty of this place, for down in these depths is where they found the Gold Lights."

	"Huh... then I guess this place was—"

	"In honor of her indomitable spirit, we have since named our realm after her.  She was a brave soul, harboring a courage that cost her her life far too soon.  She may only have been a mere pony, but she exalted the Valkyrie with great vigor.  We have all since learned from our sparrow years to follow her example, and it's not let us down in the least."

	"Yeah.  I can see that."  Rainbow glanced aside as the two walked down the crooked stone floor.  "Well, for what it's worth, looks like you guys have chosen the best sort of heroes to—"  She froze in place, hooves scuffling.

	Fawful trotted a few steps, stopped, and looked back.  "Rainbow?" Her red eyes darted about, and her ears folded in concern.  "Rainbow, is everything alright?"

	Rainbow's eyes were twitching.  She took a few steps forward and placed a hoof on the wall before her.

	Three rings were etched into the stone.  Even through the dust and soot, she could spot twelve segments on each of them.

	"Urohringr..." Rainbow murmured.

	Fawful's brow furrowed.  "I..."  She leaned forward.  "What was that?"

	Rainbow hovered backwards, taking in the full extent of the etching.  She glanced down the wall, and immediately her heart skipped a beat.  Hauntingly familiar images of pegasi leapt at one another amidst impressionistic designs of cosmic stars and nebulae.

	"Pegasi," Rainbow murmured, hovering now on blurred wings.  Her muzzle hung agape as she scanned down illustration after illustration.  "The 'angels' that the Herald spoke of... from before the Sundering..."

	"I... I am confused, Rainbow Dash," Fawful said, shuffling over to catch up with the scrambling mare.  "Do you... somehow recognize the Valkyrie's Symbols?"

	Rainbow spun to gawk at her.  "Valkyrie's what-now?"

	"Her Symbols," Fawful said.  She cleared her throat.  "They are very sacred to us.  From what the elders understand of the scrolls that Duranda preserved, they are meant as a warning of the coming Windlessness and how we must preserve the Valkyrie's glory to surpass oblivion."

	Rainbow turned to face the symbols once more.  "A warning..."

	"That is why they stand upon the threshhold of the Valkyrie Silver... which lies ahead..."  Fawful squinted, trotting up until she was right beneath Rainbow.  "Rainbow, are you feeling okay...
?"

	"I feel... I feel..."  Rainbow turned around.  She gazed down the way which they came.  Through the combined aura of the various lanterns, she made out chambers, columns, and perfectly cut walls of smoothe granite.  "We're inside a sentinel," she murmured to herself.  "Or j-just a piece of one..."  She gulped and flew back before the Urohringr symbol.  "We were right all along... this is Stratopolis.  It has to be."

	"These words that you're using..."  Fawful shook her worried face.  "They are... very strange."

	"Sorry.  I'm just... erm... h-having something of an epiphany right now."

	"Would you mind sharing it?"

	Rainbow exhaled.  "Not until I get a better grasp of the full picture."  She turned calmly towards Fawful from where she hovered.  "Please... may I see the Gold Lights, now?"



	Fawful led Rainbow through five more turns and corners.  Finally, they came upon a straightaway, and this was where the interior changed.  At some point about five meters down the stretch, the stone floor cracked at an odd angle.  Thick wooden pillars had been erected between the floor and a partially collapsed ceiling.  Nevertheless, there was still enough room to proceed, and a patch of sundered earth was covered with wooden planks.

	The Gray-Feather escroting Rainbow had to trot carefully along this point.  Rainbow simply flew through the niche, ducking beneath the jagged ceiling.  On the other end, she saw the hallway ending abruptly before what appeared to be an enormous dull expanse.  In the center of the chamber ahead, a pulsating gold light hung in a circle, like a spotlight was shining straight down from the distant ceiling above.

	Before they entered the next spot, Fawful paused.  She knelt down low, extended her wings forward, and murmured a breathy prayer.  Then, with a flick of her tail, she stood up and stepped boldly onto a strange floor.

	Rainbow looked straight down.

	Where the stone ended, an immaculately polished sheet of metal began.  It proceeded forward at a perfectly even angle, with several geometric grooves and lines winding across it as far as her eyes could see in the darkness.

	"This is the Valkyrie Silver," Fawful said quietly, though her tiny voice echoed immensely across the incomprehensible expanse.

	This forced Rainbow to spin around towards the tunnel exit, upon which she gawked at the sight of a huge chunk of gray stone resting eternally at a jagged angle against the metallic floor.  Around and above her where she hovered, a domed hollow of exposed earth, rock, and dust lingered just beyond the penumbra of light.

	"And this..."  Fawful's voice caused Rainbow to look ahead.  The elder stood a before a wooden pedestal flanked by four ponies—once more, two Gray-Feathers and two First-Borns.  "...is the source of the Gold Lights."  She stepped aside, allowing Rainbow to see what was on top of the platform.

	Rainbow squinted.

	She saw a gold helmet, stained with the decay of time.  All across its top, several tiny fibrous strands stuck out at every angle.  She could faintly detect multiple colors clashing and mixing all at once.  Glancing down, Rainbow could see a pulsating halo of light emanating from where the wooden pedestal made contact with the metallic floor.  The smooth curves and geometric lines shimmered with living energy.  Beyond the sphere of influence, the metal was dull, dim, but no less shiny.

	Rainbow sucked in her breath.  Once again, she gazed at the helmet.  A pair of blue hooves clasped over her muzzle, and she clenched her eyes shut with a shudder.

	"Yes... the... the sheer power of the Valkyrie is overwhelming to anypony," Fawful said with a reassuring power.  "At first, our ancestors had no idea that the Gold Lights would be here to bless us.  But then, on one fateful occasion, Duranda brought this artifact down here while she was seeking shelter for the foals of the Valkyrie.  Not long after they discovered the unblemished silver of this realm, it began issuing unworldly illuminescence—directly in response to the last piece of the Valkryie's essence.  It was immediately afterwards that Duranda and everypony with him knew that the Lights From Above had blessed the surviving remnant of the Air's Protector, for they had given this sign to mirror the glory that awaits us every dawn."

	"I..."  Rainbow Dash exhaled with a shuddering breath, lowering her hooves.  "I know wh-what this is..."  She reopened her ruby eyes thinly.  "This... essence of the Valkyrie—"

	"Contained within the helm," Fawful said, pointing atop the pedestal.

	Rainbow stared squarely at her.  "It's her mane hair, isn't it?"  She glanced at two of the guards.  "Is that why you're dying yourselves to look like her?  Because of this?"

	"Elder?"  One of the First-Borns leaned towards her, eyes on Rainbow.  "Who have you brought to gaze upon the Gold Lights...?"

	"Shhh..."  Fawful placed a hoof on her shoulder.  "It's okay.  Trust me."  She turned to look up at Rainbow.  "The scrolls that Duranda preserved also maintain who and what the Valkyrie looked like in her physical form.  We emulate her out of reverence, an honor that is carried out by the First-Borns and then humbly sacrificed upon achieving the status of elder."

	"Right... right.  I-I get all of that.  But... but you see..."  Rainbow winced, sighed, and ultimately muttered, "Fawful, I... I knew who the Valkyrie was before I even arrived here."

	The guards glanced nervously at each other.

	"You mean..."  Fawful smiled brightly.  "...before you arrived from beyond the greens?"  She took a bouncy step forward.  "That is delightful to know, Rainbow!  It means that the glory of the Valkyrie extends to all realms!  If she spoke to your heart, then surely the scrolls—"

	"It's... not like that.  She..."  Rainbow gulped.  At last, she sputtered, "In Equestria, we have a different name for her:  Commander Hurricane."

	The two First-Borns immediately exchanged wild expressions.

	"Commander... What?" one of the two elders stammered.

	"She was the military leader of a kingdom in the sky... a cloud city named Pegasopolis.  It belonged to winged ponies—just like you and me—only thousands and thousands of years ago.  After a horrible winter that lasted over a decade, the pegasus formed an alliance with other ponies in the land—most famously the earth ponies and unicorns.  Equestria was founded, and the remaining Alicorns—ponies with both wings and magical horns—ruled over the land as monarchs.  Not long after, a terribly nasty cloud city flew in out of nowhere.  Commander Hurricane took it up on herself to steer this cursed thing away from Equestria before it could destroy the newly-formed kingdom.  She took a bunch of pegasus soldiers and warriors with her, and they were never seen or heard from again... until I stumbled upon what remained of the ill-fated city once fabled to be called 'Stratopolis.'"

	Fawful blinked.  "Stratopolis...?" she murmured.

	"Fawful, what is this all about?!" an elder exclaimed.

	The other pointed.  "Is this the outsider whom Sivrem spoke of?"

	"I... I..."

	"Please... just..."  Rainbow Dash clenched her teeth and shook two hooves in front of her.  "Just hear me out!  The reason I know the Valkyrie is because I had always grown up learning about her as a kid!  And then—to my surprise—I totally stumbled upon the place of her last stand!  I saw a magical projection of her, delivering a message.  I even saw an effigy of her on her tomb and—"

	"Her tomb?!" one of the elders blurted.

	"Why... wh-why is she speaking of the Valkyrie in this way?" A First-Born stammered.  "Fawful...?"

	"Rainbow Dash, do you actually—"  Fawful winced, straightened her bleached bangs, and composed herself.  "You mean to state that she is an Equestrian?"

	"You mean from a realm beyond the greens?" an elder barked.  "Preposterous!"

	"Look," rainbow said.  "I know this sounds crazy—"

	"Why've you brought this pony here?" a First-Born growled.  "To the Gold Lights?!  This place is sacred!  And yet you let her speak like this?"

	"Everypony, please, just calm down!"  Fawful exclaimed, spinning.  "Let us not be quick to anger!"  Taking a deep breath, she turned and gazed up at Rainbow.  "Rainbow, if that was even somehow remotely true, how is it that the Valkyrie Silver reacts to her essence?"

	"Well... that... uh..."

	"Clearly, she was fated to have arrived here, in the hooves of Duranda.  It was a message meant to keep us on the path of exalting the Lights From Above.  I... I-I fail to see how cloud cities such as 'Pegasopolis' and 'Stratopolis' have anything to do with this matter—"

	"Because I think that there's more to the story than what you guys get from the scrolls!"  Rainbow gulped.  "Fawful, you yourself said that 'everything has a beginning.'  Well, that's just what I'm trying to get at here!  I suspected it for a while, but I didn't want to open my mouth until I saw all of the evidence before my very eyes.  Well, now I've seen it, and—clear as day—this is all related to Commander Hurricane!  Someway, somehow, I'm dead-certain that everypony who lives here is descended from a piece of the expedition that commandeered the cloud city most ponies beyond the green called 'Stratopolis.'"

	Fawful opened her mouth to respond, but an angry elder stallion brushed past her and growled:  "And just how do you intend to explain our arriving here?"

	"I... I don't know... but you did."

	"In a flying cloud city?"

	"It... nnngh... it wasn't all clouds!"  Rainbow spun and pointed at the granite structure that housed the tunnel exit.  "That's one of the buildings that flew in it!"

	"A flying structure..."

	"Yes!  Just like the Noble Jury—an example of 'flying Valkyrie Silver' that got me and my friends here from beyond the greens, only this thing was powered by something else."  She spun to glance down at Fawful.  "Fawful, those symbols I saw along the way here—they're the same kind of things I saw while my friends and I were stranded inside Stratopolis not long ago!  I think something caused it to crash-land here, and afterwards Duranda and her fellow pegasus soldiers had to make do with what they had and rebuild a society in this strange crater!"

	"And what of the majesty of the Valkyrie?" the aged stallion remarked, frowning.  "And the power of the Lights From Above that are imbued in her glory?"

	Rainbow shook her head, wincing.  "I-I... I can't—"

	"Rainbow, so much of what you claim is... unbelievably far-fetched.  Don't you understand that?" Fawful said, her face awash with concern.  "I refuse to think that you have any intention of deceiving us.  Nevertheless, I implore you to look deep down and ask yourself just why it is you believe these things..."

	"You wanted answers, didn't you?" Rainbow Dash's voice cracked.  "I'm trying to give you some!"

	"On what claim?!" the other elder spoke up.  "That your outsider history somehow validates the insults that you've launched at the Valkyrie's legacy?"

	"It's... it's more than that," Rainbow murmured.  "This metal place... this machine world... I-I've seen it before... like a gazillion times."

	"'Machine... world...?'" one of the First-Borns stammered.

	"And... and..."  Rainbow sucked in her breath, closed her eyes, and spoke through tight lips.  "I think I may actually be related to Commander Hurricane."

	One of the elders almost fainted.

	"Related... to the Valkyrie, Rainbow?" Fawful exhaled in shock.

	"Enough is enough!"  The old stallion adjusted his gray mane and shouldered his way past the First-Borns.  He marched towards Rainbow, snarling up at her.  "Listen here, outsider, you will not blemish the glory of everypony's Righteous Mother!  We don't need the likes of you down here!  This is a sacred place!  The essence of the Valkyrie—contained in this helm—has produced the Gold Lights for eons, and it will continue to do so long after your eggshell soul has fallen into Windlessness—"

	Rainbow clenched her jaw.  Coiling her wings to her side, she dropped straight down.  Cl-Clank!  Her hooves made contact with the metal floor, and instantly pulsated with four round halos of shimmering light.

	A swift shriek escaped Fawful's lips.  She stumbled backwards, eyes bulging as she held a hoof over her muzzle.

	The stallion stood dead-still, his eyes locked on the glowing flood of light issuing outward from Rainbow Dash in every angle.

	One First-Born shivered in his avian armor.  The other immediately dropped his javelin and fell down in a panicked state, bowing towards Rainbow—at least until the other elder fiercely yanked the timid youngster back up to his hooves.

	All five Durandanans watched in stunned silence as the gold light spread further and further from the living pegasus.  Soon, the entire chamber was as bright as day, illuminating the entire earthen ceiling along with every crooked crevice along the corners.

	Fawful was slowly twirling about, whimpering indecipherable words into her hooves as her teary eyes darted across every golden sheen.

	"Fawful," Rainbow murmured.

	Fawful kept spinning, trembling.

	"Fawful..."  Rainbow marched firmly towards her and grasped the mare's hooves.  "Look at me."

	The elder's frightened eyes locked with Rainbow's.  A tear or two trickled down.

	Rainbow smiled calmly.  "I don't understand it either," she said.  Slowly, she flapped her wings, lifting her legs off the ground but not letting go of Fawful's hooves.  The room gradually dimmed, the gold light pulsating a few more times in the last spot where the pegasus' limbs made contact.  "But perhaps we can find out together, okay?"

	Fawful simply gazed at her, lips trembling.

	"Hey, c'mere..."  Rainbow tugged at the mare.  The Gray-Feather's wings nervously flapped, and soon she was hovering in Rainbow's tight embrace, her head gazing blankly over her shoulder as they hugged.  "Tell me," Rainbow said quietly.  "What do you sense?"

	Fawful's hyperventilation came to a gradual end.  She gulped hard, and said in a shaky voice, "C-Confusion."  Her face scrunched up as she fought another sob.  "N-nothing but confusion..."

	Rainbow gently patted her shoulder, gazing at the helm on the pedestal below them.  "You and me both, girl..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Nopony Expects the Durandanan Inquisition(!)		//------------------------------//

	Several Gray-Feathers stood side by side, all bunched up in a thick crowd at the tunnel's stone exit to the metal-floored chamber.  They murmured amongst each other, craning their necks to see Rainbow Dash and Fawful.

	"Is it true...?"

	"She makes her own Gold Lights?"

	"Impossible!  Only the essence of Valkryie can create the Lights!"

	"But the First-Borns say they saw her!"

	"Could it be outsider sorcery?"

	"Not a chance!  Look at her.  She's a foal of the Valkyrie just like the rest of us!"

	"This doesn't make sense..."

	"Duranda's scrolls would have mentioned something—"

	"Please... please!"  The elder stallion stood before the group, stretching out both his wings and his forelimbs.  "Everypony, calm down!  There is no need for this juvenile display!  Be calm.  Meditate!  The Valkyrie's righteous intution shall make itself known to us!"  He sighed, turned around, and gave Fawful a tired gaze.  "Would you wish me to summon the high elders?  If so, then I will need help passing by all of our fellow companions here..."

	"Not... not just yet," Fawful stammered.  She paced and paced before the helm, her hooves brushing over the half-illuminescent sheets of metal.  "I... I-I just need a moment to think."

	"Fawful," Rainbow murmured from where she hovered above.

	"Just..."  She gritted her teeth, staring ahead of her at all times while she trotted in circles.  "Just concentrate... focus."  She gulped.  "Nothing Duranda taught suggests that a pegasus couldn't possess the Gold Lights from the Valkyrie.  After all, we are all her foals.  Why shouldn't she choose to hoof down even the barest sliver of her glory?"

	"Please, girl... would you..."  Rainbow winced.  "Would you relax for one second?  You're making me anxious just watching you!"

	"There's... th-there's no reason to say that any of this invalidates the scrolls!"  Fawful skidded to a stop, shuddering.  "But the light... the light was so bright... and... and..."

	Rainbow's hoof rested on Fawful's shoulder.

	"Mmm!"  The elder spun, taring up at Rainbow with twitching eyes.

	Rainbow gulped and smiled.  Slowly, that grin faded away.  Her ears drooped and she glanced aside.  "Look, I'm... I-I'm sorry..."

	Fawful stared up at her, shivering slightly.  "Why?"

	Rainbow looked at Fawful once more.

	Fawful was still, quiet.

	After a breath, Rainbow gently said, "Look, I-I didn't come here to rain on your parade.  What you all hold faith in, it totally works for you!  I mean... you've got a pretty nifty society goin' on here!  Fruit-picking, leatherback-milking, flight-racing and love-making?"  She grinned.  "That's all awesome!  And I'm super happy to witness it all up close.  So please... believe me..."

	She hovered lower until she was a few inches from Fawful's gaze.

	"I didn't mean to come down so hard on what you believe in," Rainbow said in a low tone.  "It was never my wish to shatter beliefs or crush hopes or any of that jazz.  I have nothing against this 'Valkyrie.'  Heck, if she truly is the pony I think she is, then I believe in her too!  Er... more or less.  But... please, Fawful... understand."  Rainbow bit her lip.  "I'm not out to tear your faith to shreds.  I-I wouldn't have anything to friggin' gain from that!  I wouldn't want to gain anything from it!  All things considered, I'm just passing through!"

	"But... the Gold Lights!" Fawful stammered, her eyes turning misty again.  "You... y-you summoned them."  She gulped, shivering.  "Nopony h-has ever been able to summon them without the essence of the Valkyrie..."

	"Yeah, well, now that I have..."  Rainbow hesitated slightly, then muttered, "Just what does it mean to you Gray-Feathers?"

	"I..."  Fawful grimaced.  "I do not know."  She gazed at the crowd of onlookers.  "Already, even the slightest hint of what's happened here has made everypony... uneasy.  I am less scared of what this means about the scrolls and more scared of what it means to every Durandanan."

	Rainbow held her breath.  She turned, glanced at the onlookers, then looked back at Fawful.  "Maybe they don't have to know."

	Fawful's eyes twitched.  "Wh-what?"

	"Sivrem saw me do a sonic rainboom up above!  In the Raked Ravine!"  Rainbow smiled sweatily.  "I-I'm full of tricks!"  She gestured with her hooves, wings beating heavily.  "Fwooosh!  Zooom!  Ker-sparkle!!  Heh... perhaps it was all an optical illusion, y'know?  Silly guards are down here for hours on end—maybe their eyes just played tricks on them!  Heh!  Yours too!"

	"Rainbow..."

	"Or, y'know, 'outsider sorcery!'  Nopony knows what crazy, wacky stuff happens beyond the greens!"

	"Rainbow, don't be dishonest," Fawful said with a frown.  "Even I can tell that it doesn't suit you."

	Rainbow winced.

	"It didn't work with Kitsune when you tried to pretend you were from East D, and it most certainly will not work here."  Fawful gestured towards the onlookers.  "Not before all of the Gray-Feathers, especially."

	Rainbow hung her head.

	Fawful trotted firmly towards her.  "What else... do you know about the Lights?"  Her brow furrowed.  "About the Valkyrie?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth, but hesitated.  She stared forlornly at Fawful.

	The elder mare waited with baited breath.

	"What..."  Rainbow fidgeted in midair.  "...what if I told you that... th-that the Valkyrie was imbued with more than just the power to make these 'Gold Lights?'"  Rainbow's eyes narrowed.  "What if I told you that she was given power to wield the energy of the Lights From Above?"

	Fawful nodded slowly.  "That would be in accordance with the scrolls..."

	"Right..."  Rainbow flew in a slow circle.  "And... like... what if there was—uh—an artifact, just like that helmet over there—only it was a direct vessel for the Lights?"

	"You mean something that could make the lights on its own?"

	"Erm... almost.  But it so happened that the Valkyrie possessed it."

	Fawful gave Rainbow a blank stare.

	So the pegasus went on:  "And... like... what if one of us—a mere pegasus—was to... er... stumble upon this artifact?"

	"What kind of artifact are we talking about?"

	"A sword," Rainbow Dash said.  "A sword blessed with golden energy—like a living sunrise."  She took a deep breath.  "And... uh... it was something the Valkyrie used while she was still 'ruling the air.'"

	Fawful eventually nodded.  "The immensity of the Valkyrie's power has always held various interpretations in the minds of her foals.  I can't see why a sword wouldn't factor into her righteous arsenal."

	"I mean... she was totally a warrior, right?"

	"Every Durandanan knows that—even from a sparrow's age."

	Rainbow's eyes darted towards the helment.  "How do you suppose Duranda got ahold of that?"

	"She was given it by the Valkyrie herself."

	"They knew each other in real life, right?"

	"But of course.  She was one of the few who was blessed to share breaths with the Valkyrie."

	"And... like... what if history was different?"

	"Huh?"

	"Hear me out," Rainbow said, gesturing with a hoof.  "What if Duranda was never directly given the helmet?  What if she found the helmet... later... much later..."

	"You mean... as if the Valkyrie visited Durandana?"

	"I'm talking about finding it on the Valkyrie's grave, Fawful."

	A few voices gasped from afar.  Fawful glanced over.  She shared worried looks with the stallion and other Gray-Feathers.  Finally, she tilted her eyes back up to Rainbow.  "Nopony knows the time or location of the Valkyrie's passing.  She lives eternally in our blood.  To... to assume anything about her final resting place is shameful."

	"Well I know where she was laid to rest, Fawful," Rainbow said.  "Because that's where I discovered the sword she last used."  A gulp.  "Up in Stratopolis."

	"The... the evil cloud city."

	"Yes."

	"What would possess her to occupy such a place?"

	"I tried to explain it earlier," Rainbow said, eyes darting briefly to the onlookers.  "She was steering it away from Equestria.  Comma—erm... the Valkyrie and her fellow soldiers—Duranda included, most likely—sacrificed their lives so that no equine civilization would have to suffer from this place.  It turned out to be an even tougher job than they imagined.  Something really... really nasty was waiting deep inside the bowels of Stratopolis.  Once it woke up, it brought death to most of the Pegasopolitan expedition.  I've every reason to believe it killed the Valkyrie off too, but not before she made a brave last stand, with several of her most trusted warriors at her side."

	"The Valkyrie?"  Fawful winced.  "Defeated?  That's..."

	Rainbow stared quietly at her.

	Fawful sighed.  She rubbed her temple and grumbled, "It is not a concept that any of us can easily wrap our heads around."

	"If there's anything I've learned from all my travels, Fawful, it's that everything dies."  She blinked, then glance down at her pendant.  "Sometimes more than once..."

	"Huh?"

	"But I'm telling you this:  the sword is real."  Rainbow looked up.  "If I hadn't found it, I'd not have gotten out of Stratopolis alive.  The power of the sun—or the Light From Above—saved me and my friends when I needed it the most.  What's more, it allowed me to talk with my ruler—Princess Celestia—back in Equestria."

	"Princess Celestia?"  Fawful tilted her head aside.  "What... I mean... how is Equestria related to the Light From Above?"

	"Because..."  Rainbow paused, then exhaled long and hard.  "Because Princess Celestia controls the Light From Above, Fawful."  She gulped dryly.  "She makes the sun rise and fall."

	The Gray-Feathers gasped and murmured in the distance.  The stallion holding the line between them and Fawful shifted uncomfortably.

	"Rainbow... d-do you realize what you're saying?"

	"Yes.  I know it sounds—"

	"No single pony can control the Lights!"  Fawful exclaimed.  "Even the Valkryie—as glorious as she is—is empowered by the Light From Above!  She's never wieled control over it!"

	"Right!  And Celestia blessed the sword that she gave Commander Hurricane to maintain harmony with!  They also used it as a means of two-way conversation!"  Rainbow swung a forelimb wildly.  "I-I could even get you to talk to her yourself!"

	"With your Princess?  From far away in Equestria?"

	"Yes!  It's a really powerful magic spell."

	"Too powerful if you ask me."

	"And controlling the Sun is foal's play?"

	"I'm telling you, Rainbow, no pony can do that!"

	"Alicorns can!"  Rainbow said.  "They live longer than all of us mortals combined!  I'm not saying that the likes of Celestia can make stars, but they come from a cosmic place so far away and so old that they've figured all that stuff out!"

	"And it's Celestia's sole purpose to keep this realm lit?"

	"Among other things, sure!  Fawful, listen..."  Rainbow sighed, gesturing with her hooves.  "This is all pretty crazy stuff to take in, I'm sure.  And... I-I could easily have just flown away and not said anything but... but..."  

	"But what, Rainbow?" Fawful asked, looking concerned.

	Rainbow bit her lip.  "I know what I know.  And... and to think of leaving you ponies without letting you in on Commander Hurricane and Celestia and... and..."  Rainbow grunted internally.  "You're Equestrians, Fawful!  You may not know it—or even feel it, but deep down—in your blood and guts and feathers—you're the same as me and all of the friends I've ever cared for... all the fr-friends I left behind... and... and..."

	"...Rainbow?" Fawful suddenly stood up straight, worried.  "What's wrong?"

	Rainbow was teetering in midair.  "Harmony... H-Harmony can't exist without th-the light... so..."  Bulbs of sweat formed along her blue brow.  "Buck me... n-not now... not here..."

	"Fawful, what's wrong with her?" an elder from the tunnel asked.

	"I... I-I don't know!"  Fawful flapped her wings and hovered at Rainbow's level.  "Rainbow, look at me.  Are you ill?"

	"So... so dizzy..."  Rainbow squeaked, teetering forward.  "Happening... again..."

	"Valkyrie's Shout..."  Fawful tried gasping Rainbow's figure.  "Somepony, quick—"

	"Mnnnghh..."  Rainbow plummeted.  She slipped through Fawful's weak forelimbs and collapsed on the floor.  The metal instantly lit up with a gold aura, causing many voices to gasp and shriek.

	Fawful hollered above the noise.  "Get a wing-mender!  Quick!  She needs help!"

	"Yes, elder!"  Two First-Borns dashed up the tunnel, along with a few Gray-Feathers.

	"Rainbow... Rainbow!"  Fawful shook the mare's shoulder, cradling her.  "Try and stay awake!"

	"Can't... c-can't..." Rainbow's eyes were tearing.

	"You'll be alright, just stay focused!"

	"Whatever... h-happens..."  Rainbow hissed, her eyes rolling back.  "Don't... t-take my pendant off.  Don't... d-don't..."  And she went limp as the metal world spun.
		//------------------------------//
		// On a Mother Bucking Ship		//------------------------------//

	"Unky Prowsy?" Props stammered.  She licked her lips, sweating as she adjusted the dials of her communications array inside the engine room of the Noble Jury.  "Unky Prowsy, if you're there, come in!  This is your lil' Propsicle!  Over and out!"

	Nothing but static screeched out of the quivering speakers.

	Props pouted.

	"Mmmmmmmm-Prowssssssy!  Talk to me!  You've got the most powerful antenna in the world!  Get it sparkling, old stallion!"

	At last, a voice:  "You're sure working up a sweat, blondie."

	Props gasped, grinning.  "It's working!  I can hear you, Unky—wait."  Her goggled brow furrowed.  "How do you know that I'm still dying it?"

	"Ahem."

	Props swiveled around in her stool.

	Zaid stood in the open doorway to the navigations room, waving with a bashful smile.

	"Zaidddddddd..." Props stuck her tongue out.  "You're not Unky Propsy!"

	"Heh.  'Tis a shame.  I'd kill for his beard."

	"Well, considering the law of averages, you probably would have to do just that."

	"Busy with stickening the wicket, I see."  He closed the hatch behind him and trotted nonchalantly towards her work bench.  "Any luck?"

	"Phweeeeeeeeeee..."  Props blew through her lips and slouched in her stool.  "No."  Another sigh.  "It's this poopy-headed crater and its poopy-headed Sky Stabs breaking the unbreakable symbol."

	"Fitting, consider the basin's pretty much nature's toilet, don't you think?"

	"Ehhh..."  Props shrugged.  "The ponies here are nice."  She swiveled about, smirking pleasantly.  "I guess when love is free—heehee—you have very little to stress about!"

	"I'm not sure how to feel about that, by the way."

	"Oh?"

	"Yeah.  Kind of takes the thrill out of boinking it when all you're ever doing is boinking it."

	"Heeheehee... Well, so long as they all get along nicely with each other, I don't see what the problem is!"

	"Not having a mom or a dad?"  Zaid brushed his bangs back.  "Seems a bit crazy to me."  He grinned wide.  "And I was part of a cult!"

	"Still, a lot less baggage."

	"Yeah.  But then there'd be no smexy Uncles with bigass antennae to inherit."

	"Oh... right..."  Props made a sad face, her ears folding.  "Wow, that sounds lonely."

	"Hmmmm..."  Zaid scratched his chin.  "Ponies incapable of feeling lonesome... kinda makes you wonder if they ever truly get 'happiness' down pat."

	"Pffft.  It's not like us to judge!"

	"Sure it is."

	Silence.

	Zaid cleared his throat.  "You... uh... you're totally gonna see him again, y'know."

	She turned towards him, blue eyes sparkling.  "Chiii?"

	"Prowse," Zaid said, sliding up a metal crate and sitting beside her.  "You really think he'll fall back on his promise to meet us in Val Roa?"  He winked.  "For real, gurl.  I've not seen an Uncle that protective over her niece since... since..."  He grimaced slightly.  "Yeesh, y'know, let's end it right there."  He gulped.  "It'd be a real buzz kill to talk about that one week that the Herald spent recruiting in Oakansas..."

	Props giggled.  After a sigh, she turned and looked forlornly at the communications array.  "You have it the other way around."

	"Huh?"

	"He's not the one who's protective over me..."

	Zaid stared at her.  He smirked.  "You know... for all of your clumsiness—"

	"Clumsiness?!"

	"—and fuzzyheadedness—"

	"Fuzzyheadedness?!"

	"—and the way you spit in other ponies faces when you get excited—"

	"I do not spitttt!"

	Zaid shielded his face, took a breath, and finished:  "—you have an angelic charm about you.  Like... golden harps friggin' kill themselves out of shame everytime you so much as talk.  Not to mention you're bootyful with a capital 'booty.'  It's hard to imagine anything that squeaky-clean coming out of the floating cesspool that was Gary Smokes."

	"Gray Smoke."

	"Whatever.  Point is..."  He smirked.  "There are very few irresistible things in this world.  I've no doubt that Prowse would drop everything he was doing—even Queen Lasairfion!  Whewwwwwwww-KERSPLUNK!—just to come zipping back to find you and make sure you're just as cuteawesome as you were when he last hugged you."

	By this point, Props was biting her lips while her cheeks puffed red at the bursting point. With an inward squeal, she teetered forward and flung her forelimbs around the stallion's neck, nuzzling his shoulder.  "Ohhhhhh Zaidy Waidy.  You're super adorbs when you're this thoughtful!  I don't care what Josho says about you!  Or Roarke or Ebon or Eagle or Handsome!  You're cute as soot in my book!"

	"Errr... th-thanks!"  Zaid blinked crookedly.  "I think."

	"Heeheehee!  Anypony ever tell you that you're fuzzy in all the right places?"

	"Yes, well... heheh..."  He gently scratched behind one of her ears.  "To each their own."

	"H-Hey!"  She batted his hoof away and pouted.  "I just scrubbed there this morning!"

	"Erm..."  He gulped and sat straight.  "My bad."

	"... ... ...I didn't tell you to stop."  Her eyelashes batted.

	"Oh... h-hey..."  He shrugged and resumed scratching her ear with a smile.  "L'chaim!"

	"Heeeeeeeeee..."  She leaned into him with a comforting exhale, her tail flicking pleasantly.
		//------------------------------//
		// That Is Why You Fail		//------------------------------//

	"It's no use..."  Kera gritted her teeth, sweating as legs wobbled beneath her.  No matter how brightly her horn strobed, the large boulder in front of her barely got a foot off the ground.  Grass and weeds swayed within ten feet of the magical exercise.  An unearthly wind picked up, only to die and then pick up again.  Large bulbs of sweat gathered around the filly's tattooed brow, glistening in the amber sunset.  "Couldn't I-I just... I dunno... try twirling around several coconuts instead?"

	"It's a crater, child," Roarke droned from where she stood by the filly's side.  "Not a beach."

	"Then h-how about some large twigs or several small t-turtles?"

	"Do you really wish to be tossing turtles around so soon?"

	"R-Roarke!"

	"I know you're strong enough and disciplined enough to tackle this," Roarke said, pointing at the boulder.  "To choose something else would be undermining your true potential."

	"Roarke, I-I don't even know what my true potential is!"

	"Perhaps you have, but you've simply forgotten it."

	Thud!  Kera dropped the boulder altogether.  She turned to glare at Roarke.  "Forgotten it?!  I'm a kid!  I am what I learn!  I'm not some old mare pining for the glory days like you!"

	"Just because my past has been bloody doesn't make it glorious," Roarke droned.  "Now stop changing the subject.  We're here to focus on improving your skills, not lambast mine."

	"Unnngh..." Kera rolled her eyes.

	"Again," Roarke said, pointing at the boulder.  "See if you can make it turn upside down in midair."

	"What's th-the point of all this, anyways?!" Kera said, frowning.  "I don't remember anypony making me your apprentice."

	Roarke's brow furrowed over her lenses.  "Strange.  Earlier, you were quite excited about doing some magical training."

	"Yeah, but I didn't think I'd be putting my brain through a meat grinder!"

	"From what Bellesmith has said, you were once able to open complex locking mechanisms from the inside out, even overpowering weighted devices that ran on pure mana."

	"Yeah, well, I-I haven't had to do that in a while!"

	"So you admit that you're out of practice."

	"What I admit is that I shouldn't have come out here if all you wanted to do was make me sweat like a trained dog!"  Kera frowned.  "Let me float around some smaller rocks that I know I can handle, and then let's call it a day."

	Roarke took a deep breath.  "Very well."  Nodding, she trotted towards the southern crater wall to gather chunks of debris blown off earlier from her rockets.  "I can see now that having been coddled into a surrogate family by Bellesmith and Pilate has softened you.  It may not exactly be my standard of living, but that's simply me.  I was wrong to assume that you were a mare who wished to push herself and calculate her strengths.  If you wish to lower the difficulty of this exercise, I shall do so.  However, someday, you will be grown, and the likes of Pilate and Bellesmith may depend on you, and I doubt the world will allow itself to be any easier."

	Kera clenched her teeth.  She fumed and fumed, shutting her eyes tight.

	Roarke was in the middle of gathering some tiny rocks when all of the sudden she felt the wind shift once more.  Her lips curved for the briefest moment.  Then, deadpan, she turned around.  Her lenses rotated upon seeing the rock floating a good four feet off the ground.

	"Hmmm... now that's a considerable improvement," the metal mare said.

	"Yeah, well, doesn't seem quite so huge now," Kera grumbled.

	"Perhaps because you're channeling your emotion into it."

	The filly was silent.

	Roarke trotted up.  "Very well.  Now... concentrate."  She pointed.  "Turn it upside down..."

	"Grnnnnghhhh..." Kera grunted and hissed.



	An hour had passed.  The basin of the crater was bathed in crimson.  Soon, the light of the dying day would be past the western sky stabs, casting the tree canopies in soupy darkness.

	Somewhere, like dots clinging to the southern wall, Roarke and Kera still lingered, the latter producing a shimmering glow that stood out amidst the darkening shadows of evening.

	"Good..."  Roarke trotted around Kera in a wide circle, observing the boulder as it floated fifteen feet above the ground.  "You've gotten good at manipulating its lift."  She turned towards the filly.  "But now you've got to turn it upside down."

	"Look... it's up high, okay?" Kera squeaked amidst her strain.  "Isn't that good enough?"

	"No, Kera," Roarke muttered.  "Raw strength is one thing.  Controlling it takes true skill.  To exhibit true mastery, one must be able to impart her will in noticeable detail."

	"How d-do you know?" Kera's teeth gnashed as leaves and grass blades twirled around her.  "You're... nnnghh... not a unicorn!"

	"You think true mastery applies to one race?"  Roarke paced as she spoke.  "You think Props needs magic to know engines like she does?  You think Floydien needs wings to fly the Jury?"

	"You c-could really use a cork to shut the b-buck up!" Kera squeaked.

	"Cute."  Roarke pointed up at the boulder.  "Now turn it upside down."

	"I-I can't... I'm telling ya...!"

	"You've already lifted it much higher than you had it earlier," Roarke said.  "What makes you think you can't improve again?"

	"Common... s-sense...?"

	"You're doing well so far."

	"B-because you're pissing m-me off so much!"

	"Very well, then."  Roarke's eye-lenses pistoned outward.  "Focus on that anger.  Harness the passion.  If it's what empowers your magic, then flow with it."

	"H-how's that going to help anything?!"

	"You're a filly who says what she thinks and does what she wants," Roarke said.  "What's more, you're wise beyond your years.  You're a filly that's simultaneously defined by your rebelliousness and your precociousness.  Also, you're quick to anger.  So be it."

	"So... b-be it?"

	"Stop being s-something that you're not and give in," Roarke said.  "Be yourself.  Feel and act all at once."

	"I... I..."  Kera heaved and shivered, her horn pulsating.  "I don't know wh-what you're talking about—"

	"Kera..."  Roarke spoke in a hauntingly calm tone.  "Kera, I know what you've been wanting to say.  Now say it."

	Kera clamped her jaw shut.  Her nostrils flared.

	Roarke's ears folded back as she snarled, "Stop holding back!  You want to be Belle's and Pilate's little coward all your life?!  Now let it out!"

	"Rrrrrr-HAAAAAAUGH!"  Kera spun the rock... and sent it hurling straight at Roarke.

	Without saying a word, Roarke nimbly leapt back, firing a trio of mini-rockets from her shoulder-braces.  They screamed through the air, impacted the boulder dead-on, and exploded the chunk of earth in mid-air.  The smouldering pebbles parted ways, splattering harmlessly against the crater wall behind Roarke.  The metal-mare landed from her leap, skidding to a reverse stop as she crouched.  She looked across the clearing, catching her breath.

	Kera slumped down on her chest, but her horn hadn't stopped glowing.  When she looked up, her tattoos were crawling with magical illuminescence.  "Why did you do it?!" she hollered.  "Why did you talk me into staying at Lerris?!"  Her breath seethed through her teeth.  "Didn't you see I was happy on board the Jury?!  That I was just fine with Belle and Pilate?!"

	Roarke stared.  She listened quietly, patiently, not moving a muscle.

	"Hrnnngh..." Kera curled her forelimbs to her chin and growled, "I didn't need you messing with my head!  You hear me?!  I didn't need any of that!  I wanted... I-I wanted..."

	Slowly, the air grew still across the clearing.  Kera's panting breaths rolled over the dusty rock and stone.

	"...I wanted for just once in my life to not have to be running from something all the time.  Once, it was pretty cool to be the only filly on the street who didn't need to be part of some stupid gang in order to feed herself.  But now?  I'm just so friggin' tired of it.  I want... I-I want to chillax, you know?  And then there was Lerris... and then there were the th-things that you said to me at Archer Point.  And I thought... I-I thought I might finally... have..."

	Roarke held her breath.

	"Grrrrrrrr..."  Kera slapped the earth floor.  "I hate this!  I hate this I hate this I hate this!"  She clenched her skull and grumbled.  "Why can't I friggin' get over what happened, already?!  It's not like I brought that maniac there!  It's not like I wanted so many ponies to die!  I hate it... I hate it so much!"

	At last, she slumped against the earth, exhaling heavily.  She closed her eyes and fumed, her face stuck in a permanent frown.

	After half a minute, Roarke's hooves shuffled over.  She stood beside the filly.

	"I... I never had the courage to kill my mother," Roarke said.

	Kera stirred.  Sniffling, she wiped her muzzle and looked up with glossy eyes.  "What...?"

	"In Searonese culture," Roarke explained.  "There comes a time in every young mare's life where they must prove their resilient warrior's blood.  The most common rite of passage is to slay one's own maternal bearer in combat.  A lot of grown mares give birth several times just so they can prove themselves against thick-headed daughters who are a third of their age, to show that they still have the tenacity to spill blood for the Goddess Searo.  As for the daughter—if she can overcome her superior, then she is considered a strong warrior, and she gets to sit and feast on the spoils of war in the Great Hall for the rest of her days, until she's slain by another mare, of course."

	"That's..."  Kera gulped, lips quivering.  "Really really sucky."

	"For me, it was life.  My life.  And I failed at it."  Roarke's nostrils flared.  "Even worse.  I never even tried."

	"But... h-how could you?"

	"That's what my mother thought, and she tried several times to engage the attack in hopes that she would get something out of me.  I suffered many broken bones before the age of ten.  There are some winters I don't remember, because I had endured so much head trauma.  Eventually, though, my mother discovered that I didn't have the guile to try striking her down."

	"What... wh-what did she do?"

	"She fled towards a bounty hunter station in the south, far from Searo's Hold.  It was the only way she could manage the shame.  I wasn't the only one who was cowardly... I suppose..."

	Kera bit her lip.

	Roarke sighed as she squatted beside the filly.  "For years, I carried my weakness as a burden.  Nopony wanted to train me, and most mares who so much as saw me out in the field tried their best to eliminate me as soon as they spotted the colors of my ship.  It took over a decade and constant struggle, but I soon became a professional bounty hunter, with a list of victories and spoils that made every warrior around me green with envy.  At some point, Lady Pestiferous took note of my accomplishments, and she granted me entry into the Great Hall.  I was one of a very small group of warriors who made it that far without enduring a traditional rite of passage.  That made me something of an oddity... a rarity." 

	"And... what happened to your mother?"

	Roarke shook her head.  "I can only guess.  Odds are she died in combat, which is what she would have wanted.  But it doesn't matter.  All my life, I saw myself as a coward for refusing to do what I did.  I had nopony to turn to and share my feelings.  Then Imre entered my life.  And after that, Rainbow Dash liberated me from a prison that I didn't even know I was stuck in.  Looking back, do you know what I realized?"

	Kera simply gazed at her.

	Roarke said, "I realized that, the whole time, I was stronger than all of the ponies around me.  When Searo's Hold collapsed, they were all confused and witless.  And yet I carried on.  Even with my ship destroyed and my former armor stripped, I still feel as strong as ever—maybe more so.  And I know now that all of my life I have been preparing for a future that I'm only now starting to grasp, and I wouldn't have it any other way.  With the Noble Jury—with Rainbow's friends—I am discovering more and more to be proud of... to be thankful of..."

	The filly blinked rapidly, staring down at the stone floor—at least until Roarke's metal-laced hoof tilted her chin back up.

	Roarke's lenses reflected Kera's face.  "You have such... such immense strength, Kera.  Beneath all of the confusion and the jocularity and the anger, there lies a powerful grown mare just waiting to burst out of her shell."  She let her hoof rest on the filly's shoulder.  "What happened at Lerris is going to weigh on you for a long... long... very long time.  It may even stay with you for the rest of your life.  But I am convinced that the inner strength that you possess—the very tenacity that allowed you to live on the streets—will make you more than capable of bearing that weight.  I've seen evidence of it myself.  Deep sleep or not, you've bounced back, and much of the pain that you find detestable will one day serve to be your greatest ally.  That will be a time when the lives of ponies will depend on you, and you will accomplish such heroics that right now you can't even fathom them."

	Kera's eyes watered.  "But... b-but it's just so much... so terribly much to d-deal with..."

	"Kera, listen to me.  You must never... ever doubt yourself.  Your life is so fresh and young that the last thing you need right now is blindness.  Don't blind yourself, Kera.  We all deserve to bear full witnesses to our own strengths.  Don't waste decades until you can finally look back and realize that you were strong when you thought you were weak... even for just being a loving daughter."

	The filly sniffed.  She leaned aside, nuzzling Roarke's forelimb as she smiled tearfully into the mare's face.

	Roarke fidgeted.  "You should know," she grunted, her lenses retracting.  "I don't do hugs."

	"Too bad."  Kera flung herself forward and wrapped her forelimbs around the mare's neck.  She buried her warm face in Roarke's shoulder.  "Thank you, Roarke most Rare..."

	The bounty hunter sighed hard.  "...I think I preferred you throwing boulders at me."

	And Kera giggled.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Weight That We Bear		//------------------------------//

	"...and in early November, the leaves would turn color, giving the forests beyond the fields a melting orange glow," Eagle Eye said, gazing out onto the darkening mists beneath the waterfall as the sun set beyond the Sky Stabs.  Ebon leaned comfortably against his shoulder as he went on.  "The harvest left the crops of Franzington bare for a month.  We'd use the field for war games.  Every little colt and filly was a mercenary at heart, and we'd divide ourselves up into teams and do hard tackles at full-gallop."

	"Yeesh..."  Ebon shuddered slightly.  "Sounds painful."

	"Hmmm... Maybe.  Foals know how to bounce back up onto their hooves."

	"And you?"  Ebon exhaled, feeling the warmth of the unicorn's colt beneath his muzzle.  "You're petite enough as it is.  I can't imagine how dinky you must have been as a kid."

	Eagle's breath squeaked with a slight giggle.  "You're not exactly the biggest boulder on the block yourself."

	"Heh... just saying."

	Eagle shrugged.  "I... bounced a lot as a kid.  Got my fair share of bumps and bruises.  In fact... I was never all that good at winning war games."

	"Why'd you keep on trying?"

	"Cuz the other kids were starting to think I was pretty cool."  Eagle flicked his tail.  "For... g-getting up so much after taking tons and tons of heavy falls.  I guess they all thought I had guts."  He gulped.  "Then, one day, we all went out on our own to lose them... on some foreign field or another."

	"Sounds like a tragic way to live."

	"Except that the ones who made it back lived all the harder," Eagle said.  "They all got married quickly and had foals... tons of foals.  They made their parents proud. And I..."

	Ebon waited quietly.

	Eagle sighed out his nostrils.  "I realized early on that I wasn't gonna be making any kids ever..."

	"You say that as if you regret it."

	"Heh... not a chance."  Eagle smirked.  "I love foals.  Only... Franzington isn't all that big on adoption."

	"But I thought you said that Crimson and Phoenix became surrogate brothers to Tweak in Aurum?"

	"Heh... they're different.  They left Franzington by doing that.  I mean... I did in a way, too, but I had my heart set much... much earlier.  Wish I could say the same about my mind."

	Ebon sat up straight, gazing at the other stallion.  "Well, I'm glad that you still have such pleasant memories to hold onto.  When it comes to Franzington, I mean."

	"Heh..."  Eagle squirmed slightly, staring down at his folded legs.  "Yeah, I guess."

	"It... it must be a wonderful thing."  Ebon gulped, staring off into the darkening forest.  "To be able to remember things like that, for better or for worse."

	Eagle sat in silence.  He turned to look at Ebon.

	Ebon's shoulders slumped with a prolonged sigh.  Suddenly, he felt his chin being tilted towards Eagle.

	"Isn't it better to dwell on where you are now?"  Eagle smiled faintly.  "Than on where you were once or where you're going?"

	"Then what does that make me, EE?"  Ebon's eyes moistened.  "What does that make anything?"

	"You're happy though, aren't you?" Eagle remarked.  "On board the Jury?  With friends and family and... and..."

	"But there has to be more to me than just a feeling," Ebon murmured.  "Where's the substance? What do I have to measure myself by?"

	"Do you truly feel lost, Ebon?"

	"Yes... and yet... n-no..."  Ebon sniffled, glancing down.  "It's hard t-to explain.  There are nights when I just want to cry myself to sleep.  But then there are moments—wonderful waking moments..."  He gulped.  "Like this one."

	Eagle smiled.  "I, for one, am a fan of happy moments.  What about you?"

	"I just... I-I want to know where I belong," Ebon said.  "I want to be grounded.  I want to have a story."

	"A story?"

	"A beginning a middle and an end."  Ebon shuddered.  "You and the rest have that.  I don't."

	"I'm sure Propsy would disagree," Eagle said with a smile.  "Bet she could tell you in great detail how she felt the moment you blessed her by entering her life."

	"Props could fall in love with a rabid manticore if she wanted to."

	"Heh.  Guess that explains Zaid."

	"Huh?"

	Eagle sighed and shook his head.  "Never mind."  He caressed the stallion's chin.  "Ebon, listen.  Maybe you feel lost at times.  Maybe there isn't much to see behind or before you, but I'm telling you... you are real.  You do matter.  And just because things look and feel bleak now doesn't mean you can't find that subtance that you crave."

	"I've tried, Eagle," Ebon murmured.  "For so long on my own, I've tried.  You can't make a life's story out of n-nothing."

	Eagle gazed at him.  He fought to keep his voice even.  "Then maybe you need a place to start."

	"With what?" Ebon asked.

	"With this."  Eagle leaned in and kissed him gently.  Then, raising a hoof, he softly embraced the stallion, nuzzling him cheek to cheek.  "I love you, Ebon Mane.  If you're looking for a story, then let's make one together."  He smiled, his eyes shut.  "And we can make it a happy one, from page to page, start to finish."  He choked back a sob and cracked a smile.  "What do you say?"

	Silence.

	"Ebon...?"  Eagle raised his forelimb again, but felt nothing but cold air.  His eyes opened.

	Ebon had stood up and was not shivering several feet away.  His expression was pale, hollow.

	"Ebon?"  Eagle stood up, jaw agape.  "What's—"

	"This... th-this isn't..."  Ebon quivered.  He hobbled backwards, his eyes watering.  A slight whimper escaped his throat.  "I'm so foolish.  I'm doing it again!"  He clenched his eyes shut, hissing at himself.  "I promised myself.  I promised!"

	"Again?"  Eagle stepped closer.  "Ebon, please, talk to me! What's going—"

	"St-stay back!" Ebon shrieked.  Tears ran down his face as he approached the brink of hyperventilation.  "Eagle, I'm so sorry.  But it's just not... I mean you shouldn't..."  He clenched his teeth, seethed, and spun around.  "I can't!  I just c-can't!"

	"Ebon—!"

	"I'm s-sorry!"  Ebon's breath faltered, fluttering behind him in sporadic sobs.  He galloped off into the night, approaching the distant glittering specks of West D.

	Eagle stood dead still, alone beside the babbling brook.  It was too dark to make sense of the waters or the foliage.  He plopped down on his haunches, numb with shock.  Slowly, as the shadows of night fell into every corner of the basin, he buried his muzzle into his forelimbs, and wept in quiet confusion.



	Rainbow Dash's eyes fluttered.  Her muzzle tensed, and she hissed a bit before turning over to flickering lamplight.  At last, her lids popped open.

	A gray-maned figure came into focus, bearing bright red eyes.  Fawful blinked, staring down at Rainbow Dash with patient concern.

	A low trilling sound escaped Rainbow's mouth. "Let me guess," she muttered.  "'Gold Petals?'"

	Fawful's brow furrowed.  "Who?"

	Rainbow smirked.  "Heh."  She tried getting up, only to feel a wave of dizziness still soaring through her.  "Grnnngh... good t-to know some things are capable of changing."

	Fawful reached down and helped the pegasus sit up.  Rainbow saw a starry night twinkling just outside a wooden window.  She sat on a cot inside a building located somewhere along the upper height of Central D's tower.

	"You dragged me all the way out, huh?"

	"A pair of First-Borns assisted.  But yes."

	"Hah..."  Rainbow smirked through another wave of dizziness.  "Guess Ebon's cooking must have finally paid off.  I'm getting heavier for once."

	"I'm... not sure what you mean by that."

	"Don't mind me.  I wake up with the worst rambling in the morning," Rainbow said.  Fawful helped prop her up against a wooden post.  Rainbow stared calmly out onto the misty night's sky as her head gradually stopped spinning.  "I... must have given you quite a scare..."

	"I'm certain it wasn't on purpose."

	Rainbow gulped.  "What am I talking about?  It was more than one scare."

	Fawful said nothing.

	"I've never been the best communicator.  Guess I couldn't think of a better way to show you than—well—showing you."  Rainbow exhaled out her nostrils.  She tilted her head down, catching a glimpse of the pendant through the corner of her eyesight.  "You kept it on me."  She brought a hoof up, toying with the weight of the lightning bolt.  "Good girl."

	Fawful nodded.  "I... can't fathom how you bear to carry the weight of that thing at all times."

	"Yeah, well, there are different way to m-make sacrifices, Fawful."  Rainbow gulped.  "Some of us give stuff up... the rest of us slap stuff on."

	"What would happen if it were to come off?"

	"I could tell you what would stop happening," Rainbow said.  "Me."

	Fawful paced slowly across the tiny hut.  "You... you stated that you left Equestria as the last bearer of your kingdom's Elements."

	"Did I?"  Rainbow shrugged, feeling the dizziness gradually wear off.  "I'm the Element of Loyalty, if you must know."

	"And the other Element bearers?"  Fawful squinted at her.  "What became of them?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "They're dead.  All of them."

	"They were faithful companions of yours?"

	"They were my best friends."

	"What caused them to die, if you don't mind my asking?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth, hesitated, and eventually droned:  "Discord.  A supreme bad guy from Celestia-knows-where.  He came in, wielded a whole bunch of 'chaos lord' powers, and the rest of my friends tried to take him out.  Problem is, without me around, they didn't realize that the Elements would backfire.  They all... they all turned to dust.  I was the only one left alive.  As you can imagine... I was... uh... pretty ticked off, to put it lightly.  I grabbed the last surviving Element and took out Discord on my own, but I did so at a price.  His chaos energy shot into me, and now I've gotta wear this thing at all times to keep that evil stuff corked up, ya feel me?"

	Fawful was ready to ask:  "And your Princesses... Celestia and Luna—?"

	"Yeah, what about them?"

	"They didn't intercede on your friends' behalf?  They didn't use their mighty powers to stop Discord on their own?"

	Rainbow exhaled heavily, shaking her head.  "No."

	"Why not?"

	"Just because there are creatures in this world who are like gods, doesn't mean they are."  Rainbow tilted her head to look squarely at Fawful.  "Even your Valkyrie—for all the awesome things she's done—has her limits."  She gulped.  "Everything lives and everything dies.  Just not everything manages to do so awesomely."

	Fawful chewed on her lip.  Her gaze was locked on Rainbow's pendant.  "This... this chaos energy that you speak of..."  Slowly, her eyes raised to Rainbow's level.  "How long do you think you can fight it back?"

	Rainbow simply stared back at her.

	Fawful's ears folded.  "How long have you known?"

	"Between you and me?" Rainbow muttered.  "I stopped living the very moment I saw the piles of ash that my friends had become."  She gazed out at the stars again.  "When Belle and Pilate hopped into my life, things changed... like a spark ignited something inside me.  I learned to live once again.  But even then, I knew... as I know now..."  She slowly shook her head.  "Nothing lasts forever.  And—especially as of late—it's getting worse.  I... I don't know how much time I have left.  The flames of the machine world seem to help, but even that can't do the trick indefinitely."

	"And yet, you stopped here."  Fawful leaned her head to the side.  "You have the flying Valkyrie Silver.  You could have flown off to more important things on your journey, and yet you didn't.  Why?"

	"How could I?" Rainbow said quietly.  She gulped.  "You and I, Fawful?  We're cut from the same cloth. Same with Sivrem, Jerrio, Kitsune, and all the little birds around the campfire."  A faint smile.  "We've got Equestria in our veins.  It's just too good of a thing for me to pass up."  She then winced.  "I guess... I-I let it go to my head a little..."

	Fawful nodded at that.  Slowly, she pivoted about and sat right beside the cot.  She faced the window full of stars, breathing evenly.  At last, she said, "You aren't lying... about Commander Hurricane and the evil sky city..."

	Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "I'm afraid not, elder."

	Fawful sighed.  She closed her eyes and sat there in silence.

	Rainbow fidgeted a bit.  She glanced aside.  "Do... uhm... er..."

	Fawful opened her eyes and glanced up.

	Rainbow gulped.  "You and the others took me out of that place with the gold lights."  Her brow furrowed.  "How many know about what went down in there?"

	Fawful adjusted her white bangs and said, "Only a few."

	"Only a few?"

	"The Gray-Feathers believe that the nature of our discussion should be kept in strictest confidence until all of the elders have reviewed it in great detail."

	"Fawful... let's be real, here..."  Rainbow sat up straight, wincing.  "You can't keep the cork on that for long!"

	"Rainbow—"

	"Especially—nngh—in a secluded crater populated by flying horndogs! I mean, come on!" She smirked painfully.  "That Jagold chick alone looks like a living prattle-a-minute."

	"I know it must seem like an awful thing," Fawful said.  "To keep a secret such as that from the Non-Grays."

	"Pfft!  Only because it is!"

	"But you witnessed what happened down there!" Fawful exclaimed, wide-eyed.  "You saw how most of the elders reacted!"  She pointed at herself.  "You s-saw how I reacted!  You must understand, Rainbow, that we've never had a reason to challenge the scrolls in untold eons!"

	"But if you just let me talk to everypony!"  Rainbow said.  "Someplace calm and out in the open!  I promise I won't freak anyone out this time!  All I need to do is sit them down and tell them all about... about..."

	Fawful simply glared at Rainbow.

	"Er... yeah..."  Rainbow winced, her wings drooping.  "Maybe it's best that your elders talk this one over."

	"I'm inclined to agree," Fawful said, standing up and trotting towards a window.

	Rainbow scooted up until she sat on the edge of the cot.  "Do you... uh... do you have any idea what they're gonna say?"

	"I'm afraid I don't," Fawful muttered.  She lifted one hoof and rested it on the window frame while she gazed out onto the lower huts and platforms amidst the trees.  "I am still freshly initiated, and I'm too young to accurately predict what they'll decide."

	"But... th-they gotta own up to what I have to share with them, r-right?"  Rainbow stepped off the cot, winced, and hobbled towards the window.  She managed to stand upright the whole time.  "There were tons of witnesses.  They all saw the gold lights down there.  There's no sane point in covering that all up, right—"

	"Rainbow Dash, we are not a dishonest band of silencers!" Fawful said, seething slightly.  She turned to frown at the mare.  "Our chief duty as former-First-Borns is to look after the sanctity and preservation of the scrolls!  Believe it or not, we are not opposed to truth and the evidence of truth!"

	"Then... wh-what was with all the freaked out ponies downstairs, y'know?"

	Fawful sighed, her ears folding.  "Regardless of how much control we have over our faculties, we are still ponies, Rainbow Dash."  She gulped.  "As much as I hesitate to admit it, we are still vulnerable to fear."

	"Yeah, I kinda figured that."

	"You see, the Valkyrie has always been a source of strength and courage for us," Fawful explained.  "Dwelling on her legacy has been a means of preparing ourselves for the inevitable Windlessness beyond death and beyond the greens."

	Rainbow smirked.  "And—like—who says you gotta give up all that monk-like hocus pocus up, huh?"

	"But Rainbow..."  Fawful clenched her teeth.  "If what you say is true, and the Valkyrie was... was... a mere militant—!"

	"Hey... whoah whoah whoah..."  Rainbow waved a hoof.  "Hurricane was no mere soldier.  She led an entire race of ponies.  Stratopolis wouldn't have survived its horrible winters to join Equestria if it wasn't for that mare!  Heck, she was even responsible for helping pegasi survive the windigoes—"

	"The what?"

	"The... the windigoes..."  Rainbow cleared her throat.  "Big... uh... freaky ghost horses that bring pestilence, famine, and—most of all—snow and ice."

	Fawful blinked, her mouth agape.  "The frost demons," she murmured.  "The Valkyrie... b-banished their blight from the skies of Light."

	Rainbow chuckled.  "Heh... ya see?"  She smiled.  "Equestria and Durandana has more in common than you think."  She cleared her throat and tilted her hoof from side to side.  "Aside from—y'know—the messiah worship schtick."

	Fawful glanced up at Rainbow Dash.  She blinked.  "How do you think you factor in all of this, Rainbow?"

	"Huh?"

	Fawful reached forward and caressed the mare's mane.

	Rainbow's eyes followed the elder's hoof, then glanced back at Fawful.

	"You... you truly are a daughter of the Valkryie, aren't you?"  Fawful's jaw trembled.  "A First among First-Borns everywhere?"

	Rainbow exhaled calmly.  She grasped Fawful's hoof and held it between them while maintaining a gentle smile.  "Over the last year or so, I've been called many things.  Half of them I believe are bunk.  The other half—I don't really care.  All that matters to me is finding the strength to fly towards the next sunrise while remaining in one piece... and then—of course—to make sure the same goes for my friends."

	"But... but..."

	"Fawful, I am telling you... I am promising you... I didn't have any agenda for coming here.  Other than to find out the truth and share that truth."  She opened her mouth again, but lingered.

	Fawful took notice of it.

	After a sigh, Rainbow gazed towards the floor and muttered, "Guess that's not true.  There is another angle to it all."

	"And what's that?"

	"I... I couldn't pass this place up," Rainbow said.  "The moment I saw it... heard it... smelled it and tasted it..."  Rainbow shook her head, sniffled, and smiled weakly.  "I didn't think that after flying in one direction for so long th-that I'd somehow end up in a place like home.  At least not this early."  Rainbow gulped.  "The timing seems all too perfect, considering... well..."

	Fawful gazed at her worriedly.

	Rainbow cleared her throat and shook her head.  "But screw all that noise.  Your elders are stressing about it.  Why should we?"  Rainbow tilted her head up, bearing a brave smirk.  "So, tell me, Fawful..."

	"Tell you what?"

	"What does a girl in Central D do to party this time of night?"  Bright teeth.
		//------------------------------//
		// For Ponies On the Wing		//------------------------------//

	"You're pacing again," Pilate murmured.

	"I... I-I know, beloved," Bellesmith exhaled, trotting in wide circles across the top deck of the Noble Jury.  "I can't help it.  Don't you think they'd be back by now?"

	"Roarke is a mare who fully commits to what she does," Pilate said.  "I've no doubt that she had the entire day set aside for her exercises.  Even up to sundown."

	"Pilate.  It's almost an hour past sundown."

	"Perhaps there were some things she wished to test after the sun had set."

	"Shhh!"  Belle spun, gazing towards the horizon with a gaping expression.  "Did you hear that?"

	Pilate tilted his head, ears twitching.  "I don't hear anything, beloved."

	"Nnnnngh... I swear, I've been hearing explosions all day."

	"That would fall in line with the sort of things Roarke would be testing."

	"Pilate."  Belle frowned.  "I'm worried.  Aren't you?"

	The zebra slowly shook his head.  "Honestly, no."

	"Need I remind you that our little Kera is still out there with a former bounty hunter?"

	"I'd be more worried for Roarke at this point."

	"Ungh... Pilate..."

	"Well, think of it this way."  Pilate smirked.  "If she had spent the day out with Rainbow Dash instead, she'd probably have spelunked ten monster-filled caves by now."

	Belle ran a hoof through her chestnut bangs.  "Hmmm... you have a point there."

	Pilate shrugged.  "And if she had spent the day with Zaid—"

	"Guh!  Don't go there!"

	"Heheheh..."

	"Speaking of Zaid, have you noticed how he and Props appear to be—?"  Belle's words were cut off by the flapping of feathers.  She glanced up.

	A trio of Durandanans were hovering right above the stern of the Noble Jury.  The largest of the three deposited an earth pony down onto the top deck.  It took some squinting, but Belle made out the unmistakable shape of Ebon Mane.  The stallion pivoted to face the pegasi and gestured towards them, thanking them.

	"Hey!  Don't mention it, outsider!" one chirped.

	"Yeah!"  One of the others nodded.  "I'd be feathered too if I was wingless!  May First Light bless ya!"  And the three flew their way towards the Western Tower.  "Wow... did you ever meet a stallion that smelled that good?"

	"Hrmmmm..."  Pilate tilted his head in Belle's direction.  "I have two guesses, but I'm not in the mood for making a fool of myself this late."

	"Ebon!"  Belle trotted briskly towards him, grinning.  "You're back!  Why..."  She came to a stop, blinking at his limp figure.  "Why d-didn't you take the Lounge sphere back?  Where's Roarke and the others?"

	Ebon lingered on the top deck.  He turned, gazing lethargically at the mare.  "I... I dunno..."  He trotted coldly past her and headed towards the cockpit entrance.  "They'll come around.  Don't worry."

	Belle watched him pass by, her lips pursed.

	"Well, he sounded remarkably... dead," Pilate said.

	"If only you could see his expression."  Belle gulped.  "Though I doubt the O.A.S.I.S. Sphere would do it any justice, even with all the upgrades."

	"Perhaps something less than pleasant went down between him and Eagle Eye."

	"Spark spare us!" Belle exclaimed.  "That's a horrible thing to ponder."

	"Was he carried here by one of the locals?"

	"Seems that way.  Ebon isn't the type to approach strangers without—"

	"Belle," Pilate murmured, reaching a hoof out to her shoulder.

	"What?"

	The zebra's ears twitched as he motioned in the direction of the ship's stern.

	Belle stared at him.  Eventually, she gasped, for she heard the unmistakable sound of mana engines gliding.  "The sphere!"

	"Come..."  Pilate grinned warmly, tugging Belle towards the stairwell.  "Let's take a whizz, shall we?"



	The black transport vessel had landed and the hangar doors were closing right as Belle and Pilate descended the stairwell and entered on the bottom floor.

	"May I advise that we not go on the offensive immediately?  At least not in front of Kera?" Pilate remarked.  "It's perfectly natural to be displeased with Roarke for being out this long, but I think we can choose a more strategic time and place for expressing our frustrations and concerns."

	"I'm more concerned about Kera at the moment, to be perfectly honest," Belle said while helping Pilate down the stairs.  "She's so easily bored.  Having spent the entire day out there while Roarke shuffled through one obscure piece of equipment to another?  She'll probably never want to leave the ship again."

	"Wasn't she promised explosions?"

	"The girl has grown up with explosions, Pilate.  I really think she should have stayed by our side today."

	"The filly needs to stretch her legs once in a while.  Not to mention her horn."

	"I know that.  But if today has proven anything, it's that we need to allow her freedom in smaller and more manageable slices of—"

	The two reached the bottom floor of the hangar, and they barely had time to breathe when Kera came scampering from the opened doors of the transport.  "Belle!  Pilate!"  She leapt high, practically tackling Bellesmith.  "Heeeee!  Hi hi hi!"

	"Gaaah!"  Belle fell back on her haunches, catching Kera.  She stifled a giggle and smiled at the filly.  "Well, hello there yourself!"

	"We had the best time!  There were explosions and big rocks and small rocks and missiles!"

	"Erm... well..."  Belle fidgeted with the foal in her grasp.  "That's... uhm... v-very..."  She blinked, feeling the child's silken mane as she nuzzled Belle in crook of her neck.  "...Kera?"

	"Hmmmmm..."  Kera smiled, her eyes shut above rosy, tattooed cheeks.  "Have I mentioned how much I love you?"  She clutched Belle's shoulder and giggled again.  "For real.  You guys are swell.  I really should tell you that more.  I don't care how sappy."

	Belle blinked, her eyes slightly misty.  "Why... what a darling thing to say, Kera."  She sniffed, then lovingly stroked the filly's mane while looking her in the eye.  "Looks like you had a blissful day."

	"Mmmhmm!  Hmmhmm!"  Kera grinned, her green tail flicking.  "Roarke taught me a lot of stuff!  And then I almost killed her!"

	"I see..." Belle's eyes darted up towards Roarke.  Her coy smile lingered.  "It's a good thing that she's so resourceful."

	"Yes," Roarke said.  She finished dropping a crate of equipment into the corner of the hangar.  "Fortunately, I am."  She fidgeted slightly.  Then, with a forced twirl, she turned from the equipment and trotted across the hangar.  Belle was standing up by the time she came to a stop.  "You and Pilate have done much good to Kera.  It was... a pleasure to spend a day with her."  She stretched a hoof out.

	Belle looked at it, then at the metal mare's eye-lenses.  "Roarke?  What...?"

	"I assume it is traditional by Ledomaritan custom to hoof-bump in celebratory fashion?" the ex-bounty hunter said.

	Belle merely smiled.  She gently moved Kera aside and flung her arms around Roarke.

	The metal mare's body stiffened in Belle's embrace.  Twitching, she sighed out the side of her muzzle.  "This is turning into a disturbing pattern..."

	"Mmmmm... get used to it," Belle said with a smile.

	"Heeheehee!"  Kera giggled.

	Pilate stood nearby, smiling as he overheard the exchange.  Just then, a series of petite hoofsteps clattered across the hangar floor behind him.  He turned, took one sniff, and smiled.  "Eagle Eye.  Have a nice day, I hope?  You know, Ebon arrived not that long ago and—"

	"I know," Eagle murmured, his eyes glossy as he trudged right past the zebra.  "Sorry.  I... I-I'm tired.  I'm heading to bed."

	Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  He turned, following the sound of Eagle's retreating steps.  He gazed blindly with a curious expression.  Slowly, reluctantly, he turned back towards the conversation ensuing between Kera, Roarke, and Bellesmith.



	"And so I gripped Nevlamas' big crystal death antlers like this, ya see?!"  Rainbow Dash said, grinning into the firelight.  She hovered above an open wooden platform clinging to the stalk of Central D.  No less than a hundred pegasi sat beneath her, gazing through the smoke and embers in jaw-dropping awe.  "And she's flying down the mountainside at full force, right?  Any moment and she could grind me to a pulp and then breathe glowy aquamarine flame all over my bubbling corpse!  Well,  I wasn't about to have any of that!  Time to kick some mutant chaos dragon tail, am I right?!"

	The crowd murmured, feathers rustling.  Jerrio squinted with perpetual skepticism.  Sivrem leaned against a wooden support strut with his forearms folded.  He smirked at the other Durandanans, then stared pleasantly up at the mare.

	"So, I take this baby right here..."  Rainbow Dash touched the pendant, summoning a tiny glow.  The pegasi all gasped harder.  "And I shine it into Nevlamas' skull!  Pewwwwwwwww!  Endless stream of harmonic energy, ya feel me?  And—guess what?—it does the trick!  A whole crapton of her scales melt away and she's bleeding all over like a chocolate-filled pinata!  By the time she's reached the base of the mountain, she's become so weak that I could practically suplex her!  I mean, why not!  I've had tons of practice along my journey!"

	Giggles and chuckles.  Jagold clung to Smythe as she stammered, "And then what happened?"

	"Pffft.  She crashed into the countryside.  But I had bigger fish to fry, so I spat on her, turned tail, and glided all the way to the battlefield where I was headed!  And don't even get me started on all of the tattooed warriors and screaming managliders I took down!  It was like fireworks during the Summer Sun Celebration!"

	The Durandanans chuckled and murmured in awe amongst themselves.

	Rainbow grinned wide.  "And you know what the best part is?"  Her eyes darted across everypony.  Eventually, she winked.  "It wasn't the first dragon I had headbutted with!  Not by a longshot!"

	The ponies all cooed in awe, eventually clapping their hooves against the wooden surface of the platform.  Rayvine lay on her chest, gazing up at Rainbow Dash with a warm smile and even warmer ear-tips.

	"That's so awesome!"

	"Tell us more, outsider!"

	"I haven't felt this excited since I was a little sparrow!"

	"Heh... trust me..."  Rainbow Dash touched down, pretending to examine her hoof as she stood beside the fireplace.  "All of the crazy stuff I've done could fill a book... or maybe five..."  She tongued the inside of her mouth, gazing across the stars above.  "Or twelve."

	"Tell us about the Gold Lights!"

	Rainbow's blood went cold.  "Errrrrrr..." She glanced through the campfire.

	A young mare with red wings blinked back.  "We... we h-heard that you made Gold Lights... your own Gold Lights down below..."  She gulped.  "Where only Gray Feathers and First-Borns go."

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip.

	Jerrio's eyes darted from her to the Durandanans and back.  He stood in silence.

	"I... don't exactly know what you think you heard," Rainbow eventually blurted.  "If I were you, I'd stop paying bridle gossip any mind and j-just... y'know... listen to your elders!  Like you always do, ya dig?"

	"But... b-but—!"

	Kitsune cleared her throat.  She hovered above the crowd, smiling.  "Rainbow Dash is right.  Besides, it's quite late.  We have many chores to do in the morning."

	The crowd collectively groaned.

	"Kitsune has a point, gulls," Sivrem added, yanking at a rope that suspended a varnished whicker dome over the fire.  He lowered it so that it stifled the flames, gradually choking them to a low flicker.  "The leatherbacks won't milk themselves.  Even with outsiders visiting on floating Valkyrie Silver, our tasks here in the basin do not end."  He motioned with a sweep of his mighty wings.  "Go to roost.  All of you."

	"And for those of you going to roost in pairs..."  Kitsune hollered after the sulking, retreating groups.  "Just get it over with and get some rest, ya hear?"

	Several chuckling voices echoed back.  Eventually the group dissipated.

	Rainbow stood on the edge of the platform.  She turned to see Kitsune and Sivrem floating towards her.

	"Don't mind them, Rainbow," Kitsune said.  "Their heads are like their wings.  They're prone to catching a breeze—any breeze."

	"Well, I don't blame them," Rainbow said.  "This crater is cool and all... but it's still a crater."  Her ears folded.  "Maybe... m-maybe I shouldn't have told tales of my journey beyond the greens."

	"Nonsense!"  Sivrem grinned wide.  "You made their entire day!  Duranda knows you made mine!" he winked.

	"A story is a story," Kitsune said.  "If nothing else, it'll live on in their dreams."

	"Yeah, sure.  I can dig that."  Rainbow said.  She gulped, then fidgeted as she glanced sideways at the two.  "Uh... just... j-just how much do they know."

	"Hmmm?"

	"Lemme put this another way," Rainbow muttered.  "How much do you guys know?"

	Kitsune and Sivrem exchanged glances.  With lingering smiles, it was Kitsune who spoke first, and quietly:  "We know that... that you collapsed again."

	"Just like earlier when you outflew us in the Raked Ravine," Sivrem said.

	"Only this time it was... a lot scarier," Kitsune remarked.

	"Uh huh..."  Rainbow nodded, then gulped.  "And is that all you know?"

	The two First-Borns were silent.

	"Did anypony tell you about what went on downstairs?  Y'know... in the room with all the Valkyrie Silv—?"

	"You said it yourself, Rainbow Dash," Kitsune said.  "Best to listen to our elders."

	"Yeah.  And I know you guys respect them.  But—"

	"Rainbow, I know it must seem very... very odd to you," Sivrem said with a calm smile.  He waved a hoof as he spoke.  "But relying on their wise judgment has worked here for countless generations.  They preserve the scrolls and guide us towards liberation by the Valkyrie's Shout, both in this life and in the Windlessness beyond."

	"Yeah, and I respect that—"

	"Then do not concern yourself with what the elders decide or don't decide," Kitsune remarked.  "They'll come to you when they've made their choice.  They'll come to all of us."

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "I... I just don't want you guys to freak out, y'know?  And I know how much it stinks to have to wait for something important to be decided by others..."

	"Rainbow, look at me," Kitsune said, caressing the mare's chin.  She smiled.  "Hanging out with you has made us anything but anxious."  She winked.  "If you came here to Durandana bringing something horrible, I'm sure Sivrem and I would have figured it out by now."

	"And we woulda kicked your flank," Sivrem said with a wink.

	Kitsune giggled.  "Yes, well, we would have tried to, anyway."

	"Hah hah!"  Sivrem slapped his own knee, grinning.  "Isn't that the truth?!"  He squinted Rainbow's way.  "I would love for you to perform that amazing sky light trick before Ice's flock.  You think it's possible?"

	"Uhhhhh... you mean the sonic rainboom?"  Rainbow gulped.  "Honestly, I'm not s-sure I have another one of those in me right now."  She suddenly paled, staring off into the glittering lights of Central D.  "I'm not sure... I have another one of th-those in me ever."

	Sivrem and Kitsune exchanged glances.  They gazed calmly at Rainbow.  "Would you like an escort back to your Valkyrie silver?"

	"No... heh..."  Rainbow smiled.  "I'm good.  But thanks, though.  You two get some rest."

	"Rainbow Dash, are you certain you shouldn't reconsider?" Sivrem said in a very calm tone.

	Rainbow opened her mouth, her eyes lingering on their serious expressions.  "Yes.  I'm certain.  I'll be fine, okay?"

	Silence.

	"Very well," Sivrem said, nodding.  He smiled.  "I look forward to seeing you tomorrow.  Perhaps you could tell us of the other dragons you've battled."

	"Heh..."  Rainbow kicked at the floor, smirking.  "I'm afraid you guys have heard the most exciting one."

	"Hmmm..."  Sivrem winked, flapped his wings, and took off.  "Somehow I doubt that."

	"Have a blessed First Light, Rainbow," Kitsune said, soaring after him.

	"Yeah, uh..."  Rainbow waved.  "You too."  As the two pegasi disappeared along the glittering night sky, she stood alone, exhaling hard as she glanced across the stars, tree branches, and lanterns of Central D.  The wind blew through her mane, warm and inviting.  She closed her eyes, stretching her wings out as she smiled to herself.  Her bangs fluttered in the nightly breeze, and for a brief moment Rainbow was sitting on a cloud overlooking the hazy stretches of Cloudsdale and its many buildings.  An endless array of lights twinkled in the sky, from homes to weather factories to public courtyards.  In the distance, lighting flashed, giving the lofty world an undercurrent of magic and mystique.

	Rainbow exhaled with a shuddering breath.  At last, she turned west and opened her eyes.  She instantly got a muzzle-ful of Rayvinne.

	"You must have been scared."

	"Gah!"  Rainbow hobbled backwards, panting.

	"Heehee... like that!"  Rayvinne said, grinning from ear-to-ear.  "A pony?  As tiny as you?  Taking on some giant reptilian fire-breathing beast?  It's hard enough to believe that you can steer a leatherback off course."

	"Yeah, well, Nevlamas was no push-over, and—"  Rainbow blinked.  "Wait, what do you mean 'tiny?'"

	Rayvinne giggled, pacing in a close circle around Rainbow.  "Please.  It's nothing to be ashamed of.  Jagold's a little thing, but she knows how to make a big splash."  Rayvinne paused to smirk.  "In more ways than one."

	"Well... uh... glad to know you gals are such... g-good friends."  Rainbow blinked, turning her head to blink at Rayvinne.  "Aren't you supposed to be heading to bed?"

	"Hmmm.  Aren't we all?"

	"For real, I don't wanna be stepping on anypony's feathers," Rainbow said, chuckling to herself.  She glanced up at the higher platforms.  "Kitsune and Sivrem are obviously calling the shots here.  But, really, I think they're totally qualified for the leadership thingy."  She turned back.  "I bet you're really proud to fly alongside them everyday—Mmmmmff!"

	Rayvinne's muzzle was clamped tightly over Rainbow's.

	Eyes bulging, Rainbow yanked her neck back, disentangling her lips from Rayvinne's with a comical pop!.  "Whoah... whoahhhhhhhh-ho-ho-ho..."  She stretched her hooves out, bracing Rayvinne's shoulders.  "Heh... I like your style, girl, but—for real—it's all about the landing!"

	"I agree."  Rayvinne grinned, her eyes thin.  "Your nest or mine?"

	"Buh?"

	"You wanna land?"  The pegasus purred, nuzzling one of Rainbow's forelimbs.  "I've got a place for that.  And then, right after, I can show you what it truly means to fly."

	Rainbow stared, her jaw dropped.  "Uhhhh... ahem... uhhh..."  She wrenched her eyes away, grinning stupidly as her cheeks caught aflame.  "Not th-that... that doesn't seem like a really swell invitation or anything..."

	"Hmmmm..."  Rayvinne nuzzled her cheek up the length of Rainbow's leg.  "Who's inviting?"

	Rainbow blinked.  "Look, no..."

	"It's not that long of a flight—"

	"I'm sorry, but no, okay?"  Rainbow yanked her leg out of Rayvinne's grip.  "I'm flattered.  And..."  She winced.  "Damn if you aren't hot as Tartarus, but... I can't..."

	Rayvinne pouted, pink eyes glittering.  "You can't?"

	"I won't," Rainbow said.  Her frown was a brief, brief thing, swallowed up by a sigh as she ran a hoof through her bangs.  "Don't take it personally.  But... but it's just that... I'm not in a good place for—"

	"Hmmm..."  Rayvine leaned back with a knowing smirk.  "There's somepony else, isn't there?"

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip, staring at Rayvinne.  Eventually she murmured, "I... I-I don't really know..."  She gulped.  "But there might as well be."

	Rayvinne's wingtips fluttered.  "Well, have them join!"

	"HAH!"  Rainbow barked.  She tilted her head back, eyes rolling.  "HA HA!"  She exhaled long and slow.  "Whewwwwwww..."  A smirk.  "Go to bed, Rayvinne."

	"Hmmph.  Fine."  Rayvinne brushed past Rainbow, as did her feathers and feathers and feathers.  "But the moment you change your mind..."  She winked.  "I'll be waiting."  Then, with a heavy flap of her wings, she took off into the glittering night sky.

	Rainbow Dash stood there, watching her.  All the while, her ears twitched to a persistent rattling sound.  She realized it was her Loyalty Pendant rhythmically clattering with her intense heartbeat.  She pressed a hoof to the gem and steadied herself with a deep breath.

	"I hope you know," Fawful's voice remarked, descending from above.  "You just turned down the opportunity of a lifetime."

	Rainbow turned to glance at the elder.  "And just how would you know that?"

	Fawful smirked in the penumbra of distant lantern light.  "I haven't exactly been a Gray Feather for long."  She pointed in the direction where the other mare had just flown.  "And Rayvinne's older than she looks."

	"You can stop right there.  For real."  Rainbow gulped.  "Must be hard to 'protect scrolls' in a place like this with all of the... distractions."

	"Hmmmm..."  Fawful chuckled breathily.  "We Durandanans have more self-control than you think.  Especially when it matters."  She landed and pointed at the pegasus.  "So do you, it would seem."

	"That wasn't self-control," Rainbow muttered.  She then sighed, wings drooping.  "That was... something else."

	"Would you like to talk about it?"

	"No."

	"My apologies."

	"Nothing to be sorry about."  Rainbow glanced over.  She blinked calmly.  "However, you could talk to me about what the elders have decided."

	Fawful nodded.  "Yes.  Yes, I could..."

	"Well?"  Rainbow gulped.  "Is it good news or bad news?"

	Fawful gazed thoughtfully into the stars.  "Well..."  She gave Rainbow a faint smile.  "A little bit of both."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Matter of Our Discussion		//------------------------------//

	"The elders are willing to talk to Celestia," Rainbow Dash said.  "Through... erm... the sword."

	"Truly?" Pilate remarked.  He and Bellesmith looked up from where they sat on a couch inside the Noble Jury's Lounge.  Kera was curled up beside Bellesmith, a contented smile plastered on her slumbering face as the mare stroked her mane.  "That was rather quick."

	"Er... they want some time to prepare, though," Rainbow said.  "So... erm... w-we're gonna be here at least two more days."  She winced from where she hovered over the mess hall's table.  "You think that's doable?"

	"Rainbow, this is major development that could very well determine the future of these remarkable ponies," Pilate said.  "I'm sure the crew will let you take as much time as you need."

	"Mmmm..."  Belle chewed on the edge of her lip.

	The zebra tilted his head towards her.  "Or... erm... am I-I wrong?"

	"I'm all for staying here personally," Belle said.  "But what about Val Roa?  Certainly we plan to get there sooner than later."

	"We'll still be making it there faster than Chrysalis could ever have expected us!" Rainbow said with a smirk.  "Going around the Sky Stabs would have taken ten times as long!"

	"Yes, but still..."  Belle took a deep breath, glancing across the mess hall.  "There is no telling how swiftly she might regain her strength."

	"Pffft.  Without her brood?  She's chump change!"

	"And I appreciate your optimism there, Rainbow," Belle said with a smile.  "But, logically speaking, there is no real way to tell just how powerful she might become."

	"There is no real reason to tell anything," Pilate remarked.  "All things considered—we really don't know all that much about what Chrysalis is up to in Val Roa, aside from what she's capable of."

	Rainbow rubbed her chin in thought.  "Hmmmm..."  Her eyes darted up.  "Has Props been able to make contact with her Uncle Prowse?"

	Pilate shook his head.  "Not sense we've entered this crater."

	"Though I doubt she's put much effort into contacting him as of late," Belle said.  "She's been distracted as of late."

	"Distracted?"  Rainbow blinked.  "How?"

	"Oh... well... er..."  Belle gulped and smiled nervously.  "You know Props!"

	"Heh.  Yeah, sure."

	"I must say, Rainbow," Pilate spoke up.  "These Durandanans seem to be taking all of this rather nicely."

	"Ehhhhhh..."  Rainbow winced.

	Pilate's ears twitched.  "...No?"

	"Things could have gone down a lot smoother," Rainbow said.  "I only have myself to blame for a lot of that."

	"But apparently they're willing to communicate with the Princess directly."

	"Yeah.  But who the hay knows where that could go," Rainbow muttered in mid-hover.  "I did get them to agree with one thing, though."

	"Hmmm?  What's that?"

	"I still can't make heads or tails out of how Duranda and the rest of the ponies got here in the first place," Rainbow said.  "I mean, that inner sanctum thingy of theirs is sooooooooooooo a piece of the Machine World.  And the structure above it is a piece of Stratopolis."

	"You're certain of that, Rainbow?" Belle asked.

	"Sure as I am awesome!"

	"Well, no arguing that," Belle said with a smile.

	"But I don't buy that the piece of Stratopolis smashed into this place and caused the crater!  I mean... the structure is just too dang small!  Those buildings aren't exactly indestructable.  Like, we all saw how Stratopolis crumbled once it hit the skystone fields."  She winced, then smiled nervously in Pilate's direction.  "Erm... most of us saw it.  Sorry."

	"That's quite alright," Pilate said with a nod and a smile.  "I got a front row seat.  I'm not complaining."

	"Then what do you think caused the crater?" Belle asked.  "Or exposed the machine world?"

	"That's what I wanna find out," Rainbow said.  She tilted about.  "So, I got the elders' permission to bring somepony to the sanctum so that we could study the place together and hopefully come up with some answers."

	"Hmmm?"  Pilate tilted his head aside.  "Like who?"

	Rainbow was silent.

	Pilate gulped.  "Me?"

	"You and Belle got the O.A.S.I.S. thingy working again, right?"

	"Well, yes, but—"

	"Pilate, you've always been my go-to zebra for figuring all this Austraeoh crap out," Rainbow said.  "Granted, you've been my only zebra—but you catch my drift.  With your brains and that scanning orb thingy, maybe the two of us can come together and figure out from the site just what happened."

	"But—Rainbow—it's been several thousand years!"  He chuckled helplessly.  "I mean... I'm flattered!  But just what could we possibly find?"

	"Isn't it a smart thing to have a naked hypotenuse?"

	"Null hypothesis," Belle corrected.

	"Yeah.  What she said."

	"To be perfectly honest, Rainbow, I'm not sure how much I can even scrounge up in just two days!" Pilate remarked.  "Even with O.A.S.I.S. at full capacity."

	"Yeah, but think of it!"  Rainbow hovered down until she was directly in front of where the stallion sat.  "This is the one opportunity in thousands of years that anypony with science has been allowed to study this site!  And what we discover could possibly provide answers to these ponies that they've been missing out on for eons!"

	"Well... yes..."  Pilate fidgeted.  "I do suppose that does carry an air of excitement to it."

	"Rainbow, how do we know that the Durandanans truly desire to have these answers?"

	"Huh?"  Rainbow turned towards her, muzzle scrunched.  "Well... b-because it's the truth, Ding-Dong!  I can't be leaving these ponies in the dark!"

	"They seem to be doing quite well for themselves, Rainbow," Belle said with a gentle smile.  "Why, they even have a way of harnessing the light on their own."

	Rainbow squinted at her.  "Are... you suggesting that we just leave them the way they are?"  Rainbow gestured blindly with a hoof.  "That we just let them keep believing that they're the only ponies who've ever existed?  That Commander Hurricane is some Goddess Valkyrie Mare Thingy and that there're no Alicorn Princesses?"

	"It's worked for them for so long, hasn't it?"

	"Yeah, but it's not..."  Rainbow sighed.  "Belle, it's not true."

	"Isn't it more appropriate to say that it's simply what you don't believe?"

	"What?!"  Rainbow frowned.  "No!  No, it's not.  This is completely different!"

	"How so?"

	"B-because I know who raises and lowers the sun!" Rainbow's voice cracked.  "I know who the true source of Harmony is!  I've seen it with my own eyes!  I've lived it!"

	"Then how come you didn't stop to preach to the ponies in Darkstine?" Belle asked.  "Or Silvadel?  Or—heh—how come you've never once taken a swipe at me and Pilate for adhering to the Spark?"

	"Because... b-because...!"  Rainbow clammed up, fidgeting.

	Belle and Pilate gazed up at her.

	With a sigh, Rainbow's wings went slack.  She plopped down on the edge of the mess hall, balancing her chin on a forelimb.  "Hrmmmmfff... it's because I'm related to them.  Or at least I feel that way."

	"We're all related in some fashion or another, Rainbow," Pilate said.

	"Yeah, well, you don't have wings."  Rainbow blinked, then winced.  "Erm... no offense."

	"I think we understand, Rainbow," Belle said with a smile.  "You have every reason to believe that these Durandanans are direct descendants from proto-Equestrians.  I think it's very noble that you want to illuminate these pegasi to the best of your ability."

	"Yeah... but?"  Rainbow looked up with bored eyes.  "You're dying to tell me otherwise, aren't ya, Belle?"

	"Truthfully, Rainbow?"  The mare paused in stroking Kera's mane to shrug.  "I think we should keep in mind what's best for the Durandanans.  Evidently they express a legitimate curiosity in what you have to share with them."

	"And it's a good sign that they're willing to let another outsider help you in conducting a study on the area," Pilate added.

	"But... there are so many possible ramifications to what's being unveiled here," Belle said.  "For better or for worse, it could deconstruct the entire system that they've established after all these years.  Why... just the act of acclimating to even a sliver of modern Equestrian societal values could shock them to the core!"

	"I... that..."  Rainbow gulped.  "Nopony ever said that they'd have to change who they are!"

	Belle raised an eyebrow.  "Really?  You think Princess Celestia and Luna would be accepting of the Durandanan 'family' structure?"

	"Or more appropriately, the lack of one?" Pilate remarked.

	Rainbow squirmed on the edge of the table.  She squeaked forth, "M-maybe?  I mean... Celestia's used to this sort of diplomat stuff!  It's her bread and butter!  And... and it's not like the Equestrian idea of Harmony can be forced—"  She stopped dead in her speech, blinking.

	Pilate and Belle were silent.

	Rainbow sighed heavily, running a hoof through her mane.  "I guess I haven't put a lot of thought into this."  She gulped.  "Not like I should have."

	"Nopony can blame you for being enthusiastic, Rainbow Dash," Belle said.  She then smiled.  "Did you enjoy your day spent in Central D?"

	"Oh girl... lemme tell ya!"  Rainbow grinned, her wings fluttering and carrying her back into the air.  "First, we showed these leatherbacks who's the boss.  Vrmmm-nyeeeeuuuur!  Heh!  Felt just like cloud kicking back home!  Erm... with less kicking.  They wouldn't make nice milk that way."

	"Heehee... I imagine not..."

	"And then I raced Sivrem and Kitsune and the rest!"  Rainbow grinned, gesturing with her hoof.  "Fwoooooosh!  We soared on through this bigflank Ravine like it was nopony's business!  I mean... pffft... it ain't got nothin' on the Ghastly Gorge back in Equestria, but I totally schooled them!  Even made a sonic rainboom out of it!"

	"Sonic... rainboom...?"  Pilate remarked.

	"Hah!  Yeah!  Boy, you shoulda heard them gasp!  And then they applauded and cheered!  It was like being at a Wonderbolts Airshow!"  Rainbow grinned wide.  "And don't get me started on their campfire stories!"

	"Their stories or yours?" Belle remarked with a cool grin.

	"Pffft!  Mine, of course!  I told them about kicking Nevlamas' tail and I had every single one of them instantly floored!  Not a single lowered wing in the crowd... heh... if you catch my drift..."

	"Loud and clear, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "We're quite happy you hit it off so well."

	"Yeah—and... y'know... it got rough there for a second—but only a brief second, ya feel me?!"  Rainbow said, smiling.  "Fawful—the Gray Feather I'm communicating with—she's a lot cooler than I expected.  Hell, all of them are super cool!  Even the elders who sometimes lose their cool!"  She giggled, hugging herself in mid-air.  "And Sivrem's so badass and Kitsune's so confident and Rayvinne..."  She rolled her eyes, cheeks blushing.  "Don't get me started.  Ahem.  But... everypony's so chillaxed and they've got everything so together!  There's no bullying, no wars, no enslavement—it's just a perfect flock, y'know!"

	"Wow, Rainbow Dash," Belle uttered, smiling warmly.  "It's been a while since I've seen you this... this..."

	Pilate interjected, "Toasty?"

	"Hah!  Yeah, sure!"  Rainbow giggled again.  "Heeheehee!  Whew... boy would it suck to leave a place like this—"  Her muzzle froze in place, and her ears folded slightly.  She added with a squeak:  "So soon, I mean.  But... I-I've got things to talk out with Celestia, to get her prepared and all."  She cleared her throat.  "And... of c-course, there's the sanctum that deserves studying... and... uhmmm..."

	Silence.

	Pilate tilted his head towards Belle.  Belle glanced at him, then up at Rainbow.  "You say there's an exposed piece of the machine world down below?"

	Rainbow gulped and nodded.  "Yeah.  Just a patch.  It responds to an artifact of Commander Hurricane's—like... a piece of her mane hair attached to a helmet."

	"Just like the metal responds to you?" Pilate asked.

	"Right."

	"And..."  Belle squinted.  "...is there a door in there?"

	Rainbow shook her head.  "If there was, I would have noticed right away.  Heck... I'm sure the Durandanans would have opened it centuries ago with that helmet of theirs."

	"So... there's no way of getting close to the ruby flame?"

	"Er... I don't think so, Belle," Rainbow said in a low tone.  "Besides, I... uh..."

	"What?"

	Rainbow shrugged.  "I'm not sensing any nearby.  The last few times I've come close to the stuff, I could sense where it was at all times.  That's not the case here.  Beats me where the heck the next flame is—but I'm guessing between here and Val Roa."

	"Or beyond?" Pilate asked.

	"Yeah, I guess."

	More silence.

	"I... uh... I guess I should get some rest... heh..."  Rainbow scratched the back of her neck.  "I need to talk to Celestia in the morning.  Lonnnnng talk."

	"I can only imagine," Belle said.

	"Pilate, you on board or not?"  Rainbow asked.  "Sorry to put you on the spot, dude, but I need your talents here.  Can't do squat without 'em."

	"Heh..."  Pilate sat up straight.  "I am as willing as I am intrigued.  I'll do the best I can.  Besides..."  He smirked.  "I doubt these pegasi will feel threatened by a blind zebra with a metal plate wandering around their sacred hovels."

	"Now that's the spirit!"  Rainbow smirked, patting Pilate's shoulder as he flapped past the pair.  "I gotta hit the hay. Wish I could say goodnight to all the Jurists, but—not much time."

	"Right."

	"Say, where's Roarke?  Any of you seen her?"

	"Errrrr..."  Pilate pivoted his head towards Belle.

	"She was... with Kera all day," Belle said.  "But, otherwise, she's made her scarce."

	Rainbow nodded quietly.  Eventually, she said, "Well, the hammock calls.  Thanks for hearing me out, guys."  She smiled, waving as she hovered away.  "You're swell... as always!"

	"What are best friends for?"

	"Heh... I know, right?"  And Rainbow was gone.

	Slowly, Pilate and Belle leaned against each other.  A quiet breath was shared between them as they lingered beside Kera's slumbering form.

	"What... what do you think, beloved?" Pilate said quietly.

	"I was going to ask the same of you," Belle muttered.

	A collective sigh.  They nuzzled each other.

	"Just... give it time," Pilate said quietly.  "Whatever happens... it will be for the best."

	"Can we honestly believe so?"

	"Do we have a choice?  Should we?"

	Belle bit her lip.  Her eyes grew misty as she closed them.  Pilate rested his chin atop her head, holding her close as the seconds drifted by.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Thought of Leaving You		//------------------------------//

	A pair of violet eyes opened blearily.

	Eagle Eye stirred in his cot.  He sat up, groaning inwardly.  The first thing he instinctually did was levitate a brush across the cramped quarters to straighten out his mane.  However, halfway through the routine, he paused, staring dully at an empty space beside him on the cot.

	A sigh escaped his lips.

	He dropped the brush to the floor, swung out of bed, and trotted dizzily across the tiny compartment.



	Eagle trotted up to where the second floor ended at the vertical crawslpace towards the front of the Jury.  He placed one hoof on a ladder rung... and paused.  His ears twitched to the sound of murmurs and commotion.  He stared down the crawlspace.

	In the sunlight glaring through the observation room, he spotted the shadows of Zaid and Props.  The two ponies rambled on in casual conversation.  At one point, Props giggled, and Eagle could see the shadow of her mane flouncing while Zaid leaned against the bulkheads.  The stallion chuckled, and soon the conversation continued on for an unknown length of time.

	Eagle wrenched his gaze away and crawled up the ladder.



	Inside the cockpit, Floydien was grumbling to himself, using two cloven hooves to fix a loose panel just above the airship's instruments.  The elk suppressed several angry curse words.  At first—as Eagle came up from below—he was at a loss to figure out just why Floydien was holding his voice down.

	Then he heard two voices from the top deck beyond the cockpit:  one raspy and the other disembodied, majestic.  Eagle Eye craned his neck, peering onto the sun-lit exterior of the Noble Jury.  There, he saw Rainbow Dash sitting up on the edge of the ship's port side railing.  Her legs dangled, and she had the Sword of Solstice balanced across her thighs.

	"...too quickly, Rainbow Dash.  My sister and I would be more than happy to speak with them, but only on their terms.  It would not be wise to rush them."

	"And I-I'm totally not, Your Highness!  But—face it—getting to hear from you and Luna would be the simplest and easiest way to show them who's really running the place!"

	"It's true that Celestia and I maintain the Sun and Moon for this physical plane, but our rule only covers Equestria Proper.  Need I remind you that there are countless landscapes all throughout this world that exist beyond our sphere of influence?  Some of them even harmoniously."

	"Yeah, but—like—most of them not harmoniously.  Ya think?"

	"From what you've described, it seems as though the Durandanans have done magnificently on their own, even if their values are considerably different than Equestria's."

	"Are you s-saying that we should just leave them be?!  Celestia, they're all Equestrians by blood!  They're... th-they're like a long lost flock!"

	"Rainbow, I'll have you know that I feel responsible for all living beings that exist—incuding all the ones who don't even belong to Equestria."

	"And I-I'm totally not denying that!  It's just—"

	"I could have set out long... long ago to bring every remote civilization into my fold.  But while harmony is something that can be maintain, it mustn't be forced, for then it becomes a mechanism.  I fear that we have... mutually learned th-that the hard way with the Elements of Harmony..."

	"Mmmmm... yeah... y-yeah, I guess so..."

	"My long lost brothers and sisters sacrificed everything to do their best for this plane, and their blessing of harmony exists today as a natural essence, breathing life and vigor into this world.  As the last immortal alicorns, Luna and I are tasked with illuminating the world and staving off chaos so that the creatures still dwelling on this plane can bask in peace for as long as the world will allow them."

	"Which isn't for too much friggin' longer, if what Axan says is true."

	"I am not entirely convinced that Axan's views are completely accurate in that matter.  Just because the Divines are dying doesn't mean that the whole world is doomed as well.  Then again, all things do come to an end.  I simply haven't had the time nor the resources to investigate the matter thoroughly."

	"Right... chaos rift and all..."

	"But Luna's sarosian agents and Cadance's expedition are attempting to learn all that they can.  And yet, despite our efforts, you—Rainbow Dash—are still the finest and most learned pioneer that this kingdom has ever produced.  If there is any pony who can discover the truth, it's you.  For that, you have my pride, my confidence, and even a little bit of my envy."

	"Heh... you ain't so bad yourself, Your Highness."

	"But not all ponies are quite so bent on discovery.  I've no doubt that your presence there in Durandana has sparked a fire of curiosity in the locals.  I will gladly do what I can to satiate the wonder in their hearts, for I too am eager to make a connection with these long lost souls.  But I will do so only if it is approved by the powers that be.  Please, whatever you do, Rainbow Dash, do not thrust this knowledge upon them with any more spontaneous dramatics.  This is a very delicate situation, and I would greatly appreciate your tactfulness."

	"Hey, don't sweat it, Princess!  'Tact' is my middle name!... along with 'Danger' and 'Professionalism' and... and... erm... something else.  Begins with a 'J,' I think..."

	By this point, Eagle Eye had shuffled back down the crawlspace without saying a word to either Rainbow Dash or Floydien.



	Belle and Josho were seated in the lounge of the mess hall while Eagle Eye trotted by.

	"So, the plan is that Rainbow Dash will carry Pilate off to Central D, and there they'll investigate the inner sanctum with its Gold Lights—using the O.A.S.I.S. in conjunction with my beloved's mimetic mind, of course."

	"Wow.  Heh.  It's a dayum good thing you got all that fixed in time."

	"I know, right?  It was difficult working past the alterations Roarke made to help Pilate harness the Oracular Array."

	"Actually, I was talkin' about the zebra's brains."

	"Heeheehee... yes, well... I know certain languages that even Pilate didn't know he could speak."

	"If I was a lot younger, I would have asked for more sordid details."

	"And if I was younger, I probably would have told you."

	"Fair enough.  Say, where's the rust bucket off to this morning?"

	"Hmmm?  You mean Roarke?  Is she gone again?"

	"She took the Whizzer thingy and flew off.  I figured that was why Rainbow was having to carry your husband horse."

	"Beats me where Roarke has gone off to.  I think she just doesn't want to be on board the Jury today."

	"Heh, yeah.  What—with all these winged cuccos flying all around us."

	"No, I... I think she's trying to avoid something else."

	"Oh?"

	"But still, she took really good care of Kera yesterday."

	"Is that so?"

	"Mmmhmmm.  Kera had a grand old time.  Apparently it wore her out, because she's still sleeping in."

	"This late?"

	"Heehee.  Yes, the silly filly."

	"I'm surprised Roarke didn't bring her back in pieces."

	"I don't think that's giving Roarke enough credit, Josho.  Roarke is... well..."

	"She's trying, I get it."

	"And yet, I think she's succeeding.  You know?  There are times when Pilate and I fear that we just don't know how to reach Kera at times—"

	"You saps don't give yourselves enough friggin' credit."

	"No, perhaps not.  And yet... I think Roarke found something in Kera that needed attention.  I have somewhat of an idea as to what it is... but I'm too busy feeling dumbstruck that Roarke made her mark that easily."

	"Well, it's a shocker to me.  I always thought the Searonese used fillies for target practice."

	"Oh please, Josho.  I think it's about high time we stopped harping on Roarke for being who she is."

	"And why's that?"

	"Isn't it obvious? She's still on board the Jury."

	"So?"

	"...I don't think she is who she was anymore..."

	Eagle Eye paused, glanced back at the two, then continued his way across the mess hall.  Before the kitchen entrance, he hesitated slightly, then trotted right in.



	Ebon was leaning over the sink, washing lettuce in a large bowl.

	Eagle Eye stood at a distance.  He fidgeted, opting to turn around and leave once or twice.  Eventually, his body slumped, and—sighing—he took a bold step forward.  "Uhm..."

	"Good morning," Ebon Mane murmured.

	Eagle blinked, freezing in place.  "Good morning," he blurted back in a dull tone.  His eyes squinted.  "How long have you been—?"

	"I'm always up early to serve breakfast," Ebon droned.  "Lots of us have a bunch of things we need to do today.  And there's no telling now when or if we might get winged guests.  It's best to be prepared."

	"Erm... right..."

	"Plus, your old buddy, Josho."  Ebon's nostrils flared as he turned the lettuce leaves over under the spicket.  "There's no telling how much he'll wanna scarf down.  Some days I wanna rent him out as a second garbage disposal."

	"He sure... uh... does like to eat a lot."

	"It'll be about twenty minutes," Ebon murmured.  "If you wanna grab a bowl for yourself, be my guest."

	"Ebon..."

	"You'll have to slice the carrots up yourself, though.  I haven't gotten to those yet—"

	"Ebon, stop it!"  Eagle gritted his teeth.  "Can we please talk about last night?"

	Ebon said nothing.  His hooves lingered under the trickling water as he stared deep into the bowl of leaves.

	"I couldn't get a wink of sleep.  I couldn't do anything but think about... about what happened!  Or better yet—what didn't happen!"  Eagle sniffed, his eyes instantly turning moist.  "Please, Ebon.  Talk to me.  Please help me know what I did wrong!"

	"You didn't do anything wrong," Ebon said in a low tone.  He didn't look at Eagle as he spoke.  "You didn't do anything because there wasn't anything to be done."

	"Ebon...?"

	"Things can't end if they don't begin," Ebon said, switching the water off with the slap of his hoof.  "We can live fine with the way things are."

	Eagle slowly shook his head.  "No, we c-can't," his voice cracked.  A tear formed on his cheek.  "I can't."

	Ebon's hooves gripped tight to the counter.

	"Ebon, nothing can undo what I said... what I meant... or how I feel!"  He sniffled and trotted forward.  "And if you don't feel the same, then maybe you should just tell—"

	"Don't come near me!" Ebon suddenly hissed.

	Eagle flinched as if struck by a bullet.  He leaned back with quivering lips.  At last, his face bowed towards the floor.  "This is all my f-fault.  I... I-I rushed things."  Another sniffle.  "I'm such a sappy romantic at heart.  I should have known better than to push you towards something you weren't prepared for!"

	"Eagle..."

	"But... I can't help it."  Eagle looked up, frowning.  "I love you, Ebon.  I love you so much."  He inhaled sharply and held a hoof over his chest.  "You bring me to a place where I thought I would never be!  I no longer care about where I'm going or where I've been... so long as you're there with me!  I... I feel horrible because this is something I-I can't change—"

	"Yes you can," Ebon said with a slight growling tone.  "Stop pretending like you're powerless—"

	"But I'm not!"  Eagle stepped forward with a heavy hoof.  "Don't you get it?  For once in my life, I chose something!  Even in spite of all the risks!  And if you knew what I knew, Ebon, maybe then you would understand why I want to love you and protect you so much—"

	"You know nothing!" Ebon snarled, teeth showing.  "All you have is what you feel, and it's going to rob you blind!"

	"Please, Ebon, will you just let me tell you—"

	"No!"  Ebon barked, finally turning to face Eagle, and it was with a frown.  "We are friends, do you understand?"

	Eagle slowly shook his tearstained face.  "No.  I d-don't."

	"We are just friends," Ebon said, eyes thin.  "And friends know how to do what's best with one another... even if it means leaving each other alone."

	"But... b-but Ebon..."

	"I've said all that needs to be said," Ebon uttered.  He sucked in his breath, regaining his dull expression.  "Now."  He slapped the bowl of lettuce onto the counter and marched through the opposite doorway.  "If you don't mind, I need to go tell the others that breakfast is served."

	Eagle stood alone.  As Ebon's hoofsteps grew distant, the stallion fell back on his haunches.  He leaned against the counter, his face melting as he broke into quiet, quiet sobs.



	In the stairwell, Ebon came to a stop as soon as he was alone.  His rigid expression shattered instantly, replaced by a pale and panting face.  He grimaced... then grimaced harder.  Slumping back against a wall, he slid down before the steps and curled up into a little bergundy ball.  His eyes darted about, then closed completely to dam in the tears.

	With little squeaks, he cried to the walls for the space of several minutes, until he was once again able to summon the strength to get up and finish his duties.

		//------------------------------//
		// Next Time On the View		//------------------------------//

	With a grunt, two First-Borns pried open the wooden latch to the dark space beneath Central D's foundation.

	"Thanks," Rainbow Dash said, standing in the morning light besides Pilate.  "We'll try our best not to get into anypony's way."

	"I doubt that will be an issue," Fawful said.  "The elders have collectively agreed to grant you access once again."

	Rainbow winced slightly.  "Sounds like it wasn't an easy decision."

	"It wasn't.  But don't dwell on it," Fawful said.  "We're all seeking the truth, are we not?"

	"Yeah... yeah, totally," Rainbow Dash said with a nervous smile.  A gulp, and she glanced behind her tail.

	Unlike the day before, a fairly thick crowd of Durandanans had gathered.  They murmured with each other, gazing at the two outsiders from afar.  Sivrem and Jerrio flew down, gently urging the group to stand back.

	"How... uh..."  Rainbow murmured aside.  "How many ponies know about what went down yesterday?"

	"You can't keep a secret for too long in the crater," Fawful said.  "Word travels with the wind in a place such as Durandana."

	"Yeah, I get it," Rainbow said with a nod.  "But... that's a lot of ponies? What's to blame, pillow talk?"

	"Too many pegasi and not enough beds," Pilate murmured.

	"Stripesy!" Rainbow hissed.

	"What was that?" Fawful asked.

	"Er... nothing!"  Rainbow chuckled nervously before giving the stallion a swat with his tail.  "Hah hah!  Silly zebra!"

	Fawful stared, squinted, and ultimately smirked.  "How about you go first...?"

	"My friggin' pleasure."  Rainbow turned to Pilate.  "Careful, buddy.  It's dark down there."

	"... ... ..."

	Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "Dammit.  Whatever.  Look, the stairs are steep.  Lemme just carry you."

	"Don't you get tired of doing that?"

	"You kidding?"  She smirked and grasped Pilate from behind.  "Your brohawk scratches the itch on my chin."

	He held his breath as he dangled in her grasp.  "Well, s-so long as we're both comfortable..."

	Rainbow and Pilate drifted down, followed by Fawful and a few other elders.

	"Alright, everypony..."  Sivrem smirked as he nudged the crowd back some.  "Don't be a bunch of loitering gulls, now.  Gust!  Gust!"

	As the crowd dissipated, one pony stood alone.  Jerrio stared dully at the wooden latch as the guards slowly shut it.  After a few seconds, he sighed and looked off with folded ears.



	"Say, you need any help down in the robo-womb, blondie?" Zaid asked across the mess hall.

	"Mmmmff...?"  Props gulped down some celery and shook her head.  "I don't have any metal parts!  I promise!"

	"No, I meant the engine room."

	"Oh!  Ohhhhhhhh... hee hee hee..."  She smiled with rosy cheeks.  "Sure thing!  If you've got nothing better to do!"

	"Well, it's been a good long week since Josho last backed up the lavatory, so—"

	"Grab a wrench and come on down!"

	"Heh!  Will do!"

	Bellesmith sat on a couch in the lounge, sipping from tea.  She glanced up as Zaid and Props trotted by.  A slight smirk crossed her muzzle.

	"Everytime I see them lately, they act as though they are breeding."

	"Gaaaie!"  Belle nearly fell out of her seat.  She spun around, breathless.

	Roarke gazed down, her eye-lenses rotating to a stop.

	Belle panted, panted, and exhaled, "Oh Roarke.  You gave me quite a scare!"  She fanned herself.  "I didn't even realize you were there."

	"I was attempting the casual conversation," Roarke droned.

	Belle stared at Roarke.

	Roarke stared at Belle.

	With a gulp, Belle smiled awkwardly.  "Small talk!  But of course!"

	Roarke's nostrils flared.  "Which of the two do you think will attempt to initiate coitus first—?"

	"Roarke, just—"  Belle raised a hoof, clenched her eyes shut, and sighed.  "...if you want to engage in small talk, you might want to ch-choose a slightly less icky topic."

	Roarke was silent.  Eventually, she nodded.  "I understand."  A fidgeting.  "I suppose I have more weapons to test."  She made for the kitchen door at the far end of the room.

	"No.  Roarke, wait!"  Belle held a hoof up.  She smiled gently.  "Roarke, please forgive me.  I can tell that you're trying very hard.  But... just don't stress it!  We're friends, aren't we?"

	Roarke stood sideways several feet away.  "I suppose..."

	Belle giggled.  "Well, you certainly have saved our skins on several occasions."

	"And have jeopardized it."

	"Yeah, well..."  Belle took another sip, placed the cup down on the table before her, and chuckled.  "Nopony's perfect."  She gestured.  "Have a seat!  You can sit, can't you?"

	Roarke stood, squirmed, and stood some more.  With a slight trilling sound, she eventually swiveled about and marched across the room.  She squatted down on a couch across from Belle.  Her metal braces and thick horseshoes made the entire gesture more than residually uncomfortable.  The hard lines in her face showed it.

	Belle chose to ignore them.  "So... uhm... this is relaxing."

	"I suppose it is."

	"Yes..."

	"... ... ..."

	Silence.

	Belle cleared her throat.  With a tranquil smile, she fluffed her own mane while straing at Roarke's.  "You know, I've never had the opportunity to say it before, but I've always secretly loved what you do with your hair."

	"What do you mean?" Roarke asked in a neutral tone.

	Belle blinked.  "Well..."  She shifted where she sat.  "I mean... the braids!  And the little metal ringlets at the end!"  She suppressed a giggle.  "It's really quite beautiful, in its own, intricate, exotic way."

	"Each twisted strand represents a different enemy of Searo whom I've slain in the name of the Goddess," Roarke said.  "I used to dip my mane in their blood upon ritualistically dragging the ringlet down the length of the braid."

	Belle stared, slack-jawed.  Eventually she murmured, "So... uhhhh... th-then it's not your natural color or...?"

	"This was a bad idea."  Roarke stood up and marched towards the hallway.  "I should be elsewhere."

	"Roarke, wait!"  Belle reached a hoof out.  She sighed, smiling tiredly.  "Fine.  Small talk is out.  No biggie.  Can we just have a heart to heart, then?"

	"Hrmmmf..."  Roarke clenched her jaw, not looking at the mare.  "You can certainly try."

	Belle rested her hooves together daintily as she said, "What you did with Kera yesterday... thank you."

	Roarke's lenses retracted.  She slid about and stared at Belle with a furrowed brow.  "I don't believe I've told you anything about what Kera and I did yesterday."

	"I know.  And, Roarke, I trust you... okay?"  Belle smiled.  "Pilate and I... we trust you.  Otherwise we wouldn't have let you take Kera out to begin with."

	Roarke's head tilted down.

	Belle continued.  "And... whatever it was that you did together, it made Kera so... so wonderfully happy."  She smiled.  "Almost as if a weight is off her shoulders.  I haven't seen her that giddy and cheerful in a long while.  I m-mean... I know she's still recovering from Lerris.  We all are.  But somehow you were able to help her... loosen up a lot more.  That means so much to us."

	"She is a strong filly."

	"Which is what makes it so very hard for Pilate and I to find a way to level with her," Belle said.  "She can be very unpredictable.  We don't want to ignore her feelings—and yet, at the same time, we don't wish to coddle her."

	Roarke looked at Belle sideways.

	"Yes.  Heehee... I know."  Belle rolled her eyes.  "I certainly can't help myself at times.  But it's just that I wish the best for Kera, and I feel helpless when I can't always provide that."

	Roarke's hooves grinded against the floor.  She trudged back and plopped down on the seat across from Belle.  Silence... until:  "...Kera is a powerful mare."

	"Hmmm?"  Belle raised her eyebrow.

	"She has magical powers unlike any other unicorn her age," Roarke droned.  "I've battled many unicorns in my day.  I've killed criminals and warriors who couldn't even compare to her."

	"Well... h-here's hoping that you don't have to battle Kera, ever."

	"That is not what I meant."  Roarke glanced up.  "Where I come from, untapped power is an insult to the laws of nature.  Kera is capable of so much, and I fear that she's allowed the pain of Lerris to hold her back."

	"No offense, Roarke... but..."  Belle squirmed slightly.  "I-I don't think Pilate and I want Kera becoming a bounty hunter when she grows up."

	"That is not what I meant either," Roarke said.  Eventually she sighed.  "It is hard to explain.  When I first joined the Noble Jury, and there was this child on board the craft, I wanted absolutely nothing to do with her.  But now... as the months have gone by... I find that my mind... dwells on her often."

	"And is it just Kera?" Belle said with a coy smirk.

	"... ... ..."

	"Ahem."  Belle played with her hooves as she spoke on, "Roarke, I think it's only natural to wish the best for a little filly like her.  Spark knows it consumes my mind all the time."

	"I don't see the point," Roarke said.  "There's no profit in it.  I've never had much care for distractions."

	"Have you ever thought, Roarke, that with Searo behind you, maybe your priorities have shifted?"

	"I don't see what you mean."

	"Not to insult your culture or anything, but it seems to me that you've carried a lot of unnecessary weight for a long time," Belle said.  "You say you've never cared much for 'distractions,' but what is distractions is all you've known?"

	"Impossible."

	"Is it?"  Belle cocked her head aside.  "Is it really so impossible to think that beneath all of the armor, all of the cybernetic implants, all of the warpaint and scars of misery, there's a soul that knows what it means to be a pony that loves life?"  Belle smiled.  "And a mare that longs to be a mother?"

	Roarke's lips opened.  She winced slightly.  After a half-minute, she eventually murmured, "I will never... ever have that."

	Belle's ears folded upon hearing that.  With a sweet smile, she leaned forward.  "Roarke..."

	Roarke looked up.

	Belle whispered, "I used to think that about myself too."

	Roarke's nostrils flared.  "We are hardly alike."

	"Hmmm-hehe..."  Belle tossed her mane and leaned back.  "Then let's fix that, shall we?"

	"How?"

	"We're here.  Sitting.  Talking?"  Belle shrugged.  "Tell me about yourself."

	Roarke's lenses pistoned outward.  She frowned.  "Myself."

	Belle nodded.  "Yes."

	Roarke clenched her jaw tighter.  "You do not wish to hear about myself."

	"Sure I do!"

	"Hmrnnngh..."  Roarke tilted her head aside.  "Breakfast..."

	"Huh?"

	"Did you eat anything this morning?"

	"Uhhh..."  Belle slowly shook her head.  "I... haven't gotten around to it, actually, no."

	"Hrmmmf... Very well then."  Roarke cracked the joints in her neck and leaned forward.  "I was foaled in the frozen mountains southwest of what you would call Franzington.  There was a terrible blizzard, and my mother was miles away from her ship and a heating source.  According to Terra, she had to slay a llama and carve out its still-bleeding abdomen to form an insulated sleeping niche.  We had little provisions, so we shared the meat of the placenta between us and..."



	"See anything, yet?" Rainbow Dash asked.

	Pilate sighed in the midst of scanning a wall full of carved symbols.  "It is ever an endless cycle, isn't it?"

	"Fine."  Rainbow rolled her eyes and trotted down the leaning temple hallway.  "Have you sensed anything yet?"

	"You were right about what you said," Pilate remarked while O.A.S.I.S. flashed its laser-light across the chamber.  "We've run across several of these symbols before.  Many of them hail back to the structure we camped at inside Foxtaur."

	Rainbow did a double-take.  "You remember that far back?"

	"Rainbow, I remember the first word I ever said."

	"'Boogers?'"

	"Actually, 'Ultimo.'"

	"I was close."

	"Hmmph..."  Pilate tilted his runic plate, chewing his lip in thought.  "Interesting..."

	"What?"

	"Do you notice anything different about the walls of this place compared to Stratopolis?"

	"Jee, mystical zebra, I thought that's what I brought you down here to figure out."

	"Humor me, if you will."

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow squinted at the etchings along the lantern-lit corridors of the place.  "Yeah, to be honest?  The carvings appear a lot sharper."

	"You mean the indentations are deeper?"

	"Right!  What's that supposed to mean?"

	"I didn't have a chance to use O.A.S.I.S. on the walls of Stratopolis."  Pilate turned his head towards Rainbow.  "But I'm willing to bet that their etchings all appeared collectively worn down."

	"And yet the ones here aren't?"  Rainbow rubbed her head.  "What's the reason for that, you think?  Cuz Stratopolis was exposed to storm and rain and stuff for so long?"

	"Did the weather reach into every interior of the buildings?"

	"Erm... well... n-no..."

	Pilate cocked his head aside.  "But something else did pollute the halls of that floating city.  Something horrendously corrosive and dangerous."

	Rainbow blinked.  Her eyes widened.  "The zombie slime!"

	Pilate nodded.  "And we both well know that we and the Lounge weren't the first ones to battle that horrendous substance inside Stratopolis."

	"Right, Commander Hurricane and her forces did.  Wait."  Rainbow turned and glanced down the hallway.  "...are you suggesting that this structure got separated from the rest of Stratopolis before Hurricane accidentally accessed the 'dark heart of Stratopolis?'"

	"It could be possible," Pilate thought out loud.  He began trotting down the hallway.  "It stands to reason that Hurricane wouldn't have felt the urgency of guarding that flying city until she discovered the ooze.  Maybe she and her troops had found a way to commandeer one of the buildings—"

	"—and sent it out like a scout ship?"

	"Precisely," Pilate said, nodding.  "Seems as though your ancient relative had invented a 'Whizzball' long before we did."

	"Stop calling her my 'ancient relative.'"

	"Why not?  It's pretty much a given at this point, isn't it?"

	"Yeah, I know... but..."  Rainbow winced, glancing behind her a distant cluster of elders.  "I just don't think it's a very smart thing to do right now."

	"You shouldn't be afraid of exposing reality, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "None of us should."

	"Belle seems to think otherwise."

	"Well, my beloved and I don't necessarily agreen on everythi—"  Pilate tripped.

	"Whoah!"  Rainbow caught him.  "Careful, buddy!  Didja forget you were in Stallion Wonder mode?"

	"Cute," Stallion wheezed.  "What did I just trip on?"

	"I dunno.  A rock, or something?"

	"Is that what I hear rattling?"

	"Huh?"  Rainbow glanced down the corridor.

	A tiny granite pebble slid down the floor.

	"It seems to be going awfully far," Pilate murmured.

	"Yeah, well, the floor's at a pretty steep lean."

	The pebble took a sudden right turn around the corner on its own.

	Rainbow blinked.  "Whoah."

	"Huh?"  Pilate craned his neck.  "What is it?"

	"Hold on."  Rainbow searched the floor.  She found another pebble, then kicked it.  Following it along with her eyes, she watched as it rolled down to an intersection of corridors, then suddenly and sharply bend to the right.  "Uhmmm... Pilate?"

	"Yes?"

	"How's your geology skills?"

	"Not too shabby.  Why?"

	She led the zebra forward.  "I think it's time we test your metal..."



	Sputtering.  Wretching.  Spitting.

	Roarke sighed, her lenses staring up at the ceiling of the Noble Jury's lavatory.  After a few seconds, she tilted her head down.  "Do you still require me to hold your hair?"

	"Just... snkkkt..."  Belle hissed, squatting before a wide porcelain bowl.  She spat a few more times and caught her breath.  "... a little wh-while longer..."

	"I told you this was a bad idea."

	"I'm f-fine... just... just..."  Belle winced, wiping her moist chin.  "Guhhh... How c-could any poor soul stand to survive that long in the desert... and disembowled?!"

	"If it helps to know, I had experienced far worse pain beforehand."

	"You were a t-teenager, Roarke!"

	"It's not as terrible as it sounds," Roarke said.  "In fact, I was able to use the raw teeth of a sand wyrm to staple my intestines back into place—"

	"Hraaaa-gghhullklttttt!"

	Roarke winced.  "P-perhaps it's best that I not... erm.. dw-dwell on the stories of my wilderness survival..."

	"Grghhhhl... pfttt... buhhh... th-that would be nice..."  Belle gulped.  "At least for a while."  She sat up, her eyes rolling back.  "Unngh...Praise Spark Zaid was telling the truth about Josho earlier..."

	"I beg your pardon?"

	"H-how about a happy story, Roarke?"  Belle brushed her bangs back and glanced sickly over her shoulder.  She bore a weary smile.  "How about—urp—the t-time you first met Imre?"

	Roarke's brow furrowed.  "You think that's a happy story?"

	"I don't know."  Belle gulped down bile and murmured, "Is it?"

	Roarke took a deep breath.  "I... don't really know.  I haven't shared it with many ponies."

	"Well, you can sh-share it with me!"  Belle said gently.  "I'm your friend."

	"My... friend."

	Belle simply stared at her.

	Roarke's ears twitched.  "Well... I suppose it is worth a shot."

	"Everything is worth a shot, Roarke."

	"Hmmm—I just remembered.  The sand wyrm's epidermal layer kept me warm overnight—"

	"Guhhhhhh—"

	"Imre!" Roarke blurted.  "Imre it is!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Just a Stone's Throw Away		//------------------------------//

	With a swift hoof, Rainbow Dash kicked a cluster of granite pebbles up the inclined corridor leading to the inner sanctum.  Almost immediately, they darted back in an eerie line and stopped dead against the metal floor.

	"Are they doing it each time?" Pilate asked.

	"Well, yeah, but... y'know..."  Rainbow shrugged.  "Gravity."

	"Carry them further into the temple strudture," Pilate suggested from where he stood.  "Beyond the adjacent hallway's corner, perhaps."

	"Yeah, I feel you."  Rainbow scooped up half-a-dozen tiny pieces of granite debris.  Holding her breath, she flew up, turned a corner, and stopped dead-center in a corridor full with etchings.  Kneeling in the lanternlight, she squatted down and "released" every pebble.  Without hesitation, they rolled forward down the hall, then zipped around the corner.  Rainbow followed them, gliding.  "Pilate, they're headed your way!" she shouted down towards him.

	He switched on O.A.S.I.S. just in time to scan them upon approach.  When they reached the layer of metal floor, they stopped dead, not rolling any further.  "Hmmm... interesting."  The zebra tilted his head up.  "Did they move around the corner like predicted?"

	"Yup.  It's gotta be more than just a matter of rolling down an incline."

	"I'm intrigued that they stop dead right against the metal here," Pilate said, pointing.  "It seems like they would naturally roll further along the even surface.  Instead, it's almost as if they're sticking magnetically to the metal as soon as they come into contact."

	"Stone being magnetically attracted to metal?"  Rainbow's face twisted.  "When did that ever make sense?"

	"It is the righteous glory of the Valkyrie Silver," said Fawful's voice.

	Rainbow turned to see the mare casually strolling down the granite corridor.

	"What you're witnessing isn't exactly new," Fawful said with a calm smile.  "Even Duranda's scrolls speak of the power that the inner sanctum has over the stone."  She pointed inwards towards the helmet and the glowing Gold Lights.  "The majesty of the Valkyrie's aura commands respect from both ponies and nature alike."

	"Does the 'Valkyrie Silver' attract anything else?" Pilate asked.  "These pebbles appear to have once been part of the granite structure's walls."

	"Indeed, the hallowed hallways before the inner sanctum aren't as immaculate as the place where the Gold Lights are made manifest," Fawful said.  "We've known that for eons."

	"Hmmm..."  Pilate scratched his chin.  "From what I'm discovering, though, it seems as if the machine world here has a particularly strong attraction to the material that makes up a Sentinel."

	"You mean Stratopolis?" Rainbow said to him.

	"Rainbow..."  Pilate tilted his head towards her.  "I would like to conduct another experiment, but this needs to be done outside."

	"You mean on the surface?"

	"Indeed."  Pilate pivoted towards Fawful.  "Assuming, of course, that the Gray Feathers will graciously allow us to take some of these granite rocks outside..."

	Fawful curtsied.  "I will talk to the elders concerning the matter..."




	Eagle Eye sat 	quietly at the ship's stern, his violet eyes glazed over with a dull sheen.  Slowly, he exhaled out his nostrils and stared at the emerald tree canopy of Durandana.  Every once in a while, athletic pegasi would fly up through the foliage, slicing the sky with their colorful wings.  The ex-mercenary was hardly enthused.

	He heard a slight commotion from behind him.  He turned to look, spotting Zaid in conversation with three winged mares.  The stallion said a few words, and the mares all exchanged glances, giggling mischievously before nodding in one accord.  Zaid smirked and bowed, then reached a hoof up towards one of them.

	Eagle squinted—

	"You know, the wind here really carries your perfume a long way."

	"Gah!" Eagle nearly fell off the ship.

	Josho steadied the petite stallion with his magic.  "Relax, kid.  Didn't meant to knock any of the fruit out of the basket."

	Eagle exhaled, glaring past Josho.  "For the thousandth time, I don't do perfume."

	"Then just what's your secret, huh?"  Josho smirked tiredly.  "You could tell me."

	"Mmmmm..."  Eagle bit his lip, squirming slightly.  "Sometimes... B-Belle's kind enough to let me borrow her conditioner."

	"For real?"  Josho grunted as he squatted his fat self down beside Eagle.  "But that mare's been sporting the Sinead O'Canter look for a while.  I figured it'd be the other way around."

	"Meh..." Eagle sighed into the warm winds of the basin.

	"Aaaaaaaand now you're back to being a mare.  Well that's find and dandy."  Josho was silent for a while.  His nostrils flared.  "But, for real, kid.  Just what's been sucking the color out of you lately?"

	"Don't bother, old stallion," Eagle said, sniffling.  "It's nothing for you to be concerned with."

	"What, you think all I do each day is sit around, eat, and fart?"

	"It has occurred to me..."

	"I wouldn't be on this friggin' pleasure cruise if it wasn't for a certain little girl in Franzington clothing."

	"You know..." Eagle gritted his teeth.  "I'm starting to get really sick and tired of you calling me a—"

	"Level with me and I'll knock it off."  Josho's gaze was firm.

	Eagle looked at him.  He sighed and stared back out into the jungled basin.  "You ever feel like you have everything figured out, and then life decides to blow up in your face and remind you how truly out of control everything is?"

	"Sounds like the first three times I almost got married."

	"How does somepony your age keep sane?"

	"Sanity's overrated," Josho grumbled.  "If I ended up keeping a 'level head' back in Ledomare, then I would have remained a guilty murderer and criminal forever, just like all the other 'sane ponies' that served the Queen."

	"It wasn't that bad..."

	"Are you kidding me, kid?"  Josho squinted.  "Turning my back on Shell and the Council of Ledo is the best thing I ever could have done.  It so happens it was also the most insane thing I could have done."

	Eagle rolled his eyes.  "You've told me all this before..."

	"Then give me something new to work with, ya filly stain!"  Josho nudged him.  "What's life done to you that's so terrible?  I mean, besides giving you a father that doesn't love you, ditching you as a fugitive in Foxtaur, chasing you towards the ends of the earth with changelings and zombie pegasi and mutant talking fox-furries and—"

	"Stop it!  Just... put a cork in it!"  Eagle's voice cracked.  "Spark, you suck at this!"

	Silence... until Josho murmured, "It's because your mommy clock has gone off, isn't it?"

	"It's Ebon, okay?!" Eagle screeched into Josho's ear, frowning.  "I'm upset over Ebon!  I've laid my heart down for him to see every squishy satin fold, and he buries me in the dust!"  Eagle panted and panted and panted.

	Josho reached over, patting Eagle's shoulder.  "Now... that wasn't so bad, was it—?"

	"And it's not that I'm mad at him, I'm m-mad at myself!" Eagle whimpered, burying his face in two hooves.  "Grnnngh... I-I thought that I could protect him, that I could reach out and give him a place to feel safe, secure, and loved.  But Ebon's wounds run too deep!  And it's n-not about him being shell-shocked or having daddy issues or swimming in pools of remorse over the war—he's got something so secret bottled up inside him that it's gonna keep him alone and isolated forever!  I thought I could help him, and that what we'd share together would be precious and special but I was wrong!  Stupid and wrong!  So... so friggin' stupid!"  Eagle finished his rambling woes with a sniffling sound.  He wiped his eyes dry and hugged himself as he stared out into the forests.

	Josho took a deep breath.  "It can't be easy to puch that much stock in love."

	"Pffft.  Jee... thanks for rubbing it in," Eagle muttered.

	"Hey, I wasn't dissing you," Josho said.  "If anything, I envy you."

	Eagle sniffed again and glared at the stallion.  "Bite your tongue..."

	"No, I mean it."  Josho gazed at him softly.  "You've never been a pony to do things the easy way.  When your family got pissed at you, you went to war anyhow.  When the Ledomaritan Confederacy reared its nasty head, you deserted.  When Rainbow Dash stumbled in on you and your war buddies in Foxtaur, you immediately took her side."

	As Eagle heard all of this, his expression softened beneath folded ears.

	Josho smirked.  "When you and I got joined at the hooves, you didn't kill me."

	"I wanted to," Eagle muttered.

	"Well, you could have tried harder."

	"Whatever..."

	"Not whatever," Josho said.  "In everything you've ever stumbled upon, you've always tried the friggin' hardest path to trot.  It's as if you've been doing nothing but trotting uphill all your life."

	"Yeah, well, maybe I'm a glutton for punishment."

	"Or perhaps you just believe in doing that which is good," Josho said.  "Because you're a good pony, kid."

	Eagle bit his lip.

	Josho exhaled heavily, glaring out onto the tree tops.  "And... all things considered... you would... nnngh... be the best possible catch for Ebon."

	Eagle did a double-take.  "Huh...?"

	"And we both know that ain't easy."

	"You believe that?" Eagle remarked.

	"Sure, why not?"

	"You."  Eagle squinted hard.  "You of all ponies believe that."

	"Look, I just said it, didn't I?!"  Josho growled.  "Do you need me to draw you a diagram in my own feces or something?!"

	Eagle Eye shook and shook and shook his head.

	"Hrmmmm..."  Josho scratched his chins as he said, "I've always believed that ponies deserved that which they work hard for.  I just never practiced what I preached because I always had ponies around me—like Secchy—who could do it way better than I could.  At some point, I just got tired of trying all the time.  What's the point in aiming towards life's goals if somepony somewhere is just gonna show you who's the real boss?  It's shameful, not to mention stupid and pointless."

	Josho glanced down at the metal surface of the Jury's stern.

	"But then... y'know... I met you, kid.  And suddenly it was okay to believe in something again.  And to be proud."  He gulped and looked at the smaller unicorn.  "You make me very... very proud, Eagle Eye.  And it sucks the Queen's tits to think that anything in life can still manage to make you sad."

	Eagle Eye gulped.  Though his cheeks burned slightly, he sadly murmured, "Yeah, well... your pity added to mine isn't gonna do much."

	"It ain't pity," Josho muttered.  "Unless... all you've got stored up for Ebon is pity too."

	Eagle grimaced at that.

	"Well, is it?"

	Eagle sniffled, rubbing a tear off his cheek.  "N-no..."

	"Then I guess there's only one outcome to this," Josho murmured, staring out onto the trees again.  "Somepony's gonna keep fighting."

	Eagle Eye shook his head, fighting back a sob.  "There's nothing to fight for.  It's a lost cause."

	"Heh..."  Josho shrugged.  "If you say so."  With a grunt, he stood up and shuffled towards the far end of the airship.  "But I used to believe in lost causes before..."  A glaring eye.  "Until I met you."

	Eagle gazed up at him.

	"But... seriously, though..."  Josho gave the stallion's shoulder one last slap.  "Just buy your own friggin' conditioner, ya feel me?"  And he trotted off.

	Eagle Eye looked after him, then gazed forward.  Sighing, he hugged himself tighter, his face melancholic... yet contemplative.




	"Here goes nothing!" Rainbow Dash soared straight up, scaling the heights of Central D.  Her wings flapped harder than usual, for she was carrying a heavy burlap bag in her forelimbs.  Looking straight down in mid-ascent, she could spot the tiny specks of Pilate, Fawful, and other ponies down below.

	At last, once she was level with the summit to the tower, she angled her wings and strafed westward a bit.

	"Okay!" she shouted down for posterity's sake.  "I'm a little to the left of the entrance!  Ready?!  Here goes!"

	Then, holding her breath, she turned the bag over and emptied its contents.  No less than two dozen granite pebbles spilled out.  Before they could even be caught in the winds of Durandana, they took a sharp right and flew diagonally downward through the air like a serpent.

	"Whoah!"  Rainbow exclaimed.  With a devilish smirk, she dove down and flew after the rocks.

	As fast as Rainbow flew, the rocks somehow descended faster.  What's more, they accelerated, causing the air around them to whistle.

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow cupped two hooves around her muzzle.  "Look out below!"

	Several of the ponies flinched.  The First-Borns "guarding" the wooden latch to the inner sanctum actually jumped out of the way.  Cl-cl-cl-clackk!  Every stone embedded itself into the wooden beams acting as the floor to the basin at the tower's summit.

	"Great Sp-Spark!" Pilate stammered as Fawful helped him regain balance.

	Fwoosh!  Rainbow nimbly touched down.  "Did you see that?!"

	"Rainbow—"

	"You know what I mean.  Whip out O.A.S.I.S. already, ya melon fudge."

	Holding his breath, Pilate floated his manasphere out and scanned where the stones had landed.

	"You saw that, though, right, Fawful?"  Rainbow gestured towards the elder.  "They took a sharp turn in the air, moving over from where I released them!"

	"Unlike the natural stones you gathered from the crater's wall," Pilate murmured in mid-scan.

	"Totally!"  Rainbow grinned.  "Those fell straight down, but these flew directly towards this spot right here!"

	"What's more... th-they're still moving," Pilate said as his manalight streamed over the rattling rocks.  "Or, at least they're trying to move... as if they can somehow manage to squeeze through the wooden lattices."

	"Forgive me if I sound unenthused," Fawful murmured with a curious expression.  She shrugged.  "But this isn't exactly an alarming discovery—at least not to us."  She gestured at the rocks while onlookers gathered around in a circle.  "We've always known that the rocks from the outer sanctum were attracted to what lies beneath."

	"Yes... but why?"  Pilate tapped his chin in thought.  "Hmmm... perhaps if—"

	"What?"  Rainbow hovered in front of him.  "Tell me what your zebra eyes see!"

	"If the machine world of the rings and the sentinels that orbit them are all cut from the same cloth of Urohringr..."  Pilate tilted his head up towards the pegasus.  "Then perhaps that might explain the purposeful attraction between them."

	"So, in other words, any piece of Stratopolis would be attracted to the metal surface below?"  Rainbow said.

	"Precisely."

	"Then—like—why would the dislodged temple structure land here?"  Rainbow shrugged.  "I mean, the metal surface is beneath the whole earth and everywhere, right?  So wouldn't the temple that Duranda and company were on just slam into any continent?  Or the ocean floor for that matter?"

	"Uhm..."  Fawful squirmed where she stood.  "Any chance you ponies could slow down?  I'm having a hard time followi—"

	"Rainbow, take a look around you," Pilate remarked.  "I imagine this basin is far too vast for the average eye to see in its entirety."

	"You have a point there, Pilate.  But so what?"

	"Do you honestly think that a single building from Stratopolis could have made an impact crater of this magnitude?"

	"Well... s-sure!"

	"How?"

	"What if it flew down here really really fast?"

	"Then we'd be talking rather astronomical speeds, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "Not to mention improbable.  Tell me, just how would Duranda and the rest of Commander Hurricane's soldiers have survived?"

	"Uhhh..."  Rainbow gulped, then grinned awkwardly.  "Lots and lots of pillows...?"

	"I believe that something else caused this crater, Rainbow," Pilate said.  He began pacing across the wooden beams.  "I'm talking about something long, long ago—eons before the likes of the Ledomaritans and the Xonans blasted open a piece of the earth to give Nightshade access to the Machine World.  I'm willing to bet it was something that happened long before even the founding of Equestria—so long ago that it afforded nature the time it needed to form a perfect tropical niche in this very basin."

	"But—like—how far back are we talking?!"  Rainbow shrugged.  "The way you put it, it's almost as if we'd had have to go all the way to—"  She paused in mid-speech, blinking.

	Pilate scuffled to a stop and pivoted towards her.  He tilted his head up.

	Rainbow murmured, "The Sundering."

	"The what?" Fawful stammered.

	"Rainbow, since our run-in with the Herald, we've had every reason to believe that the sundering of the ring—Urohringr—was something that was forced to happen by malevolent parties."

	Rainbow gulped.  "Or just one bunch of bad eggs."

	"Right.  Regardless, we can't even pretend to guess how the rings are to be properly separated.  But if it was all done forcefully—even unnaturally—then it's safe to assume that the process was anything but smooth."  Pilate gestured all around him.  "I'm willing to believe that whatever caused this crater was something transpiring on such a large scale that it would shatter our comprehension."

	"Like..."  Rainbow gritted her teeth.  "Like maybe this crater was caused... b-by another piece of the ring?"

	"Just try to imagine," Pilate said.  "Several large objects, aloft in chaotic space, suddenly separated from one another.  This was long before the alicorns came upon this plane and blessed it with harmony.  Beforehand, everything must have been subject to the rampant laws of nature and physics.  I'm willing to bet that the pieces of the ring collided with one another due to the force of gravity... perhaps even more than once!  It would certainly explain a crater of this size."

	Rainbow gulped.  "It might explain something like the 'Grand Choke' too."

	"Now, that's pushing it a bit, don't you think?"

	"Hey, just trying to be ahead of the curve."

	"And an impact like that could have been sufficient enough to expose the machine world's surface from beneath the geological topography," Pilate thought out loud.  "That's why there's no door down in the Inner Sanctum, Rainbow.  It was never built to be accessed.  It was simply dug up by unforeseen events.  And then, over the millennia that passed, an ecosystem developed here—but the machine world was still exposed in the very center of the crater.  And when a piece of the sentinel that Commander Hurricane discovered was separated from the rest—without any means of its own propulsion—"

	"It shot its way here like a bullet!" Rainbow exclaimed.  "Attracted by the energy of the machine world n'stuff!"

	"And yet both the structures of Stratopolis and the Machine World are mutually responsive to the energy force of you, the Austraeoh," Pilate said.  "Which explains why you and Commander Hurricane both cause the Gold Lights."

	"Uhm... pardon me..."  Fawful leaned her head in, squinting.  "The Austraeoh?"  She gawked.  "Just what is that?"

	Pilate twitched visibly.  He turned towards Rainbow.  "Rainbow...?"

	"Uhhhhhh...."  Rainbow gulped.  "Eh heh heh..."

	"Rainbow..."  Pilate sighed, his ears folded.  "Please... please tell me you've told them..."

	"Told us what?"  Fawful's head darted back and forth.  Her ears flounced from the heaviness of her heartbeat.  "What is 'Austraeoh?'"

	Pilate tapped his hoof, jaws clenched.

	Rainbow bit her lip.  "So... uh... h-how 'bout lunch?"  She chuckled nervously, hovering on drooped wings.  "A nice... long... informative lunch?  Heh heh heh heh..."



	Props strolled into the cockpit, yawning.  "Mmmmmm-nyupppp... 'Afternoon, Handsome."

	"Hey hey hey," Floydien muttered while digging into several metal conduits.

	"Hmmm... still pulling apart Nancy Jane's guts?"

	"Floydien has nothing better to do," the elk said.  "This basin gives Floydien the shimmer jimmers, and these winged boomers are too cheerful for their own good.  Yes yes yessss."

	"Awwww..."  Props smiled.  "I bet you'd like them if you'd get to know them."

	"Kera."

	"Huh?"

	"The little boomerette, Kera," Floydien muttered.  "She says the same thing.  Grnngh... sometimes I think the Nancy Jane boomers are out to turn Floydien's skin another color."

	"Heeheehee!  It's just because we care so much about you!"

	"Then it's best to leave Floydien alone with Floydien's skin."

	"Pfft.  Where's the fun in that?"  Props glanced all around with bright blue eyes.  "And speaking of fun, where did Zaidy Waidy run off to?"

	"Hmmmfff... blonde boomer means the one with hairy brown brown?"

	"Yupperooni!"

	"Grfff..."  Floydien's antlers sparkled as he fused a few wires together.  "Lavender boomer saw him earlier on the top deck..."

	"Ahhhhh."  Props turned and trotted out the cockpit door.  "Okay.  Thankies!"

	"Yes yes yes... apparently he was flying off with three winged boomerettes to their tree house."

	Props skidded to a stop, her eyes twitching wildly while her coat went pale.

	"They were certainly full of the giggle glimmer, lavender says.  Hmmmf.  Must be something boomerettes all share in the same same."  Floydien looked over his shoulder.  "Yes yes yes?"  Silence.  "Blonde boomer?"

	Props was gone, nowhere to be seen.

	"Hrmmm..."  Floydien turned back to the consoles with a neutral expression.  "Blood blood blood."
		//------------------------------//
		// Whoah, Hold Your East Horses		//------------------------------//

	"...and, from what I can tell—at least—the flames from this machine world empower Rainbow Dash in mesmerizing ways," Pilate said from across the wooden chamber.  "She's capable of controlling ancient mechanisms that remain dormant for everypony else.  In other cases, she's been able to restore harmony by returning the magical fire to the pedestals where they belong."

	"And these... these ancient words," Fawful murmured, squinting from where she sat across the lantern-lit interior alongside several other elders  "You have found them in various places?"

	"Throughout the continent of Ledomare and beyond," Pilate said with a nod.  "And on top of that you have all of the landscapes Rainbow Dash has flown through previously, not to mention the symbols found in Stratopolis itself."

	"And..."  Fawful exchanged glances with the other Gray-Feathers, then glanced back at the zebra.  "These... these dragon creatures also recognize this?"

	"They're called the Divines, and Rainbow Dash knows more about them than I do," Pilate said.  "But, to answer your question, yes—the dragon Axan—a guardian far older than all of our lives combined—recognized Rainbow Dash as this 'Austraeoh.'  It's precisely why she spared the mare's life."

	The elders all murmured amongst themselves.

	Fawful rubbed her chin in thought.  Slowly, she got up and shuffled past Pilate, staring at a figure in the windowsill.  "Rainbow Dash..."  She frowned slightly.  "All this time, you never once thought of explaining all of this to us?"

	Rainbow Dash was perpetually face-hoofing.  After a prolonged sigh, she muffled into her forelimbs.  "Grffff... I wish somepony would explain it to myself..."

	"Even still, you should have told me, Rainbow."

	"Tell you what?!"  Rainbow looked up.  "'Oh, by the way, Fawful, not only are your Sun and Moon controlled by these winged unicorn thingies called Alicorns, but I'm this magically gifted harbinger of flame and sparkles who may be of the same bloodline as the ancient mare you've worshipped since foaling!'"

	"Rainbow, I am a Gray-Feather, not a child," Fawful said with a raised eyebrow.  "Don't you know that I'm properly equipped to deal with the information you have to provide me?"

	Rainbow gawked at her, slowly shaking her head.  "No.  I don't."

	"But if you had just—"

	"Do you forget what happened down there in the sanctum?!" Rainbow's voice cracked.  "Or do you easily just brush off every instance that you suffer a nervous breakdown?!"

	Fawful took a deep breath, turning to glance lethargically at the elders.

	Rainbow sighed, rolling her eyes.  She kicked off the window frame and trotted over until she stood beside Pilate in the lanternlight.  "Just... think about it for one moment.  Try to imagine it from my perspective.  All I wanna do is connect the gap between Equestria and you guys."  She gulped.  "Like—what's the point in bringing up all this crazy junk if the first pill is so hard and bitter to swallow as it is?!"

	"They never asked to remain ignorant, Rainbow," Pilate muttered.

	Rainbow barked at him, "I know how to deal with this, Stripesy!"

	"Like you have so far?!" Pilate retorted.  "By leaving them in the dark about Urohringr and—"

	"Enough!"  Fawful raised her hooves, silencing the two.  After they both quieted down, she cleared her throat and spoke in a calm voice.  "Rainbow, how much does your... Celestia know about this?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.  "Erm... not much.  The same can be said about Luna.  As a matter of fact..."  She glanced up with a weary expression.  "Nopony knew much of anything until I... I-I began my flight."

	"And when did you start to realize your purpose in this journey?"

	"Purpose?"  Rainbow blinked.  "Jury's still out on that, girl."  She twitched and rolled her eyes at herself.  "No pun intended, but—for real—I'm figuring it out as I go along."

	"Rainbow," Pilate spoke up.  "The Herald wouldn't have existed at all if there wasn't some ounce of truth in the angels that brought about the Sundering.  I don't see why you bother to deny at this point that—"

	"I'm not denying anything, darn it!  I just..."  Rainbow sighed.  She smiled weakly and rested a hoof on the zebra's shoulder.  "Sorry for being so snippy, dude."  She gulped and turned towards the elders.  "Look, all I've known from the beginning... all I've felt was the need to move... and to fly.  And it was never because something was speaking to me and urging me to go on.  I just... I-I just had to chase the sun and keep moving.  I couldn't stay where I was.  I couldn't..."  She winced, her pupils shrinking at the thought.

	Fawful slowly nodded.  "Because of what happened to your friends."

	Pilate's ears twitched.  He tilted his head in Rainbow's direction.  "You told her, then?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "I told her enough."  Her ears folded as she avoided everpony's gaze.  "Or so I thought..."

	"So, all this time..."  An elder trotted up from the rear of the room, his eyes thin.  "You never had any intention of arriving in Durandana?"

	Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "Despite all of the stuff you've just learned, I've never been one to take much stock in fate.  I wasn't lying when I first told Sivrem and Fawful and the like that my friends and I were heading to a kingdom east of this place.  It just so happened that Durandana was along the way, and we had just gone through all that mess in Stratopolis and... and..."

	"Rainbow..."  Pilate leaned his head towards her.  "Before you speak yourself in a corner..."

	"The hay are you going on about?"

	"Haven't you ever paused to consider?"

	"Consider what?"

	"You couldn't have stumbled upon the Sword of Solstice at a better time."

	Rainbow's blood went cold.

	"Maybe there's a reason Commander Hurricane met the end that she did," the zebra suggested.  "Perhaps there was yet a pony who would complete her journey for her."

	"Pilate, please."  Rainbow cleared her throat.  It still sounded raspy as she spoke, "Don't make everypony think I'm something that I'm not."

	"What do you mean?" Fawful remarked.  "Do you believe that there's an even greater connection between yourself and the Valkyrie?"  This only caused the elders behind her to stammer.

	Rainbow hesitated, then eventually said, "A connection?"  She gulped.  "Probably so.  But..."  She stepped forward.  "Hurricane and I were never the same thing!  Please... please don't believe that!  It's not what I wanted you to believe!"

	Fawful stared squarely at Rainbow.  "But what do you believe?"

	Rainbow stood stock still.  "I believe..."  Eventually, she slumped back on her haunches and muttered.  "I believe that things were really dang simple when all I ever had to worry about was strange caves and giant eels..."
		//------------------------------//
		// A Bird Finds Its Nest		//------------------------------//

	Thud!

	Josho glanced up from a gun he was cleaning.

	Across the mess hall table from him, Props had just slapped a bowl of lettuce down.  She plopped limply into a chair, scooted up noisily, and began munching with wild abandon.  Her peach-colored ears were folded back over a perpetual scowl.

	Josho blinked.  Shrugging, he returned his gaze to his weapon as he scrubbed the inner pieces.  At last, he muttered out the side of his muzzle, "There a salad eating contest I don't know about?"

	"It's scrumptious," Props blurted, continuing to scarf away.  "I like stuff that tastes good."

	Josho felt his mane flouncing from the volume of her statement.  "Hmmm... glad to know that it's having such a positive effect on you."

	"Did you need something?" Props gargled between salad bits.  "Because I don't have time for big bouncy meanie heads!"

	"H-hey... just casual conversation," Josho said.  "Besides, the war's over, lady."

	Props sighed, slumping back in her chair as her expressions softened.  "I'm super sorries.  It's just that..."

	"Something dead in the womb?"

	"It's Zaidy Waidy," Props slurred, her eyes jaded and emotionless.  "Handsome said that he saw him leave the ship earlier this morning with three or four winged mares."

	"Floydien said that, huh?"

	"And I dunno why it's bothering me, but... I-I just can't get my mind bubbles off it," Props said with a sigh.

	"Well, I saw Zaid leave myself," Josho said.  "And I can tell you right now that Floydien's totally wrong."

	Props gasped wide, beaming.  "Really?!  You mean it?"

	"Yup."  Josho nodded.  "It was more like ten winged mares."

	Props' jaw hung open.  Slowly, her eartips lowered towards the table.

	Josho blinked.  "Hmmm..."  With a nervous shuffle, he slid out of his chair.  "I... th-think I'm gonna... uhm... go carry my gun..."  He waddled away.  "...to the opposite side of the Jury."

	As he left, Props sat in the chair, her muzzle frozen.  Slowly—like a geological tremor—her eyebrows began twitching... and twitching and twitching and twitching and—



	Rainbow Dash sat on the edge of a platform overlooking the western canopy beneath Central D.  Before her, the basin's mists parted ways to reveal scarlet beams from the sunset.  As the crimson light swept over the treetops, various Durandanans retreated home in lazy droves.  Rainbow could see friends laughing and wrestling with each other in midair.  Closer to the upper branches, lovers nuzzled each other and wandered inside just in time to evade the shadows of evening.

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  She closed her eyes, relishing a fresh breeze as it toyed with her bangs and filled her nostrils with coolness.  She held a hoof out, feeling each drift of the wind current.

	"It's not forbidden, you know."

	Rainbow's eyes opened.  She looked over her shoulder.  "Hmmm?"

	Fawful strolled up from the elders' building.  Her bleached threads danced in the breeze.  "Flying.  You strike me as a pony who does her best thinking when she gusts."

	Rainbow sighed, glaring at the horizon.  "I've had my full of thinking lately."

	"Hmmm..."  Fawful smirked slightly as she stood at the edge beside Rainbow.  "If only some of us could be so lucky."

	Rainbow winced.  She closed her eyes, grumbled, and said, "Fawful, I... I think I may have made a mistake coming here."

	"Oh?"  Fawful squatted down daintily beside her.  "And what makes you say that?"

	"Just imagine," Rainbow muttered.  "If a sky stone vessel like ours hadn't pierced the winds of the sky stabs and shown up here..."  She blew out the side of her muzzle and stared down at the treetops.  "We'd never have bothered with Durandana to begin with.  We wouldn't have blown anypony's minds with the idea of a huge... huge world.  And we certainly wouldn't have made you rethink the whole Valkyrie business."

	"Hmmmm..."  Fawful smiled.  "And who said anything was being rethought, Rainbow?"

	"Huh?"  Rainbow blinked at the elder.  "But I thought—I mean... with all of the stuff that Pilate and I..."

	"The way tomorrow's Durandanans will think and feel is up to time to decide, not you, Rainbow Dash," Fawful said.  "And if you must know, though I was raised from a sparrow to respect the glory of the Valkyrie, I know in my heart that she speaks to me, as she speaks to all of us.  I'd not have carried my weight as a Gray Feather if this wasn't the case."

	"Yeah, but... y-you were First-Born!" Rainbow exclaimed.  "You didn't have a choice!"

	"You really believe we're that simple, hmmm?"  Fawful asked.

	Rainbow blinked.  "I don't know what to believe."  She glanced down at the trees once again.  "Though, it's been my experience that nothing in this world is simple."  She sighed.  "And I, for one, would really... really like simple."

	Fawful gazed quietly at her.  "Rainbow, please... don't feel bad for that which you've shown us.  I don't believe that it's in your heart to complicate things for anypony."

	"Okay—if... like..."  Rainbow fidgeted as she spoke.  "Say there was some nasty dragon enslaving all of you—and I had the challenge of kicking its tail.  That would be a way cooler situation than what's going on right now!"  She gulped.  "Or if it was a bunch of bullies in airships and managliders, I could deal with that crud before breakfast!  But... but this whole legacy of the Valkyrie business..."  Rainbow cringed, hugging herself.  "It's been a long, long time since I felt like an idiot.  And the worst part is I'm sure things would be a lot less messy if I hadn't tried to tell you guys anything in the first place."

	"But you couldn't, could you?" Fawful remarked.  "You were destined to come here."

	"Me being 'Austraeoh' has nothing to do with it—" Rainbow's eyes bulged.  She flashed Fawful a nervous look.  "Wait... don't tell me that you're starting to believe—"

	Fawful giggled.  "I only answer to one calling, Rainbow Dash.  And she manifests destiny through her own glory.  There are many elders already debating whether or not your arrival here may have been prophesied in the scrolls."

	"Please..."  Rainbow clenched her eyes shut, wincing.  "Don't go there.  Don't have them go there.  I am totally not some... fr-friggin' Valkyrie apostle or something."

	"You're an awesome pegasus, Rainbow Dash," Fawful said, then shook her head.  "But you're far from worship material."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Oh..."

	"But, it's certainly something worth contemplating."  Fawful cocked her head to the side.  "Maybe Celestia and Luna play into the Valkyrie's glorious legacy.  Maybe they don't.  But you?"  She took a calm breath and said, "Perhaps... just perhaps... you were meant to arrive here in Durandana by all the powers combined."

	"What for?" Rainbow muttered.  "You know enough about me.  Even Pilate can tell you that I haven't have much left in my system."

	"Precisely."

	Rainbow flashed Fawful a look.

	The Gray-Feather was silent.

	Rainbow gulped.  "But... but my friends," Rainbow murmured.  "Val Roa... my journey..."  Her eyes narrowed.  "The Midnight Armory and the Harmonic Prism..."

	"I..."  Fawful winced slightly.  "...I know v-very little about the last subject matter, even though you and your striped friend went to great lengths to explain it to us."

	"Yeah.  My bad.  The two of us can be full of words at times."

	"But... if the Valkyrie—or 'Commander Hurricane' as you speak of her—could not complete her journey, though she was bound by the same purpose as you, then what's to say that your final resting places lies so far ahead?"  Fawful stared intently at Rainbow Dash.  "Maybe it's here, Rainbow Dash.  Maybe this is where you were meant to arrive... and where you were meant to stay?"

	Rainbow's face was stuck in a perpetual grimace, but she couldn't summon the strength to retort.  Eventually, she swallowed a lump down her throat and said, "Then just what is the nature of 'Austraeoh?'  My friends—Bellesmith, Pilate, Kera—all of this Eljunbyro and Odrsjot gobbily-gook!  Was it all for nothing?!"

	"You think your Commander Hurricane lacked any of the same things?"

	"I... I don't know..."

	"It would seem as if her glory was passed on to you."  Fawful said.  "Like a torch, if you will.  Perhaps, then, you have a torch to pass along yourself?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.  She heard a rattling sound, then glanced down to see that her hoof was grasping her pendant.

	Fawful quietly said, "I'm simply saying what has been dwelling on my mind since you and Pilate told us more about you.  Perhaps now you can understand why I wish you to tell me everything that you possibly can, Rainbow.  You need not be alone in contemplating the nature of your presence here."

	Rainbow shuddered.  "The reason I stopped to begin with... is because something about this place..."  She gazed up at the misty heights.  "...keeps me from feeling so alone."

	"And what of your friends?" Fawful said.

	Rainbow's nostrils flared.  She stared out onto the jungle with a melancholic gaze.  "No matter what happens—whether I live or die, whether I make it to the ends of the world or not, I am going to have to leave them."  She gulped, her voice cracking slightly.  "Just like I left m-my other friends..."

	Fawful stared at her silently.

	"It's been one adventure after another.  Constant battles.  Ledomaritans this and Xonans that."  Rainbow winced.  "I've... h-had the luxury of ignoring the problem.  But... what's the point?  I'm dying, and it's only getting worse.  Sure, the flames of the machine world help me a little bit—but even they are getting flimsier... watered down."  She gulped.  "When I first set off, the flight was just a challenge to myself.  I wasn't sure if I would make it or not—but I just didn't care.  And now...?"

	"Yes?"

	Rainbow's ears drooped.  "...now I'm starting to think that I should have kept that mindset the whole dang time."  She chewed on her lip, eventually turning to glance at Fawful.  "What do you think I should do?"

	"I only barely know you, Rainbow Dash," Fawful said.  "You've done so much... given us so much to think about and be amazed at.  But, beneath all of that, I can see a very brave and loyal mare... who's also very weary and exhausted."  Fawful smiled gently.  "That's the real reason I think you came here.  Whether the Valkyrie willed it or Harmony itself."

	Rainbow blinked.  "A bird to its nest."  She clenched her jaw, then stared out.

	Silence reigned.

	"There... w-was another reason I came out here," Fawful said.  "It's to tell you that the elders are still prepared to speak with Celestia, provided you can make such a thing possible with the Sword of Solstice."

	"It is..."  Rainbow nodded.  "And I can.  But right now... I-I just can't think of anything."

	"Perhaps you would like to retire along with your friend on your vessel?"

	"Nah.  Too early for that," Rainbow said.  Stretching her limbs, she stood up, spread her wings, and hovered up.  "I may hate thinking, but it's something I gotta do from time to time.  And there's only one way to do it."

	Fawful chuckled.  "Just be sure to maintain a high altitude.  There are lot of herders and foragers gliding back home this time of the evening."

	"Yeah... don't wanna blow any more ponies' minds."  Rainbow drifted off with a bittersweet grin.  "Stay young.  You know you can."  With a blue hoof salute, she was gone.

	Fawful watched her fly off.  She gently exhaled, then leaned her chin on her forelimbs with an expression of mute melancholy.



	"I'm not even remotely joking," Bellesmith said with a pleasant smile as she and Roarke trotted down the stairwell at the rear of the Jury.  "After having just sequenced with Nightshade, I had Rainbow Dash's memories freshly resurfaced in my head.  It was like I was born to kick flank in ways that would make a Royal Guardspony jealous!"

	"I had heard stories of how you single-hoofedly stole a dozen orphans from the confines of a northern airship," Roarke said, trotting down the steps along with her.

	"Oh, and don't forget the time I saved Phoenix from a skyscraper armed to the teeth with Nightshade's personally-hired stormtroopers!"

	"Hrmmm... I'm only familiar with your frail exterior."  Roarke's lenses retracted.  "I had assumed that there wasn't a single drop of warrior's blood to be found in you."

	"And just how do you think I made it out of Stratopolis alive, hmmm?"  Belle swiveled to a stop, smirking proudly at the metal mare.  "I may fancy peace and civility, Roarke, but I'm not exactly a weakling."  She winked.  "You can ask Pilate that."

	"I'm not certain he can judge you for the same qualities that we're talking about."

	"Oh, you can ask him about that too."  Belle grinned wide.  "Then you'll find out just what's black, white, and red all over."  Belle giggled merrily, reeling on the platform.  At last, she caught her breath—but when she did so she heard a strange, raspy noise.  Almost like a faded siren was going off in the distance.  She glanced all around, finally discovering the origin of the sound in Roarke's throat.

	Roarke silenced herself upon Belle's stare.  Her lips melted back to a neutral expression.  Silence—save for the whirring of her lenses.  "That... was humorous, was it not?"

	Belle smirked.  "It is now."

	"Hmmm..."  Roarke's ears twitched, and her lips curved slightly.  "So be it."  She took one bold step into the hangar—then froze in place.

	"Huh?"  Belle nearly stumbled into Roarke's flank.  "What's the matter, Roarke?"

	"Whizzball."  Roarke droned.  A beat.  She winced, gnashing her teeth.  "My transport."

	"Huh?"  Belle leaned her head in.  "What about it—?"  She blinked curiously.

	The hangar was empty, and its rear doors hung open to the red mists of the evening.

	Roarke's limb muscles tightened in their metal braces.  "Just who would be stupid enough to take it?"



	CRASSSSH!

	A bulbous black sphere exploded through a wooden wall.

	With a shriek, two Durandanan stallions and a mare rolled out of a bed and pressed their shivering, sweating bodies to the far end of the treehouse interior.  Their eyes were wide as saucers.

	Hisssss!  The doors to the sphere groaned open with flickering manalight.  An angry, angry mare leapt out and slid to a stop across the tangled bedsheets.

	"Featherless gull!"  Props barked.  "Mud-brown mane streak!  Smells like unwashed horseshoes and a bag of potato chips!  Where did he go?!"

	"Uhhhh... uhhhhhhhh..." The pegasi stammered.

	"Hckkkkkkkk-clkkk-clkkk-clkkk!"  Props' head forward like a tank turret, her teeth gritting so hard they produced sparks.  Blue eyes lit up with nebulous flame.

	"Guhhh—Two trees down!" the winged mare stammered, pointing with a shivering hoof out the nearest door.  "Lower branches!  Red doorstop!  You c-can't miss it!"

	"Thankies!" Props sang with the briefest of melodic breaths, then swiveled about, once more a living torpedo.  "Grrrrrrr-rrrrrr-rrrrrrr!"  She galloped out of the building so quickly that the wooden planks beneath her turned briefly red with heated friction.
		//------------------------------//
		// Rainbow Dash Flies In Circles		//------------------------------//

	The stars broke out overhead.  Even through the misty haze of the Durandanan Basin, Rainbow Dash could see them—not for very long, though, for she was frequently closing her eyes.

	Rainbow glided at a perpetual curve, angling her left wings along the bend in the basin.  As the crater ran in a circle, so did she, pivoting at a snail's pace while otherwise majestically soaring over the dense jungle and foliage below.  When the wind blew at her feathers, she didn't fight it, allowing herself to drift up and down with whatever whim the weather exhibited.  She relished in the chorus of countless crickets alone, in the rustle and dance of trees.

	It had been a long time since Rainbow Dash had flown in a circle.  In a lot of ways, it almost felt like flying in a straight line.  The beginning of the flight mattered little, and there was seemingly no end.  So long as she maintained a consistent pace and mastered the wind currents, then she could seemingly fly on forever.

	However, Rainbow Dash knew that she couldn't.  At any given moment, the flight would end.  It could have been in her next breath.  It could have been several months later.  Ultimately, it mattered little.  Despite the immortal strength of her will, the elements would hold sway when all was said and done.

	She had always imagined a glorious death.  In fact, she had earned herself one.  But that wasn't enough, and destiny evidently wouldn't settle for what Rainbow Dash deemed "acceptable."  For a moment, Rainbow contemplated that she had never been flying in a straight line at all, but instead several spiraling circles that just got smaller and smaller over time, dragging in various innocent lives into the cyclone until the revolutions eventually ended.  Would it culminate in a gentle release or a calamitous implosion?  Rainbow couldn't even pretend to guess.

	When Rainbow Dash began her journey, she received the blessings of Luna and Celestia.  She never expected to experience such grace when her flight ended.  But here—in Durandana—Fawful and the other pegasi were extending a blessing of their own.  What was the need to fight anymore?  She had lost friends and gained some more.  She had lived more than one life in a single gust.  Despite all of the pain and fighting and struggle, Rainbow began to wonder—perhaps she had a lot to be thankful for?  Perhaps she had everything to be thankful for—

	The world inexplicably spun.

	Rainbow's eyes flashed open, red on yellow.  She hissed in pain, clutching her skull as she flew straight towards spiraling trees.  "Nnnngh—L-Luna!"  A sea of branches hurled towards her from beyond the mist.  "Guhh... f-for buck's sake!"  Gritting her teeth, Rainbow reached through the numbness and flapped her wings hard.  She couldn't feel it, but her eyes told her that she was evening out.  She angled her feathers in such a way to pull her vision up and over the rustling tree canopy.  There was a flash of stars, then scattering leeves.

	Rainbow's body impacted off a tree branch.

	"Augh!"  She spun twice.  She couldn't register enough pain to tell how much damage had been done.  She could trust her body to be tough enough, even if she couldn't trust gravity at the moment.

	Her head turned to the side.  She saw another branch slicing its way towards her.

	"Hrghhh!"  Rainbow hooked a hoof out, catching the branch with her forelimb.  The resulting jolt broke through the dizziness, sending her blood surging through her petite frame.  She awakened to enough senses to toss herself upwards.  Leaping from the branch, she spread her wings again, slowing her descent with enough grace to come gliding lazily towards a pair of outstretched tree limbs.  Once above them, she coiled her feathers, and fell down hard.  "Ooomf!"

	The tree branches caught her.  She nestled her weight against them, relishing in the cold touch of the bark as her body slowly, slowly spun to a stop.  She clutched her head, her pained eyes returning to their vibrant ruby hue.

	"Mmmnngh... just... pull yourself together..."  Rainbow clenched her teeth and squeezed her eyes tight.  "You've got m-more left in you than this!  Focus... focus, Rainbow!  For the love of all that's awesome, focus!"

	She wasn't aware of it at first, but her breaths were growing more and more evenly spaced.  A slick curtain of sweat ran down her neck and chin.  Her eyes were shut so tight that tiny lines of color started playing tricks against her retinae.  As she felt the blood pumping in her ears, she thought—however fleetingly—that all of the lines morphed together, coalescing to become something.  A face?  A name?  A word?

	Rainbow didn't have any chance to concentrate on anything, for a loud rustling sound broke through the numbness, awaking her.  Her eyes flashed open, seeing sparks melting against the misty canvas all around.  Once more, she heard the sound... the beating sound... like leather wings against the darkness.

	"H-huh?!"  She tilted her head up, reeling slightly.

	The stars broke continuously in a straight line, then shone unimpeded.  The beating grew more and more distant.

	Rainbow blinked.  Rainbow frowned.  Rainbow fumed.  With a single flap of her wings, she shot skyward like a bullet, piercing the night's sky.  Dizziness still clung to her wings, but she fought against the fainting trails of her spell, ascending as rapidly as she could.  Her eyes darted everywhere.  Out of the corner of her vision, she thougth she made out a black shape against the stars, and she rocketed straight towards it.

	Rainbow climbed and climbed and climbed through the air.  She ascended so high that she flew beyond the reach of Durandana's weather currents.  Here, the air was a turbulent, tempestuous mess, blowing at her with wild winds that rivaled the blizzard gusts of the Wastes.

	Nevertheless, Rainbow hovered firmly against the gales, sneering into the howling winds.  "Nnnnngh—What is it?!" she hollered, she screamed.  "What do you want from me?!"  She flung her forelimbs out.  "Come back and spill it out, you scaley creep!"

	Nothing but darkness and noise.

	Rainbow snarled at it all.  "Why are you still watching me?!  I have n-nothing left for you!"  She panted and panted between loud outbursts.  "I have nothing left for anypony!  So just what in the buck did you see in me, huh?!"  She wheezed and yelled, "What does Urohringr want from me?!"

	The world grew hazier and hazier.  Rainbow's vision was fogging.

	"Gnnnghhh!"  Rainbow pulled at her hair.  "What?!  Do I need to kill another one of your sisters to get you to talk to me?!  I'm at the end of my rope!  Where do I go?!"  Shivering.  Hyperventilating.  "Why am I going th-there?!"

	There was no answer.  There was never an answer.

	Rainbow seethed and seethed.  Moisture formed along the edges of her eyes, all too quickly blown away by the slicing wind currents.  She hung her head as her wings flapped with looser and looser motions.  Her hooves grasped the pendant rattling around her neck.

	"So much..."  She gulped, her voice wavering.  "It j-just... weighs so m-much.  It always has.  I'm tired.  I'm just... s-so tired..."

	There was a sniffling sound that was deaffened by the wind, and Rainbow slowly, slowly drifted back down into the welcoming heart of the lost basin.



	Eagle Eye lay curled up in his cot, the same fetal position he had been in for hours.  There was no sleeping; his moist eyes stared intently into the nearest bulkhead while his lavender ears occasionally flickered.  Every so often, a sad breath would escape his nostrils, and his eyes would grow wetter.

	Sniffling, the stallion buried his face into his pillow.  A tiny whimpering noise escaped his throat, silenced by the shadows around him.

	So it was with a curious stirring that Eagle Eye ultimately lifted his head to the repeated sound of a hoof knocking at his cabin door.  His eyes blinked blearily across the darkness.

	The knocking persisted, louder and more earnest this time.

	With stiff legs, Eagle Eye rolled out of bed, stood up, and shuffled towards the door, sighing the whole way.  At last, he grabbed the hatch and opened it with a squeaky turn.  As soon as he opened the thing to the hallway, his breath left him.

	"... ... ...Ebon?!"

	The stallion avoided Eagle's gaze, staring down at the floor with folded ears.  He was dead silent, though his trembles were more than noticeable.

	"I... uhm..."  Eagle gulped.  "I-I don't know... what..."

	"May I step inside, Eagle, please?"  It was the gentlest of whispers.

	Eagle gawked.  He nod-nod-nodded and stepped aside, giving Ebon room to shuffle on in.  He very slowly, very gently closed the door behind them both.

	Ebon stared dead at the wall, his tail hanging limply behind him.  With a slight turn of the head, he murmured over his shoulder, "I was t-told that you would be here."

	"Uhm..."  Eagle Eye gulped the biggest lump ever down his throat.  "Yeah.  I mean... sure.  I guess..."

	"I... I was also told that you've been absolutely miserable."  Ebon's dry throat cleared.  "And from the way he described it, I... st-started to get concerned..."

	"Huh?"  Eagle blinked.  "Who?"

	"I know how dramatic you c-can sometimes be, Eagle."  Ebon twirled, eyes glossy as they finally found their mark, shaking Eagle to his core.  "The l-last thing I'd ever want for you is to hurt yourself!"

	"But... b-but I wouldn't!  I mean..."  Eagle's muzzle scrunched.  "Who gave you that idea—?!"

	"He loves you very much, you know," Ebon says.  "I... I don't blame him."

	Eagle blinked.  At last, he rolled his eyes and groaned inwardly.  "You dirty, dirty old stallion..."

	"Eagle Eye, please hear me out—"

	"Look."  Eagle sighed, trotting forward and waving a forelimb.  "Whatever Josho said, I'm sure it's just him trying to—"

	"No."  Ebon's bergundy hooves gently clasped either side of Eagle's leg and squeezed tight.  He gazed up into the other stallion's eyes.  "This is about me and you."  He gulped.  "It's always about me and you."

	"Ebon...?"

	Ebon sniffled, his eyes tearing up.  "You've been so good to me... so loving... so... adoring."  Ebon gritted his teeth.  "Everything in my being is telling me not to do this.  But... b-but I can't help it, Eagle.  I have to tell you..."

	Eagle took a deep, deep breath.  "Tell me what, Ebon?"

	"The tr-truth, Eagle," Ebon whimpered, his lips quivering.  "The truth about me."

	Eagle Eye nodded.  He smiled gently, a tear running down his muzzle.  He raised his other hoof and clasped it with Ebon's.  "I'm all ears..."
		//------------------------------//
		// All You Need Is Love		//------------------------------//

	"Back in Gray Smoke, I told you that I had no memories," Ebon Mane said as he trotted a tiny circle inside the confined cabin.  "I told you that the only thing I remembered was my mother... and the desire to find my mother."  He clenched his jaw tight as his hooves shuffled to a stop.  "...but that was a lie."

	Silence.

	Eagle gazed thinly across the dim interior.  "What?  That... that you were searching for your mother?  I mean, who else are you writing to—?"

	"Not that.  That part is true.  What I'm trying to tell you is that I was lying to you because I... I-I was leaving something out."  With a gulp, Ebon swiveled around and slowly sat on the edge of the bottom cot.  "Something else that I actually remembered... and still do."

	Eagle Eye nodded slowly.  "Please, Ebon.  Do go on."

	The stallion avoided Eagle's gaze, staring instead at the metal floor.  His ears folded over his head like a guilty foal.  "Whatever happened to me... it took away everything I know about where I was born... what I did for a living... where I came from..."  He glanced lethargically at his haunches.  "How or why I got this stupid cutie mark..."

	Eagle Eye patiently listened.

	Ebon went on, "But... th-there is one thing I do remember.  My first memory, and it's much... much clearer than anything else in my head.  I don't even remember my mother's face like I remember this."  He gazed up with a quivering lip.  His voice cracked, "I remember the pony who found me."

	Eagle leaned his head to the side.  "The pony who... f-found you?"

	"He... h-he was a trader."  Ebon gulped.  "Or a merchant.  He owned a skiff that he used to travel up and down the rivers of eastern Ledomare.  While he operated out of a town not that far from most Confederate settlements, his main place of operations was in Gray Smoke.  And that's where I was when I first saw him... and his eyes... his warm... comforting eyes..."  Ebon's face winced as his pupils shrank suddenly.

	Eagle blinked at that.

	With a raspy sigh, Ebon continued.  "I was so... so confused... and weak."  He swallowed.  "I felt like an infant.  So helpless and frightened... but too frail to sob in fright.  But it didn't matter.  He was there to protect me... to nurse me back to health.  I couldn't understand why or how... but I trusted this stallion.  Who else or what else could I trust?  I had nothing, Eagle.  Nothing.  It was like coming out of a thick storm, but he was there to drag me to dry land.  I trusted him.  I felt blessed to have been found by him."

	With a gentle smile, Eagle said, "Sounds like he was a good pony."

	"I believe so."  Ebon nodded. "Whole heartedly.  There is no doubt in my mind."  He cleared his throat.  "As... uhm... as time wore on, I started feeling healthier and healthier.  I couldn't figure out why.  The stallion brought me food, but I don't remember ever eating any.  It just... d-didn't feel important to me at the time.  As each day went by, all I wanted to do was see his face, his smile, his warm, warm eyes.   Somehow... that was enough.  Eventually, I got healthy enough that I could look around and collect my bearings.  He told me all about how he had found me on some river's edge while he was trading between Ledomaritan towns.  As soon as he realized how sick I was, he took the first zeppelin transport up to Gray Smoke so he could nurse me back to health with the comforts of his own home.  I... I-I just couldn't believe the generosity of such a pony!  And such selflessness too!  I told him that I couldn't remember anything—much less how I ended up alone and weak on some riverbed.  But... but none of that mattered.  It was as though his entire aim in life was to make sure I recovered from whatever happened to me."

	"Not all Ledomaritans are heartless creatures, Ebon," Eagle said with a hopeful smile.  "Most of them are capable of kindness and gentleness.  I mean, look at Belle and Pilate!"

	"Eagle, you have to understand."  Ebon gulped.  "This was different."

	"In what way?"

	Ebon hesitated.

	Eagle winced.  "Blessed Spark.  He didn't... h-he didn't take advantage of you, did he?"

	Ebon's nostrils flared.  "No."  The breath of anger dissipated as soon as it formed, and the stallion instantly winced.  "It... it w-was the other way around..."

	Eagle stared quizzically.

	With a murmur, Ebon continued.  "At first, I was incredibly frightened at how little I knew about myself.  My life was a complete and utter blank slate.  I was even more afraid of the reason for all of this.  But... as it turned out, it didn't matter.   This stallion—my caretaker—filled the hours by talking to me.  He... he talked about his trade routes and how to properly haggle with soot-stained customers and his various brothers and sisters who had been swept up in the war.  He was like a living fountain of words and stories and anecdotes.  And you know what?  I didn't care one bit!  I... I loved listening to him... watching him as he sat across from my cot... seeing the little twitches in his ears when he came upon an exciting story or a harrowing tale that he had to share.  I..."  Ebon's face locked into a cold position.

	Eagle waited for it.

	"I... I-I loved him, EE," Ebon said.  "I trusted him.  I depended on him.  I enjoyed him.  But... but I loved him.  Deep down inside... it was the only thing about me that was real.  But that wasn't all."  He gulped.  "He loved me.  I don't say that facetiously, for it was true.  I knew it was true.  I could feel it.  He had the deepest... warmest... most sincere love that anypony could have for another.  And he chose to bestow it on me... a literal nopony.  And it's not like I could give him anything in return!  I mean... yes... I listened to his stories.  I gave him company and smiles and... all of m-my attention.  But..."  Ebon gritted his teeth.  "It wasn't worth it in the end.  He shouldn't have taken me in.  He sh-shouldn't have!"  A tear ran down Ebon's face.

	Sitting down on his haunches across from Ebon, Eagle gathered the courage to ask, "What happened...?"

	Ebon sniffed.  "I..."  He rubbed his cheek, avoiding Eagle's gaze.  "I st-started to notice a change as soon as I was strong enough to walk.  Suddenly, my caretaker was having to sit down a lot.  It's... it's like he couldn't trot straight.  I figured at first that he was exhausted.  I mean, he didn't sleep much when he was around me.  He was... was so dedicated to making sure I felt better.  Well, now I was having my strength return... but wh-why was he losing his balance?"

	Ebon paused to shudder.

	"And it only got worse, EE," he said.  "Suddenly, he would collapse without warning.  He'd have these fainting spells.  Then, as my vision got better, I could see... I-I could see..." A squeaking sob.  "Just how thin and diseased he was."  He held a hoof over his muzzle as he stammered.  "All this t-time that he was taking care of me... h-he was only dying himself!"  Eagle choked.  "I... I-I tried to get help!  I ran out of his shop and begged for help from these strangers all around me that I'd never seen before!  Nopony would lend a hoof.  I had n-no idea that we were in the Rust District!  It never occurred to me that every neighbor would be cold and heartless scumbags!  Unlike him!  And his gentle laugh and his warm eyes..."  He gnashed his teeth and shook his head.  "But they weren't warm anymore!  The life had left him!  Sucked out as if with a funnel!"

	Eagle's lips pursed as he watched with quivering eyes.  By this time, Ebon was grasping his head, bending over and shuddering from head to tail.

	"I... I-I didn't know what else to d-do!  The only thing that seemed to make him feel better was when I was around.  So... so I stayed by his side.  I even held him close, trying to g-get him to tell the stories that he used to, as if it would m-make him feel better as it did me.  But... it didn't."  He whimpered.  "He only got worse!  It... it was like we were the opposites now of who and what we were when everything began!  There he lay in the same cot I occupied for goddess-knows how long, and no amount of food or water I brought him could nurse him back to health.  I... I-I was helpless, EE!  I was helpless to heal the caretaker who saved me from certain death!"

	Eagle shook his head.  "If he truly loved you, Eagle Eye, I'm sure he would have done something to help the situation.  He wouldn't have left so much in your hooves!  I'm sure of it!"  Eagle gestured.  "He'd have told you how to find a physician or where to get medicine or—"

	"He didn't want any of that, Eagle!" Ebon practically shouted.  He looked up with flaring, wet eyes.  "Don't you get it?!  He wanted nothing!  Nothing but... but m-my company..."  The stallion's face paled.  Tears streamed down to his quivering jaw.  "I... I killed him, EE."

	Eagle's muzzle contorted.  "...what?"

	"I did.  I killed him," Ebon murmured.  "It took me a long time to realize it.  But the same thing that got him to salvage my body in the first place is what sapped him of all energy.  He loved me... and I loved him..."  Ebon's jaw clamped tightly.  "And... because of that... he died.  Because of me."

	Eagle shook his head.  "You... you c-can't possibly blame yourself for that!  That's absurd!"

	"Isn't it?"  Ebon's nostrils flared.  "Even as his life faded away, I could feel my health reaching its peak.  I don't know what it is... but there's something horrible inside of me.  A demon.  A curse.  A magical disease.  Something horrible... and it claimed him as his victim.  It... it killed the one pony I truly loved..."  Ebon shuddered.  "And... and as soon as I f-figured out what was happening, I tried to tell him.  But... but he was too far g-gone.  His cheekbones were hollow and his m-mane... oh goddess... his mane was falling out at the roots.  I sobbed like an infant, and with his last breath he silenced me.  He had a smile on his withered face and... and..."  Ebon nearly hyperventilated.  "Do you know want to know what he said, Eagle?"

	Eagle simply stared in stunned silence.

	Ebon grunted, "He said 'thank you.'"  He clenched his eyes shut.  "He... th-thanked me for ending h-his life!"  A sniffling, and he clamped his hooves over face.  "Mrrmmmf... all he knew was the love th-that had enraptured him... not knowing that it killed him as well!  What ever happened to his anger and his fear and his s-sadness?  Were they sucked away t-too?!  That's not a natural way to die!  It's not a right way to die!"

	The stallion's quiet sobs echoed between the two.

	Eagle exhaled with a shudder, his eyes falling to the floor.  Ultimately, he gulped and asked, "What h-happened next?"

	"Next?"  Ebon sniffed and gazed into the corner of the room.  "It... w-wasn't long after that the soot-stained weasels who lived next door caught wind of his passing.  They didn't know much about what had happened—only that their neighbor was taking care of an invalid... and getting sick himself.  Before I could even grieve his passing, they tore into the shop and ransacked the place.  I-I tried to fight them off... b-but they were just too many.  I..."  He grimaced.  "I-I couldn't even recover his b-body to bury him, those damned butchers..."

	"Ebon..."

	He went on.  "Suddenly, I was alone in the streets of Gray Smoke.  I didn't know what to do with myself.  I was afraid to do anything!"  He shuddered.  "If I got close to another pony... if I fell into the comforting arms of another equine like his..."  He looked up.  "What more could I do?  Haven't I caused enough damage as it was?"

	"Let me guess..."  Eagle took a deep breath.  "You discovered a way to blend in."

	Ebon nodded.  "I needed to find some method of keeping myself alive.  After my caretaker's death, I felt myself growing weak once again.  I... I-I thought if I just scrounged up some food, then I might be able to sustain myself.  So..."  He shifted where he sat.  "I-I snuck into the back of a restaurant in the Bronze District, thinking I m-might be able to steal some bread or something.  But... I-I was caught in the act.  I had to think fast to save myself, so I told them that I was a backup cook sent from the next district over.  To my surprise, they bought it.  I had to somehow make some convincingly good meals to save my flank.  It... w-wasn't easy, but I discovered I was a fast learner.  I'm sure my cooking was pretty shoddy when I began, but somehow it didn't matter.  Almost everypony who ate my food felt intensely satisfied—more than the other cooks'.  Well, if it works, why spit on it... r-right?  I moved my way up, advertising my 'cooking skills' from one restaurant to another, and eventually I was able to sustain myself.  But... b-but only through serving food."

	Eagle leaned his head to the side.  "How do you mean?"

	"Well, EE..."  Ebon glanced up.  "Have you ever seen me eat?  Ever?"

	Eagle's teeth held his tongue in place for a good few seconds.  At last, he murmured, "A good chef never indulges—or so I've always figured."

	"Eagle Eye..."  Ebon slowly, slowly shook his head.  "I don't eat."

	Eagle was silent.

	"Like... ever."  Ebon winced.  "It's because... for some reason... it's like I don't have to.  It's... it's just fulfilling enough to make other ponies happy with the things I serve them.  I can get by on that.  And, you know what?  That's perfectly fine.  That's the way it's always been, and that's the way I aim to keep it.  Because I haven't brought harm to another pony.  Not even Props!  Not until..."  He stopped in mid-speech, wincing as if a knife was stabbing him in the gut.

	Eagle gulped and leaned forward. "Ebon, I know what you're probably thinking.  Or, that is, what you're afraid of, but... please... you have to realize—"

	"Do you want to know what his name was?" Ebon asked.

	Eagle blinked.  "Huh?"

	"My caretaker."  Ebon gulped, his face frowning.  "His name."

	Eagle simply stared at him.

	Ebon sneered, "His name was Ebon... Ebon mane."  A tear ran down the stallion's face, though his frown remained resolute.  "I took it, EE.  I robbed it from him just as I robbed him of his life."  He gulped.  "It was the f-first thing I thought of wh-when I was nearly caught stealing food from a kitchen.  I didn't have an identity of my own.  So I took his... because I loved him... or so I th-thought..."

	"Thought?"

	Ebon's countenance had collapsed, and he was on the virge of sobbing once again.  "My love is a poison, Eagle.  It sapped all that was good from Ebon.  It took the gift that he gave me and turned it inside out... turned it to arsenic.  If I knew what was good for everypony around me, I-I would have just thrown myself off of Gray Smoke when I realized what had happened!  But I didn't!"

	"Ebon..."

	"Stop calling me that!!" he shrieked hysterically, then broke down crying.  "I'm a c-coward!"

	"You're a strong pony!  And you've lasted this long through tenacity and wit!" Eagle shook his head with a hopeful smile.  "That's not cowardice!"

	"But it is, Eagle!  Just because I managed to brush past Props and so many other ponies without hurting them doesn't matter!  Because I made myself a promise long, long ago!  A pr-promise that I feel myself breaking... or about to break!  And as much as I want to do otherwise, I-I can't... I can't break that promise!"  Ebon panted and panted, his legs going weak beneath him.  "I... I don't want... d-don't want..."

	"Please..."  Eagle drifted forward and placed his hooves on the stallion's shoulders.  "Look at me..."

	"Nnnngh..."  Ebon clenched his moist eyes shut.  He sobbed out the side of his muzzle, a whimpering foalish voice:  "I-I don't want to h-hurt you! But that's all that's going to happen, Eagle!  I swear it!"

	"It's not going to happen to me, Ebon."

	"Yes it will!"  Ebon hid his face in his hooves.  "Nnnngh... don't say it, EE.  Please, d-don't say it!"

	"Ebon..."  Eagle yanked the stallion's arms down.  "I love you because I choose to.  Because you make my life happier when I'm around you..."

	"You... y-you can't..."  Ebon shook his head, his eyes full of fright.  "We c-can't—"

	"And what's more, I made a promise, Ebon!" Eagle said.  "I promised that I would take care of you!  I would bring you home, even if neither of us know what your home is yet!"

	Ebon gulped hard.  His ragged breaths steadied into a slow shudder.  "You can't possibly know that..."  He shook his head rapidly.  "Nopony can know that!"

	"It doesn't matter," Eagle said.  "Ebon, I'm so... so sorry for what's happened to you, but you have to stop running!  You deserve a healthy, happy life!"

	"EE, I have a healthy and happy life!  I have the Jury—"

	"And you deserve the best that this life has to give you," Eagle said, slowly forming a warm smile.  "You don't deserve to feel cold and lonely everynight.  What's more... you don't deserve to feel guilty."

	Ebon sucked his breath in on that.  His gaze locked with Eagle's.

	"You don't, Ebon," Eagle said, squeezing the stallion's shoulders.  "What happened was not your fault!  Do you understand me?  None of this is your fault."

	Ebon shook and shook.  His eyes once again filled with tears.  "Eagle... Eagle, I... I..."

	Eagle smiled tearfully.  He pulled the stallion in for the deepest of hugs.

	Ebon hung his neck over the ex-mercenary's shoulder.  He whimpered quietly, his body limp in Eagle's embrace.  "I'm so sc-scared.  I don't want to hurt you... I d-don't ever want to hurt anypony ever again..."

	"Shhhh... it's okay," Eagle said, nuzzling the stallion's ear.  "You don't have to say it.  But it's okay.  We can make it work out."

	"But h-how, Eagle?  How?  You have n-no idea what you're getting yourself into!"

	Eagle briefly bit his lip.  With a deep breath he said, "You're going to have to trust me, Ebon.  We will find a way.  You have friends.  You have a place to stay.  And you have love.  My love, and that has never... ever been something I give just freely."

	Ebon squeaked an indecipherable word or two past Eagle's ears as he clung to him.  After sniffling he said, "Are... are you m-mad at me?  Are you disappointed at me f-for not telling you?"

	Eagle opened his mouth to respond, hesitated, then said.  "What do you think?"

	Ebon gulped, then stammered, "You are mad... j-just a little..."

	Eagle smiled.  "But I love you more than for that to be an issue.  Is that so hard to believe?"

	Ebon sniffled, then formed a weak smile across his face.  "No... it isn't..."

	Eagle nuzzled him closely.  His voice was warm, though his gaze was distant as he said, "We're going to make this work, Ebon.  Someway, somehow, you won't have to be alone or distant anymore.  And... and n-neither will I."

	Ebon shuddered.  "Th-thank you, EE.  I... I-I'm so sorry for abandoning you the other day... for leaving you alone and confused..."

	Eagle took a deep breath.  "One st-step at a time... you feel me?"

	"Yes... I-I feel you..."  A nervous giggle, then a quiet sob.

	The two remained seated together in each other's embrace, until their mutual exhaustion carried them into a mellow slumber.
		//------------------------------//
		// There's Some Food For Thought		//------------------------------//

	Thud!  Thud!  Thud!

	"Zaidy Waidy!"  Props hollered before the door to a rickety treehouse high above an array of swaying branches.  The torch dangling from the exterior flickered with each heavy slam of her rear hooves against the front entrance.  "I know you're in there!  You have some explaining to do, ya fuzzhead!"

	From the neighboring platform, several pegasi gathered in droves, clutching each other and murmuring in fright.

	"I mean it!  I've got pliers and I'm not afraid to use 'em!" Props spat.  With a growl, she kicked and kicked at the door.  "Grrrrnnngh!  What's this made out of?  Space Wood?"  The frazzled mare spun about, forcing the Durandanans around her to flinch.  Her eyes fell on the closest household on a platform.  "Excuse me, ma'am?" she spoke in a charming, melodic tone.  Her smile matched.  "May I borrow that?"  She pointed at a large wooden rake leaning against the structure's outer wall.

	The pegasus gulped and tossed the heavy beam towards her.  "B-be my guest, outsider!"

	Thap!  Props easily caught it.  "Thankiessss!"  She smiled.  She curtsied.  She spun and slammed the hulking weight of the thing against the door.  "Raaaaaaaaaugh!"

	Smassssssssh!  The entrance was reduced to splinters.

	The Noble Jury's engineer stuck her grinning, twitching face in through the door.  "Heeeeeeeeere's Propsy!"  Reaching her hoof in, she unlatched the frame from the inside and opened it with a creaking sound.  It promptly collapsed to dust about two seconds after the gesture.  Trotting inside, Props' goggles glinted like an arachnid's pair of eyes above her skull.  "Now, Zaid... what do you have to say for yourself...?"

	A voice trembled from the shadows.  "Please... you h-have to understand..."

	"Understand what?!"  Props sneered, seething.  "That's you're a two-timing hussy who can't stand on four legs and four legs alone?!"

	"I... I-I didn't want anypony else around for this!  It... it wouldn't be right!"

	"Around for what?!"  Props squinted.  She lifted the outside lantern with her pole and held it forward.  "Just where are you...?"

	A swath of amber light swam over the interior.  At last, the stallion was exposed, lying on a pile of velvety cushions.  He had a plate full of toasted bread crumbs right beside him, and his chin was stained with the unmistakable yellow signs of cheese, cheese, and more cheese.

	Props blinked... then blinked again.  "Buh...?"

	"Okay, confession time."  Zaid squirmed in the spotlight.  "I l-love this stuff more than life itself.  Enough to forget about... about..."  His eyelids twitched.

	The sound of a miniature foghorn echoed across the chamber.

	Zaid blushed.  "...lactose intolerance."  He bit his lip.

	Props blinked.  She blinked again.  "Snkkkt..."  Her whole body flinched, struck back by an invisible stone.  Her golden mane curtained around her skull like a deflated balloon, and soon she was laughing, giggling, guffawing.

	"Eh heh heh..."  Zaid gulped.  "K-Keep that open flame away, blondie."

	"Heeheeheehee!"

	"Sorry about... erm..."  Zaid winced as his body jolted again.  "Guh... the sm-smell..."

	"You kidding?!"  Props tossed the pole behind her and hopped in place.  "I love it!"  She pounced.  "Smells like victory!"

	"Gaaaah!"  He gasped as she plowed into him and the two rolled over the rattling plate and breadcrumbs.  "Oh jeez!  Oh jeez!  It's like wrestling living f-fuzz!"

	"I knew it!  I knew it all along!"

	"H-hey!  Uh... me too!  So... you're not going to murder me, still, are you?"

	"Depends on if you can live through it."

	"Live through what—Mmmfmmmff!"  His eyes bulged in the darkness as the two rolled even harder into the shadows.

	The room turned into an echo chamber of giggles, chuckles, and low moans—all accompanied by a nebulous horn section.

	Outside, a few pegasi nervously peaked in.  One or two blinked, their wingfeathers slowly stretching out.  At last, a First-Born cleared her throat, yanked the welcome mat off the wooden balcony, and draped it securely over the door, sealing off the interior of the treehouse.



	The next morning, amber dawnlight wafted through the portholes of the Noble Jury's mess hall.

	Shuffling by himself, a bleary Eagle Eye made his way to a chair and slid in.  He slapped down a plate of apple slices and began nibbling tiredly.  His nostrils flared as he gazed ahead of him in thought.

	Slowly, another set of hoofsteps entered the room.  A large figure came to a stop, glanced at Eagle and his plate, then back towards the kitchen.

	"Hrrrmmm..."  Josho took a deep breath.  "From the looks of your table setting, I'm guessing that our cook isn't up and about to make breakfast yet."

	"Mmmmf... no..." Eagle Eye gulped some apple mush down and shook his head.  "And he won't for a while."

	"Is that so?" Josho leaned against the table with a smirk across his top chin.  "I take it things went swimmingly."

	Eagle gulped again.  "It's not like that."

	"Ah.  Righto."  Josho nodded.  He stood there in awkward silence.

	Eagle continued eating.

	"Erm... uhhh..."  Josho scratched the side of his head.  "I'm guessing that... since you haven't tried to kill me yet... you're not mad for laying the spurs on the little burgundy bit purse?"

	"If you're wanting me to say thank you... 'Thank you.'" Eagle muttered.

	"Well, you don't sound very happy."

	"It's not unhappiness, old stallion.  It's..."  Eagle dropped his latest apple slice and sighed, closing his eyes.  After a meditative pause, he murmured, "Ebon slept like a doll all night."

	"Is that a fact?"

	"I held him close the whole time."

	"Is that all you did?"

	"Josho?!"

	"Hey..."  Josho waved a forelimb, smirking.  "Sorry!  Sometimes I get surrogate 'dad' mixed up with surrogate 'bro.'"

	"Surrogate flankhole is more like it."

	"Heh... fine."  Josho waddled off.  "Try girl-chatting with the space reindeer and see if you have any better luck."

	"Josho... no, please, wait."  Eagle clenched his teeth, giving the stallion a light tug with his telekinesis.  "Really.  I'm sorry.  I'm just... worried."

	"About what?" Josho shrugged.  "You and the sailboat are back together, aren't you?"

	"Yes.  And that's wonderful.  It's just that... that..."  Eagle hesitated.

	Josho gazed quietly at him.  Finally, he trotted over, pulled a chair out, and sat across from the ex-mercenary.

	Eagle Eye looked up.

	Josho waited patiently.

	At last, Eagle Eye murmured, "Let's say you love somepony... like... genuinely... truly love somepony.  And... and you w-want what is best for them, that which will make them happy."  Eagle gulped, then fidgeted with his forelimbs.  "And to make this pony happy, you go all out.  You expose them to your feelings.  You show them everything you're afraid of... and everything you hope for."  He winced.  "But... like... what if that's not enough?"

	"Is there something you're holding back from the guy, guy?"

	"Josho..."

	"It's an h-honest question!"

	Eagle gulped.  "I want Ebon to be happy.  But... but I know something... something that's the truth... but I know--or at least I'm pretty sure that such a truth wpuld only make him miserable."  He ran a hoof through his frazzled mane.  "In fact, I'm pretty sure it will crush him.  I'll be by his side, of course, but... but maybe th-that won't be enough."

	Silence.

	Josho scratched his chins again.  "Hrmmmmm... Kiddo, I'm no expert on romances.  I couldn't stick with anypony long enough to make anything out of it back in Ledomare--much less a friggin' baby.  Heh."  He smirked bitterly.  "And I'm certainly no expert on the locking of colt-bolts."

	"Uh huh..."

	"I mean... hah... seems rather redundant to play a ballgame with two sticks where I come from--"

	"Will you get to the point?!" Eagle barked.

	"Ahem... the point is, Eagle Eye..."  Josho took a quiet breath, then stared squarely at him.  "If what you do is give your all to make one pony happy, and yet you don't tell him the truth, then you're not really giving your all, now are ya?"  He leaned forward, eyes narrow.  "And what would that be, then?  Real love?  Or just a cardboard cut-out of the real thing?"

	Eagle stared at the sunlit windows past Josho.

	"The way I see it, nothing's worth goo-gooing on about if only one of you is happy, 'cuz the other one's struggling so hard to keep some stageplay goin' on constantly.  You may be together... but is that something that'll be real?"

	Eagle shuddered.  In a weak voice, he eventually said, "I want Ebon to feel like what he has is real."

	Josho blinked once.  "Can't it be real enough on its own?"

	Eagle chewed on his lip.

	Josho glanced down.  He sighed, then smiled faintly as he stood up.  "Again... not the expert, talking."  He shuffled two steps, paused, then looked back at the petite unicorn.  "But, for what it's worth... I'm glad you two are back together.  I mean... kind of a lonely basket with just one fruit in it.  You know what I'm saying?"

	"Buck me sideways, old stallion."

	"Heh.  Somepony else has that job now, the way I see it."  Josho waddled towards the kitchen.  "And then there's friggin' Blondie and Sir Cults-a-Lot.  Ledo's buttfunk!  Did somepony spike this crater or what?!  Meh... I'm making an omelet."

	With Josho gone, Eagle leaned forward, resting his chin on crossed forelimbs.  He stared into the dawnlight, breathing in slow, contemplative motions.
		//------------------------------//
		// Broad Side of an Eljunbyro		//------------------------------//

	"Rainbow?"  Bellesmith squinted into the morning sunlight from where she and Pilate stood on the Noble Jury's top deck.  "What... what do you mean?"

	"Just what it sounds like."  Rainbow finished sliding the Sword of Solstice into her saddlebag.  Fastening it tight, she turned to face her friends.  "Tell Floydien to bring the ship close to the crater's southern edge.  I want you guys to be ready to glide over the Sky Stabs at a moment's notice."

	Belle gawked at Pilate, then leaned forward with an expression of disbelief.  "Surely it isn't that dire of a situation!"

	"I... I really don't know," Rainbow muttered.  "Fawful's giving me plenty of good vibes, but most of these Gray Feather guys?"  She shuddered.  "They're so secretive, it's not even funny.  Kind of gives me the willies, if you know what I mean."

	"And because of that, you're expecting the worst?"

	"I don't know what to expect, Belle," Rainbow said.  "For all I know, maybe they'll all giggle with glee and demand that Sivrem and Kitsune fashion a whole bunch of Celestia plushies.  I just... I just want you all to be safe, no matter what."  Rainbow gulped.  "It's the least I can do."

	"What does that mean?"

	"It means that... that I'm not exactly 'leader' material these days," Rainbow murmured.  "I can't protect you guys so well anymore."  She winced.  "I can't even fly straight for too long before I just friggin' collapse.  I found that out the hard way last night."

	"Rainbow, all you've done for these Durandanans has been very noble," Pilate said.  "But I'd hate to think that this entire time you've been neglecting your own health."

	"Heh..."  Rainbow smirked bitterly.  "What's there to neglect, dude?"  She inhaled softly.  "We all know it was bound to get worse eventually.  Might as well be now..."  Her eyes scraped the orange mists above.  "...in this place."

	"Don't talk like that, Rainbow," Belle said.  "I know your dizzy spells have been more frequent lately, but that's not to suggest that you're at the end of your rope!"

	"Frankly, Ding Dong."  Belle glanced up at her.  "None of us know that for certain."

	Belle chewed on the edge of her lips.

	Rainbow sighed.  She turned to face the east side of the ship... but stopped in her hooves.  Her wings didn't even bother to flap.

	Pilate tilted his head aside.  "Is there something you're wishing to tell us, Rainbow?"

	Belle craned her ears patiently.

	Rainbow fidgeted.  Ultimately, she muttered, "Last night... when I had my dizzy spell... I could have sworn that... that I saw her."

	"Who, Rainbow?"

	Rainbow clenched her teeth.  "Axan."

	"She's..."  Belle blinked.  "She's in Durandana?"

	"Or above Durandana.  Or outside Durandana.  Pffft.  Whatever.  Goddess only knows how that freaky dragon queen manages to stalk me the way she does."  Rainbow swiveled around.  "I only caught a glimpse of her... and even then... mmmfff... g-guess it could have been my imagination."

	"If she's actually flying overhead and watching you from afar in a place like this..." Pilate reached up and scratched his chin.  "...I can only wonder what it means."

	"Righto."  Rainbow nodded.  "That's why I asked her."

	The pegasus' two friends froze in place.

	"And..."  Belle blinked.  "Did she answer?"

	Rainbow slowly, slowly shook her head.

	Belle sighed.  "Well, Rainbow, maybe she didn't have a reason to—"

	"Doesn't she?"  Rainbow squinted.  "Hasn't she always?"  She raised a forelimb, squinting at it while it trembled ever so slightly.  "Why kill me... and then drop me off somewhere so I could come back?"  She gulped.  "Why take down Nevlamas when she was about to crush me to a pulp like Axan once did?"

	"You told us yourself that she called you 'Austraeoh.'"

	"Yeah, well, if she knows so flippin' much about who or what I am, she's not being that big of a help," Rainbow grumbled.  "Unless, perhaps..."

	"Perhaps what, Rainbow?" Belle asked.

	Rainbow's eyes were thin, contemplative.  "...she knows where I'm supposed to end, and how the next flame gets quenched."  She gazed up at the platinum sky over the basin.  "After all, the Divine's got a lotta years left.  If another Austraeoh comes along, she could totally do the stalker thing with him or her in my place."

	"I can't see how that's an actual strategy," Belle remarked.

	"Why not?"  Rainbow turned to look at the mare.  "If Axan wanted me to get to the Midnight Armory, wouldn't she have just flown my flank to the world's edge on her bigass wings?"

	"Then, it seems to me, that she expects you to do something else, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "Something more than just reaching the dark side of the world."

	Rainbow slowly shook her head, nostrils flaring.  "There are times when I think I would have better off if she just left me dead back in Silvadel."

	Belle sighed, ears folded.  "Rainbow..."

	"I... I-I don't mean that I'd rather not have met you guys," Rainbow said, gazing thoughtfully at them.  "You and Kera and EE and the rest are the best things I could have asked for."  She gulped.  "And yet the worse.  Because—some way or another—I'm going to have to leave you."  She fidgeted.  "I just... I just didn't think it would happen so soon.  I sorta figured that I would have t-time to think it over."

	Belle and Pilate leaned against each other.  Pilate whispered something in a low breath.  Clearing her throat, Belle the spoke up, "Rainbow, Pilate and I... well... we were talking..."

	"Talking?"  Rainbow smirked goofily, her eyes soft.  "That's new."

	"You've done so much for us," Belle said.  "But, aside from saving our lives and giving us all a new future, you've taught us so much as well.  And between what we've learned... and what the likes of Josho and Roarke have to lend..."

	"Hmmm?"  Rainbow blinked, curious.  "What are you getting at?"

	Belle bit her lip, so Pilate spoke up.  "Whatever we encounter in Val Roa will inevitably involve a great deal of drama and conflict.  It could be quite... stressful."

	"Yeah?  So?"  Rainbow chuckled.  "I'm used to stress.  It's my bread and butter, next to cider and and a cracking voice."

	"The Rainbow we met in Blue Shelf could undoubtedly handle it," Pilate said.  "Same with the Rainbow who fought Nevlamas... and the mare I adventured with in Stratopolis..."

	"But now..."  Belle sighed.  "Well... d-do we need to rub it in anymore?"

	Rainbow's eyes darted between them.  "... you don't think I have what it takes to make it to Val Roa."

	"You could make it to Val Roa, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "For all we know, you could even see the Grand Choke.  But..."  He clenched and unclenched his jaw.  "Should you?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "Wh-what are you guys saying?" Rainbow asked in a raspy tone.

	"You asked a question of Axan," Pilate said.  "And she never answered you.  But... for all of her guile and miraculous intervention, Axan is not your friend, Rainbow."  His ears folded.  "We are.  We wish that we could somehow repay you for all of the things you've done for us, but all of us know that it isn't quite possible.  The least we can do is make sure that... that your last days aren't fraught with pain and stress."

	"And you think that not being around you guys is somehow gonna assure that?"

	Pilate opened his mouth to reply, but he had no words.  He hung his head.

	Belle hiccuped on a sob.

	Rainbow turned to look at her.

	"We..."  Belle covered her muzzle with a forelimb, shivering.  "We j-just want you to be happy, Rainbow.  And... and if we dr-drag you into another escapade... if you're finding yourself having to risk your already fragile neck for us wh-when you should just be at peace—"

	"Hey... hey."  Rainbow trotted up close, pressing her head against Belle's.  "Shhhh... look at me, girl."

	Belle quivered, her eyes clenched shut.

	Rainbow tilted the mare's chin up.  "Look at me."

	Belle forced her teary eyes open.

	Rainbow smiled warmly.  "I am happy."  A giggle.  "I'm awesome."  She leaned in and nuzzled the mare.  "And so are you."  She exhaled, staring painfully over the mare's shoulder.  "Who needs peace, anyways?"

	"You d-do, Rainbow Dash..."

	"Yeah, well, I'm not alone."  Rainbow leaned back, shaking the weight of the Sword of Solstice in her bag.  "I gotta make sure these Durandanans get a healthy helping of it too."

	"But Rainbow—"

	"I brought Harmony to Darkstine, Silvadel, and Chrysalis's brood."  Rainbow tossed her mane.  "Heck, if you wanna get super technical about it, I guess you could say I brought Harmony to Luxmare as well.."  A devilish smirk.  "Now... I gotta bring it to these guys.  Austraeoh or not, this is what I'm here to do.  And I'm not gonna let any stupid dizzy spells stop me from doing what comes natural.  And as for Val Roa..."  Her smirk dissolved.

	Pilate and Belle stared her way.

	Rainbow exhaled.  "Yeah, well, one wing flap at a time."  She gulped.  "That's how I've always looked at it.  Guess it's not worth ditching now."  That said, she turned around, spread her feathers, and glided off the Noble Jury's bow without another word.

	Belle and Pilate leaned against each other, watching as their friend tore off for the Central Tower.  The golden beam of First Light pierced the high mists, and Rainbow flew along it, heading east, against the wind.
		//------------------------------//
		// Meet Elders Celestia and Luna		//------------------------------//

	Central Durandana was abuzz with winged bodies, most of them gray.  A flock of elders streamed up along the stalk of the tower, collecting thickly around its summit.  Various onlookers flew in wide circles below, gazing up at the top of the Tower and murmuring among themselves.  Diligent First-Born guards held the general populous at a distance, keeping them to the lower platforms as the early morning waxed past First Light.

	The summit of the Central Tower itself was a hollow granite block, dislodged from the rest of the structure that made up the bulk of the Inner Sanctum underground.  The unmistakable signs of ancient impact fractures formed the jagged edges of the enclosure, and a thick wooden framework acted as the floor to the chamber.  Round hollows had been painstakingly carved out of the walls of the building, allowing for sunlight to beam through at a precise angle to highlight an elaborate lamp made out of gold metals and shiny glass.  Through this lamp, the sun's glow was narrowed into a thin platinum thread forever pulsating westward where it would ultimately make contact with a similar structure built into the summit of the Western Tower.

	Next to one of the round windows, Fawful perched, her wings twitching as she glanced all around.  An anxious expression hung off her features.

	Fwoosh!  Several nearby elders gasped, for Rainbow had just landed from a greath height.  As the wind settled, she tossed her mane back and smiled at Fawful.  "Whew!  Sorry if I'm late.  I was out like a light last evening."

	Fawful blinked at her.

	Rainbow winked.  "Even if you don't get the pun, the least you can do is laugh."

	Almost instantly, the tension left Fawful's head and shoulders.  She exhaled through a winded chuckle.

	"Hah..."  Rainbow coiled her wings and sat on her haunches within the window frame.  "I knew you still had a giggle left somewhere inside that body of yours."  She exhaled heavily, then fanned herself with her own wing.  "Yeesh... it's pretty stifling up here, huh?"

	"That's the heat generated by the Light's glory."

	"You could have just said 'it's the vapors,' girl."

	Fawful chuckled again.  "You're rather jocular this morning."

	"Why shouldn't I be?"  Rainbow squinted.  "Can you give me a reason why I should fret?"

	Fawful gulped, then slowly shook her head.

	"Awesome sauce."  Rainbow took a deep breath, glancing all around at the elders gathered in their murmuring flocks.  "Then let's keep it that way, huh?  Frankly, I'm happy to get this over with."

	"I believe many of the Valkyrie's foals would share the same sentiment."

	"Are we gonna have... y'know..."  Rainbow waved a forelimb, shrugging.  "...what we agreed to?"

	Fawful turned and pointed up at the sky.  "See for yourself."

	Rainbow pivoted, squinting.

	From a high altitude, several multi-colored bodies descended, led by Sivrem.  One by one, they landed within the window frames of the Tower's top structure.  Dozens of First-Borns stood at attention, their eyes locked on the outsider.  Rainbow could spot Kitsune and Jerrio from among them, the latter of whom she let her gaze linger on.

	"Just as you requested, elder."  Sivrem bowed before Fawful, smiling.  "The First-Borns of West and East D."

	"Very well done, Sivrem," Fawful said with a nod.  "And you have briefed them on what is about to transpire here?"

	Sivrem looked up.  Slowly, his smile faded.  "Ahem."  For once, the athletic stallion fumbled.  "Yes, elder.  That I have."

	Rainbow gulped.

	"Then I believe we can proceed," said an old stallion trotting up until he stood alongside the glowing lamp.  He turned his wrinkled head towards Fawful.  "Elder?  Is the outsider ready?"

	"You may ask the same of her," Fawful said, gesturing towards Rainbow.  "Rainbow Dash?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "Here goes nothing..."  She reached back with three wingfeathers and unlatched her satchel.  Without thinking, she slid the sword out with nimble swiftness.  Schiiiiiing!

	Several First-Borns flinched, their backs arching as they responded with instinctual shrieks and chirps.  Even Fawful cringed slightly.

	Rainbow gulped.  "Eheh... my bad..."  She sweated, only partially because of the heat.  "I've had to use this baby quite a few times for combat.  But, really, you've got nothing to worry about unless you're... undead... p-pegasi..."

	All of the Durandanans stared at Rainbow blankly.

	"Ahem... Rainbow..." Fawful hoarsely whispered.

	"Er, right."  Rainbow stepped forward, balanced herself with her wings, and rested the Sword of Solstice down hilt-first so that its blade leaned against the elaborate lamp, basking in the glow of the refracted sunlight.

	Almost immediately, the multi-colored rubies down the center flashed one by one, followed by the gold metal of the blade itself.  The hollow chamber around them shone with a golden brilliance, more luminescent than all three Durandanan towers combined.  Several First-Borns gasped in shock, and a lot of them instantly bowed.  Sivrem and Kitsune hovered around in a tight circle, quietly urging them to stand at attention.

	"Uhm..."  Fawful murmured, "Just how long does it usually take to summon—"

	"Greetings, Rainbow Dash," a majestic female voice resonated across the heavens.

	"Mmmm!" Fawful squeaked inwardly, stepping back with a flounce of her bleached bangs.

	Other elders whispered in shock, their jaded eyes suddenly wide and bright.

	Rainbow smiled warmly, proudly.  "'Hey' yourself, your Highness.  We're not alone, y'know."

	"Indeed..."  Celestia's words undulated in booming strength and clarity.  "We have been waiting eagerly for this moment."

	"W-we?" Fawful whispered aside.

	Rainbow leaned in.  "Where Celestia is, Luna's bound to follow."

	Fawful mouthed "Oh," her eyes wide as she nodded and nodded.

	"From the heart of Equestria, we—the Royal Alicorn Sisters of Harmony—greet you with great respect and boundless joy.  I am Princess Celestia, Steward of the Sun and Ruler of Equestria."

	"And I am Princess Luna," a second voice chimed in, no less eloquent than the first.  "The Keeper of the Moon and Eternal Watcher of Dreams."

	The chamber was aflood with gasping voices, but Celestia's presence drowned it all out.

	"For over ten millennia have we kept faithful vigil over the center of this plane, the land of Rainbow Dash's foaling, Equestria," Celestia continued gracefully.  "My sister and I have been blessed with long lives and intense magical prowess.  For this reason, we have taken it upon ourselves to oversee the lives of the mortal ponies who dwell within our dominion.  It has been a glorious responsibility—but seldom a simple one.  We have had great victories over chaos over the eons, and yet we are not without our mistakes and shortcomings.  And yet, despite all of our struggles, we have successfully maintained a peaceful kingdom in the center of the world, a bastion of Harmony that we hope to someday spread to the furthest reaches of the known realm.  And, if you are so willing, we would love to extend such peace, tranquility, and understanding to you, the pegasi of Durandana."

	There was no response.  Ponies—First-Borns and Gray Feathers alike—simply stared at one anothers in stunned silence.

	From across the way, Rainbow caught Kitsune's eyes.  They looked frightened, jittery.  Rainbow stared at her.  Slowly, she smiled.  After a few breaths, Kitsune calmed down somewhat, and her lips began to curve ever so slightly.

	Then Luna's voice made her and everypony else jolt:  "Perhaps the best way to proceed is not for us to lecture you on our cosmological view of the world, but to encourage the lot of you to perform a formal inquiry."

	Sivrem's brow furrowed at that, as did many ponies beside him.

	"I... I do believe that what my sister means to say is that we are open to all of your questions," Celestia's voice said with a hint of amusement.  "Please, do not hesitate to come forth.  I cannot promise that we will have all the answers that you seek, but we will certainly endeavor to bring you whatever clarity we can muster."

	Ponies exchanged glances.  At last, an elder mare trotted up.  All eyes were on her as she approached the sword and bravely spoke, "Princess... Celestia...?"

	"Yes, my little pony?"

	The elder's eyes narrowed.  "Did you know the Valkyrie?"

	Everypony's breaths were collectively held.  Rainbow glanced at the sword, waiting calmly.

	"I cannot with full certainty say that I have," Celestia's voice said.  Before a commotion could rise, she continued:  "As you may have already heard, Rainbow Dash has proposed that the Valkyrie could be the same as Commander Hurricane, a military pegasus from Pegasopolis who departed for eastern skies long ago, rifht after the Kingdom of Equestria was just newly formed.  If this is the case, then—yes, conceivably—I knew her, and I cherished her.  Commander Hurricane was a fiery and inspirational pegasus, a mare who did not back down from any threat—no matter how large.  We bequeathed her this sword that you see before you as a means to keep in contact, as well as to bolster Hurricane's already proficient strength and warrior talents.  Alas, as we have discovered through Rainbow, Hurricane's journey came to a heroic end in a floating city called Stratopolis.  We have yet to determine the fate of other ponies in Hurricane's charge—such as the one you call Duranda."

	Before any other elders could react, Luna's voice spoke up.  "However, it is not an inconceivable concept to us that somepony like the Valkyrie could exist.  All throughout Equestria's history, we have witnessed ponies who have exhibited great power and intense magic, rivaling even that of an alicorn such as myself and my sister.  Several of them, like Starswirl the Bearded, were dear comrades to us in the pursuit of Harmony.  Others—like King Sombra—were ponies cut from a different cloth, but nevertheless impressive in the manner in which they wielded mana and elemental sorcery."

	Fawful stepped up.  "Another question, if I may, Celestia and Luna."

	Rainbow glanced at her.

	The sword pulsed with golden brilliance. "By all means."

	"Where did you and your sister come from?"

	"Ah.  That is a very good question.  My sister and I—as stated before—are Alicorns.  We come from a realm located far, far away.  It is a place situated on the far end of the cosmos, where chaos doesn't run quite so rampant.  Our collective memories of our origin is relatively foggy at best, for on top of being tens of thousands of years ago, the both of us were quite young when we first arrived on this plane."

	Luna spoke up:  "We weren't alone.  There were hundreds of us—all alicorns.  As soon as we discovered this plane—floating lonesomely through the ether—we felt pity for the living creatures suffering in darkness.  We sought for a way to illuminate this world and give them harmony, not to mention peace of mind.  To do this, we had to emulate the natural cycle of a planet born from stardust.  Thus, we constructed this plane's Sun and Moon, but it took the better portion of all of our magical resources.  Most of the alicorns were elders like you, only with lifetimes so vast that they defy explanation.  For them, creating the elements to cover this plane exhausted their remaining strength, and they left Equestria to die quietly among the stars."

	"The youngest alicorns, including myself and Luna, stayed behind to govern the spirit of Harmony that was planted here in this land.  It has been anything but an easy task, and even at the peak of our power we can only illuminate one side of the plane.  However, the civilization that we have established in Equestria and abroad gives us hope for an entire plane of uniformed Harmony someday.  That will be a time when the likes of alicorns may no longer be needed whatsoever—"

	"You control the Sun and Moon?!" Kitsune blurted.  "How?!"

	Others stammered while a few elders frowned at the flinching mare.

	Fawful trotted over and rested a hoof on the First-Born's shoulder.  "She has a good question."  She smiled, then turned towards the sword.  "If it's possible to elaborate."

	"It is," Celestia said.  "The Sun—as stated before—was conjured by the alicorns and harnessed to abide by natural elements.  That said, we exist on a fairly unnatural plane, a place that we incidentally discovered to house life.  To that end, the Sun requires a well-timed spell in order to induce a proper orbit.  I perform this regularly—every day—at dawn."

	"And I raise the Moon to light up the night every evenng," Luna's voice said.  "Also regularly.  As natural realms abide, so must this one.  This is the promise that we made to our late brothers and sisters several millennia ago, for the sake of maintaining Harmony."

	"If that is true..." An elder stallion approached the sword, his eyes narrow.  "Then that means your powers hold sway over the Sun and Moon at any given time?"

	"Indeed."

	Another mare spoke up.  "Then could you lower the Sun now?  Or raise the Moon now?  To demonstrate your power?"

	The room filled with breathy commotion.  Sivrem leaned forward curiously.  Jerrio was glancing fitfully to his left and right.

	Celestia eventually spoke, her voice full of reluctance.  "I'm afraid... that simply isn't possible."

	"And why isn't it?" an elder asked.  "If you are what you claim to be, then it all falls under your control."

	"It is as we said," Luna spoke up.  "While we raise the Sun and Moon, we must abide by the natural mechanisms that are put in place for them.  Once dawn or evening has transpired, we have completed our separate labors."

	Celestia joined in.  "You must realize that the Sun and Moon do not shine on Durandana alone, nor just Equestria for that matter.  They shine upon this plane equally, rising and falling at the same time for equines everywhere—relative to their placement upon the surface of earth.  To alter their movements may be explainable to Equestrians, and they might surve a purpose in educating you."

	"But there is no telling what overwhelmingly tragic effects it may have on all of the distant civilizations that populate this world," Luna explained.  "Almost all of whom we cannot afford contact with, much less in the way in which we're blessed to communicate with you."

	"But..."  Sivrem flapped his wings, hovering boldly towards the blade.  Jerrio watched him with a jerk as he flew by.  "... the Lights From Above did go dark at one point."  His eyes narrowed.  "Several seasons ago.  Were you abiding by your own rules then?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.

	Eventually, it was Luna who replied:  "Indeed, we were not, but not for lack of trying.  You see, there was... the culmination of a long struggle, leading to over twenty-four hours of night.  I take full responsibility for it.  I have... only recently been restored to my station, you see.  For a thousand years, Celestia was in charge of both the Sun and Moon."

	"For... them both?" a stallion remarked while the First-Borns behind him murmured in awe.

	"And now, it is I who controls them both," Luna said.  "Though Celestia's glory holds fast over the Sun, she is currently encumbered with suppressing a well of chaos energy, preventing it from consuming Equestria from the inside out."

	Rainbow exhaled hard through her nostrils, bowing her head.  Fawful glanced curiously at her.

	"It pains me to admit that we are far from perfect, my friends," Celestia said.  "We have only ever endeavored to bring order to this plane.  It has not been without its fair share of tribulation and regrettable mistakes.  One such mistake is having lost track of Hurricane's expedition for so many years."

	Luna spoke:  "We weren't there to see what happened to the Commander's remnant, but from what we have learned through the Sword of Solstice's recovery, we have every reason to believe that you—each and every one of you—are descendants of ancient Equestrians.  You are like long lost family to us, and while we aren't proud of having broken contact, we are indescribably jubilant to be in conference with you now."

	Elders and First-Borns alike exchanged glances.  Several of them bore contented expressions.

	Rainbow's eyes scanned the crowd—but lingered on a twitching sight.  Jerrio was shivering to the point of convulsions.  His ears folded back.

	"Please understand that we have no intention of denouncing the Valkyrie or what she stands for.  As we have much to tell you, we do hope you'll have much to tell us.  That way, we might be able to make a better connection, and dwell together—not as missing fragments—but as one flock, united in peace and Harmony—"

	Snarling, Jerrio galloped up suddenly.

	Rainbow winced, jolting forward.

	"Jerrio—!" Sivrem shouted too late.

	"Grnnngh!"  Jerrio leapt with gliding wings and struck the blade with a heavy forelimb.

	Cl-Clang!  The sword ricocheted across the wooden frame, settling to a loud stop at the hooves of flinching pegasi.  Luna's and Celestia's voice instantly faded, giving way to gasping, whispering Durandanans.

	Rainbow's eyes closed.  She exhaled long and hard, her wings drooping.

	"First-Born!" an angry elder barked from the other side of the chamber.  "You were brought here and allowed to give audience to the outsider's patron matriarchs!  And this is how you show your gratitude?"

	"Gratitude...?!"  Jerrio seethed and winced.  Blood trickled down his fetlock from where he had punched the tip of the golden blade.  "And not eggshells?!"

	"Jerrio..." Kitsune trotted up to him, raising a trembling hoof to his wound.  "Y-your leg...!"

	"Hnnngh!" Jerrio shoved the mare off so that she fell into Sivrem's embrace.  Spinning about, he pointed his bleeding hoof at the blade and spat, "It's evil sorcery!  Meant to deceive us!"

	"Jerrio," Fawful droned, her eyes like daggers.  "You're not helping."

	"And you are?!"  Jerrio balked at her.  "Fawful, you were once First-Born... but now you are a Gray Feather!  You are meant to protect the scrolls!  Not allow for an invasion of lies and treachery!"  He spun and snarled at the crowd.  "Conjuring an unnatural Sun and Moon?!  Illuminating a plane floating pointlessly through chaos?!  Do you even hear what these creatures are saying?!  How they malign the Lights from Above and insult the Valkyrie's glory?!"

	"Dude... come on..."  Rainbow sighed, trotting forward.  "If you just listened to what they had to—"

	"I did listen!" Jerrio hollered.  "And it's blasphemous!  All of it!"  He shoved his bleeding hoof into Rainbow's chest.  "Now you listen!  You do not carry the blood of our glorious Valkyrie!  I don't know how you caused the Gold Lights—but you and your talking sword and your flying Silver can go just gust!  We do not need your infernal devices defacing the glory of our Mother any longer!  There is only one Source of the Light!  Not two!  Not hundreds!"  He limped off, grimacing.  "And th-those of you foolish enough to lend ear to this nonsense... you... you..."  He panted, his eyes tearing as he gnashed his teeth.  "You are no Durandanans!  You have n-no respect for the scrolls!"

	With that, he took off on heavy wings.

	Kitsune clung to Sivrem, watching breathlessly while the stallion frowned.

	Several Gray Feathers exchanged quiet looks.

	Multiple First-Borns—visibly shaken—turned tail and flapped off, gliding after Jerrio.

	The whole group lingered in muddled silence.

	Rainbow slumped back on her haunches, sighing.  She toyed with her pendant, staring down at the floor.  After hearing a scraping sound, she looked aside to see Fawful stepping up, dragging the Sword of Solstice after her.

	"Please... don't be a sad sparrow," she said through a quiet smile, then hoofed the sword over.  "Place it back up.  Most of us wish to hear more."

	Rainbow gulped.  "You... you r-really think so?"

	Fawful's eyes narrowed.  "I wish to hear more."

	Rainbow blinked, then slowly nodded.  With everypony watching, she shuffled back to the lamp and calmly placed the blade back.  As the gold glow returned, it caused the trailing puddle of crimson blood to evaporate into the heated air, becoming nothing.

	A sore lump formed in Rainbow's throat.  She turned around and trotted towards the edge of the structure, remaining there in meditative silence while the rest of the Durandanans continued their conversation with Luna and Celestia.
		//------------------------------//
		// Welcome to the Club, Pal		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash slid the Sword of Solstice all the way inside her saddlebag, then proceeded to tighten the satchel shut with a jerk of her teeth to the outer flap.  Releasing her grip, she exhaled calmly, turned around, and stared over the misty treetops stretching west from the platform along Central D.

	An orange sun was setting along the horizon, casting jagged shadows across the basin as it lowered beyond the reach of the western Sky Stabs.

	Rainbow took a deep breath, her eyes falling towards the foliage below.  The treehouses lingered in sleepy silence.  Lights flickered on one by one as the various Durandanans settled in for the night.  The serenity of the moment stole something out of Rainbow's inner being, and she trembled ever so slightly as she gazed on.

	A slight jolt ran through her body at the sound of Fawful shuffling up from behind.

	"I thought you had flown off already," the Gray Feather said.  She trotted up and stood alongside Rainbow.  "You look troubled.  Is there something you're looking for out there?"

	Rainbow's nostrils flared.  "Yeah," she muttered.  "Flame, smoke, and looting."

	Fawful raised an eyebrow.  "Why, whatever do you mean?"

	With a groan, Rainbow muttered, "You can't pretend to tell me that everything's hunky-dorey."  She gulped.  "There were tons less ponies hanging out around the end of the conversation as there were in the beginning."

	"It was hardly a complete disaster, Rainbow."

	"Fawful, a lot of Durandanans are clearly unhappy with the stuff that Celestia and Luna had to say!"

	Fawful gulped and said, "And I honestly can't blame them.  I'd be lying if I said that I wasn't shooken up myself."

	Rainbow squinted at her.  "Then why did you stick around for the whole thing?"

	"The same reason that you did."

	"Huh?"

	Fawful smiled contentedly.  "I may not fully grasp all of the things that your Princesses said.  In fact, from what I can tell, they're not entirely sure of all the things they're saying themselves."

	Rainbow winced and said, "But we're on the ball with most of it."

	"I can tell that," Fawful said with a nod.  "And, what's more, I find your sincerity palpable.  What you've chosen to do today was very, very brave, Rainbow Dash.  Furthermore, I'm touched that you would express such concern for the welfare of all Durandanans."

	"Yeah... but... more to the point..."  Rainbow clenched and unclenched her jaw.  "...do you guys believe any of it?"

	Slowly, Fawful's smile faded.  She trotted towards the edge of the platform.

	Rainbow gazed at her in silence.

	At last, Fawful said, "It has always been the job of the elders to protect the scrolls.  But, our task goes even beyond that.  Every so often, there's an issue that arises concerning the interpretation of the words of Duranda.  Usually, wise counsel falls within picking one of two or three different stances on the scripture in question.  Once the Gray Feathers have deliberated, they announce their decision to the Three Towers, and the flock of Durandana agree whole-heartedly to follow the interpretation without question.  We've no other choice.  The decision of the Gray Feathers is absolute.  It has to be, or else the strength of the Valkyrie's legacy threatens to dissolve within our hearts."

	Fidgeting where she stood, Rainbow said, "Do you... uhm... h-have any idea what sort a decision the majority of elders are gonna make about what happened today?"

	Fawful tensed slightly.  Her eyes moistened while remaining locked upon the red horizon.  "All I know is... f-for the first time in my entire life... I can feel that my heart may—in fact—not agree with the decision that the Gray Feathers ultimately make."

	Rainbow bit her teeth as her ears folded.

	Fawful noticed it.  She turned towards Rainbow Dash and sniffled, forcing a smile.  "If you hadn't stumbled our way to give us the knowledge that you most recently have, Rainbow, then I'm certain somepony eventually would, be it in this age or the next.  The basin of Durandana couldn't remain a lonely nest forever..."

	Rainbow grimaced as she said, "So much about me and destiny, huh?"

	Fawful had no immediate response.  She faltered slightly.  After a timid shiver, she quietly said, "Go and be with your friends, Rainbow Dash.  It's been a long day, and you've earned a respite."  She gulped and turned about, trotting away.  "We all deserve to be at peace with the world..."

	Rainbow watched her trot along.  After a few moments, she spread her wings and flew west, coasting along the currents of her own sighs.



	As Rainbow lifted herself over another row of tall trees, she spotted the stalk of West D stretching against the darkening horizon.  Before her eyes, the giant wooden tower retracted, slowly lowering towards the earth while clattering echoes of wooden gears sounded across the basin.

	With the last beams of Final Light diminished, the landscape was engulfed in a dark shadow, and even the distant twinkle of treehouses resembled dying stars amidst the perpetual haze.

	The momentary desolation was strangely calming.  Rainbow exhaled softly—only to realize that she couldn't use her lungs.

	The pegasus' eyes bulged.  The world spun, thrown aloft by an impermeable wave of dizziness.  A frail squeak escaped her lips, and her hooves thrashed at the world as it spun and spun harder around her.

	"Gnnngh... C-Celestia!" she wheezed into the cyclonic blur.  The trees were flying towards her at dozens of feet per second.  This time, there was nothing to broadcast a command from her head to her feathers.  She hissed, feeling the taste of bile rising up in her throat.  Soon, the frantic world darkened—turning cold and numb.  She gave into the deathly kiss of gravity, closing her eyes, rolling over as if to sleep.

	And just like that, the spinning stop.  She heard flapping wings pierce the air, and she felt the blood shifting in her body until she was plummeting no more.

	"Nnnngh... g-guh..."  It took some violent effort, but she was finally able to wrench one of her eyes open.  The dizziness was still there, but she could see the treetops slowly lowering around her.  She was coasting towards the forest floor, draped in a body's firm grip.  "Mmmff... A... Axan...?"

	There was no response.  Rainbow felt herself being gently rolled to a stop in the soft grass.  As her body slumped still, she caught a pony's bandaged leg in the starlight.

	The mare sputtered.  "J-Jerrio...?"

	The glint of his green eyes was unmistakable.  His serious face tilted down towards her.  Jerrio bent low, feeling her muzzle and neck with his hooves.  In a neutral tone, he murmured, "Breathe evenly.  Try to relax."

	She struggled with that.

	"I said breathe," he hissed.  "You're like a sparrow taking her first plunge from the tree branches."

	Rainbow twitched less and less.  Her eyes settled on the sway of leaves overhead.  At last, the shivers dissipated, and she once again felt her forelimbs through the fog of the moment.  "Nnnngh... whew..."  She sighed heavily. "Jerrio... Jerrio, thank you.  I... I c-couldn't stop what was happening.  If you hadn't flown by, I would have been a goner for sure."  Silence.  Rainbow blinked.  "Jerrio?"

	He was nowhere to be seen.  As a matter of fact, he was nowhere to be heard.

	Rainbow blinked nervously.  As her senses continued to coalesce, she felt remarkably lighter.  She rolled to her side, gasping—for Luna's saddlebag was no longer clinging to her flanks.  "The Sword!  Where—?"

	A length of metal glinted in the starlight.

	Rainbow's blood ran cold.  She glanced up weakly.  Gulping, she muttered, "Jerrio... wh-what are you doing?"

	From where she lay, she could see the stallion standing at an angle.  The length of the Sword lay in his grasp, and he stared at it intently with thin eyes.  "What gives you the right to control the Lights From Above?" he murmured in a dry voice.

	Rainbow swallowed hard and said, "Celestia can't talk to you right now, Jerrio.  It's nighttime."

	"I wasn't asking her."  A piercing green gaze pivoted and fell on Rainbow.  With a furrowed brow, the stallion gripped the sword tighter and said, "This is just an object.  I could carry this to the highest mists over Durandana and drop it to its doom.  I could hide it where nopony would ever see it.  I could even smash it to bits against the rocks that surround my home."

	"Jerrio..."  Rainbow's teeth showed.  "Listen to me!  Whatever you're th-thinking..." She shivered and sputtered, "Don't go through with it!  If you think that you can just—" Her words trailed off as her eyes twitched.

	Jerrio was gently laying the sword down in the grass before Rainbow Dash.  "But it wouldn't do any good, would it?" the stallion murmured in a melancholic tone.  "The damage is done.  The scrolls have been maligned.  And even if I actually did do away with the sword, the outside world would still come crashing in on us, one way or another."  A deep breath.  "Carried in on strange... frightening winds..."

	Rainbow shuddered.  "For a m-moment there, I thought you were g-gonna do something stupid."

	"Hrmmm..."  He sighed out his nostrils, gazing at his bandaged forelimb.  "I already did."

	"Hey..."  Rainbow smiled awkwardly.  "We all do crazy th—"

	"But I do not apologize for it!" he leaned forward and spat, teeth showing.  "Do you have any idea what this means?!  Do you have any idea what you have done to me and every pony I hold dear?!"

	Rainbow stared at him.  Her muzzle quivered.  "I-I'm starting to," she murmured.

	Jerrio fumed, fumed, then ultimately leaned back with a sigh.  "All my life, I've abided by the word of the Gray Feathers.  And here you come with a... sword of sorcery, claiming that there's some word that exists higher than the elders!"

	"Now nopony ever said that Celestia and Luna have greater authority than—"

	"Do not lie!" Jerrio snarled.  "It does not suit you!"  A heavy breath.  "Nor does fear..."

	Rainbow blinked, then frowned.  "Fine.  Fine.  You want the truth?  Gnnngh..."  With struggling muscles, she pushed herself up into a sitting position.  "Friggin' get over yourself!  So what if I rained on your damn parade?!  There's a huge world out there, Jerrio... a world that's huge and scary and violent—I know.  But get used to it!  That's what I had to do!  I thought I could take on the world beyond Equestria all lickety-split with nothing to care for but myself, but I realized it was all way... way bigger than me!  And the only thing that keeps me going is the hope that Harmony will win out for all of the ponies whose lives I've struggled to help!  And the same goes for you!  Even if you are being a stupid little jerk about it!"

	"How does any of this help me?  Help us?!" Jerrio snarled.  "I spent the entire afternoon arguing with my brothers and sisters!  Every breath was full of heat and eggshells!  Some are talking about exploring the world beyond the green!  Others are thinking that a terrible sickness has befallen the Gray Feathers!  And all of this because of you!"

	"Look, I'm sorry to be the bearer of bad news!" Rainbow grunted.  "But some day or another you dudes are going to have to own up to the fact that you're not alone in this world!  I know it's simple and easy to just dwell on the Gold Lights and the Valkyrie and nothing else, but you just can't stop reality!"

	Jerrio took several fuming breaths.  "Do you th-think that it is easy?"  He gulped.  "To g-give up flight, to give up love, to g-give up freedom and the color of one's m-mane... just to b-become a Gray Feather himself?"  His face paled slightly in the starlight, and his breath became ragged.  "To commit one's entire life to the scrolls... to forsake all levity and joy for the pursuit of the same scripture that h-has defined you from foaling 'til death?"

	Rainbow gazed at him softly. She blinked and said, "Seems like somepony's been struggling with the truth before I even came here..."

	Jerrio's eyes glistened.  He sat back and shiver slightly.  At last, he said, "I've struggled with my own selfish emotions for a long... long time.  I did not ask to be First-Born, but I dared not question it.  My only solace was that a life of commitment to the scrolls would provide me the answers I've sweated over for so long.  I would have solace... b-but now?"  He winced.  "I... I no longer have a center.  What kind of a world is this where the Lights shine on strangers and siblings alike?  And even the creatures who empower those Lights are fallible themselves?"  He sniffled and ran a hoof through his mane.  "It's just... too ugly... too frightening to comprehend.  I... I-I do not know how to even trust myself in this world you've painted for all of us..."

	Rainbow nodded slowly.  "Welcome to the club, pal," she said in a soft tone.  "It ain't all that fun at first.  But believe me..."  She smiled.  "It isn't all ugly."

	Jerrio narrowed his gaze on her.  "How do you cope?  How do you spend the rest of your days knowing that the enormity of everything dwarves you?"

	"Easy," Rainbow said.  "By being better than everything."

	"But that's impossible."

	"Doesn't mean I'm not gonna give it all I'm worth," she said, wheezing slightly at an aftershock of dizziness.  "Nnnngh... used to be that all I hated in life was losing.  But now?"  She gulped.  "The one thing that freaks me out is being a bad example, despite everything I've ever done.  I'd hate to fail Harmony now..."

	Jerrio trotted over.  He used his hoof to coil Rainbow's wings at her side.  "...this illness... this sickness that you have...?"

	"What about it?"

	"It is killing you, isn't it?"

	Rainbow bit her lip, and ultimately nodded.

	Jerrio's brow furrowed.  "Then just what does a pony like you have to gain from all of this?"

	At last, Rainbow wheezed, "I-I just want us all to get together as one flock."

	Jerrio squinted at her.  "And you think the Gray Feathers will actually allow this?"

	She gazed straight back.  "You think it's gonna matter?"

	He had no response.

	Rainbow took several deep breaths.  On wobbly legs, she stood up, exhaling in relief.  "I... I-I think I'm good to go..."  She slid the sword back into her saddlebag and limply slipped it on.  "Mrmmmf... just... j-just gotta get back to the Noble Jury.  Thanks, Jerrio... I-I think I can fly back now."

	"No."  The stallion shook his head before trotting over to help even her balance.  He spread his wings over the both of them.  "Not on your own, you can't..."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Greatest Triumph There Is		//------------------------------//

	"Rainbow Dash!"  Bellesmith exclaimed, galloping up to the Noble Jury's edge alongside Eagle Eye and Pilate.  "There you are!  We were so worried!"

	"Heh... wh-why should you be?" Rainbow Dash said with a slight smirk.  She nevertheless winced as she unhooked a forelimb from around Jerrio's neck.  The stallion helped her down to the ship's top deck with gently flapping wings.  "I just t-took a detour on the way back.  That's all—whoah."  She teetered as soon as her hooves touched down.

	Eagle Eye steadied her with expert telekinesis.  "Yeesh.  You're really out of it, aren't you?"

	"Some of us have better luck staying out than in, Eagle..."

	"Hardy har har."  Eagle glanced over his shoulder.  "Belle?"

	"Right."  The mare nodded and reached in to support Rainbow's shoulder.  "Hammock time."

	"Hooo boy..."  Rainbow wheezed, hobbling alongside Belle.  "I certainly won't argue with that."

	"You've had a long day," Belle said with a smile.  "No shame in retiring early."

	"Ugh.  Really, Belle.  Don't use the 'r' word."

	"S-sorry..."

	"Is the Sword of Solstice in one piece?" Pilate asked.

	"I'm fine, Stripesy.  Thanks for asking," Rainbow muttered.

	"The sword is undamaged," Jerrio said, hovering in place.  "I made sure of that."

	Pilate tilted his head towards the stallion.  "Is that so?"

	Jerrio didn't respond.  He watched as Eagle Eye and Belle helped Rainbow into the cockpit and down the vertical crawlspace of the Noble Jury.  "Just how long has she been dying?"

	Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  He said, "Always."

	"You knew this when you befriended her?"

	Pilate nodded.

	"And yet... you stuck by her side?"

	"She stuck by our side," Pilate said.  "When all we had in our lives was lost and when everything we once trusted had turned on us, Rainbow clung to us like our own fur and led us out of a land of pure destruction."

	"Is that so...?"

	"Have the two of you been talking?"

	"Yes.  But not about her past," Jerrio said.

	"It's quite an epic tale," Pilate remarked.  "With abundant heartache... but great triumph as well."

	"Have you ever once considered..."  Jerrio hovered lower, gazing intently at the blind zebra.  "...that your lives would have been better off if she had never crossed paths with you to begin with?"

	Pilate was silent.

	"That perhaps all of the things that you're grateful to her for are simply coincidences?"  Jerrio leaned his head to the side.  "And your lives have actually been sacrificed by her own intervention?"

	After a deep breath, Pilate said, "Do I regret leaving our quiet cabin back in Blue Shelf?  Do I regret having become enemies of the Ledomaritan Confederacy and having to live life on the run?"  He slowly nodded.  "Not a day goes by when I don't wish things had been easier on us.  But I wouldn't have it any other way."

	Jerrio squinted.  "And just why is that?"

	"Because I would prefer to die in my beloved's arms as a free and righteous pony rather than suffer a life where I submitted one more day to a manipulative regime built on lies and deceit," Pilate said.  He took a step forward, speaking in the Durandanan's direction.  "Complacency is one of the blackest sins ever, and it can adapt itself to any life and any environment.  But just because one feels comfortable with a way of life doesn't make it a good one."

	Jerrio frowned.  "Every time I hear about the lands beyond the greens, I am disgusted.  As far as I'm concerned, it's a disgusting world."

	"But it is also a good world."

	"How do you know that?"

	Pilate's lips curved.  "Because there are ponies like Rainbow Dash in it."  A pause, and then he added, "And ponies like you."

	Jerrio blinked awkwardly.  "I don't understand..."

	Pilate turned his head towards the cockpit.  "It's no mere miracle that Rainbow Dash arrived here safely so late..."  He turned back towards Jerrio.  "And with the Sword of Solstice... is it?"

	Jerrio was dead silent.

	"Rainbow has immense respect and faith in you pegasi," Pilate said, then shuffled towards the stern as he felt his way to the stairwell.  "For a while, I didn't quite understand why... until now."

	The stallion's wings went slack.  He perched on the ship's railing, gazing off in silence.

	"Have a blessed First Light, friend," Pilate said from a distance.

	Jerrio cleared his throat and nodded.  "Likewise..."



	Hours passed.

	Rainbow tossed and turned in her hammock.

	She winced, her lips murmuring indecipherable words.

	At last, with a gasp, she jerked up in the swinging bed.

	"Gnngh!  Discord!  Guys, h-he...!"

	Silence.

	Rainbow panted and panted.  Her eyes twitched as her body went limp.  Gritting her teeth, Rainbow covered her face with her forelimbs.  She sat there for a while, combating shivers.

	At last, stretching one wing after another, she hovered off the cockpit and landed on the floor of the observation room.  She almost stumbled upon a warm body.  Squinting in the starlight, she spotted Bellesmith lying on a mess of gathered blankets.  The mare had chosen to stay close to Rainbow overnight.

	Glancing towards the doorway, Rainbow saw Pilate—likewise asleep—lying with his haunches propped up against the doorframe.  She gazed at the couple in silence.

	Belle's breaths shuddered slightly.  She curled up, hugging her exposed body.

	Rainbow gently grasped the edge of a blanket in her teeth and laid it over Belle's figure.  The mare relaxed in mid-sleep, her breaths growing softer, quieter.

	Without saying a word, Rainbow drifted out of the observation room altogether.



	Ascending the crawlspace to the second floor, Rainbow evened out then hovered down the thin hallway full of sleeping cabins.  Halfway towards the mess hall, she stopped, levitating in place.

	She leaned her head towards one cabin door.  Inside, she could hear Eagle Eye's even breaths.  They weren't alone.  Another stallion was sleeping peacefully alongside him.

	Rainbow inched from the doorway without a word.  After a contemplative breath, she glided into the mess hall and through the kitchen beyond.



	With a quiet squeak, Rainbow twisted open the rear hatch to the engine room.  Her ruby eyes squinted against the lavender glow coming from the tome in the very center of the compartment.

	Beyond a glossy sea of consoles, Rainbow spotted a cot lying just beside Props' workbench and communications array.  Two figures were fast asleep on the bed.  A blonde pony nestled in the limbs of a lanky stallion while his forelimbs gently wrapped around her.

	Even from afar, Rainbow could see soft smiles on Props' and Zaid's muzzles.  She gazed at them for a little while, then made a quiet exit, closing the engine room door as quietly as she could behind her.



	Rainbow lingered.  She hesitated.

	Her limbs fidgeted beneath her, and she was biting her lip to the point of bleeding.

	At last, after one or two deep breaths, she found the nerve to knock on the door in front of her.

	There was no response.

	She knocked again.

	Still, dead silence.

	At last, holding her breath, Rainbow went on ahead and opened the door to the lower hangar.

	She peered her head into the compartment, glancing left and right.  As the shadowed interior came into focus, she realized that there was no sign of Roarke.  There was no sign of the Lounge transport either.  The place was completely empty.

	A very familiar feeling.

	Rainbow Dash sighed.

	"She's out, in case you're wondering."

	Rainbow Dash spun around.  "Huh?"

	Kera stood against the doorframe, rubbing her tired eyes with a little hoof.  "Mmmff... you're looking for Roarke, aren't you?"

	Rainbow Dash squinted.  "Shouldn't you be in bed, kid?" she whispered.

	Kera frowned.  "Why's that always the first thing that comes out of adults' mouths these days?"

	"Because it's the easiest thing," Rainbow droned.  "You'll use it when you're my age.  Trust me."

	"You'll be a lot older by then," Kera said with a smirk.  "Like... wrinkly old.  So wouldn't I be saying the same thing to you?"

	"I doubt you'll have to worry about that."

	"Huh?"

	Rainbow sighed and flew past her, ascending the stairwell.  "Go to bed, kid."



	Rainbow Dash sat along the port side of the Noble Jury.  Waves of crickets echoed from the treetops below.  She kept facing the east horizon, watching as a thin glow of gold light formed along the distant Sky Stabs.

	Breathing deeply, she closed her eyes and spread her wings, focusing on the brief currents of warm wind that blew her bangs in intermittent waves.

	From behind her:  "She'll be back eventually, y'know.  I'm sure if you hung around long enough, you could talk to her then."

	Rainbow sighed and opened her eyes.  "What part of 'go to bed' don't you understand?"

	"Oh, I understand it," Kera said in a warm voice as she waddled closer.  "I just don't give a flying feather."

	"Hah.  Cute," Rainbow blurted in a neutral tone.  "You can make a pegasus pun."

	"I knew you'd like it."

	"Kera, what are—?"  Rainbow stopped in mid speech, clenched her teeth, and sighed in defeat.  "Mmmmf... I-I haven't been very awesome, lately."

	"Huh?"

	She turned to look over her shoulder with a tired smile.  "I haven't been keeping track of you.  I'm sorry for that, kid."

	"You... uh..."  Kera squirmed where she stood.  "You've been very busy n'stuff."

	"Still, it's no excuse.  You guys are like family to me."  Rainbow stood up and shuffled around until she faced her.  "How are you doing, girl?"

	"You mean... you're not gonna keep grinding my gears over being up?"

	"That'd be like... uhm... the pot holder drawing the corn kernel black... or something."

	Kera giggled.  "How about we both stick to stuff we understand saying?"

	"Pffft.  Agreed."  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "I'm no Belle or Pilate."

	"You could say that again."

	Rainbow tilted her head aside.  "You don't like them?  I figured they were basically your folks by now."

	"Please... I love 'em to death!"  Kera trotted over to Rainbow's side.  "But you wouldn't be you if you just repeated them all the time."  Her emerald eyes narrowed like daggers.  "Especially around me."

	Rainbow gulped.  "Gotya."

	"You've been sick or something?"

	"Huh?"

	"Everypony on the Jury keeps talking about how you keep getting dizzier and dizzier," Kera said.  "A lot of them are worried sick, but I don't think they've got the guts to talk about it."

	Rainbow gulped.  "Even Roarke?"

	Kera blinked.  "Why you so bent out of shape over Roarke?"

	Rainbow bit her lip and looked away.  "Forget I ever said anything."

	"Why?"

	"Because... it's n-not important..."

	"Why?"

	"Because it's true!" Rainbow suddenly barked.  "I am sick and it's not getting any better!"

	Kera leaned back, blinking awkwardly.

	Rainbow winced.  "I... I-I'm sorry, kid... I..."  She ran a hoof through her hair and shuddered.  "Enough about me."  She gulped.  "How are you holding up?  For real, though?"

	"I... uhm... I'm getting along, I guess."  Kera squatted down on folded legs.  "At least I think so..."

	"Oh yeah?"

	Kera sighed out her nostrils.  "Yeah."  She gulped.  "But, like, everytime I think I'm A-Okay... something rears its ugly head and I'm a shivering mess."  She rolled her eyes.  "I can't stand it.  And, if you don't mind, I'd rather not talk about it."

	"Heh... fair enough," Rainbow said.  "But, for what it's worth, you're doing super-well in my book."

	"Since when did you read books?"

	"I mean it, kid," Rainbow said.  "An adoracute little smartass is a stone's throw from a drooling ragdoll anyday."

	"Heeheehee..."  Kera smirked.  "I wasn't that bad."

	"Yeah."  Rainbow nodded firmly.  "You were."

	"Mrmmmff..."  Kera rested a pouting chin on her forelimbs and stared off.  "Whatever.  At least Belle, Pilate, and Roarke have been super supportive."

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow.  "Roarke?"

	"Mmmmhmmmm."

	"What did Roarke do?"

	"She let me throw a huge boulder at her."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Oh..."  She blinked again.  "...really?"

	"Yeah.  I nearly killed her.  It was cool."

	"Sounds like it."

	"Apparently I've got a lot of super powerful mana juice inside me or something," Kera said.  "I mean, I knew I always had what it took to make major sparkles happen, but apparently it's all real earth-shattering stuff."  Kera shrugged.  "I used to think having that much power would be cool.  But now that I'm owning up to it..."

	"It weighs on you a lot more than you had hoped, huh?"

	"Yeah.  Kinda sorta."  Kera tilted her chin up.  "How did you know?"

	"Because I've lived it, girl," Rainbow murmured with a nod.  "Through in through."

	Silence.

	Kera asked, "So... are these ponies your brothers and sisters or something?"

	"Hmmm?"

	"You keep spending long days outside of the ship, hanging with these pegasi."

	"Yeah.  I guess I have."

	"The others are saying that it's because they're related to you or something."

	"More or less.  I mean... they're descendants of ancient Equestrians."

	"That's where you came from, though, right?"  Kera asked.  "Equestria?"

	"Heh.  You know your stuff, kid."

	"So... are you going to point them west so that they could fly home or something?"

	Rainbow gulped.  "It's not that simple.  And even if it were, I wouldn't have them leave this place."

	"Why not?"

	"Just because they're descendants of ancient Equestrians doesn't mean that they absolutely belong in Equestria."  Rainbow took a deep breath.  "However... they do deserve to know about where they came from."

	"If they've been living here for so long, I can't imagine they'd give a crap."

	"Yeah, well, there's no sense in letting them live on without knowing the truth."

	"Sounds like something Pilate would say."

	"And lemme guess," Rainbow murmured.  "Not what Belle would say."

	Kera shrugged.  She tapped her chin, then looked up.  "What do you think?"

	"I... I think..."  Rainbow lingered.  "...I think that I can only do so much for these guys.  I've done too much as it is to leave them on their own."

	"Huh?"  Kera blinked.  "What do you mean?"

	Rainbow was silent.

	"Rainbow...?"

	"Can... can you k-keep a secret, kid?" Rainbow murmured.  "If it meant a lot to me?"

	Kera silently nodded and nodded.

	After a deep breath, Rainbow gazed off the ship's side and said, "I don't think we'll be having many future conversations like this.  Face it.  We're out of Ledomare.  Stratopolis is a bunch of burning ashes.  Elma got dropped off someplace where she'll be happy.  On top of that, you guys have what it takes to deal with Val Roa.  But as for me..."

	"You're... y-you're staying?"

	"Please..."  Rainbow gritted her teeth.  "I... I-I still gotta figure out a way to break it to Pilate and Belle.  But... it's the only thing that makes sense at this point."

	"How does this m-make sense?!" Kera stammered.  "I mean... you're the whole reason the Noble Jury sticks together!"

	"We stick together because we're a damn good team," Rainbow said.  "And it'll do well even with one member short."

	"You're not just a member, Rainbow Dash!"  Kera stood up, shaking slightly.  "You're the most awesome pegasus there is!"

	"Kera..."

	"Are you crazy?!"  Kera frowned.  "We can't do crap in Val Roa without you!"

	"That's something you're going to have to deal with one way or another!" Rainbow hissed back.  Then, her ears drooped as she spoke in a calmer tone.  "I... I-I don't have much in me left, Kera."

	Kera blinked.  "Your illness," she murmured.

	"If I stick with you guys, I'm just dead weight," Rainbow said.  "It's time I faced the music.  I've had my tailwind, Kera, and it gave me some good distance.  But now?"  She shook her head.  "I'll be lucky if I make it out of this crater alive.  And even then... what good would I do?  If I'm gonna kerplunk, I'd best do it in a place where I don't have to slow anypony down."

	"So, you'd rather die here instead?"

	"I... I'm of some use here," Rainbow said.  "These pegasi can learn a lot from me, and I'm sure I could learn a lot from them.  I mean... all this 'Austraeoh' crap has been about fate this and destiny that.  Doesn't seem like no small coincidence that Durandana would exist here of all places, at the end of my journey."

	Kera's eyes narrowed.  "It's only your end if you make it, Dash."

	"I'm no more a fan of it than you are, kid.  But a strong mare knows when her number's up."  Rainbow gulped, her voice hoarse.  "It's been awesome, but... I-I just can't do it any longer."

	Kera shivered slightly, hanging her head.  "Why'd you tell me, then?  Before the others, I mean."

	"'Cuz you're a lot stronger than everypony gives you credit for, Kera," Rainbow said with a slight smirk.  "Perhaps Roarke has been the first to help you see your own potential.  If that's so, good for her.  But sooner than you know it, you'll have to step up and prove yourself to everypony else.  They'll try and treat you with foal's gloves, only because they love you. But you can't let that stop you from pulling your own weight and saving their skin when the moment demands it."

	"You mean Belle and Pilate?"

	"Especially Belle and Pilate.  They're a good pair, those ponies, but they can be real sissies every once and a while.  Countless times, I'ved had to ignore all of their whimpering and just kick flank for them anyways.  I figure the same thing's gonna be true with you, kid, because you're getting old and they're not getting any younger and who knows what's in store for the Jury in Val Roa."

	"The way you talk about us..."  Kera tried not to sniffle, but failed.  "It's like you know us inside and out."

	"I can't help it, kiddo," Rainbow said.  "We're like family.  And I'm sorry if it hurts to hear me say all this, but there's no sense in padding it up any."  She gulped.  "Back where I come from, there was a little foal with a lot of spunk... kind of like you.  And I discovered too late how important it was to sh-share with her a piece of my mind... to tell her how much I believed in her."  Rainbow gulped.  "And I believe in you, Kera.  You've got what it takes to go places... even longer distances than me."

	Kera's head was bowed.  She shook and shivered.

	"Kid... come on..."  Rainbow trotted softly towards her.  "Look at me..."

	"If you say th-that we're like f-family..."  Kera looked up, her eyes glossy.  "Then why are you leaving us, Rainbow Dash?"

	Rainbow froze in her tracks.

	Kera frowned as a tear ran down her tattooed face.  "What do these winged freaks got that we haven't?"

	"They... th-they aren't freaks, Kera.  They're Equestrians at heart and—"

	"So what?!"  Kera stomped her hooves.  "They don't know how awesome you are!  They haven't had their skin saved ten times over by you in the past!"

	"Kera—"

	"They haven't survived dragons and chaos creeps and Xonans and zombies with you!" Kera's voice cracked.  "And you're gonna ditch us just to cuddle up with them?!"

	"You think I like making this decision?!"

	"Then don't do it!" Kera barked.  "You're awesome!  You can do whatever you want!"

	"Kera, I'm dying.  Don't you get it?"

	"And don't you?!"  Kera frowned even harder.  "When has that ever stopped you?  When in your entire friggin' life has that stopped you from chasing the sun and going the distance?!"

	Rainbow was suddenly speechless.

	Kera took a shuddering breath.  "I know you care about these guys.  They mean a lot to you.  But—like—more than Belle and Pilate?!  More than Eagle Eye and Josho and Propsy and Zaid and Ebon and Floydien?!"  She gulped.  "More than me?"

	"You... guys mean everything to me, Kera," Rainbow stammered.  "You... you know that..."

	Kera hung her head again.  She muttered bitterly, "I once made a decision to stay someplace and leave you guys.  I thought it was the right thing to do.  I thought it was best for everypony.  But I was wrong."

	"Oh Kera..."

	"I should have made a decision based on my heart.  And look where it got me!"

	Rainbow reached in and scooped Kera towards her in a hug.  "It's... it's not the same, Kera.  Don't think like that..."

	"Isn't it, though?"  Kera buried her face in Rainbow's chest.  "You belong here, Rainbow Dash.  You belong with your family."

	"Kera, I... I-I just can't stick around forever," Rainbow stammered.  "I'm in a race where I cannot win."

	"And since when did that st-stop you?"  Kera looked up with wet eyes.  "I thought you hated losing."

	"I know, it's j-just that..."  Rainbow blinked awkwardly in mid speech.  She held Kera closer as she gazed off towards the western horizon.  "... I-I suppose I gave up that hate."  She gulped.  "I gave it up for ignorance.  I knew my lease would be up eventually.  I chose to keep on flying anyways.  But you gotta understand, Kera.  That's not a triumph.  That's—"

	"You're alive, Rainbow," Kera said.  "You're all that's left of your friends, your home.  And yet you've carried it all this far."  Kera sniffled.  "Isn't that triumphant enough?"

	Rainbow's eyes narrowed.  "You're something bigger than the legacy of Lerris, kid.  Don't you ever think different."

	Kera snarled, "And I intend to prove it.  Can you say the same?"

	Rainbow's ears folded.

	"Don't ever stop flying, Rainbow," Kera said.  "It's what makes you you."

	Rainbow breathed and breathed harder.  Her eyes moistened as she murmured, "I-I can't just leave these ponies."  She gulped.  "Not after what they've learned.  They need guidance.  They need answers..."

	"And is that your job to do?"

	"Of course, I have to—"

	"Is it something you can do?"

	Rainbow's muzzle hung open.  She eventually sighed.  "No."  A cold shudder.  "No, it's not..."

	Kera stared at her.

	Rainbow blinked.  Slowly, like a sunrise, a warm smile crept across her lips.  "But it's somepony else's..."  She grinned.  She beamed.  "Yeah..."  Her wings fluttered.  "Yeah..."  A giggle; a chuckle.  "No friggin' duh!  Why haven't I thought of it before?"

	Kera stuck her tongue out.  "'Cuz you're a damned idiot?"

	"And a lucky one!"  Rainbow spiraled up into the air, tossing Kera in her forelimbs.  "Woohoo!  Kera, you're the best foal this damned idiot could ever ask for!"

	"Uhhhhh..."  Kera winced into Rainbow's chest as the pegasus hugged her.  "You're welcome?  Also... ew?"



	At Second Light, Fawful stood with her muzzle agape.  She turned to glance back at the other Gray Feathers of Central D, all of which looked no less shocked.  She pivoted back to face Rainbow.  "You wish to do what?"

	"It's not something I wish to do," Rainbow said.  "It's something I'm going to do."  She unsheathed the Sword of Solstice from her saddlebag.  As the golden glow illuminated her face and the Durandanans around her, she held it out towards Fawful.  "Take it.  Keep it.  It was a gift from Princess Celestia to Commander Hurricane.  You already have at least one artifact of the Valkyrie's.  It's fitting you get the blade that matches that armor."

	"But... but..."  Fawful glanced at the sword, squirmed, and gawked at Rainbow Dash.  "Rainbow, your travels.  Surely you need this to speak with your rulers back home!"

	"I've got Luna's moon spell to do that," Rainbow said.  "And... heh... let's face it.  Havin' this sexy sword was a little too convenient.  Even a magical talking space elk can't top that."

	"But... but..."

	"Believe me, it ain't easy," Rainbow said.  "Not just giving this thing up, but the whole 'Austraeoh' business that defines me as well."  She looked at the elders who were gathered atop the platform.  "For so long, I've been trying to figure out if my life is something made from destiny or made from choice.  And I'm starting to think that maybe it's both.  It doesn't make sense to me that I'd be dying before I finish my travels, but it does make sense that this sword belongs to you..." She finally dropped it in Fawful's hooves.  "And so do the words of Princess Celestia.  You can't rightfully make a decision concerning the knowledge you've learned overnight.  Let Equestria's ruler guide you... slowly... faithfully... over time and at a pace that you deem fit."

	"And... your Princess agrees to this?" another elder asked.

	Rainbow nodded.  "I already had a long, long talk with her and Luna about it," she said.  "It's why I showed up so late today.  They think it's poetic justice at it's finest.  I couldn't agree more."  She bore a bittersweet grin.  "Face it.  As awesome as this place is, I really don't belong here."  She shook her head.  "I'm a different kind of awesome.  And if I stuck around... I-I just wouldn't be home."

	"Then just what is your home, Rainbow?" Fawful asked.

	"Something I gave up a long, long time ago," Rainbow said.  She gulped.  "My crew... my family needs me, even if for just a little while longer.  Dying or not, I'll take each sunrise as it comes.  That's how I've always done it, and I wouldn't be myself if I didn't do that which I do best.  It's how I win at things, after all."

	Fawful nodded... then nodded again.  She held the sword close to her body.  "Since the first time we talked, I knew you were capable of great wisdom, though you hide it with great humility."

	"You're not too shabby yourself, babe," Rainbow said with a wink.

	She smiled, but another elder trotted up with a worried expression.  "I only wish it was this simple, outsider."

	"What do you mean?"

	"Since yesterday's conversation with your princesses, there's been a great deal of anxiety and worrisome debate among the Towers."

	"In what way?"

	"Despite the Gray Feathers' insistence, there's a small group of Durandanans who feel passionately about seeing the world beyond the Greens.  Though we're certain they haven't turned their backs on the scrolls, we fear that they will not be at rest until they see for themselves the world that your rulers have spoken of."

	"Like..." Rainbow leaned her head to the side.  "They wanna ditch this place?"

	"Whatever they want, they will still be stuck here," another elder said.  "We simply do not have the means of leaving this basin.  Only you and your fellow outsiders have the technology to depart."

	Fawful spoke up, "Rainbow, not to put a great burden on you, but I fear for Durandana's future."  She gulped.  "It may be a small group now, but if other youths catch wind of the passion that these gusters have, then what may have started as an intense curiosity could turn into an unsettling rebellion."

	"Haven't you considered giving them the freedom to—y'know—leave this place?"

	"Don't you understand?!" an elder exclaimed.  "We don't even know how!  Nopony does!"

	To that, Rainbow smirked devilishly.  "Well, you're in luck.  Because I can totally show you how..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Your Fast Dash to Soarin'		//------------------------------//

	Roarke trotted through the jungle until she had a break in the forest's ceiling.  She tilted her head up, her eye-lenses focusing on a cluster of clouds above.  Several winged figures were congregating around the wisps of moisture, and one prismatic pony in particular was zipping speedily through the mess, causing the clouds to cluster tighter and thicker together.

	With flaring nostrils, Roarke muttered something to herself, turned her back to the scene, and marched to where her experimental weapons lay in wait.



	"Yah!  Haah!  Zaat!  And loop the loop around and—"  Rainbow came down from one last spiraling glide and kicked a final cluster of mists into the main cloud gathered before her.  "—yeah!"  Panting, she nestled down atop one cloud, sitting with a smug face.  "What'd I tell you?"

	"I dunno..."  Kitsune folded her forelimbs from where she hovered alongside Sivrem.  "Felt like more than ten seconds to me."

	"Pffft.  That's not the point."  Rainbow rolled her eyes, then pointed at the large cloud again.  "Do you see this or don't ya?"

	"Indeed we do."  Sivrem smiled.  "It's a cloud."

	"Not just any cloud... but one that I've compacted using pegasus weather flying skills!"  Rainbow smirked at the First-Borns.  "You do know how to weather fly, don't you?"

	"Uhhhhhhhhhhhhh..."

	"Didn't think so."  Rainbow reclined on her side, pressing her hoof into a plushy cloud.  "You ever sit on a cloud before, dude?"

	"Absolutely."  Sivrem nodded.  "Plenty of times."

	"Yes, all Durandanans can," Kitsune remarked.  "Even from a sparrow's age.  We've always considered it a gift from the Valkyrie."

	"But we can't sit on a cloud for too long," Sivrem said.  "Eventually, the mists dissipate, carried off beyond the greens."

	"Is that so?"  Rainbow gestured at the cloud.  "Try flying through it now."

	Sivrem simply squinted at her.

	"Come on!"  Rainbow grinned brightly.  "Do it!"

	"Hrmmm..."  Sivrem cracked his neck joints as he flapped his wings harder.  "Hate to mess up your hard work."

	"Don't worry."  Rainbow yawned.  "You won't."

	"Hrnnnnngh...!"  Sivrem backflipped, picked up speed, and hurled himself at the cloud.

	"Errrr..."  Rainbow was already wincing.  "Maybe not quite so fast—!"

	WHAM!  Sivrem's body pinballed off the cloud like it was a solid brick wall.

	"Sivrem!" Kitsune gasped.  In a blink, her body had darted down below in time to catch his dizzied figure.  "Are you alright?!"

	"Guhhhhh..."  Sivrem's eyes rolled until he shook the cobwebs clear.  "Feather my insides!"  He rubbed his head as he glanced up at the cloud.  "Been a long time since I've been whalloped that hard."

	"Heh..."  Kitsune smirked.  "Like that last fight you had with Drenner before he became a Gray-Feather."

	"Rainbow, care to explain?"  Sivrem hovered upright, squinting at the cloud.  "I've never seen a cloud stay put like that before."

	"Because you've never compacted it with weather flying skills before!"  Rainbow said with a proud smirk.  "And—for your information—it doesn't have to 'stay put.'"

	"Huh?"

	"This is the kind of stuff that cities like Cloudsdale and Las Pegasus are made out of!"  Rainbow Dash said.  "Pegasopolis was the same thing.  You see..."  Rainbow trotted briskly across the cloud top.  "...Harmony empowers the pegasus body to walk on clouds—as well as manipulate the weather.  If I wanted, I could turn this into a thunderstorm, make it produce lightning, and even generate hail!"  She turned about and winked.  "And, no, it's not because I'm related to the Valkyrie or some noise.  Every pegasus can do this.  All it takes is knowing how nature works and learning how to bend the rules... just a teeeeeeeny bit."

	"Then how come we've never been able to do it before?" Kitsune said.

	"Probably because you were never taught the tools of the trade," Rainbow explained.  "All you've known or cared about these past few millennia is looking after the scrolls of Duranda.  That's all good n'all, but—at the same time—the ability to fly your sexy flanks out of here has been hiding right under your muzzles!"  Rainbow blinked.  "Or, y'know, above them."  She giggled.

	"So... what you're saying..."  Sivrem pointed, fumbling for words.  "...is that this cloud can take us out of the basin?"

	"You wanna find out for yourself?"

	"Uhhhh... when?"

	Rainbow's ruby eyes lit up.  "Now."



	"Color wheel boomer is certain Floydien shouldn't follow her mist glimmer?" the elk asked from the starboard side of the hovering Jury.  "To protect from gravity's spit?"

	"If you wanna have Eagle keep his snazzy eye on us, that's fine, Floydien," Rainbow said as she stood on the cloud drifting slowly past West D's tower.  "But, if I'm gonna prove that this thing can work, it's gotta work on its own ya feel me?"

	"Hrmmf..."  Floydien's nostrils flared.  "If the boomer insists."  He turned and trotted inside the Jury's cockpit.  "Floydien will think up a touching eulogy."

	"Yeah.  That may not be such a bad idea."  Rainbow gulped.  "Generally speaking, I mean."  She nevertheless threw on a happy smile and turned towards her winged partners.  "We all ready to go?"

	"Just about."  Sivrem turned about from where he stood atop the bulky cloud.  "Smythe!  Jagold!  Hurry it up!"

	"Yeah!" Rayvinne chirped, hovering alongside Kitsune.  "Let's gust already!"

	"We're c-coming!"  Jagold glided down, but stopped just inches from the crowd.  "Mmmmmm..."  She whimpered to herself, squirming at the sight of the coagulated mists.  "Is... is it g-gonna hurt me?"

	"Come on, girl!"  Smythe swatted her on the back with his wing.  "Every gull knows you like it fluffy!"

	"Aack!"  Jagold landed, sprawled across the cloudbed.  She blinked, her ears perking up.  "Hey!  It is fluffy!"

	"Story of my life," Rayvinne droned.  She turned towards Rainbow Dash.  "So, you 'built' this yourself, huh?"

	"Yup!"  Rainbow nodded.  "And for the return trip, I'm gonna show you how to build you your own!"

	"That's assuming we don't get dashed to meaty ribbons across the mountaintops," Rayvinne said.

	"Hey.  You volunteered to come along."

	"Mmmmhmmm..."  Rayvinne's eyes went thin above a warm smile.  "And I can't think of another pony whose arms I'd rather die in."

	"Uhhhhhhhhhhhh huh..."  Rainbow pivoted about.  "On that note, we ready to go or what?"

	Sivrem opened his mouth—

	"Not quite yet."

	Everypony turned and looked up.

	"Jerrio...?"  Kitsune blinked akwardly.

	The First-Born in question touched down with a canvas bag bulging with items.  "There's no telling how long this venture will take," he said, settling down on the cloud.  "We're going to need food and water for the trip beyond the greens."

	"What do you mean we?" Smythe asked.

	Jagold gasped.  "You're coming along too?!"

	Jerrio glanced calmly aside.  "But of course.  You're going to need somepony responsible to make sure this goes off without any problems."

	Sivrem squinted.  "You mean we're going to need somepony to report every damn detail to the Gray Feathers like the pigeon-tailed sissy he is."

	"Mmmmm... yes."  Jerrio's muzzle curved ever so slightly.  "Something to that extent."

	"I thought as much."  Sivrem turned to Rainbow Dash, sighing with a tired smile.  "I believe we're a go."

	"Groovy!"

	"Erm..."  Smythe fidgeted.  "Just how is this going to work?"

	"The key is not to think that the cloud is an object," Rainbow said.  "But—instead—a piece of ourselves.  I mean... we built it."

	"You built it," Kitsune said.

	Rainbow stuck her tongue out.  "A maiden voyage is best led by the maiden herself."

	"Do you seriously believe that?" Rayvinne asked.

	"I do now.  Alright, everypony.  Spread out."

	"In what way...?"

	"There's only seven of us, and we need to get this cloud moving against the wind.  So... four in the back.  two in the center.  I'll take point."

	"Huh?"

	"What I mean is that I'll be up front.  Now—for the ponies in the back—we want the outside wingponies to be the strongest."

	"Guess that means Sivrem and Kitsune."

	"Hrmmm..."  Jerrio murmured to himself.

	Sivrem smirked.  "Would you like to say something, First-Born?"

	"I'll take the middle with Smythe."

	"Hey!"  Jagold frowned.  "I'm not that weak!"

	Rayvinne glided past her, murmuring in her ear.  "Yes you are."

	"Ohhhh..." Jagold melodically sighed, following the other mare.  "I guess you're right."

	"Alright!" Kitsune sounded off from the rear of the cloud.  "We're in position!"

	"Are we doing what I think we're doing?!" Smythe remarked.

	"Yup!"  Rainbow took her spot at the very front of the cloud.  The group formed a triangular "V" that fanned out towards the rear.  "On my mark, you're going to start beating your wings.  I'll get our position started, and then when I shout 'left,' I want Smythe and Kitsune to angle us towards the right.  When I shout 'right,' I want Jerrio and Sivrem to angle us to the left!  Got it?"

	"I... th-think so?"

	"Once we get enough momentum, the cloud will pretty much carry itself!"

	"What about ascending—"

	"I'll take care of it!  What's more, I'll show you how it's done when the time comes!  Just trust me!"

	"Uh... sure thing..."

	"Alright, everypony!"  Rainbow Dash raised her hoof.  "Southbound Express for Beyond the Greens!  Let's roll!"



	Across the deck of the Noble Jury, several ponies stood, watching with baited breath.  Before their eyes, the angular cloud picked up speed and started cruising its way south.

	"It's moving!"  Kera squeaked, hopping up and down across Bellesmith's back.  "It's moving!"

	"Absolutely remarkable," Belle murmured, a soft grin plastered across her muzzle.  She brushed shoulders with Pilate.  "Beloved, I wish you could see this."

	"Hmmm..."  The zebra smiled.  "I can hear it just fine."

	Belle squinted at him.  "But... it's not making any noise."

	"I know, and that's the beauty of it."  He chuckled.  "Imagine, a vehicle built by clouds... powered by ponies alone."

	"Winged ponies, you mean," Propsy said.

	"Well, true."

	"I wonder why we've never seen Rainbow do something like this before," Eagle murmured from where he stood with Ebon.

	"Maybe you haven't, EE," Belle said with a smile.  "But Pilate and I have witnessed Rainbow do some cloudplay in our day."

	"I've seen her do it," Zaid said with a proud smirk.

	Props blinked up at him.  "You have?"

	"Heck yeah!"  He hung a forelimb around her shoulder.  "It's how the Terrific Trio snuck aboard the Lightning Bearer!  Pegasus Cloud Power!  Yeah!"

	Josho raised an eyebrow.  "'Terrific Trio?'"

	"Yup!  Me, Rainbow Kickass, and Roarke Most Rawwwwr."

	"Hmmm..."  Josho smirked.  "'More like Damnable Duo Plus One Jackass.'"

	"Hey!"  Zaid frowned at the fat stallion.  "I provided charisma!"

	"I bet you provided plenty of urine too, from how much you flew."

	"Meh.  At that height, it would have frozen as it came out.  I know.  This one time, I tried taking a leak off the side of Khao's skystone ship."  He shivered.  "Last time I drank applejuice over a mile high."

	Props giggled.

	"Say..."  Ebon spoke up.  "Just where is Roarke, anyway?"

	Belle sighed.  "I wish I could say.  Just a day or two ago, she was opening up.  We actually got the chance to talk about things like normal friends."

	"Then what happened?" Ebon asked.

	"I... I'm not certain."

	"I'm sure it had nothing to do with Blondie commandeering Roarke's only piece of moving property!" Zaid said with a grin.

	"Errrm..."  Props squirmed.  "I think I'll b-be sleeping with my wrench close beside me this month."

	"Would I make a good substitute?"

	"I dunno.  Can you twist a pipe loose with your teeth?"

	"Heeheehee!" Ebon giggled.

	Eagle turned to smirk at him.  "Having fun?"

	"Hmmm..."  Ebon smiled calmly, leaning his neck against Eagle's mane.  "Something like that..."

	Eagle reciprocated, nuzzling him gently.

	Kera smiled at the two, then tilted her head up to gaze proudly at the cloud floating slowly away.



	"There they go!" a pegasus shouted.

	Several Durandanans along the upper platforms of West D chirped and shrieked in an avian melody.

	Ice paused in mid-air, gathering the colts and fillies around them as they all whooped and cheered from the lower skies.

	Standing along a platform, several Gray Feathers watched in dead silence.  The younger ones with less-bleached manes stood on the very wooden edge, chewing on their lips as they struggled with mute anticipation.

	Fawful hovered slightly above them.  She glanced down at her fellow elders, then looked up at the cloud as it began to pass over the mountains of the southern crater.  She closed her eyes and murmured a whispery prayer.

	"Righteous Valkyrie, may your Light shine favorably on your First-Borns."  She took a shuddering breath, a tear or two clinging to her lashes.  "...as well as Rainbow Dash."
		//------------------------------//
		// Legend of the Marenificent Seven		//------------------------------//

	"This isn't going to work..."  Smythe trembled, clinging to his side of the cloud as winds along the mountain peaks began picking up.  "This isn't going to work.  This isn't going to work!"

	"Hey!  Sivrem!"  Rainbow hollered back as she guided the misty bed upwards and into the tempestuous currents.  "You or one of the other First-Borns tell him to put a sock in it!"

	"Erm..."  Sivrem's brow furrowed.  "I feel ya, Rainbow, but what's a sock?"

	"Holy crud."  Rainbow chuckled dryly.  "We have got to get you out of this crater!"

	"I share Smythe's concerns!" Kitsune spoke up.  "You certain we can manage the winds?"

	"Girl, we're pegasi," Rainbow said.  "We are the winds!"

	"But wh-what good is a cloud against a bunch of heavy gales?!" Smythe stammered.

	"Equestrian pegasi have been building cloud structures that can resist natural typhoons for centuries, Smythe!"  Rainbow glanced back briefly.  "This isn't some crazy trick that I learned on a whim!  This is eons of history being put to the test!"

	Jagold gulped.  "I-I just wish it wasn't such a fr-freaky scary test!"

	"Calm yourselves, gulls," Jerrio grunted.  "Rainbow Dash, is there a method to this madness?"

	"Things are about to get really bumpy really quick!" Rainbow exclaimed.  "The key thing is to keep the bottom of the cloud facing the winds and taking the brunt of the air currents being thrown at us!  I promise you that it won't dissipate like any normal cloud!  I've compacted this thing tight!  It'll act like a surfboard going over a wave!"

	"Surfboard?"

	"Wave?"

	"Look—just flap your wings when I tell you to!  We gotta keep this thing at just the right angle, or else we'll be knocked back to the basin like loose coconuts!  Can you understand that?!"

	"Loud and clear, Rainbow!" Rayvinne stammered, wincing against the rising winds.  "Things are about to g-get real, aren't they?"

	"Way ahead of yourself, girl!"  Rainbow gripped the front of the cloud tighter.  "Okay!  Sivrem, beat your wings hard!"

	"Rrrgghhhh—like... so...?!"

	"Harder!  Kitsune, get ready to compensate!  Rayvinne and Jagold!  Keep up the pace!  Everypony hold tight, now!  Things are about to get jumpy—"

	A rising gust of air send the cloud flouncing skyward in a savage jolt.

	"Guhh!" Smythe wheezed, nearly slipping.

	"We're good!  We're good!" Rainbow exclaimed.  "That's just the start!"

	"Just the st-start?!" Jagold chirped.

	"Concentrate on beating your wings!" Kitsune shouted.  "Rainbow, I feel us teetering to the left!"

	"I know!  I'm guiding us along an air pocket!  Just wait for my command!"

	"Valkyrie's Shout..."  Smythe stammered.  "This was a bad idea..."

	"Listen for Rainbow Dash," Jerrio said.

	"Okay!  Kitsune!  Beat your wings harder!  Sivrem, give some slack!"

	"Aack!" Jagold yelped.  "We're falling!"

	"It's called gliding, girl," Rayvinne hissed through a smirk.  "Just relax!"

	"Heheheheheheh..."  Sivrem grinned wide as the entire cloud shook and flounced.

	Kitsune squinted across the bed.  "You're enjoying this waaay too much."

	"If only you knew how many times I tried this on my own," Sivrem said, smirking.

	"I do."

	"This is incredible..."

	"Keep your head in the game, guys!" Rainbow shouted, squinting over the front of the cloud.  "Okay!  Here c-comes the rough part!  Jerrio!  Smythe!  Beat your wings, give us lift!"

	"On it!"

	"Rggggghhh!"

	"Everypony in the rear, angle your wings out!  And hang on!  This is about to get kaizo!"

	As Rainbow said that, the cloud lifted up, almost mimicking the jutting angles of the sky stabs below.  The compacted mists ascended rapidly, swaying left and right as it surfed an air current.  Then, just as the cloud settled still in mid-air...

	"And... Stop, Smythe and Jerrio!"  Rainbow glance over her shoulder.  "Kitsune!  Sivrem!  Give us lift!"

	The First-Borns did so, forcing the rear of the cloud to raise while the tip tilted downward.

	"Jagold!  Rayvinne!  Now you guys!"

	The cloud tilted even more.

	"Everypony... hold!"

	All of the wings stopped beating.  The air howled as the cloud sliced its way forward, shook slightly, then began a maddening plunge.

	"Eggshells—" Smythe began.

	"Everyone!" Rainbow shouted, clutching the front of the cloud as she angled her wings back.  "Wings spread!  Glide!  Glide!"

	"Awwwwwwwwwwwwwwwww crud!" Rayvinne squeaked while she and the rest complied.

	The cloud began a rapid descent, soaring down the southern faces of the Sky Stabs.  Waves of mist and fog parted ways as the ponies slid on through them.  They could hear the pounding of blood in their ears as they approached maximum velocity.

	"This is faaa-aaaa-aaast!" Jagold whimpered.

	"Woooooo-hooooo!" Sivrem grinned.  "Ha haaa!"

	"It's not over yet!" Rainbow hollered.  "We need more lift on the left side!  Smythe...!"  Silence.  She glanced back.  "Smythe?!"

	"Nnnngh... c-can't..."  The stallion wheezed, slipping.  "C-can't hang on!"

	Rainbow gasped.  "Smythe!"

	"Gaaaaaah!"  The stallion lost his grip.  He toppeled backwards like a loose boulder—

	"Hnntttt!"  Jerrio lunged out, grasping the loose stallion by his tail.

	The Durandanans in the back gasped.

	Gritting his teeth, Jerrio strained against the murderous winds and body-pressed Smythe back into the cloud bed, holding him down with his weight.

	Rainbow lunged in reverse, planted herself in the middle of the cloud, and spread her wings high.  "Gnnnrrnnnghhh-guhhhh!"  Compensating for Jerrio and Smythe, she managed to catch enough air in her feathers to force the cloud into an upward tilt.  The bottom of the cloudbed absorbed the friction, and the compacted mist thinned all throughout.  The cloud stretched broader, wider.

	"It's... it's breaking apart!" Kitsune stammered.

	"That's... all... p-part of the plan!" Rainbow hissed.  She glanced outward.  Through thin eyes, she caught treetops and a glinting sun.  "On my mark, everypony jump off and fly!"

	"But... b-but...!"

	"We'll be slowed down enough to make it work!  Trust me!"

	"Listen to her, gulls!" Sivrem shouted.

	"Get ready..."  Rainbow hissed above the sound of howling winds.  "Get set..."  A deep breath.  "Now!"

	Rayvinne and Jagold lunged forward.

	Kitsune and Sivrem flapped their wings.

	Jerrio carried a breathless Smythe as they flew off the cloud.

	At last, Rainbow dove after them.  She flapped her wings, gliding southward with the greatest of ease.

	Soon, all seven ponies hovered together in a flock.  They turned and looked behind them, watching as the cloud plummeted, elongated, turned into a translucent cyclone for the space of three seconds, then dissipated into nothing.

	"Whoah..."  Rayvinne murmured, panting for breath.  "Did we actually ride that thing?"

	"And how, girl."  Sivrem said with a flushed grin.

	"Uhhhhh..."  Jagold blinked from where she hovered.  "Guys?  It's not so crazy windy anymore!"

	"There's a reason for that," Rainbow said with a smile.  She pointed straight up.  "Look."

	All six Durandanans turned and stared up... up... up.  A veritable wall of rock towered above them, scraping the sky with their lacerated peaks.  Kitsune gasped, her hooves clamped over her muzzle.  Jerrio and Smythe stared in dumbfounded shock, their mouths agape.

	"We..."  Sivrem blinked.  "We scaled the walls..."

	"I know it was a wild ride," Rainbow said, wiping the sweat off her brow.  She smiled.  "But the bigger the cloud beds are, the less crazy, because they can withstand the punishment better, ya feel me?"  She caught her breath and continued, "Just imagine how easy it'd be to scale the Sky stabs if you had forty Durandanans making the cloud bed instead of just—y'know—one."

	"Then..."  Rayvinne gulped.  "Then this means..."

	Rainbow Dash pivoted about and pointed in the opposite direction.  "Check it out, guys..."

	The six pegasi twirled about.  They immediately gasped.

	A sloping valley chock full with fir trees stretched as far as the eye could see.  Glistening lakes ran south, snaking their way into a large body of water flanked by waterfalls and verdant cliffsides.  In the far distance, the forest broke briefly, exposing patches of golden farmland nestled between emerald green canopies.

	"Valkyrie's shout..." Kitsune stammered.

	Sivrem stared intently, his eyes glazed.

	Jerrio blinked several times, practically hugging Smythe at this point.

	"There's..."  Rayvinne murmured.  "...there's just so much of it."

	"Have you ever seen so much water?" Smythe remarked.

	"There are no mists... or mountains," Jagold said.  "You can see forever."

	Jerrio felt something stabbing his eyes.  He looked straight up, having to squint.  An unimpeded orb of golden light hovered at the top of the sky, illuminating anything and everything.

	"Even the Lights From Above do not hide here," Kitsune managed.

	"You think it looks big now?"  Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "You have no idea."

	Jagold bit her lip, her eyes glistening with tears. She turned towards Rayvinne and squeaked inwardly with a girlish smile.

	"Those... those fields," Sivrem said, pointing to the patch of farmland.  "It appears to have... structures of some sort."  He glanced aside at Rainbow.  "Who or what lives there."

	"I have no friggin' clue."  Rainbow gave them a bright grin, then motioned with her head.  "Come on.  Let's find out!"



	Several foals ran down a small town's main street while a group of earth ponies unloaded a wagon's worth of wares in front of a thrift store.

	"Nnngh!"  One stallion sweated and rubbed his brow.  "Guh... you th-think Green Holler's gonna want to buy a rusty old plow?"

	"Pffft.  He'd better," the other said.  "If nothing else, he can get Smoke Trails to smelt this thing down."

	"And turn it into what?  Teeth fillings?  Face it, Bronze.  This crud is useless.  Why are we wasting our time?"

	"You'd rather spend the day removing the stump from Granny's yard?"

	"Ennnngh..."

	"Look, we at least gotta try."  One stallion smiled to another.  "We need the money!  And it's not like anything special is just going to come falling from the sky—"

	Plop!  Rainbow Dash landed on the store's wooden porch right in front of them.  "Hello hello!"

	"Gaaah!" both stallions fell back in the dirt, hugging each other.

	Several ponies rushed out of the store fronts, gasping.

	One by one, the other six pegasi landed, coiling their wings at their side.  They pivoted, looking all around and blinking.

	The two stallions stood up, gawking at the feathery group.

	Jagold and Smythe fidgeted.

	Curious mares gazed from nearby alleyways, clinging to each other apprehensively.

	Rainbow cleared her throat, then trotted into the center of the street.  "Uhhhh... hey, everypony!"  She waved a bright blue hoof.  "What's up?"

	An old stallion trotted up, squinting.  "You are, apparently."

	Rainbow giggled.  "Ain't that the truth..."

	"Uhm... Bronze?" one stallion murmured to the other.  "Did I drink too much moonshine last night, or are a bunch of winged ponies standing in the middle of our town?"

	The other gulped.  "I-I think I had one too many sips myself..."

	Sivrem turned about, his bird bone necklace rattling.  He saw the old stallion who had trotted up.  He spotted a metal "star" adorning the earth pony's leather vest.  "Hrmmm... Valkyrie Silver."

	"I beg your pardon?"

	Sivrem smiled proudly.  "The Valkyrie's Light shines upon you!"  He trotted forward and stretched his wings out.  "Tell me, what is this place called?"

	The earth ponies simply stared at him.

	Sivrem blinked.  He let loose a falcon shriek, causing several of the ponies to jolt.  Turning, he got Jerrio's attention.  "Psssst!"  He whistled, chirped.  "Jerrio!  The bag!"

	"Huh?"  Jerrio glanced down at his satchel.  "Oh... uhm..."  He reached a hoof in, grabbed the first thing he saw, and tossed it Sivrem's way.

	Sivrem caught a stack of bananas with his wings, twirled gracefully, and held it out before the old stallion in his strong wingfeathers.  "An offering.  Hmmm?"

	The stallion raised an eyebrow.  He grasped the bananas, then examined him in his grasp.  A bunch of villagers galloped up, crowding around the sheriff as they gazed and gawked at the fruit.

	"Are th-those real?"

	"No way!"

	"But the eastern trade doesn't come by here this time of year!"

	"I can't believe what I'm saying..."

	"Ahem..."  The sheriff glanced back up.  "Son, do you mind explaining to me just where in the hay you stumbled upon bananas this side of the world?"

	"Why, are they of value to you?"

	"Fruit of this kind sells for a high price in the valley," the earth pony said.  "I'd say they're about as rare a sight as those wings you're sporting."

	"I p-picked them myself!" Jagold said.

	"Huh?"

	"Eeep!"  Jagold hid behind Kitsune while the First-Born rolled her eyes.

	"Nnnngh..."  The sheriff rubbed his brow.  "I'm getting too old for this."  He squinted at the lead pegasus.  "Just where in the heck are you all from, anyways?"

	"Hmmm..."  Sivrem turned, glancing at the epic sight of the southern Sky Stabs to the north.  "I suppose..."  He turned and smiled proudly.  "I suppose you could say that we're your next door neighbors."

	The townsfolk chattered in awe.  Slowly, fearlessly, they slipped out of hiding and congregated around the seven visitors.  Mares trotted up, grinning as they began asking questions of Kitsune and Jagold.

	Smythe blushed while a few teenage equines began poking and prodding curiously at his wings.

	Rayvinne waggled her eyes at a few red-faced stallions before trotting up to join Sivrem in his conversation with the town sheriff.

	All the while, Rainbow Dash hovered at a humble altitude.  She glanced across the suddenly bustling village.  At last, she spotted Jerrio.

	The First-Born fidgeted as a veritable flood of foals encircled him like adoracute sharks.  They tugged at his dyed tail hairs and giggled, asking a flood of questions.  A filly or two smiled as they nuzzled his fetlocks.

	He gawked at them all, shivering slightly.  His head raised and he made eye contact with Rainbow Dash.

	Rainbow simply smiled.

	With a calm breath, Jerrio finally relaxed.  He reached into his satchel and hoofed out a few apples.  The foals clamored for them, shrieking and laughing amongst each other before taking hearty bites of the delicious fruit.

	Rainbow giggled breathily.  Flapping her wings, she lifted up, flying a low orbit around the town as she left the Durandanans alone for a space in time.
		//------------------------------//
		// From First Light to Last		//------------------------------//

	Most Gray-Feathers sat quietly on the upper platforms of West D.  Some paced in tense little circles.  Whatever the case, the atmosphere had become decently tense by the time the seven pegasi returned.  Fawful was one of the first to see them.  Upon hearing the loud osprey shriek of a First-Born, she turned and tilted her head up, shading her eyes as she gazed at the southern mountain tops.

	Seven shapes pierced the mists, rapidly descending under a dissipating vortex of clouds.  Rainbow Dash's bright colors stood out in the evening glow.  However, she pulled back, hovering in place while the six Durandanans descended past her.

	Sivrem arrived first.  Several Gray-Feathers gathered around, eyeing the heavy weight of his precarious landing.  As soon as he coiled his wing feathers, they saw an immense satchel hanging from his muzzle.  Without saying a word, the First-Born reached deep into the bag, pulled out something slender, and tossed it before the Gray-Feathers' hooves.

	The elders stammered nervously.  One old stallion finally picked the object up, squinting at its leafy green exterior and its dense yellow core.  "What... is this?"

	"It's called corn, elder," Sivrem said.  "One of the tastiest things I've ever enjoyed in my life."  He turned towards other Gray-Feathers and pulled something else out of the bag.  "And this..."  He grunted, having to use two forelimbs to roll the large object onto the wooden platform.  "...is a watermelon."

	An elder mare murmured, "Have you seen anything so big?"

	"Yes, I have."  Sivrem smirked.  "Pumpkins.  And don't get me started on the metal tools they build in something called a forge.  Or the clothes they make out of 'wool,' body hair lent from the western territories."

	Fawful leaned forward, squinting.  "Sivrem, who are 'they?'"

	The First-Born grinned.  "The ponies of Sandstone.  Our neighbors to the south."  He turned and glanced at the other equines.  "There's an entire village of them.  And roadways built towards other villages beyond the forests and lakes."

	"Lakes?" another elder remarked.

	Kitsune trotted up and nodded.  "There's a whole world out there, elder.  A world that can be ours to explore.  Rainbow Dash showed us how.  We can show others."

	Sivrem gestured.  "And we can get more of these amazing things, so long as we trade for them."

	"Trade what?"

	"Bananas.  Apples.  The glorious bounty that the Valkyrie has blessed us with here!"  Sivrem smiled.  Then he chuckled.  "I'm guessing these Sandstone ponies have never drank milk before, much less something as glorious as what we all get from the leatherbacks."

	The elders stared at one another, murmuring in deep thought.

	Jerrio touched down behind the other two.  He shuddered slightly.

	Fawful saw it.  "Jerrio?" she asked.  "Was there something you wish to say?"

	Jerrio took a deep breath.  "There is, elder."  Everypony went silent as he gulped and said, "The ponies of Sand Stone are... without a doubt... some of the n-nicest and friendliest souls that I've met."

	Kitsune and Sivrem exchanged smiles.

	Jerrio stared at the thick line of elders standing before him.  "We can only benefit from establishing a relationship with them.  I'm certain that they have many things to teach us.  And no doubt we can share with them the blissful legacy of the Valkyrie."

	The commotion reached a new pitch, warm and charismatic.

	Fawful blinked.  She glanced up at Rainbow Dash.

	The whole time, Rainbow hovered with her forelimbs folded.  She had a knowing smirk on her face, and her eyes remained affixed to Fawful.

	The mare blinked, and she smiled, her cheeks turning rosy.



	"It is settled, then?" Celestia's voice echoed across the topmost chamber of Central D.

	"Yes, Princess," an elder said as he paced across the crowded compartment.  Several Durandanans watched and listened intently.  "Your presence shall be kept here at the request of Rainbow Dash.  You will be a guest of the Valkyrie's flock, much like Rainbow and her fellow outsiders have been."

	"That sounds perfectly reasonable to me."

	"We understand that you are very busy with royal duties over in Equestria—"

	"I shall always find time to heed your words and give you the advice that you seek," Celestia's voice said.  "Even if you may not be our royal subjects, you are nonetheless kindred spirits, and you deserve every gift of Harmony that I have to bestow."

	Another elder spoke up.  "If it's true that you and your sister live exceedingly long lives, then I suspect that your longevity shall be put to the test.  Durandana sits on the precipice of unfathomable change.  We Gray-Feathers are used to dealing with the scrolls of the past, not so much the mysteries of the future."

	"We are prepared to assist you for as long as it takes," Celestia said.  "If you have a question for us... or our grandfoals' grandfoals, we will gladly answer them to the best of our ability.  You shall not be alone in this."

	Luna's voice spoke up.  "And it will not just be us.  Already, we have established a royal council of Equestrian hearts and minds to bestow you a boundless bank of knowledge.  The esteemed pegasi of Cloudsdale shall be eager to teach you knew manners of weather control.  What's more, the earth ponies of Ponyville will be more than happy to lend you advice in planting and growing crops of all kinds."

	"And our finest unicorn delegates will be more than happy to provide consultation on diplomacy," Celestia said in a pleasant tone.  "Should you need it."

	Fawful smiled and spoke up.  "Humbly speaking, we very well might.  Although..."  She pivoted about and glanced up.  "...we have learned quite a bit already from Rainbow Dash's example."

	"Awwwww shucks..."  Rainbow waved a forelimb from where she hovered.  "I only did what any other chaos-cursed east-throttling sunrise pony with a loyalty pendant around her scrawny neck woulda done."

	"Rainbow Dash, please..."  Fawful squirmed where she stood.  "It... it doesn't take skills in empathy to realize how hard it must be to give up something like this..."

	"Hey!  We've been over this!"  Rainbow Dash touched down, eyeing her reflection in the blade's golden surface.  "I've got Princess Luna's spell connecting us through-and-through!  Sword or no sword, I'll still be able to chat with her once a month!  Ain't that right, Moonbutt?"

	"... ... ...indubitably."

	"Heehee!"  Rainbow smiled.  "Face it.  The sword's yours.  It's always been yours.  From the moment it was entombed alongside Commander Hurricane, history had made its decision.  Besides... I've already gotten out of it what I needed to."

	"It's strange to realize that it was your tool of salvation inside Stratopolis," Fawful said.

	"What got me out of Stratopolis was a bunch of different things," Rainbow Dash said.  "Most of which wait for me back in the Jury.  My friends."  She smiled.  "So long as I have them, I'm golden."

	"And how long do you intend to have them, Rainbow Dash?" Fawful quietly asked.

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  One s-sunrise at a time, Fawful," she murmured.  A bittersweet smile as she shivered slightly.  "That's how I've always dealt with things, and that's how I intend to keep doing it."

	Fawful bit her lip while her eyes grew misty.

	"Look, girl, you haven't been a Gray-Feather for long," Rainbow muttered.  "It won't be a crime to—"

	Fawful lunged forward and wrapped her forelimbs around Rainbow's neck.  She hugged the pegasus deeply, sniffling.  "Valkyrie's Light be upon you, Rainbow Dash.  I trust that she will give you peace.  A part of me is sad... and selfishly regretful... that she hasn't decided to give you such serenity here."

	"Hey hey..."  Rainbow patted Fawful's shoulder and pushed the two of them apart so that they were gazing at each other.  "Face it.  I've never been all that big on 'serenity.'  If that was Hurricane's groove up until the bitter end, then good for her.  She's got a lot of gulls to be proud of, after all."  Rainbow Dash nuzzled Fawful and stepped back.  "But there ain't no room in this crater for more two Austraeohs.  The Valkyrie's got it goin' on, and this girl knows when it's time to take flight."

	"Still..."  Fawful swallowed a lump down her throat and smiled gently.  "It has been a righteous honor..."

	"Whew... if I had a bit for every time I heard that."  A few elders chuckled as Rainbow Dash pivoted around.  "The sword is yours, guys!  So long as you don't use it for chopping branches, de-clawing leatherbacks, or dicing up fish berries, then I think we're golden!  And so's the sword.  Heh."

	"Rainbow Dash, you have done a marvelous job here," Celestia's voice said.  "I would tell you how proud I am, but I fear the time it would take would carry us well beyond sunset."

	"Hey.  My time in the spotlight in Durandana here is over."  Rainbow winked at the flickering gold metal of the blade.  "The stage is all yours, Princess.  Just make sure you don't... y'know... accidentally start a totalitarian fascist state or something."

	"'Totalitarian... fascist st-state?'" an elder muttered in total confusion.

	"See?!" Rainbow pointed with a grin.  "That's a good sign right there!"  She blinked.  "...I think."

	Luna's voice suddenly spoke up, "You are departing soon, then, Rainbow Dash?"

	Rainbow nodded, trotting closer to the sword.  "Yup.  As the natives would say, 'I gotta gust my eggshells out.'"

	Fawful giggled and rolled her eyes.

	"What?"  Rainbow turned, grinning wide.  "That's good enough, isn't it?  Sorry, girl!  You couldn't get me to gobble like a turkey even if you paid me!"

	"I trust your friends will be close by your side."

	Rainbow turned back to the blade.  She blinked.  "Why... yeah, Luna.  Why wouldn't they?"

	A pause.  Then, in a faintly melancholic tone:  "We wouldn't wish it any other way."

	Rainbow bit her lip.  Quietly, she stepped up to the Sword of Solstice.  "How long is it until the next full moon, Your Highness?"

	"We regret to inform you that one cycle culminated during your stay here in Durandana.  It will easily be a four week wait at the soonest."

	"Huh... is that so?"  Rainbow Dash chuckled breathily, though her ears folded back in a limp fashion.  "Guess time flies when you're... h-having fun..."

	"We certainly wish so, Rainbow Dash."

	Rainbow bit her lip, staring down at the wooden floor of the compartment.

	"Rainbow," Luna's voice softly echoed.  "We... I very much wish for you to know just how intensely proud I am of you.  Never doubt your talents for a single moment.  You are a shining beacon of Harmony, and your friends would jave been quite pleased—"

	"Luna..."  Rainbow stood so close to the blade that her breath fogged the golden surface.  "My friends are pleased with me."  She gulped, then smiled gently.  "Aren't you?"

	Silence.

	At last, Luna said, "Indeed."

	"See you next full moon?"

	Quiet.  Then, in a shuddering tone, "Most certainly.  The next full moon it is, Rainbow Dash."

	"Then it's a date."  Rainbow sniffled.  She then kissed her hoof and planted it against the shimmering gold surface.  "...stay awesome, MoonButt."





	"Duaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaah..."  Zaid twitched and twitched, his legs buckling from underneath him.

	Jagold and Smythe blinked at him, then exchanged glances from where they stood atop the Noble Jury.

	"Hello?"  Props leaned in and waved her hoof across Zaid's spiraling eyeballs.  "Zaidy Waidy...?"

	"I don't get it!" Jagold stammered, then gestured at the stack of yellow and white cheese wheels.  "Isn't this something he's always wanted?  Why is he having a seizure?"

	"Uhm..."  Props gulped and smiled bashfully at the two pegasi.  "Don't worry.  That's his way of saying 'thank you.'"

	Smythe squinted.  "He says 'thank you' by foaming at the mouth?"

	"Yeah!  Hehe!"  Props nuzzled the twitching stallion's neck.  "At least, I like to think so!  It explains why he falls out of the bed so much."

	"Eeep!"  Jagold blushed furiously.  "Eggshells!  Whelp... enjoy your cheese wheels!"  She flapped towards the other side of the Noble Jury.

	Ebon Mane trotted up, poked Zaid once, and watched as the stallion tipped over.  He rolled his eyes and smirked at Smythe.  "I'll take it from here.  I just hope I've got enough bread to go with this gift."

	"Good luck with that."  Smythe said and flew after Jagold.

	Ebon stared at the cheese wheels, rubbing his chin in thought.  Eagle Eye trotted up from behind.  "Looks like you have your work cut out for you."

	"Hmmm..."  Ebon nodded with a smile.  "It's all good, though.  I'm always at my best when I'm tackling a culinary challenge."

	"Yes..."  Eagle nodded, then stared down at his fidgeting hooves.  "Yes, I know."

	Ebon blinked.  He turned around and immediately nuzzled the stallion.  "At least... that's how it used to be."

	Eagle gulped.

	"Hehe... what?"  Ebon gazed at him.  "Afraid I'll cary the stink of cheese into the cabin?"

	"I dunno.  I guess..."  Eagle bit his lip.  "I-I sorta regret having to leave this place."

	"Why's that?"

	"Because..."  Eagle gulped and spoke in a quiet tone, "It feels like the first place where I actually f-found myself."

	Ebon leaned in, kissed Eagle on the lips, and murmured in his ears.  "Me too.  But, wherever we're going, I doubt either of us will be lost.  Now, will we?"

	Eagle smiled, his eyes misty.  He brushed his cheek with Ebon's and murmured, "Ebon?  I... I..."

	"Heehee... Yes, EE?"  Ebon gazed at him warmly.  "What's on your mind?"

	Eagle stared back.  At last, he gulped, then spoke in a quivering tone, "It's not m-my mind..."  He had stealthily clasped Ebon's hoof so that it rested over his chest.

	Ebon chuckled breathily.  "You sap."  A wink.  "I love you too."

	Eagle smiled.

	"And later..." Ebon leaned in and whispered in Eagle's ear.

	Eagle's lavender coat turned two shades rosier.  "Guhhh!"  He looked nervously over his shoulder.  "Ebonnnn!"

	"What?"  Ebon chuckled.  "Don't worry!  Belle's and Pilate's cabin are three rows down and on the other side!"

	"Uggggh..."  Eagle rolled his eyes.  "What am I going to do with you?"

	"...I can think of many things."

	"Ahem.  The cheese, Ebon?"

	"Hmm?  Oh!  Right.  Could you lend me a hoof?"

	"Sure.  While they're still clean."

	"Hehehehe..."

	As the stallions trotted across the deck, they passed Josho as he was cornered by a pink-eyed mare.

	"You know... I've been meaning to ask you something since you and your friends arrived here, outsider."  Rayvinne smiled, thin-eyed, as she flicked the very tip of the aging unicorn's horn with her wingfeathers.  "Is that the only part of you that glows?"

	"Yeesh, lady..."  Josho glared at her lethargically.  "No wonder Rainbow's been gone all hours of the day."

	"Oh, please.  She may have the colors of the Valkyrie, but deep inside she's all blue."

	"Yeah.  Probably from punching herself in the face so long."

	"You've got at least an hour before you sail away on your Valkyrie Silver."  Rayvinne waggled her eyebrows.  "Feel like losing some weight?"

	"Y'know, I didn't have the courage to say it until now." Josho stifled a belch.  "But—like—if this whole entire crater was actually one bigass elevator, it still wouldn't lift even half as much as your friggin' tail, girl."

	"Pffft."  Rayvinne rolled her eyes and giggled.  "Suit yourself, chief."  She trotted off with a flounce to her feathers.  "I swear, is there something in this ship's water?"

	"Yeah.  It's called cynicism," Josho grumbled.  "I down two cups of it a night before going to bed."  He cracked his neck joints, sighed, then glanced aside.  He caught a pair of red eyes staring at him.  "What are you looking at, Space Elk?"

	Floydien grunted, "Rotund boomer is sad in the sad sack."

	"Yeah... well..."  Josho waddled off, grumbling.  "Go hump a manaconduit or something."

	"Nancy Jane does not like the chafe chafe."  Floydien glanced up at the sky, his eyes catching numerous Durandanans as they hovered in close proximity to the craft.  "Hrmmmm... will the winged boomers ever give Floydien and friends their space?"

	"Rest easy, Mr. Floydien," Pilate said as he and Belle trotted gently towards the bow of the ship.  "I suspect we'll be departing soon."

	Belle cleared her throat.  "Rainbow?  Darling, are we in the clear?"

	"Err... yeah!" Rainbow waved at them.  "Just about!"  She turned to directly face Kitsune and Sivrem.  "So... uh... you've already made plans, huh?"

	"Don't worry, Rainbow," Kitsune said with a smile.  "We're taking our time with it.  Still, assuming Luna's and Celestia's contacts at Cloudsdale can give us a way to write down the instructions, it'll probably be a month or two from now when we decide to make our first cloud-raft."

	"How many ponies are you going to string along for the trip?"

	"We're thinking eighty-five," Sivrem said.  He squinted.  "Is that... t-too ambitious?"

	"Whew..."  Rainbow grinned.  "It depends!  With that many ponies, you could probably make a permanent cloud base!"

	Kitsune blinked in awe.  "A... permanent base?"

	"Yeah, girl!  A city in the sky!"  Rainbow beamed.  "Like Cloudsdale!"

	"I... I-I wasn't aware we could do that."

	"Pfft.  You're pegasi.  You're awesome enough to do anything!"  Rainbow nudged Kitsune's shoulder and winked.  "Don't forget that."

	Kitsune smiled, blushing sweetly.  "Now I'm starting to understand what Rayvinne sees in you."

	"Guh!"  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "I swear!  Does everypony know about her and me?"

	"Hey..."  Sivrem shrugged and chuckled.  "It's a small crater."  He gulped.  "At least it is now."

	"You'll deal," Rainbow said with a smirk.  "We all do.  Besides..."  She turned and glanced towards the stern of the Jury.  "...there's a whole bunch of stuff beyond... to explore."

	The tell-tale twin glints of Roarke's eye-lenses shimmered across the top deck.

	Rainbow blinked.

	Without saying a word, Roarke quietly turned around and trotted down the dark stairwell.

	Rainbow's lips pursed.  Suddenly, she heard a giggling sound, and she glanced in Kera's direction.

	Jerrio glided down to the Noble Jury's surface.  Kera was perched on his back, waving her forelimbs in the air and cheering.  The First-Born landed neatly beside Pilate and Belle.  He squatted low enough so that Kera could hop onto Belle's backside.

	"Thanks, Mr. Jerrio!"  Kera said with a devilish smirk.  "It's been a while since I got an air ride like that!  Heeheehee... Rainbow barely has time to do it anymore."

	"Yes, well, it seems as though Rainbow has done a lot for you, just as she has for all of us."  He stood up and stared Kera in the eyes.  "But, if you ask me, she's going to be needing your help from now on."

	"Yeah..."  Kera shuddered slightly.  "I-I know..."

	"It's nothing too strange," Jerrio said.  His eyes wandered across the deck, and for a brief moment he seemed to make eye contact with a certain petite pegasus.  "The Valkyrie had her friends, and Duranda wrote about it often.  You see... those of us who look and act the strongest actually need the most help.  Sometimes it takes a while to realize that."

	Kera smiled.  "I think I'm gonna miss this place."

	Jerrio breathed calmly and said, "I think I will too."  A pause.  He stretched a wing forward, clasped his teeth over the tips, and plucked one feather loose.  He rested the thing behind Kera's ear and patted her head.  "You have a spirit like unto the Valkyrie.  Trust in your elders, for they will someday depend on you as well."

	"Sure thing, Mr. Jerrio."

	Belle and Pilate smiled, leaning side by side.

	Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.

	"Rainbow?"

	She turned and blinked.

	"This place..." Sivrem's eyes narrowed.  "This... Val Roa... is it anything like Stratopolis or any of the challenges you've faced before."

	"Heh... come on, big guy..."  Rainbow smirked.  "If I could answer that, it'd spoil the fun."

	Sivrem merely blinked.

	"Ahem..."  Rainbow trotted closer and spoke in a quiet tone.  "I don't know what Val Roa has in store for my friends and I... or..."  She gulped.  "...or if I will even make it there. But that's not going to stop me from flying there anyways."

	"You could have had it so much more peaceful if you stayed here, Rainbow," Kitsune said.  "I'm sure your friends wouldn't have minded."

	Rainbow's nostrils flared.  "I would have," she said.  "Never—not even for one second—fail to push yourself beyond your limits.  Otherwise, you won't be living.  You'll just be drifting, and I've never been all that big of a fan of flying with the wind."  She smirked.  "Too boring."

	Sivrem and Kitsune exchanged glances.  They smiled, then turned back to Rainbow.  "Rainbow Dash," Kitsune said.  "We wanted to give you something before you left."

	"Is it a hug?"  Rainbow smirked.  "Cuz I think I gave all of mine to Fawful earlier in one heavy dose."

	"Don't you worry, girl," Rayvinne said, sneaking up suddenly from behind.  Smythe and Jagold stood next to her.  "This won't hurt one bit," the mare said with a wink.

	"Uhm..."  Rainbow gulped.  "What—?"  Then, to her surprise, all five pegasi were crouching low, their wings outstretched so that the feathertips barely touched her sky-blue coat.

	Sivrem spoke loudly, boldly.  "Most Righteous Valkyrie, with the glory contained within your Gold Lights, guide Rainbow's path beyond the greens.  Let the Lights From Above Shine on her forevermore, so that her legacy will live on—as yours does—in the hearts of ponies everywhere..."

	Although breathless, Rainbow felt like she should say something.  This thought was shattered the moment Jerrio suddenly joined in, crouching low with wings outstretched.

	"Our gusts will follow her from now until Windlessness," Jerrio said.  He looked up, his eyes moist above a proud smile.  "So promise the foals of the Valkyrie forever..."

	"From First-Born to Last," the six pegasi said in one accord, and it was only until the resounding echo had finished reverberating that Rainbow realized that every Durandana within earshot of the Jury had been chanting the same thing.

	Kera gazed in wonder.  Pilate smiled while Belle wiped her muzzle dry beside him.

	Rainbow glanced at them, then at the wings stretched towards her.  She smiled nervously and let loose the tiniest of giggles.  "Eheheh," her voice cracked.  "Play ball!"
		//------------------------------//
		// It's Not Easy Being Cheesy		//------------------------------//

	The Noble Jury flew east.

	It took minutes to clear the rest of the crater of Durandana.  East D was an intricate, spiraling marvel of wooden architecture.  Rainbow was amazed that she had never given herself the chance to lay her eyes on it before.  There was no telling what things, creatures, and sights were left to be seen in that misty crater.  Rainbow Dash briskly trotted below deck and didn't come out until the ship had cleared the Sky Stabs.

	The world transformed into something frighteningly brighter by the time the Jurists had cleared the crater.  With the mists and jagged topography gone, the continent appeared in all of its crystal clear glory.  The landscape stretched green and beautiful as far as the horizon could reach.  The air grew chillier, and the earth sloped down into sloping valleys dotted all over with fir trees and lush pine.

	Floydien never looked so awake.  Several crew members gave him double-glances, surprised at the bright luster in his eyes.  When questioned, the elk conveyed in so few words that he was at his best when allowed to "glide, free from glimmer shimmer."  Pilate sat by his side and the two discussed the finer mechanics of aeronautics for hours, until a melting sunset painted their healthy bodies amber.

	Ebon Mane had a feast prepared for this latest leg of their flight.  He sliced apart one whole cheese wheel for the occasion, which left Zaid an anxious, drooling mess.  Props dragged the stallion into the mess hall where they joined Bellesmith, Eagle Eye, and Josho in felicitous conversation.  Kera galloped all around, levitating Jerrio's feather over her head and pretending she was a pegasus.  There was no shortage of giggles and warm breaths.  As night poured darkness outside the portholes, the ship began to wind down as well.  Soon, Floydien switched on autopilot and came trotting downstairs along with Pilate to enjoy the meal Ebon had prepared.

	This was the scene that Rainbow Dash stumbled upon when she shuffled in from a nap in the observation room.



	She waited in the crook of the doorway to the infirmary, catching her breath.  Rainbow's teeth chattered loudly as she fought the last few waves of dizziness rocketing through her system.  Then, with several solid breaths, she stood straight, feeling the blood rushing to the far extremes of her body.  She flexed both forelimbs, and once she felt that she had completely recovered, she trotted bravely out into the hallway and marched into the mess hall beyond.

	"...never go back to eating any other kind of sandwiches!  I'm telling you!" Zaid rambled from where he sat at the long table, smiling.  "The Durandanans were good cooks and all, but they didn't have the culinary skills of Sailbooty here."  He pointed at the burgundy stallion hoofing sandwiches out one plate at a time.  "I'm telling you, our mouths are gonna implode with cheesy goodness!"

	"Jee, thanks, Zaid.  I'm flattered."  Ebon blinked.  "I think."

	"Heehee!"  Props giggled.  "No need for the preview, Zaidy Waidy!  I had some grilled cheese the other night, remember?"

	"Yeah.  But this one will have considerably less of my hairs in it."

	"Nnnnngh..."  Josho grumbled, eyes rolling.  "Must you ruin this before my colon does?"

	"Sorry, Chins," Zaid said.  "Whew!  No offense to birds of a feather, but I'm super glad to be out of that giant stone bowl!  It was starting to feel a little cramped, y'know?"

	"No offense taken, Zaid," Rainbow said as she hovered to a chair beside Pilate and Bellesmith.  "I know we all have things to do.  It was... uhm..."  She fidgeted, then took a deep breath.  "It was really swell of you guys to let us stay in Durandana for as long as we did."  She gulped.  "It... really meant a lot to me."

	"Awwwwwww..."  Props cooed, blue eyes sparkling.  "It's okies, Dashie!"

	"Absolutely," Eagle said with a grin.  "I enjoyed every moment of our stay."  He glanced up with a smile.  "And I'm not the only one."  He winked.

	Ebon blushed, biting his lip as he blindly placed down another piping-hot slice of grilled cheese.

	"Gaaaah!"  Zaid flinched, batting the cheesy mess out of his crotch.  "Hot hot hot!"

	"D'oh!  Sorry!  I'm s-so sorry!"

	"It's okay..."  Zaid hissed, eyes tearing slightly.  He nevertheless sported a brave smile.  "It's already been through a lot this week."

	"Snkkkt—Heeheeheehee!"  Props slapped the table, giggling.

	Ebon gulped.  "Okaaaaaaaaay..."  He side-trotted.  "I'm going to serve Floydien now..."

	"Not too much of the yellow drip drip, sailboat."

	"Yeah, yeah.  Most of this is going to Josho anyways."

	"Dayum straight."

	"Mmmm!"  Kera hopped into her stool beside Belle and Pilate.  "Smells good!"  She blinked, then glanced up at her guardians.  "We're not gonna run out of good eats, are we?"

	"Hmmmm..."  Belle smiled.  She reached over, straightening the filly's green bangs.  "I doubt it, darling.  Between Abinadi's generosity and the Durandanans', I think we're set."

	"A welcome reprieve, if there ever was one," Pilate said.

	"I gotta say..."  Eagle smirked.  "I'm liking this continent more and more with each passing day!"

	"Enjoy it while it lasts, sissy saddles," Josho muttered, rubbing his hooves together greedily as Ebon reached his plate and started dishing out a solid stack of bread-and-cheese.  "I'm sure the ugliness is waiting for us just a shout away."

	"Ungh!"  Props rolled her blue eyes.  "Why is everypony on board this ship so paranoid?"

	"Mrmmmfff..."  Zaid gulped down a tasty morsel and murmured, "You seem to be doing just fine."

	"I guess Nancy's womb shields me."

	"Yes yes yes."

	"Really, though, Rainbow..."  Josho glanced across the table.  "Shouldn't we be starting a game plan?"

	"Hmmm?"  She looked back at him.

	"For Val Roa.  I'm glad you got to peck it with the birds and all, but we've inadvertently given her one hell of a head start."

	"Perhaps," Pilate said.  "Perhaps not."

	"Come on, stripes," Josho sighed.  "You can't always be so dayum optimistic."

	"Optimism doesn't necessarily signify ignorance."  Pilate smirked slightly. "Chrysalis lost a great deal of power the last time we encountered her.  I doubt that in all her eons of existence she's ever dealt with such a handicap."

	"Yeah, but she's still got eons of existence.  That's enough to make her a major threat.  Never mind the ability to fart into whatever she wants to."

	"Yeah!"  Props blinked.  "How will we ever find her!"

	"We'd lose our heads from spinning if we even try," Eagle Eye said.  "Best thing to do is approach Val Roa and seek audience with the royalty there."

	"Heehee!"  Kera giggled.  "Yeah, that'll be rich!"

	"For real!"  Eagle Eye shrugged.  "Every pony and turtle has been super friendly here!  Is it too silly to expect the monarchs of Val Roa to be open to conversation with weary travelers seeking peace?"

	"And just how is that going to go?"  Kera stood up on her stool and cleared her throat.  In a ridiculously eloquent tone she murmured, "'Allo Governor of Val Roa!  Right fancy day for a stroll around the royal gardens!  My name is Duchess Eagle Eye!  Ya fancy helping us hunt down a bloody sod of a changeling!'"

	"Oka-a-a-ay," Belle chided, nevertheless chuckling.  She smiled through a blushing muzzle as she patted Kera's shoulders.  "No standing at the table, darling."

	"Ya see what I mean?"  Kera sat back, smirking devilishly.  "It's just stupid to expect the absolute best!"

	Eagle Eye, meanwhile, slunked in his seat with a pout.  "Only a duchess...?"

	Ebon sat down beside him, leaned in, and kissed his cheek.  "Muah.  Just relax and eat, EE."

	"Meh..."

	"What about you, Rainbow Dash?" Kera asked.  "What do you think we should do?"

	"Mmmmrnngh..."  Rainbow squirmed in her chair.  Her wings were coiled tight as she stared a hole through the tabletop.  "Really, it's just the first day of flight.  Do we have to talk about it now?"

	"Rainbow Dash..."  Josho sighed.

	"Less spit is fine for Floydien," the elk said, already halfway through his grilled cheese.  "Mmmm... slime sublime..."

	"It's not that I wanna overstress the issue," Josho said.  He gulped and added, "I guess it's just the stubborn old soldier who refuses to die inside of me."

	"And that's fine, Josho," Rainbow said.  "I appreciate your focus.  Really.  It's just..."  She sighed, clutching her head as she slumped against the dinner table.  "My head's still spinning.  It's hard to even sleep..."  She felt a golden hoof on her shoulder.  She looked up.

	Belle was smiling sweetly.  "It couldn't have been easy, Rainbow," she said.  "Giving up what you did."

	"Heh... yeah, well..."  Rainbow shrugged.  "I didn't have the sword for that long anyways, and it's not like I'm totally loss on the princess front—"

	"Rainbow..."  Belle squeezed her shoulder.  "We all know that you sacrificed more than that."

	Rainbow bit her lip.  At last, her voice cracked, "I-I would have given up more if I stayed."

	Pilate and Kera smiled.

	Eagle and Ebon stared, rosy-cheeked.

	"Unnngh..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "When it rains, it pours." She leaned in and nuzzled Belle dearly.

	"Awwwwwwwwwwwwww," Props cooed again.

	"Eep!  C-careful, Rainbow!" Belle shuddered as the plate before them rattled.  "The cheese!"

	"I always have my eye out for cheese."

	"Heeheehee!"

	"It's so great to have you with us, Rainbow," Pilate said.  "It wouldn't be the same Jury otherwise."

	"Yeah, well..."  Rainbow leaned back with a somber breath.  "The you-know-what is still out on that one."

	"Cute."

	"Mrmmmfff..."  Zaid muttered in mid-scarf, gesturing.  "You know, Awesome Sauce... mmmfff... I was thinking..."  He gulped a bite down.  "There's no reason why you can't have another sword made for you!"

	"Buh?"

	"I've been told just how badflank you were with all the goonie slaying back in Stratopolis!  Maybe—like—we can land in a town around here that has a blacksmith!"

	"Unnngh... Zaid..."

	"For real!"  He grinned.  "I've got experience in making some steel!  We'll give you something new to bite between your teeth!  Maybe something with a snazzier hilt.  I mean, no offense to the righteously enchanted beacon connecting Durandana to Equestria, but that damn blade always looked a bit too plain to me."

	"Really?" Pilate cocked his head innocently to the side.

	"That's it!  I'll get you one with a snazzier hilt!  Bird wings and all that crap!  It'll even match your eyes—"

	"Look, Zaid, you want my opinion on that?" Rainbow droned.  "Do whatever.  For real.  Knock yourself out."

	"Pffft.  Don't you care?"

	"Not really, no."  Rainbow sighed.  "I'm just... through with fighting for a while."  She slumped back in her chair.  "I don't even feel up to kicking clouds at the moment."

	"Nopony's going to force you to do any of the sort, Rainbow," Belle said.

	"Yes, well, give it time," Rainbow said with a tired smirk.

	"Now that's more like it," Josho uttered.

	"Hrmmph... I think differently!"  Eagle Eye stood up.  "Let's enjoy this moment of peace and togetherness!"

	"Ugh..."  Josho rolled his eyes.  "Somepony shoot me.  Roarke?!"

	"No!  I mean it!"  Eagle grinned wide.  "How about a toast?"

	"Erm..."  Ebon fidgeted.  "I-I didn't pour drinks yet."

	Eagle tapped his chin, glanced down, and grinned wide.  He raised a slice of grilled cheese.  "Ahem...To peace!  And Rainbow Dash living the dream!"

	"Spkkkt... Ha ha ha ha!"  Rainbow hugged herself, grinning.  "You for real?"

	"As real as I've ever been!" Eagle beamed.

	"Snazzatron!" Kera hopped up on the table before Belle could stop her, levitating her own slice of cheese sandwhich.  "To Rainbow Dash!"

	"Heeheeehee!"  Props hopped up and raised her slice.  "To keeping things breezy!"

	Pilate stood up, holding a plate out.  "To continued civility..."

	"Spark alive, beloved..."  Belle stealthily replaced Pilate's plate with a sandwich slice and stood up beside him.  "Hrmmm... To a warm reception in Val Roa."

	"To panties!" Zaid shot up, grinning.

	"Hrmmmf..."  Floydien rolled his eyes and stood up.  "To less of this boomer pooper pile."

	Eagle Eye giggled.

	Ebon glanced at his barren place setting.  He hurriedly scooped up a slice from Eagle's plate and stood up.

	"Heh... you guys are impossible..."  Rainbow grabbed a slice and hovered up.  "Just how do we do this?"

	"We just do it!"

	"To the Jury!" Ebon squeaked proudly.

	"To getting this over with!"  Rainbow shoved her sliced forward.

	Everypony followed suit.  With a loud squish, their cheesy sandwiches collided above the table... and stuck together.

	"Whoopsies!" Props blushed.

	"You've got to be kidding Floydien..."

	"You didn't think this out, glitterbutt!" Josho grumbled.

	"Sorr-rr-rr-yyyy!" Eagle Eye managed amidst a giggle-snort.

	As the group struggled to unstick the sandwiches, Props suddenly glanced aside.

	"Uhhh... Zaidy Waidy?"

	"Rrrgh... Yeah, Blondie?"

	"Aren't you forgetting something?"

	"... ... ..."  Zaid's ears folded back.  "Megacrud!"  He dropped his sandwich altogether and galloped out of the room.  "Gang way!"  He shot into the tunnel, took a sharp left, and slammed the lavatory door behind him.  Seconds later, everypony could almost feel the airship rocking.

	"Hrmmmf..."  The elk frowned.  "What did Floydien just say?"

	"Oh goddess..."  Ebon rolled his eyes and giggled.

	"Hoo boy..."  Josho slumped back in his seat with a dumb smirk.  "How the tables have turned."

	"And the seats, for that matter," Pilate added.

	The whole mess room filled with chuckles and laughter.

	Roarke heard it from afar.  She stared, unseen, from the kitchen door.  Chewing on her lip, the Searonese mare almost stepped out to join the group.  She lurched in place, wincing.  Her lenses reflected the colors of the rainbow—then nothing as they retracted.

	With a seething expression, Roarke turned from the group.  She brushed her scarlet braids back, sighed, and trotted lonesomely across the kitchen and into the stairwell beyond.
		//------------------------------//
		// A Lay of the Land		//------------------------------//

	"Trouble?"  An earth pony shrugged, resting casually against the railing of his wooden tree platform.  "Can't say I've heard of any trouble from Val Roa!  That place is as peaceful as peaceful can get!"

	Bellesmith, Pilate, and Rainbow Dash leaned over the Noble Jury's side.  A bright afternoon sky loomed above where the skystone ship gently hovered.

	"So, you do hear from the heart of the kingdom often?" Pilate asked.

	"Heh... you kidding?"  The earth pony glanced back, smiling down at the quaint village resting in the shadow of the alpine forest.  "This place wouldn't exist without the Val Roan trade routes!"  He turned back.  "We exchange metals and spices every week!"

	"When was the last time you heard from them?" Belle asked.

	"By 'them,' who do you mean exactly?" the villager asked.

	"Uhm... anypony, I guess," Rainbow said.  "The government... the monarchy..."

	The villager laughed, slapping his knee.  "Whew boy!  You ponies really aren't from around here, are ya?"

	"Uhhh..."  Rainbow glanced at Pilate's metal plate, Belle's broken horn, then stretched her wings with a smirk.  "You think?"

	The stallion blinked.  "Holy smokes, that's fancy..."

	"We were... uhm... hoping to seek audience with the Val Roan Monarchy," Belle said.  "Is... that even possible?"

	"Ma'am, I've never been so much as within a stone's throw of the glittering capitol!"  The stallion said.  "I don't think I could even afford to sneeze east of the mountains!  But, who knows?  You ponies probably could, judging from the shine of that skystone!"

	Two of the three glanced up at the ship's crimson propulsion.

	"Why?" Rainbow asked.  "Is that a good thing?"

	"You have to be really rich to afford a flying machine around here."

	"You mean you don't have an abundance of zeppelins in these parts?" Pilate remarked.

	"Hey.  I'm doing jumping jacks inside this handsome shell, pal."  The stallion chuckled.  "I've been on forest watch for over twenty years!  Last time I saw an air vehicle was back when I was just a little colt!  And that was because some important Duke was visiting the therapeutic springs north of here!"

	"Oh... uhm..."  Belle smiled awkwardly.  "I do hope we haven't alarmed anypony."

	"Pffft.  Don't worry about it," the stallion said with a wave.  "Besides, you seem like an awfully nice bunch.  Just what are you looking to do in Val Roa?"

	"Call us ambassadors," Pilate explained.  "We have reason to believe that some nefarious force wishes to encroach upon the monarchy's fortunes."

	"Heh... 'some nefarious force?'  Like who?"

	"That's what we were hoping you would tell us."

	"Yes, well... hmmmm..."  The stallion rubbed his chin in thought.  "There are some dirty mean reptiles who live on some islands to the far south."

	"The Lounge?" Rainbow blurted.

	The villager did a double-take.  "You know them?"

	"All too well," Rainbow droned with a frown.  "What have they been up to lately?"

	"Oh.  The Lounge are just fine!"

	Belle blinked.  "They are?"

	"Heh... it's just a few lizards who broke off from them that give the race a bad name.  Isn't it terrible?"  He shook his head with a smirk.  "They've got it good down south.  Warm waters.  Abundant fruit.  Great shipping routes."

	"You seem to have it quite good here," Belle said.

	"Hah.  Not when winter hits, believe me.  I think I'd rather be in the Grand Choke when that happens."

	"Do any lizard groups venture far east?"

	"Heck if I know.  I doubt it.  'Cuz then they'd be dealing with goblins."

	Rainbow's eyes narrowed.  "Goblins."

	"Yup.  Nasty little buggers.  Not all of them—though, just the ones that cause the biggest explosions."

	"Uhhh..."

	"What, you've never met goblins before?"

	Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "Not outside of old mares' tales."

	"They love to build guns, bombs, and crazy contraptions.  They're big on mining, and they supply lots of the metals to places as far as Alafreo.  Ambitious little leather-necks, and some of them can be downright dirty."

	"Some of them?"  Rainbow asked.  "Or enough of them to be a threat to Val Roa?"

	"Hah!  Not likely.  Val Roa squashed them centuries ago."

	"Is that so?" Pilate asked.

	The villager nodded.  "It was a pretty nasty war—if you could call it one.  The goblins were no match for the Val Roans from the beginning, even though the little imps started it.  They began attacking many of the southern villages that belonged to the northern kingdom.  The Val Roans drove them back and then defended their cities without contest for over two decades.  Finally, when the monarchy switched hooves, the newly appointed king realized he was sick of the goblins' crap and invaded the southern reaches.  Hah!  The half-pints gave up within three days!  Since then, the goblins have been strictly policed.  They're mostly harmless—save of course for the Green Bandits."

	"Green Bandits?"

	"Pfft.  Bunch of thugs and would-be pirates.  They attack villages like ours at least once a year.  The imps would probably get somewhere if their explosives didn't blow up in their wrinkled faces half of the time.  Last summer, we felt so bad for them we just gave them half of what was in our storehouse.  We've started trading amicably with the gang ever since."

	"That's... uhm... very interesting," Rainbow Dash said.

	"Heh, sorry to disappoint you!"  The villager said with a smirk.  "Unless a bunch of reptiles and Green Bandits have joined together to make some devilish army of darkness—heheh—I'd say you're in for some smooth sailing!"

	Rainbow glanced aside at Belle.  "Why's this continent so squeaky clean?"

	"Getting homesick?" Belle smirked.

	"Please..."  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "We just finished that arc."

	"Heeheehee..."

	"Is that all you dropped by for?  Just to ask a bunch of questions?"  The villager pouted slightly.  "For a minute there, you all got my hopes up."

	"I do apologize," Pilate said.  "But we were simply passing through."

	"Perhaps..."  Belle tapped her chin and smiled.  "We could trade something!"

	"Now you're talkin'!"  The pony leaned up against the railing.  "What have you got in mind?"

	"That depends."  Rainbow smiled nervously.  "Any of you guys in the mood for cheese?"  She gulped.  "Lots and lots of cheese?"



	Hours later, as the afternoon bled into a rosy sunset, the Noble Jury found itself cruising slowly over densely forested hills.

	"Just what the heck is this?"  Josho asked, turning a sliver of reflective silver around.

	"Apparently it's called a strip," Belle said from where she sat with Kera and Pilate on the other side of the Jury's top deck.  "It's the centerpiece of the Val Roan currency."

	"Are these ponies idiots or what?" Josho frowned.

	"Josho..."

	"No, seriously!  If you don't use round coins, then you stand to risk cheapscapes shaving the metal in ways that are harder to catch!"  He glanced up.  "Shave enough metal off, and you can smelt your own counterfeit!"

	"I didn't know you were an economy major, old stallion," Eagle Eye said.

	"Don't push it, dainty tush," Josho grumbled.  "It was either be an accountant or kill Xonans.  I ended up choosing the profession that got me more exercise."

	"Pffft.  If you say so."

	Ebon giggled from where he sat beside Eagle.

	"I gotta admit..."  Rainbow murmured as she paced in circles above the group.  "...I'm a little bit freaked out."

	"I'm sure gold bits is the standard back in Equestria as well," Pilate said.

	"No, it's not that."  Rainbow glanced at the treetops slowly drifting by them.  "Things around here are... a little t-too good to be true."

	"I'd say bask in it," Ebon said.  "We've got enough as it is to worry about."

	"But I just don't know what I should be worrying about," Rainbow groaned.  "Not until we get into Val Roa!"

	"And once we do, I don't think we'll be able to find out overnight," Pilate said. "Seems as though the monarchy is tightly reserved."

	"As well as they should be," Belle said.  "From the history of things, they've encountered there fair share of nasties from the south."

	"Really, though!" Kera squeaked.  "Why is it that all the bad guys tend to come from the south?"

	"Heh..."  Rainbow smirked.  "She makes a good point."

	"The Lounge!  Diamond dogs!  Foxes!  The Searonese..."

	"Now now, Kera..."  Belle patted the filly's head.  "Not all Searonese are evil."

	"Hrmmmmmmm..."  Rainbow folded her forelimbs, frowning.

	Belle squinted upat her.  "Right, Rainbow Dash...?"

	"Right..."  Rainbow paced and paced.  "They're just damn annoying."

	Kera giggled.



	"Grnnnnngh!"  Roarke gritted her teeth, struggling to file a metal bar in half.  "Come on... come on...!"  She hunched tightly over a metal crate inside the hangar where she was attempting to craft the frame to a new piece of armor.  "Come off... Searo damn you... come off!"

	SNAP!  The end broke loose, but it cracked the rest of the bar down the middle.

	Roarke's lenses retracted.  She hissed and kicked the crate altogether.  "Hnnngh!"

	The bar ricocheted off and smacked her fetlock.

	"Augggh!  Ass!"  Roarke hopped up and down in one place.  "Ass!  Ass! Ass!"  She leaned against a wall and suckled her hoof for a few seconds.  Suddenly, she froze.  She glanced at the black manasphere.  The glossy surface of the Lounge's hovercraft reflected Roarke in the middle of her curiously foalish gesture.

	Wincing heavily, Raorke stood straight... or at least she tried to.  Gulping, she glanced down at her hooves, noticing how intensely her legs were shivering.

	The mare began pacing... then pacing even faster.  Her breaths came in quick spurts.  She fought it, but where there had once been a growl—there was instead a nervous squeaking, a pitiable murmur.  She slumped to her haunches, pulling at her braids.

	"Rrrrrrrrgh... can't st-stand it... I hate this... I loathe this!"

	She hugged herself, panting.  She glanced over her shoulder.  The door to the stairwell lingered, cracked open.  From a distance, she could make out the giggling breaths of Props and Zaid.  Maybe other voices.  Each one of them shook her to the core.

	"Gnnnnngh!"  She clutched her head, seethed, and looked up with a heavy frown.  In a blur, she dashed to the far corners of the hangar, snatching up whatever weapon, axe, or spear she could find.  Then, without ceremony, she tossed them inside the hovercraft, leapt in, and closed the doors with a hiss.



	"...and so the moral of the story," Ebon said.  "...is never to serve venison to live deer."  He raised his eyebrows.

	"... ... ... ..."  Belle, Pilate, Eagle, and Josho stared dully at the stallion.

	At last, from the cockpit:  "Floydien gets it!"

	"Ha HA!"  Ebon pointed towards the bow with a bright grin.  "How about that!  Heheheh..."  He glanced down at his fidgeting hooves.  "Whewwwwwwwwwwwwww—I'm so glad I got out of that restaurant in Gray Smoke alive."

	"Yeah, well, so's my stomach," Josho said.

	Rainbow rolled her eyes.  Just then, the entire Jury lunged.

	Everypony blinked.

	"What the spit?!"  The elk in the cockpit twirled about, his antlers flashing.  "Did Nancy give birth?!"

	"We do feel a lot lighter," Pilate said.

	Eagle squinted at him.  "How do you know?"

	"A mystical zebra never shares his secrets."

	"You picked a bad time to be cheeky."

	"Would you rather go back to the venison story?"

	"Everypony... quiet!"  Rainbow hissed, raising her hooves.  "Ya hear that?"

	"Sounds like manaengines," Josho said.

	"Rainbow!  Look!"  Kera chirped, pointing over the ship's port side.  The group twirled about and watched in awe as a small black sphere shot over the forested landscape, coasting northeast.

	"Roarke?!"  Rainbow stammered.  "What in the buck is she doing?"

	"Something awesome, I bet!" Kera grinned.

	Rainbow frowned.  "I'll be the friggin' judge of that."

	"Rainbow?"  Belle blinked worriedly.  "What are you doing—?"

	"What else?"  Rainbow flapped her wings.  "I'm going after her!"

	"But—"

	"No, this stupid charade ends now!  Either she's gonna tell me what's got her saddle in a twist or I'm not coming back at all!"  Rainbow took a sharp right and breezed by the cockpit's dashboard.  "Floydien, bring her to a stop!  This shouldn't take long."

	"Yes yes yes, paint bucket."

	"Oh great..."  Josho lumbered about, groaning.  "Another delay.  Val Roa's going to be a cemetery by the time we get there."

	"Rest easy, Josho," Pilate said in a calm tone.  "Something tells me this is the most important thing to happen today..."

	Eagle Eye and Ebon watched nervously as Rainbow blurred after the black sphere in the distance.
		//------------------------------//
		// It's About Friggin' Dayum Time		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash didn't have to fly for long.  She was only crusing over the treetops for half-a-minute before she discovered the black Lounge transport parked in a tiny clearing between fir trees.  Muttering to herself, she angled her wings and dove down swiftly.

	Landing on exposed rock, she trotted around the dormant sphere.  The doors were left wide open.

	"Getting sloppy, Roarke..."  Rainbow turned and looked into the treeline.  "What in Celestia's name has gotten into your head?"

	Thick shadows formed just beyond the crimson swath of sunsetlight against the tree barks.  Rainbow squinted and squinted, and still she couldn't catch any sign of movement.  So, she held her breath, craning her ear towards the dense wilderness.  At last, she heard a steady train of rustling leaves and crackling pine cones. Without a moment's hesitation, she darted into the forest, threading neatly through trees as she zeroed in on the sound.

	Soon enough, she caught the unmistakable glint of Roarke's metal braces in the broken afternoon glow.  The mare was scurrying swiftly—on hoof—straight into nothingness.

	"Roarke?!" Rainbow called out.

	No response.

	"Roarke!"  At this point, Rainbow was frowning.  She flapped her wings harder, gliding at a distance parallel to Roarke's trudging gait.  "Roarke, for crying out loud!  Will you slow down?!"

	"I can't, Rainbow Dash," Roarke barked back, her voice uncharacteristically shaky as it ricocheted off the tree trunks.  "I... I-I just need some fresh air!"

	"Some fresh air?!"

	"I need to hunt!" Roarke snarled.  "You realize just how damn long it's been since I've reeled in some decent prey?"

	"Uhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh..."

	"Exactly!  I can't recall either!"  Roarke panted and seethed, dragging heavy equipment along with her.  "I'm getting stiff!  If I'm out of my element, I can't be expected to protect the Jury when the situation calls!"

	"Roarke..."

	"If I can't be expected to protect the Jury, then I'm about as useful as a dead breeder full of cysts!"

	"Roarke!"  Rainbow Dash slammed down in front of her, knocking loose leaves and pine needles.  "This ends now!"

	Roarke gnashed her teeth, then slumped with a sigh.  "Rainbow—"

	"No more running!  No more wallflowering!"  Rainbow snarled, marching into Roarke with each bombastic utterance.  "No more 'mystery girl routine!'  No more silent treatment!"  She stomped her hooves again.  "Talk to me, dang it!  What's gotten into you!"

	"I... I..."  Roarke frowned, her eye-lenses pistoning as she glance to the left.  "I don't know what you're talking about."

	"Yes you do!"  Rainbow moved to the left, hissing, "You're not acting normal!"

	"Normal?" Roarke looked to the right.  "This is the way I always am."

	Rainbow darted right.  "Not lately, it hasn't!"

	"Nnnngh..."  Roarke spun about and began dragging her weapons in the opposite direction.  "Please, don't lecture me..."

	"Who's lecturing, Roarke?!  It's a fact!"  Rainbow flapped after her.  "You've been opening up!  You've dined with us in the mess hall!  You've reached out to Kera!  You've girl-talked with Bellesmith for Celestia's sake!"

	"It wasn't girl-talk," Roarke muttered.  "She talked about Pilate's sleeping habits and I gave a detailed synopsis of how Searonese warriors properly groomed before retiring with a slave."

	"Uhhhh... I hate to break it to ya, Roarke, but that's pretty much 'girl-talk.'"

	Roarke stopped in her tracks.  "Oh.  Well..."  She gritted her teeth.  "Now I'm going hunting!"

	"For what?!" Rainbow cackled.

	"For whatever presents itself!"

	"You can't just go hunting at random, Roarke!"

	"I most certainly can."

	"And what if you accidentally shoot and bag yourself a sentient ceature, huh?!"

	"If it screams in more than four syllables, then I'll hold fire."

	"Dammit, Roarke!"  Rainbow hovered in her face, frowning.  "Will you just stop and listen to me?!"  She pointed.  "I know for a fact that you've been opening up lately, and it's been awesome!  But now you're doing a total one-eighty out of nowhere and I want to know why!"

	Roarke took a deep, deep breath.  Next, she frowned venomously at the pegasus.  "I don't see how you could possibly be a judge on how my behavior's been."

	"Buh?"

	"Seeing as you were too busy flocking with your bird-chirping friends all of last week."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Is that what this is about?!"  She grimaced.  "Our stay in Durandana?"

	"Tell me, Rainbow Dash, did you even miss your hammock on board the Jury while you were busy lying around with the pegasi that time forgot?!"

	"What...?!"  Rainbow slowly shook her head, muzzle agape.  "Roarke, you got it all wrong!  All I was doing was simply getting the Durandanans to connect with Equestria!  They were distant relatives of mine and I c-couldn't just leave them in ignorance!"

	"Uh huh..."

	Rainbow folded her forelimbs, frowning.  "If you found a group of Searonese living out here—cut off from the rest of the world—wouldn't you give your all to make sure they knew about the legacies and the follies of the rest of their sisters?"

	"... ... ..."  Roarke fidgeted where she stood.

	"Well?!"  Rainbow leaned forward.  "Roarke Most Rare?!  I want an intelligent, logical answer to that!"

	Roarke spun about.  She huffed, dropped her equipment, and trotted aimlessly forward.  "I'm not in the mood."

	"M... Mood?!"  Rainbow almost went cross-eyed.  "Roarke, I didn't know that word could even compute for you!"

	"Go away, Rainbow..."  Roarke stammered, her breaths labored as she trudged through thick bales of pine needles.  "I-I mean it..."

	"I don't think this has anything to do with me or the Durandanans!" Rainbow said, flying after her.

	"I just... j-just need some time alone—"

	"I think this has everything to do with you!"

	Roarke spun, her eye-lenses instantly pistoning outward.  "Me?"

	"Beneath all that metal crap, you're still a pony, Roarke!"  Rainbow said.  "Believe it!  And, y'know what?  It's sometimes okay to admit to being selfish!"

	"Rainbow..."

	"So just admit it!"

	Roarke gazed at Rainbow.  Slowly, she shook her head.  "Even after all these months I've known you... all the heroic acts you've performed... all the lengths you've flown... you can be this blind?"

	Rainbow touched down in front of Roarke, coiling her wings.  "Then talk to me, Roarke!  Tell me what I'm doing wrong?"

	"What would it matter?"  Roarke's nostrils flared.  "No matter what, you'll still be the same stubborn, selfless, suicidal east horse."

	"Care to break that sentence down, bit by bit?"

	"No."  Roarke seethed.  "I don't care to!  Because nothing is going to change who and what you are!"

	"Isn't that a good thing?"

	"You know what would have been a good thing?!"  Roarke's teeth gritted hard.  "You should have stayed, Rainbow."

	"Stayed?  Stayed where?"

	"In Durandana!"

	"Roarke, you really think I'm going to abandon my friends and—"

	"Your friends were in good hooves!" Roarke hollered.  "But now they are in sick, dying hooves!"

	"But—"

	"You could have been at peace, Rainbow!" Roarke barked.  "You could have had a piece of home!"

	"I can't paint anyplace in the rest of the world and call it 'Equestria,' Roarke!  You know that!"

	"No..."  Roarke slowly shook her head.  "All I know is that you prefer dying in a frenzied blaze of glory over anything that you deserve!"

	"It's not about what I deserve!"  Rainbow grunted and kicked a loose pine cone.  "Dammit, Roarke!  What's gotten into your head!"

	"Val Roa can crumble in ashes," Roarke moaned.  "The Dark Side of the world and rust for eternity!  There's nothing out there that can give you what you want..."  Roarke fidgeted where she stood.  "Nopony who can give you what you need..."

	"I have my fr-friends, Roarke!" Rainbow exclaimed, red in the face.  "Isn't that enough?!"

	"It's..."  Roarke glanced down at her trembling hooves.  "It's not..."

	"Well?!"  Rainbow's voice cracked.  "Isn't it?"  Her eyes widened, for they were reflecting off of Roarke's lenses very, very closely.  "Mmmmmmff?!?!"

	Roarke's ears folded back for the first time since Rainbow saw the mare, or smelled her—like the sweating scent of desperation currently wafting up to her nostrils from where their lips made sweet, hot contact.

	"Mmmfff—guahh!"  Rainbow fiercely shoved Roarke back.

	Roarke fell on her haunches, trembling, avoiding Rainbow's gaze.

	"Pfft... Feh!"  Rainbow wheezed and waved her forelimbs.  "Are you crazy?!?"  She exhaled.  Blinked.  She plunged forward, tackling Roarke.

	"Mmmm—!"  Roarke literally yelped as Rainbow's body sprawled on top of her.  Blue legs squeezed the Searonese mare's body so tightly that her metal braces began to bend.  There was no pain, no panic, nothing but a rosy-tinted flush spreading like wildfire across Roarke's brown coat as she hugged Rainbow back, deliciously lost in the avalanche of feathers, kisses, and more feathers.  A symphony of melodic moans and tiny, dainty gasps filled the fuzzy gaps in between.



	"There!  I think I see them!" Kera said, pointing off the bow's end.

	"Praise the Spark!"  Belle trotted up alongside Zaid and Pilate.  "Have any missiles flown, yet?"

	"Uhm..."  Pilate fidgeted from where he stood on the ship's edge.  "I'm hearing something, but unless missiles are slippery—"

	"Eep!" Eagle Eye's voice squeaked.  The Jurists turned to see a furiously blushing stallion rush towards the opposite end of the ship.

	"What's wrong, EE?" Ebon asked.

	"Holy spit!" a voice barked from the cockpit.  "Talk about a squeeze squeeze!"

	"Uhhhhhhh..."  Zaid blinked awkwardly.

	"Oh..."  Belle held a pair of hooves over her burning muzzle.  "Oh d-dear..."

	"Weird..."  Kera's nose scrunched.  "Nopony's gonna win if they keep wrestling like that!"

	"Aaaaaaaaaaaand that's enough fresh-air for now, kiddo." Zaid discreetly scooped Kera up from where she stood.

	"Gah!  Zaaaaaaid!"  Kera wriggled in his grip, legs dangling.  "But maybe they'll need a referee!"

	"Believe me...ahem."  Zaid tugged a shell-shocked Belle along as the group made their collective way below deck.  "At the rate those two are going?  Heh... they'll need no help with a submission move..."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Distance We Fall From		//------------------------------//

	Starlight glittered off Rainbow Dash's eyelashes as they opened.  She blinked, her ears serenaded by crickets and cool wind through the fir trees.  Feeling a chill, she did the first thing she could think of for warmth:  she hugged the body next to her tightly.

	The mare blinked.

	Rainbow craned her head up, her ruby eyes squinting down at the figure lying beside her.  She stretched a hoof, tracing the end of it around a soft brown chin and muzzle.

	Roarke's body lay still, stirring every so often with calm breaths.  The starlight glinted off her dormant lenses, as well as the ringlets at the end of her scarlet braids.

	Staring intently, Rainbow touched one ringlet after another.  She took turns, rubbing her hoof down the length of each braid, feeling the ticklish fibers like fine red rope.  The metal ends clattered gently with one another, and Rainbow giggled lightly.  A gentle warmth spread through her cheeks.  She rested her head against a bed of pine needles and gazed sideways at Roarke's neck and chest.  Eventually, her eyes found their way to one of the mare's many metal plugs—as did her hoof.  She traced a circle around the former bounty hunter's punctured chest, marveling at how seamlessly the skin blended with the prosthetics.

	"Hmm... how funny," she murmured lightly.  "All this time, I never realized you'd be..."  She lingered, then smiled even more.  "... so soft."  Another giggle.

	"I'm awake, you know," Roarke's lips suddenly moved.

	"Gah!"  Rainbow jerked back, curling her hooves to her chest.  Once she caught her breath, she rolled her eyes and groaned, "Luna poop, girl!  Somepony should put a bell on you!"

	"Hrmmmfff... not sure there's any room at this point for more metal."

	"Yeah, no kidding.  I was just... uhm... admiring it all myself," Rainbow said.

	"Indeed."

	Silence.  Dead silence.

	Roarke's lips moved again.  "Nopony told you to stop."

	"Oh.  Uhm..."  Rainbow giggled breathily.  "Alrighty, then..."  She stroked her hoof gently down Roarke's chest and lingered at a pair of plugs.  "They're a lot bigger than I thought..."

	"Most ponies don't ever get close enough to notice," Roarke said.

	"Still... just... kinda freaky, y'know?"  Rainbow bit her lip.  The mare's ears folded as she glanced up.  "Did they hurt?  Going in, I mean?"

	Roarke's nostrils flared.  "Every single one."

	"I'm sorry..."

	"Don't be," Roarke murmured.  "I'm not.  They've since been of priceless use to me all my life."

	The edge of Rainbow's muzzle twisted up.  "They didn't prove to be very helpful a few hours ago."

	"Yes, well..."  Roarke stirred slightly.  "...none of me proved very useful a few hours ago."

	"Hehehehehehe!"  Rainbow chuckled raspily.  "Yeah."  She rolled her eyes, blushing furiously.  "Yeahhhhhhhhhhh..."

	"That's twice now you've kicked my ass," Roarke muttered.  "I'm rather fond of the second bout."

	"Snkkkt—Hehehehehe!"  Rainbow curled against Roarke, clenching her eyes shut as her cheeks went even redder.  "Heh heh heh... whewwwwww... I... uhm... it's just that... that... uhhhhhh... I'm... uhmmm..."

	"I'm not complaining," Roarke said.  "I won't complain."  She gulped.  "You're still here."

	Rainbow blinked at that.  "...why wouldn't I be?"

	Roarke's teeth clenched hard.  There was a slight stirring to her lenses, but her body remained still.

	Rainbow continued to gaze at her.  She traced a hoof up, running it gently over the contours of Roarke's ear.  The fuzzy lobe flicked once or twice, then relaxed under the pegasus' gentle caress.  "Celestia, you're so friggin' adorable," Rainbow blurted.  "For so long, I couldn't... I-I mean I didn't even bother to--"

	"It's okay," Roarke said.  "I didn't let you."

	"Yes you did."

	"Hrmmmph..."

	"You totally did!"  Rainbow inhaled sharply.  "Roarke, you gave me so many opportunities to let you in.  And I did the exact opposite."

	"You couldn't be blamed."

	"Couldn't I?"  Rainbow sighed.  "You came back after I yelled at you.  You saved my friends... empowered them."

	"You would have done the same for them in time."

	"I could have.  But would I?"  Rainbow gulped.  "You're the loyalest pony there is.  You filled in all the gaps.  I... I just..."

	"Rainbow..."

	"I'm not worthy..."  Rainbow murmured.  A gulp.  "And yet here you are."  She slowly shook her head.  "I just... I..."  A fidgeting.  "I can't say anything."

	"Pretend that you can."

	"I'm so lucky.  So friggin' lucky."  Rainbow exhaled with a shuddering smile.  "Thanks for showing me."

	"Hmmm..."  Roarke's ears twitched.  "Thanks for letting me see stars."

	"Snkkkt-Heeheehee!"  Rainbow Dash curled up against Roarke again.  "Is that all it comes down to?"

	Roarke was silent.

	"...Roarke?"

	"Would you... uhm..."

	"Hmmm?"

	Roarke bit her lip and finally said, "Would you t-touch my braids again?"

	Smiling, Rainbow complied, running her hoof through the mare's braids.  She flounced one after another, letting the ringlets collide and make clinking sounds like gold coins.  "Heh... they're so cool," she said.  "I should have mine done just like these."

	"No." Something rumbled in Roarke's chest as her lenses pistoned out.  "Keep your mane as it is."

	Rainbow shrunk inward a little.  "Y-yes, ma'am."  She nevertheless continued to toy with the braids, collecting as many as she could around her fetlock.  "Heh... I love these darn things, but I can't help but wonder what you look like with it all hanging out."

	"Is that what you wish?"

	"Huh?"  Rainbow blinked. She chuckled nervously.  "Pffft!  I-I was just thinking out loud, Roarke—"

	"You know, Rainbow," Roarke spoke suddenly, "I have shared a bed with many partners in my life."

	Rainbow couldn't help but cringe.  "That's... n-not exactly something you should be t-talking about right now, ya think—?"

	"Rainbow..."  Roarke stretched her forelimbs out for the first time and grasped Rainbow's hoof.  She leaned forward.  "...I have never had a lover before."

	Rainbow stared at her.

	"I have never... never..."  Roarke winced in mid-speech.  She tilted her head down at Rainbow's hoof.  "Searo's womb, I should just stay silent..."

	Rainbow leaned in and gently nuzzled Roarke's cheek.  Roarke exhaled calmly, her body going limp as Rainbow continued to rub the side of her muzzle against Roarke's.  Rainbow leaned in even further, stroking the curve of her neck against the side of Roarke's head and then over her mane.  She then slid her face down, kissing along Roarke's forehead and towards her nose, finally ending with a feather-light contact of their lips.  She leaned back, stroking Roarke's hooves with her own.

	"Like that?" she said.

	Roarke quivered.  She sniffled and nodded timidly.

	"Now..."  Rainbow Dash leaned in again, pressing her cheek against Roarke's.  "Forget Searo... and just say anything."

	Rainbow could feel the heavy heartbeat in Roarke's body.  After a prolonged silence, the mare eventually spoke.

	"I've b-been falling apart for a long t-time," Roarke stammered.  "Even before I met you.  Before I met Imre.  I knew that once everything had peeled loose, I'd have have to meet my end.  I just... d-didn't expect that there'd be a new me on the other side.  I would never admit it... but... but I was frightened, Rainbow.  I've been very frightened..."

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow silently nodded, nuzzling the mare.  "...I sorta figured."

	"But... but it's not as b-bad as I thought..."  Roarke clenched her teeth, seething slightly.  "It... it hurts to admit it.  Because it feels like weakness.  But it's something else... the complete opposite, perhaps?"

	"Mmmmhmmm..."

	"Rainbow..."

	Rainbow sat up so she could look down at the mare.

	A pair of lenses reflected Rainbow's face twice over.  "Whether you knew it or not... whether you meant to or not... you caught me as I fell through.  And... and I-I can't stop dwelling on it... thinking about it."  Roarke gulped.  "I-I'm sorry for being so distant in Durandana.  Lately, I've been out of grips with myself, and I blamed it on you..."

	"It's okay..."

	"No, it isn't.  You deserve—"

	"I deserve exactly what's come to me," Rainbow said, gently stroking Roarke's cheek.  "And that's why there's no way in heck that I'm mad at you."  Her lips curved.  "Especially right now."

	Roarke leaned her cheek into Rainbow's caressing hoof.  She exhaled heavily as her body went limp.

	Rainbow smiled even more.  Her hoof trailed around the edges of Roarke's lenses.

	"Hrmmm... clasp the sides."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Huh?"

	"Clasp both sides simultaneously and lift," Roarke said.  "They'll come off very easily."

	Rainbow's lips pursed.  "But.. but..."  She fidgeted.  "I mean... you have those things on all the time.  Like... will it h-hurt?"

	Roarke clasped one hoof around Rainbow's forelimb.  "Nothing can hurt me now."

	Silence.

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  With careful grace, she reached down and clasped both sides of the metal mare's lenses.  There was a distinct snapping sound, followed by a brief hiss.  They felt incredibly heavy in the pegasus' grip, but that didn't stop her from lifting them off and dropping them in the bed of pine needles beside the two ponies.  Rainbow leaned over, staring intently.

	At first, Rainbow thought she was gazing down a deep well.  Twin silver-blue pools quivered, like tiny slits that rippled with each touch of starlight as Roarke strained and struggled to look back at her.  The mare visibly winced, but firmly murmured.  "I d-don't even know what they look like," Roarke said, another tear or two straining loose.  Her muzzle bravely formed a smile.  "Could you describe them to me?"

	Rainbow stared and stared.  For several seconds, she hovered like a pale statue.  At last, she collapsed, starting with her folded ears then down through a flushed red muzzle as her lips curved.  "Honest," her voice cracked, and soon the world between them fogged.  Rainbow sniffled and whimpered again, "So very honest."

	Rainbow didn't realize she was falling until Roarke's forelimbs lifted up and folded around her.  The petite pegasus curled up against her fuzzy brown chest, clenching her eyes shut as tiny sobs squeaked out of her smiling lips.  With each shuddering breath, Rainbow retreated more and more into Roarke's embrace, and she found a warm place there to hide and melt.

	"Thank you," Rainbow sobbed, curling her forelimbs over her eyes as she spoke in muffled little bursts against Roarke's neck.  "Just... th-thank you, Roarke... thank you thank you thank you..."

	"Mmmmmm..."  Roarke kissed the mare's forehead.  Shutting her eyes, she rested her neck and chin over the pegasus' head and held her tight.  "After all you're flying, it's about time somepony caught you too."


		//------------------------------//
		// A Dawn Like No Other		//------------------------------//

	Morning came.  The sun rose.

	Normally, Rainbow Dash would have embraced the dawn with an elaborate, cat-like stretch.  This occasion was very, very different.  As soon as she awoke, she felt strong forelimbs wrapped around her from behind.  Her eyelashes fluttered open, and after ten seconds of cognizance, she smiled... then smiled some more.

	Roarke was still asleep, her naked eyes clenched shut as her body expanded and contracted form directly behind Rainbow.  The petite pegasus could feel every subtle twitch of the metal mare's coat hairs as she drifted along in her slumber.

	With a quiet trilling sound, Rainbow tugged one of Roarke's hooves up towards her chin and gave it a soft, feather-light nuzzle.  She closed her eyes once more, willing to let sleep quietly engulf her once more.

	As soon as she attempted relaxing, something caused her eyelids to flutter.  The mare stirred, then stirred again.

	"Hrmm..."

	Her muzzle scrunched.

	"Hrmmmmmfff..."

	She rubbed her eyelids, blinked several times, then squinted through the forest.  Her lips pursed.  She clenched and unclenched her eyes several times.

	"... .... ...what?"

	There was a second light on the horizon.  A light that wasn't the Sun.

	Rainbow's brow furrowed.  When she blinked, the light was still there.  Even when she clenched her eyes shut tight, the illumination lingered in the distance, like a tiny shimmer against infinite haze and darkness.

	By this time, Rainbow was wide awake with confusion.  She felt Roarke stirring behind her.  Nervously—yet quietly—she pulled Roarke's forelimb out from around her.  In her sleep, the Searonese pony tried curling up to Rainbow tighter, but the pegasus managed to slip away in time.  She lay Roarke's hoof by her side, brushing her braids back before standing up and quietly trotting past the bed of leaves and pine needles where they had retired overnight.

	The fresh dew on the ground gave a squishing sound to Rainbow's hooftrots.  Nevertheless, she sauntered east, approaching a cluster of rocks grown over with moss and grass.  Once she stood on top of a dull boulder, she was able to see past a fork in the nearby trees.  Once more, she could spot the sunrise... and could furthermore spot the difference between the dawnlight and the tiny glow flickering towards her like a distant beacon.

	"... ... ...what in Luna's name?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.  She glanced back at Roarke, then back at the beacon.  She exhaled with a shuddering sigh, hugging herself.



	Ebon Mane finished pouring a mug of coffee.  He then slid the steaming cup over in front of where Josho sat in the Noble Jury's mess hall.

	"There you have it," Ebon said.  He then shuffled over and sat besides an exhausted looking Eagle Eye in front of a plate of scrambled eggs.  "The closest thing you're gonna get around here to a Ledomaritan Capuccino."  Ebon gulped and smiled nervously.  "That's over one week old..."  He fidgeted.  "...and made by turtles."

	"Hrmmmmm..."  Josho leaned his fat chins against his forelimb.  "Swell..."  He telekinetically raised the cup, squinting at it in the hazy dawnlight wafting through the windows.  "Now all we need is some month-old doughnuts baked by horned toads and it's a regular Bed'n'Breakfast."

	"Heheh..."  Ebon stifled a yawn.  "Either I'm dead-tired or that was actually funny."

	"Mrmmf... lay off of him, old stallion," Eagle Eye muttered, digging at his food.  "He did what you asked for."

	"And I'm glad for that.  Honest."  Josho took a meager sip and shuddered.  "Don't get so overprotective of your new marefriend."

	"Hey!  Come on!"  Eagle frowned.

	"Heeheehee..." Ebon quivered, giggling.

	Eagle blinked aside.  "Huh?"

	"'Marefriend.'  That's so stupid and silly."  Ebon nevertheless leaned against Eagle's shoulder.  "I liiiiiiiiiiiike it."

	"Hrmmm..."  Eagle's cheeks reddened slightly.  "I don't."

	"Look, as long as you two have at least one horn between you—" Josho began.

	"Can we not?"  Eagle sighed.  "Please?"

	"Wow, I must have put too much pepper on those eggs," Ebon stammered, blinking.

	"It's not that.  I'm just... worried... you know?"

	"About what?"

	"What else?"  Eagle dug at his plate, fidgeting.  "Neither have returned."

	"Let's just pretend it's their honeymoon and be done with it," Josho said, taking another sip.  "And, honestly, the less I try to think about it, the better."

	"I thought you of all ponies were the one in a hurry to get us to Val Roa."

	Eagle squinted.  "I mean—can you imagine trying to peel a mare out of a rusted corset only to find out it's her skin?!"

	"Josho!"

	"Hey!"  Josho shrugged.  "I know we all need to get to Val Roa!"  A beat.  "But... dayum... that mare needed to get laid way the hell more."

	Eagle raised his hoof to retort, fumbled, and shrugged.  "You know what, I'll give you that one."

	Josho nodded into his mug.  "Thatta girl."

	Ebon giggled again, and Eagle rolled his eyes with a smirk.

	"Duaaaaaaaah..."  An exhausted zebra with a tangled mane shuffled limply into the mess hall.  He fought an endless yawn before muttering, "Morning, Jury."

	"Morning, Pilate."

	"Morning, Pilate.

	"Hey there, bright eyes."

	"The place is sure quiet today."

	"Heh... if you say so."

	"And I do."  Pilate muttered, wandering over to the table.

	"Would you like some eggs and coffee, Pilate?" Ebon asked.

	"That sounds splendid, Ebon.  Much thanks."

	"Have a seat."

	"Don't mind if I do."  Pilate slumped down in a stool.  "Mmmmm... these mornings are far colder than the ones in Central Ledomare.  Reminds me of winter dawns in Mountainfall.  Nothing better than saddling up to a warm meal as the day outside begins to bloom."  He exhaled through a calm smile.  Silence.  His metal brow furrowed.  "I'm facing away from the table, aren't I?"

	"I'm afraid so, Pilate," Eagle said with a nod.

	"Nnnngh..."  Pilate spun one hundred and eighty degrees and scooted the stool closer.  "I don't suppose it would be selfish of me to ask Props to construct an iron bar that leads from my cabin to the dining table?"

	"Not unless you want to find the Tree of Life," Josho said.

	"Ugh... please..."  Pilate waved a hoof and slumped his chin against the tabletop.  "It's too early for somthing that obscure."

	"Suit yourself, Stripes."

	"Mmmm..."

	Silence.

	"She isn't back, is she?"  Pilate remarked.

	Josho slowly shook his head.  "Nope.  Neither is Roarke."

	"Indeed."  Pilate's lips slowly curved.  "Honestly, I don't think I could be happier."

	For the first time that morning, Eagle managed a chuckle.  "Here here..."



	Roarke stirred.  Her face tensed.  Her hooves moved, then swam tiny circles in the air—feeling around for something that was now gone.  In a flash, her eyes opened, and she instantly regretted it.

	"Guhhhh... Searo's ovaries!"  She slapped a hoof over her tearing sockets.  Feeling around with her other leg, she found where the lenses were resting in the surrounding bed of pine needles.  Brushing them clean against her coat, she raised them to her head and snapped them in place.  Each lens pistoned in and out in opposite directions until she regained her focus.

	Standing up, she looked around.  The forest bed was empty.  There was a tiny impression right beside her, but no pegasus.

	"Rainbow...?"  Even Roarke was surprised at how swiftly and fitfully she had spat the name out.  Her breaths quickened, and her ears twitched alternatingly.  "R-Rainbow...?!" A heavy gulp.  "Where did—?"

	"Over here, Roarke."

	The metal mare spun about, jaw clenched.  She trotted swiftly over a patch of grass and looked behind a boulder.  There, Rainbow sat, squatting over a bed of exposed white dirt and gray soil.  She had a stick gripped between two hooves and was drawing figures in the earth.

	"Nnnnghhh..."  Roarke's whole body deflated with an exhale of relief.  "Rainbow, don't run off like that."

	"I didn't run off," Rainbow muttered, continuing to drag the stick through the sand.  "I only trotted—like—ten feet.  I didn't want to wake you."

	"But still, you..."  Roarke winced.  She cleared her throat and stammered, "I mean... th-that's fine, of course.  I just... uh..."

	"I'm flattered that you missed me."  Rainbow dropped the stick, brushed her hooves clean, and stood up.  "But it was only a few friggin' minutes.  Don't have a cow."

	"Why would I want to possess a bovine?"

	"It's a figure of speech, ya gorgeous frying pan, you."

	"But—..."  Roarke grunted in frustration.  "Rainbow?!  What are you—?"

	"Shhhhh..."  Rainbow backtrotted and rested a hoof on Roarke's shoulder.  With her other hoof, she pointed at the diagram in the dirt.  "Look at this."

	"Hmmm?"

	"Do you recognize it?"

	Roarke's lenses pistoned out as far as they could go.  Carefully, she studied the symbol:





	What the metal mare saw was a pair of curved lines, vertical parabolas or half-ellipses that faced one another.  In the center of the diagram and between the curves were two small circles, one positioned above the other.  Adding to the overall symmetry of the diagram were four more circles, two on each outer side, positioned at the beginning and ending points of the curved lines.

	"It... is certifiably random," Roarke droned.

	"Do you recognize it?" Rainbow asked.

	Roarke gave Rainbow a double-glance.  "No," she said.  Her brow furrowed.  "Don't you?"

	"No."

	"Then why did you draw it?"

	"Because I woke up seeing it," Rainbow said.  She swallowed a lump down her throat.  "Just now..."  She gazed towards the east horizon.  "...and it won't go away.  Even when I close my eyes."

	Roarke gazed through the trees.  Her lenses twirled and clicked within their frames.

	"You don't see it, do you?" Rainbow muttered.

	Roarke took a deep breath.  She rested a hoof gently on Rainbow's neck.  "I think we should get you back to the Jury..."

	Rainbow slowly, slowly nodded, gazing east in a hypnotic way.  "I think you should get me back there too..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Another Day, Knocking Them Out		//------------------------------//

	"So, that's when I said, 'Khao, you can lead a horse to a water, but you can't make her clop!'"

	Props paused halfway through her plate of eggs.

	Ebon winced from where he sat besides Eagle Eye.

	Pilate and Belle sat in dead silence while Kera scarfed her plate up.

	"Annnnnd yeah... that's when the Herald officially put me on latrine duty," Zaid finished with a nervous smile.

	More dead silence.

	Zaid gulped.  "This isn't helping, isn't it?"

	"Nope."

	"Uh uh."

	"No no no."

	"All we can think about is Rainbow Dash and Roarke."

	"Same here."

	"Yes yes yes."

	"Pffft.  Yeah, well..."  Zaid shrugged and slumped against the mess hall table.  "It's not like I didn't try."

	"Awwwww... and you gave it a good try, Zaidy Waidy!"  Props grinned, lifting him back up by his shoulder.  "But sometimes you just gotta let sleeping mares—"

	The Noble Jury shook suddenly with the tell-tale signs of a hovercraft docking within the hangar.

	"Nancy shakes!"  Floydien exclaimed.  "The black ball return turns!"

	"Squee!"  Props hopped out of her seat, letting go of Zaid.

	"Guaah—" THUD!  His chin hit the table first before his body ragdolled onto the floor.  "Ooof!"

	"I wanna be the first mare to shake their hooves!"  Props sing-songed, hop-hop-hopping through the kitchen.

	"Propsy!  Hold up!"  Ebon galloped after her.  "Don't crowd in on them!"

	"Ebonnnnn!"  Eagle's voice cracked as he scampered behind them.  "Don't crowd in on her crowding in on them!  Just hold on!"

	"Mmmmmmm..."  Kera licked her plate clean, burped, then pointed at where Props had just sat.  "You think she's gonna finish it?"

	"Uhhhhh..."  Belle glanced at Pilate.  The couple stood up in unison.  "Have your fill, darling.  We'll be... r-right back."

	"Indeed."  Pilate rested a hoof on Belle's side as the two briskly trotted towards the ship's rear.

	"Heeeee!"  Kera zipped towards Props' place and began attacking her scrambled eggs.  "Mmmmm... so scrumptioustastical!"

	"Mmmf... gross gross," Floydien stood up and walked the opposite way.

	"Guh..."  Zaid stood back up, his dizzy eyes seeing stars.  "Heh-heh."  He grinned crookedly.  'Raindoarke.'  Phweeeeeee."  Thwump!



	The hangar had just closed, and the doors to the Lounge sphere were beginning to hiss open at the precise moment that Props and several other Jurists skidded to a stop.

	"Woohoo!"  Props bounced up high, pumping a hoof in the air.  "Hail the conquering heroes!"

	"Uhhh..."  Ebon blinked curiously.  "Just who is conquering who, exactly?"

	"Fine, Ebony.  Heehee..."  Props rolled her blue eyes with a mischievous grin.  "Conkin' heroes."

	Ebon blanched.  "You've been hanging around Zaid too much."

	"He smells just fine once you get to know his insides."

	"Wat."

	Eagle Eye rushed up, breathless.  "Come on, guys!  Can't we just give them some space?"

	"Funny you should say that!"  Props winked.  "Cuz I bet they soared waaaaay into outer space last night!  Heehee!"

	"Unnngh..."  Eagle face-hooved intensely.  "My dear sweet gentle puppy-nuzzling Spark..."

	At last, Rainbow Dash stepped out, followed by Roarke.

	"Welcome back, ladies!"  Props flung a forelimb around Ebon Mane as she grinned proudly.  "Want Ebony here to cook you up some love grub?  Bet you're hungry after all... that... exercise..."

	Rainbow Dash trotted briskly past them.

	Props blinked curiously at her.  "Uhhhhhhh..."

	Ebon winced, whispering in Props' ear.  "Maybe the honeymoon went south?"

	"How come?"  Props whispered back.  "Do Rainbow and Roarke have mountain ice melting in the north?"

	"Uhhhh... hi there... Rain...bow?"  Eagle Eye waved weakly as the pegasus marched past him.

	She nearly plowed over Pilate and Bellesmith as the two approached the lower door of the stairwell.  They witnessed quietly as Rainbow opened the hatch to the engine room door and made her way through.

	"That's... rather odd," Belle said.

	"Did Rainbow just walk past us?"

	"And how."  Belle nodded.  "If only you could see the look on her face."

	"Angry?  Sad?"

	"Just... blank."

	"Well, this may be a side of Rainbow we don't know."

	"How do you mean?"

	"Shhhh..."  Pilate hissed.  "I smell metal..."

	Right at that precise moment, Roarke shuffled up.  Unlike Rainbow, she came to a stop, fidgeting, but not quite looking at either of the two beloveds.

	"Roarke... how is... I mean... erm..."  Belle fumbled for words.  "Oh dear..."

	"Is everything alright, Roarke?" Pilate asked.

	Roarke clenched her teeth, but nevertheless her voice carried through.  "I... d-don't know," she said in a strangely quiet tone.

	"Roarke..."  Belle smiled.  "As you well know, it's a tiny ship."  She suppressed a giggle.  "Please don't give us the awkward task of finding out on our own."

	"I... I..."  Roarke squirmed where she stood.  Her muzzle contorted.  Slowly—like a bending tree—she turned towards the two.  "I think th-there may be something wrong with her."

	"In what way?" Pilate asked.

	"It... I don't..."  Roarke bit her lip.  Clearing her throat, she took one bold step towards the two, her head tilted downward.  "If there was a way... anyway that... th-that..."

	"Roarke..."  Belle trotted forward and clasped one of the mare's hooves with her own.  She smiled into the pony's lenses.  "We would be more than happy to help."

	Roarke said nothing.  Slowly, gently, she just nodded.

	"You can stay by our side if you like," Belle added.

	Roarke gulped and said in a raspy tone:  "Indeed."

	"Come on."  Belle motioned with her head.  "I bet she's in her hammock by now."

	"I beg to differ," Pilate said as she followed the two into the engine room.

	"Huh?"  Belle glanced back.  "What makes you say that?"

	The zebra's ears twitched.  "Can't you hear the rustling of paper?"



	Rainbow's hooves rummaged throughout the interior of the navigation room.  She yanked books off shelves, flung folders open, and searched through every drawer.

	"Come on... come on..."

	Not for one second did she cease tearing the place apart.

	"Come on come on come on!"  She hissed at herself.  "I just need a blank sheet!  Any sheet!  Yes!"  At last, she stumbled upon a rolled-up map with a pure white back to it.  She spread the thing open on the desk and squatted before it.  Feeling around the table, she yanked a pen loose, dipped it in an ink well, and began drawing with her map.

	She was about halfway done when Roarke, Belle, and Pilate showed up.  Not long after, Props, Eagle Eye, and Ebon Mane stuck their heads through the engine room door.

	Roarke leaned in towards Belle and Pilate.  "She's been... mmmm... obsessing with a strange symbol all morning."

	Belle leaned towards her.  "Was this before or after the—"

	Roarke glared.

	"Ahem.  Right."  Belle leaned back.  "Let's just... see what becomes of this."

	"I can hear you guys," Rainbow droned while in mid-sketch.  "And if that's Roarke's tense breaths I hear right next to you, just tell her to relax.  I'm not crazy.  I swear."

	Everypony glanced at Roarke, who then glanced at the bulkheads, frowning.  Clearing her throat, Props shuffled up.  "Uhhh... whatcha drawin', Dashie?"

	"That's what I'm hoping to find out."  Rainbow sniffed and sniffed.  "Is that eggs I smell in your mane?"

	"Derrrrrr—"

	"Goddess, I'm famished!  I could eat a whole bowl full of carrots.  Stalks and all."

	"Jee..." Ebon smiled.  "I wonder why—mmfmfmmff!"  He gagged siddenly on Eagle's lavender tail.

	"Hrmmm... c-can't quite get the color down," Rainbow said.  "But it'll have to do for now."  She finally leaned back from what she had just hastily scribbled onto the back of the map in black ink.  "Pilate, would you mind doing that voodoo you do?"

	"Huh?  Oh... uhm..."  The zebra trotted forward, activating O.A.S.I.S.  "By all means."  The sphere floated up and levitated over the desk.  "I do hope you haven't just vandalized one of Mr. Floydien's treasured maps."

	"Odds are I only defaced one of several Ledomaritan provinces," Rainbow droned.  "The dayum elk can cry me a river.  You scanning yet?"

	"Patience, dear friend," Pilate said.  "Trying to take it all in..."

	"That's a fancy diagram, Rainbow," Eagle said.

	"If you say so."

	"How'd you knock it out so fast?"

	"Well, army guy, if you must know—I can't stop friggin' seeing it."

	"Ptooie!"  Ebon rubbed his fuzzy muzzle.  "Seeing it?"

	"Like..."  Props blinked.  "It's in this room?"

	"Did I or did I not tell you that I ain't crazy?"

	"Eheheh...well..."

	Rainbow swiveled in the chair and pointed past the observation room beyond the door.  "It's over there."

	"Towards the bow?"

	"East.  And it won't go away."

	"Wait..."  Belle leaned forward.  "You mean, like a beacon, Rainbow Dash?"

	"This isn't like any of the machine world flames I've seen before," Rainbow said.  She gulped and curled her hooves to her chest.  "I can—like—see it with my eyes shut."

	"But... only when you face east?"

	"More or less.  It's super freaky, and it's not aligned with the Sun."

	"So, swing your hammock westward!"  Ebon said with a grin.

	Rainbow turned and glared at him.

	"Aaaaaaaaaaaand shuttingupnow," Ebon squeaked, hiding behind a smirking Eagle Eye.

	"Why you seeing it now out of nowhere?" Props asked.

	"I... I really don't know."

	"Rainbow, we can't rightly expect all of this 'Austraeoh' business to function with total rhyme and reason," Belle said.

	"Can't we, though?"  Rainbow stared at her.  She then pivoted towards Roarke.  "Hey, Roarke, you there, girl?"

	The ex bounty hunter jolted.  "Hmmm?"  She looked up.

	"Just making sure you're still with me."  Rainbow smirked.

	"Yes, Rainbow," Roarke said with a nod.  "I am still with you."

	Ebon glanced at Roarke, then at Rainbow Dash.  He remained silent.

	"O... kay..."  Pilate licked his lips as the manasphere stopped flickering over the table and retreated back to his metal choker.  "I do believe I have it."

	"Good!"  Rainbow swiveled to face him, her face bright and curious.  "Focus on it with them mimetic stripes of yours!"  Her eyes narrowed.  "Do you recognize it at all?"

	Pilate's brow furrowed in deep thought.

	"Foxtaur... Stratopolis...?"  Rainbow gulped.  "...the tome?"

	"I... d-do believe... I have seen it before," Pilate said.

	"For real?"

	"Indeed.  If I recall, this particular symbol showed up on rare occasions, and almost exclusively when there was also an occurrence of the Eljunbyro and Odrsjot characters."

	"Is that so?"  Belle blinked.  "I wonder why."

	"Is there a connection?" Rainbow asked.  "Like... what could it mean?"

	"I..."  Pilate winced.  "I am sorry, Rainbow, but I cannot say.  The patterns don't hold any meaning to me."

	"Do you at least know what it could mean in Xonan?" Rainbow asked.

	"'Yaefaerda,"' Kera mumbled, her mouth full of eggs.

	Everypony swiveled to face the little filly.

	"Yiffy what now?" Rainbow balked.

	Kera gulped and scooped another clump of scrambled eggs from the levitating plate beside her.  "'Yaefaerda,'" she repeated, pointing at the drawing with her floating fork.  "At least, that's what Nightshade taught me... before I single-hoofedly blew her popsicle stand!"

	"Wait... You escaped Nightshade Industries alone?" Props gasped.  A blink.  "You stole my breakfast?!"

	"Hey, you snooze, you lose."  Kera burped.  "Or... mrmmmfff... in your coltfriend's case, you snooze and ooze.  Heeheehee—BURRP!"

	Pilate sighed long and hard.  "I'm going to have a very long talk with that stallion..."

	"But... like..."  Rainbow fidgeted, glancing anxiously at Kera.  "You have any clue what the word means?"

	Kera shrugged.  "I'unno."  She took another bite and trotted into the next room.  "Didn't know what 'Odrsjot' was all about until it came up and bit me!"

	Rainbow Dash stared after her.  She sighed, slumping against the table as her ruby eyes traced the lines and circles.  "Nnnngh... just what I need.  More of this crap."

	"Relax, Rainbow."  Belle said, resting a hoof on the mare's shoulder.  "At least you knew to be on top of it!"

	"And it's not as though we're completely in the dark," Pilate said with a smile.  "At least now we have a name to go by."

	"Mrmmf... thanks to Kera."

	"Heheh... yes... as always... thanks to Kera."

	"No need to be anxious, Dashie!"  Props slid in with a grin.  "You're used to this, aren't ya?  Besides... pffft... it's not like you've got a half-dozen more of these discover or anything silly like that!"

	A dull pair of ruby eyes glared at Props.

	The blonde mare stared with a frozen grin.  "... ... ...I'm gonna go try contacting Unky Prowsy again!"  And she swiveled about and marched into the engine room.

	"We're... uh... going to help her," Eagle said, trotting out of the room.

	Ebon blinked.  "We are?  Eep!"  He felt himself being tugged away.  The engine room door closed behind them.

	Meanwhile, Belle was leaning in and whispering something to Pilate.  Pilate murmured something back, then tilted his ears towards Roarke.  After a knowing nod, he pivoted Rainbow's way.  "We can discuss this another time.  Shall we tell Floydien to embark for Val Roa once again?"

	"Uhhhh... yeah, sure."  Rainbow nodded.  "Totally."

	"Very well then."  The couple trotted out.

	"And... y'know..."  Rainbow waved, smiling.  "Thanks.  As always."

	"Hmmm..."  Belle smiled back.  "Don't thank just us."  And she and Pilate left, leaving the door slightly cracked.

	Swallowing, Rainbow twirled around.  She looked at Roarke.

	Roarke looked at her.

	"Hey..."  Rainbow said, waving.

	Roarke's head tilted forward and back.  "Greetings."

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow, but she nevertheless cleared her throat and said, "I... uhm... I-I'm sorry for... like... m-making things so awkward... j-just now."  She gulped.  "I really... really wanted to avoid an awkward morning at all costs."

	"Awkwardness was inevitable," Roarke droned.

	"Oh?"  Rainbow looked up with doe eyes.  Her ears folded as she glanced down.  "Oh..."  She fidgeted in her seat.  "Oh, yeah... I guess so.."

	Silence.

	At last, Roarke drifted forward,  She tossed her mane until a few slender braids cascaded over her shoulder.  She presented them before Rainbow Dash.  "Here..."

	"...?"  Rainbow glanced curiously at the gesture.

	"You... do enjoy toying with them so much," Roarke said softly.  "It seems to make things... less awkward."

	Rainbow blinked.  "Hmmm..."  Her fuzzy cheeks turned rosy.  "Yeah.  But I can think of a faster way to do the same thing."

	"Hmm?  What is that—?"  Roarke wheezed as Rainbow flew over and hugged her tightly, nuzzling the mare cheek to cheek.

	"Therrrrre..."  Rainbow hummed with their muzzles together.  "Does that get the stiffness out?"

	Roarke exhaled.  "In a manner of speaking..."

	"Heeheehee... dang it, girl!  We gotta work on loosening that tongue of yours!"

	"Hrmmm.  You would certainly be the expert on that."

	"Huh?"  Rainbow blinked and leaned back.  "What do you mean by—"

	Roarke's muzzle was curved.

	Rainbow twitched.  She rolled her eyes.  "Ungh!  Dang it!"  She ran a hoof through her mane as she chuckled.  "I did not see that coming."

	"Neither did I last evening."

	"Gah!  Double-header!"  Rainbow giggled and draped her neck against Roarke's shoulder as her wings flapped.  "Hehehehe... I'm digging this already."

	"In that case, so am I."

	"Mmmmmhmmm..."

	The two leaned against each other in silence.

	At last, Rainbow gulped and spoke in a quiet voice.  "Roarke... whatever this glowy-light business is... I-I'm going to get to the bottom of it, okay?"

	"I believe you."  Roarke's lenses retracted.  "Why so emphatic about it?"

	"I mean... in case you're... in case you were feeling—"

	Roarke raised a hoof and rested it around the back of Rainbow's neck.  "Not any longer."

	Rainbow stared at her with glossy eyes.  She smiled sweetly, murmuring "Good" in a breathless tone.  She made herself weightless, allowing Roarke to draw her closer so that she nestled herself tightly against the nape of Roarke's neck.

	Which gave the metal mare the opportunity she needed to exhale heavily through her nostrils, bestowing the bulkheads behind Rainbow Dash a tight, pale expression.

	
		//------------------------------//
		// The Journey?  Or the Destination?		//------------------------------//

	"I've flown around in many pretty circles, but—I'm tellin' ya, lassie—I haven't had much luck in recruiting brave ponies to our cause!"

	"Really?"  Props leaned in towards the microphone of her communications array.  "Why is that?"

	"Yer a smart girl!  Do I really have to explain it to ya, Propsicle?"  Prowse's voice echoed across the bulkheads of the engine room.  "It's a wee bit hard to trot up to random equines and say, 'Oy, there's a distant kingdom under threat from a shape-shifting death queen.  Would ya kindly mind trottin' on board my dead friend's manaship so we could get the drop on her now that her drones have skipped off to oblivion?!'"

	Zaid cleared his throat.  "Well, when you put it that way..."

	"Where've you been seeking help, Unky Prowsy?" Props asked.  "Pleast don't say Gray Smoke."

	"Ach, no!  Them buggers can choke on their own farts for all I care!  I've been makin' me flights around eastern Luxmare!  But, with peace bein' the new big thing'n'all now, it's tough to talk ponies into fightin' for something on a continent far away!"

	"You sure of that?"  Zaid smirked.  "That continent has its fair share of idiots."

	"Aye, and you speak from experience, don't ya, laddie?"

	Props frowned.  "Hey!  Don't be so snippy with Zaidy Waidy!"

	"With who?"

	Props suddenly blushed.  Her blue eyes blinked.  "Uhhhh... uhhhhmm..."

	The microphone whined as Zaid leaned over and tilted it towards his muzzle.  "Ahem.  How about taking a right turn and giving the Xonans a shot?"

	"Ehhh?"

	Zaid shrugged.  "If those dudes could believe a big glowy doom dragon was their goddess incarnate, they'll believe anything!  I'd say have a go!"

	"Hmmm... I haven't seen any of those tattooed blokes since I dropped off Arcshod and his Queen.  But, now that I think about it, that could very well be the best plan."

	"There ya go!"  Zaid turned and smirked at Props.  "That time I was speaking from experience."

	Props grinned back.

	Prowse's voice crackled:  "How about your journey, lassie?  For a solid week there, I couldn't reach you for the life of me!  Had me worried sick!"

	"Erm... y-yeah."  Props grinned nervousy.  "I'm soooooo super sorry about that, Unky Prowsy.  We had to make a detour into this realllllllly snazzy crater for Rainbow Dash's sake.  But we're out of it and we're on our way to Val Roa again."

	"You made a detour for Rainbow Dash, huh?"

	"Yup yup yup!"

	"Lemme tell you something, lassie..."  A crackling sound, and then Prowse's voice became suddenly clearer.  "When it comes to that spritely haired pony of yours, there ain't no such thing as a 'detour.'  The way I see it—she saved all of our lives back in Stratopolis.  She is the journey.  Stick to her like soot and you'll be just fine."

	"Don't you worry one bit!" Zaid said with a grin.  "We're clinging to Rainbow Dash every wing-flap of the way!  Especial